This place was just ok in my opinion. My family loved their food but i did not . I ordered sauted chicken w broccoli and a side with brown rice. My main dish was good but the rice disappointed me it s dry and some rices were uncooked. I wasted 2 for that bowl of rice. So disappointing and probably never come back!
Very disappointed. I ordered a acai bowl and asked if I could add shredded coconut to it. However when my bowl came out there was only shredded coconut on it and pumpkin seeds which were not supposed to be on it. There was no fruit like the description had said plus it was 11.50 for not that big of a portion. I did not pay 12 dollars for a smoothie bowl that did not contain goji berries bananas strawberries and blueberries. Outrageous prices for food that is mediocre. Will NOT be returning.
I heard a lot about this place. Fresh this fresh that. One of the most nasty burgers I have had. Grease and more grease and if you want grease fries they have them. Not for my family or me. None of us like the food
Went there Sunday night and got in free and fast because we were a on the guest list via Chad Dallas at Body English and b 2 girls. We did a tour of the place and waited and waited for the music and the dance crowd to get started. The dance floor was small and only 1 guy was dancing with a lot of girls grinding each other in boas. It was Mardi Gras night instead of the typical school girl night although we did see 1 school girl making her way to the back. We just were not feeling in and left about 25 minutes later to find a big line gathering. The decor was nice but I was not impressed with their central chandelier which supposedly cost 250 grand.
Sorry not worth the very disappointed. Tanks should have more colorful fish especially the carousel where the diver talks to the people below the water. The tank for the sea lions was not large enough for that many animals. I was sad to see them so confined. The otter exhibit was attractive to toddlers however the other tanks were just so so. The area for eating smelled like algae and we decided not to eat there. No where near the level of Monterrey Aquarium. I might go back once a year but not regularly. Will say the outside court yard was very attractive and many places are yet to open. I was disappointed in the aquarium itself.
This is not a good Dairy Queen. Almost every time I ve tried to go I get the worst customer service. The employees are all very rude and uncaring of their job. The only time I ve gone once was when a guy took our order and he joked and talked to me and my friend. Every other time I m greeted with rudeness from a bunch of high schoolers. I will not be coming back.
My therapist did not listen to what I wanted done. He kept rubbing me so hard that I thought I was getting an Indian Burn. The stones were not even hot. He did not cover my feet. And when he applied hot towels they just seeped onto the towels I was laying on so it kept me damp and cold for the remaining of my 2hr session. He did massage me like he was in a hurry hence the Indian Burn. And I was so disappointed that I honestly had numerous thoughts of leaving during my treatment because it was so awful!!! And so I really did not want to tip...and I think it s so so strange for the therapist to hover over you when you check out. When I explained myself during check out she was not accommodating at all. It s like she shun me for letting her know how unhappy I was. So she took it upon herself to tip my therapist for me. She said He works hard. Ye apparently so hard it hurt! Do not try to shame me I work in the tip industry. I do not cry when I do not get tipped. Side note tips are based on your service.
I usually get gasoline here. Not a very well kept location. Rebel needs to invest into cleaning up their locations. The credit receptacles do not always work at the pumps.
I have never been to a bail bonds before and not sure of how they work and thank god i have never needed one till this morning... i got there at 4 20 Am and after all the paperwork which was 2 pages plus like 4 of signing only and once i paid my 15 down plus their 50 fee .. it was 4 58 am i asked when will he be let out he quoted me 4 8 hours .. like i m confused i thought it would be an hour or two.. but i left a bit sad and confused. he said he would walk across to drop off the paperwork which is literally next block .. well it was already noon and nothing so i called the jail itself asking for a time frame and that s when they said they have not received anything!!! .. furious i called them a lady answered and said the bail was received by the jail at 6 28 Am .. an hour and a half after i left .. but once i called the pre trial i believe it s called they said they have not received anything and now it s 12 45 pm .. after playing phone tag she faxed them the paperwork and he got it and as of right now he s still there about to be 12 hours .. i do not recommend this place at all un very un professional
In a word nostalgia. The food is not bad but there are so many great restaurants in Las Vegas that you really should not waste your time on overpriced and mediocre food like Rao s. If you are from NY and ca not get a table there maybe it will serve some emotional purpose for you. But take your money and go to Bouchon instead.
Do not bother. Yes I know I go to a steak house. Yes I know I am going to drop some coin. Yes I know there is a celebrity s name attached to the place so I am paying a bit for that as well. Yes I am fine with that.......... For that I can expect excellent service a well paced meal superb food knowledgeable staff and a comfortable setting. Except we got 1 out of 5......... Never got to the main course we experienced ignorance and indifference from both staff and manager . So we walked out after the appetizers. No sense in throwing good money after bad.
They were scheduled to deliver my fridge before a holiday weekend but decided to begin their Independence Day early and did not bother showing up at all. No phone call no nothing. I m now without a fridge until Tuesday. Do not waste your time with this company. Poor customer service is an understatement. If you can avoid them please do.
Worst services. Sat for 15 minutes before we received our menus. Waited 10 minutes still did not have our drinks and never took our order. We left told them it was because of their lack of service. They acted like they could careless.
Pedicure was nothing special. The technician did not use any type of cuticle remover on the nails before pushing the cuticles back. No scrub was used for the legs and feet I left out with rough heels from the cheese grater that was used over wet skin. Massage was with little effort or care. Not relaxing at all!! The polish looked good but I could have polished my own nails for less than 25.
Last night we decided to try this place out since we use to go to Pasand all the time. Upon arriving you can tell they did a major renovation of the place. We were the first to be seated in our section but the LAST to be served. Our meal turned out to be a two hour dinner our server was no where to be found and the owner was as clueless as the staff. We noticed that all the natives were served first before everyone else which is a HORRIBLE way to do business. The food was decent when we got it 75 minutes after we were first seated. It took 15 minutes to ask someone to get our bill and when the so called server returned he did not even bring one. They are lucky that I did not dine and dash but I bet that they would not have even noticed. The service needs to improve or they wo not last. But I would not even waste your time or money going here because they honestly do not care about improving.
Sorry but the food is no where near Karachi food so please if you do not want to be compared then take the Karachi out of your name Secondly they should mention take away food only no eat in. Because I did not see any sign and was not aware of it. Lastly apart from good quality taste quantity is really less as well.
do not use your credit card here. mine got copied and sold !!!
My order for Zen was a complete disappointment after the good reviews I d seen on the delivery site. The bento box was inedible except for some of the pieces of shrimp which could be salvaged from the sickly sweet overpowering sauce. The fried rice was just yellow and hard with no flavor or discernible trace of vegetables. The egg roll was all fried dough with barely any filling and the General Tso s chicken was all breading and in a weird sweet sauce. I guess that s just what you get for that bargain price of 8 10 for this combination. On the other hand the shrimp with broccoli was okay at best . The portion was large and came with plenty of shrimp. The sauce was too sweet and gooey for my tastes but it was edible. The steamed rice at least was done right not at all hard like many Chinese takeout places. I would not order from here again due to the terrible bento box.
Bad food and bad service. I witnessed them Microwave my beef and broccoli. The pho was mediocre. Horrible waiters who complain about each other in front of patrons about their tips. The Monte Carlo should shut this place down and replace entirely. Never been more disgusted by a Vegas restaurant.
So as I strolled through the Phoenix Airport I moved passed the regular fast food breakfast fare and came across Matt s Big Breakfast and thought this is the place. The tables were packed and the to go line seemed to be moving quickly. I checked my phone 25 30 minutes to boarding STARTED read over the menu Breakfast Burrito for the win and got in line. The young guy working as very nice despite the fact he was obviously SLAMMED. I should ve taken the clue that 1 guy taking all the orders pouring all the coffee and having to run around the bar to pick up the to go food was a harbinger of issues to come but I forged on. He took my name and gave me my receipt. As time continued to pass I started forgetting who ordered what and when and I noticed the crowd outside of the restaurant continued to grow and grow and grow. It was cool though I still had 20 minutes left. Around the 25 minutes of waiting mark I figured it was time to see if I was close. As I waited in the line AGAIN to check the status of my food I noticed that 3 of the 7 people in the line were doing the same thing. I reached the front informed the clerk that I NEEDED my food because I d waited 30 minutes and my plane was boarding soon. He informed me my food was up soon. I waited about 7 8 more minutes after that and was handed my burrito. No bag no napkin. Just the burrito. As I ran off I overheard another lady requesting a refund because she could not wait for her food anymore. Once I finally boarded my plane and had to check my bag because I was one of the last 5 people to enter it I was ready to eat. The burrito itself was meh at best. The standout was the bacon it was amazing and it was obviously this was not some low cost meat I found myself wishing the rest of the burrito emulated this taste. It did not . The eggs had next to no flavor and were oily and I m about 90 sure the potatoes were cooked in some form of olive oil as well because that s the only taste they had. Overall I wished I had as great an experience as everyone else who sat down ate and reviewed however I was not so lucky. Beyond having a friendly person the express counter was a joke 40 minutes that s good right? and the burrito beyond the bacon completely lacked flavor. Maybe it was just a bad day I attended but I do not know if I ll roll the dice again. If you go make sure you have an hour plus and skip the burrito.
This place sucks. Locals trying to run the pool tables they even took the balls off the table as a friend and I were playing. It s cheap that s the only plus
I have been going to Spectators Bar for 2 yrs and I love the people there but then Bobby Q Grille came in and at first I thought this would be a good thing...... I was wrong. The owner is rude to loyal customers of the bar his customer service skills are certianly lacking alot. The food is ok sometimes if you like it very spicy. Because of the Management of the Bobby Q s I will never order food there again. Let me say that the waitresses and bar staff are wonderful and it really is to bad that one person has to spoil it!!!!
Always pho noodle soup soup not so good feels like a lot of msg noodle portion is small beef small portion as well note they do not have the tradition set up correctly......they cook the sprouts already.....
I stopped in Bob s Diner on a Sunday evening around 12 30pm wanting to grab a late breakfast. The place was packed. We had to wait for a table for about 10 minutes once we were seated at a table. It took the wait staff about 5 minutes to clean the table from the last customers. The waitress warned us that our food would take a long time. We figured it would be longer than normal but we were fine with waiting. We ended up waiting 55 minutes to get our food once we were seated. It was awful. There were not even a lot of other customers. We ordered the blueberry pancakes to share and a bacon mushroom and cheese omelette. Unfortunately the food was not the best. It was awful. But it was not worth waiting 55 minutes. I m disappointed because I love the Bob s Donut Shop in the McKees Rocks. I wo not be going back any time soon.
Worst service of all the cell phone companies. It is honestly like going back in time you cannot use data and phone at the same time. Actual service is horrible and God forbid you actually have to contact them. Thank God T Mobile bought them out
Very weak knock off of Chicago style pizza. Had an at best generic tasting Caesar salad followed by a stuffed crust pizza. Not even remotely as good as Giordano s. Crust was ok and the pizza sauce was bitter. Inside of pizza was lukewarm. Definitely not a return for me.
BUYER BEWARE IS MY ADVICE! When they say they cover something you best ask for specifics and the actual contract you can not take the Sales Person s word. No value look elsewhere!!!!
Ken is the owner of all three. His taste in music is bad so you ll have to suffer with 1940 s hillbilly banjo music he apparently thinks is country? I like country...Willie Nelson George Strait etc. Not that stuff. That was in the day last week. Then at night recently they overserved a guy who thought it was ok since he could barely sit on a barstool to lean all over me. No. Not ok. They know now that I would not accept that as a paying polite patron of the place. I ve now been kicked out because I got loud about drunk dude. All three? What a wimpy stupid place to drink a beer and eat wings. The watresses are sexy! And know it! Bye strange acting bar. Dirty Blonde Tavern.....A REAL bar
Decided to give this newer restaurant a try for brunch with my girlfriend. We decided to sit at the communal table towards the back. Our waiter informed us that if the place started filling up he d have to sit people at the table with us which we were fine with. As we were taking our coats off and getting settled my girlfriend sat next to me and the waiter quickly returned snapping at us that we were not allowed to sit next to each other and had to sit on opposite sides of the table. I could understand that if we were taking up the entire table how this would be an issue but we were not and were just sitting together at the end of the table. The waiter s entitled rude and downright condescending attitude was enough for us so we decided to pass on this place. Being talked down to as if you re children and being scolded for sitting the way you want to sit at a table is unacceptable. Avoid this place until it goes under or changes management as changeover tends to happen quickly at this spot.
Terrible! Has the worst scheduling process and low availability. Scheduled 2 weeks in advance online only by force drove 17 miles waited 15 minutes forced to txt for a response returned call on restricted was on vacation and did not bother to check her schedule and left me hanging. EXTREMELY DISAPPOINTED ! No respect for peoples time. Ca not handle her own business and then deleted my post on her fb business page instead of dealing w comments good or bad!
Chris Douglas Service Advisor did not follow up 5X while replaced Starter twice and never resolved starter grinding issue. If you like being lied to miss lead never any follow through double talk. I ll get back to you means Your on your own. Arrogant Condebsending unprofessional. Never Again.
I ordered a smoked turkey sandwich. Besides the fact that the sandwich was small the turkey was under cooked pink and tasted awful. There was no sauce on the sandwich either just turkey some greens and tomatoes. One other thing I noticed at the restaurant was that their prices online tasteaway do not reflect the in store prices. The sandwich was 10 online and 8.50 in store. Will not order from this restaurant again.
Being Chinese myself I did not expect much from these types of establishments but this one was particularly horrible. Was there for a quick lunch and ended up leaving with our stomachs empty. Congee had traces of metal wool cleaners. Sent it back and the second one had even more in them. Fried turnip cake turned bad and was sour. Table was not properly wiped off after the last sitting. Will never return to this location.
Use to love Pullano s but the quality is really bad. It s never busy and they do not care about the food they provide to their customers. Truly sad.
Very disappointing. Recommended by a neighbor. Out of 20 weeks of regular service they showed up on their scheduled day 15 times out of 20 times. Usually there was no text or warning they were not coming. They also do not seem equipped to answer basic pool questions. Sometimes the pool was sparkling and sometimes there was algae the day after they cleaned and chemicaled the pool. No longer my company.
Food is good but loaded with sodium. I ve had the turkey burger fried pickles and atomic fries. Make sure you drink lots of water to counter act the salt explosion in your mouth and have some tums ready. I would not go there if my friend did not absolutely love this place.
This was awful today brown rice was so dry as was Beijing beef. Really bad ! I should have known . I was sick an hour later . We will not be back to this one !
The food was great and we loved the ambiance. Service was poor. After we were sat down no one showed up to wait on us. Even after we asked for some attention it took some time to get service. I do not blame our waitress. She was nice and attentive. She did disappear for an extended period to wrap silverware but was overall pretty good. Instead I think the restaurant is lacking management. Many of the waiter and waitress staff was standing around discussing personal drama. Pro tip this really looks bad to your customers.
The ambiance is nice. Cool outside area. Food not so much. Everything has too much sugar on it. sugar on their carrots. sugar on their meat. etc... You have to pay for bread. Yep thats right. We went there around Thanksgiving. They said they had just altered their menu. Did not care for it at all.
Unhygienic is the word I can use for this restaurant. Almost all the dishes they had were dirty. Then my friend found a human hair in chicken curry. After complaining to manager the owner came apologized once and thats it. Then I went to have salad and found alive cockroach crawling on food containers. On complaining to the owner she said The cockroach was not big sir . Wow does that really matter if it was big or not. Second statement from her was Sir it happens in all restaurant and not just here. Really! she was trying to justify everything. While I was still talking to her she started attending another customer now this is unprofessional. Am surely not going to this place again.
I been here for almost 4 month and I will be breaking my lease. There was numerous problems with my apartment when I moved in and they still have not be fixed I have called them many times to come fix whats wrong and they have been over once only to look. the rent it not worth it here save your money and go somewhere else
This is probably one of the most disappointing meals we ve had from a chef of this high caliber. Perhaps because the restaurant is newly opened and the menu has not been perfected well that is still no excuse for overcooking beef ? Unlike the other low rating reviewer service was really good for us. ambiance and table seating and arrangement was also not an issue. The only problem we had was entirely on the food. I like the different tasting dishes but some times it felt really disjointed and confused as if it lacked something to tie all the small dishes together. The langoustine tasting was quite fun and interesting. While some of the dishes were amazing others were like huh? And the sake shot? I was like..hum...not sure why they are doing a shot of sake when they just sold us a bottle of really expensive wine...did not really enhance the langoustine or the overall tasting experience. My husband s steak was overdone. He ordered rare and the beef came out barely pink. We did not want to send it back and just decided to concentrate on my venison which was prob one of the best I have ever had. The dessert tasting was fun and exciting. It was like a flirtatious girl all dressed up ready for a night on the town. Lots of bling and once again many of the components did not really make sense all together. This sounds really silly but the warm baguette served before our meal was awesome not baked in house...but super tasty ! I was really hoping for so much more...
An unfortunate incident occurred at the Delano Nov 30 2015. Cockroaches were found in the Delano bathroom near the toilet on the 26th floor. Housekeeping came and confirmed. Delano staff said they NEVER bold claim have pests and blamed me or other previous guests for bringing the pests in. After being told that we would be contacted by the front desk or that a supervisor would come none of which did I am disturbed by the lack of procedure and training across the guest services group each employee from guest services to housekeeping had a different story. By pretending you ve never seen a pest your staff is not able to improve or avoid these issues. Guest services stated that it is too dry for cockroaches to live here or on the 26th floor. I want to thank the hotel for hiring entomologists in the guest services department to help me understand that I was merely seeing things. Stayed November 2015
Dr Lee is very thorough but overall this office is worth skipping. Each appointment they will find a new procedure needed cavity filling x ray even if you take their dental health advice of changing new toothpaste etc. This office is a waste of time too bad Dr. Lee is part of this group.
This is the 1st and last time I will ever come to this car wash. The cashier inside let me know the price I informed her that I was a lift driver and on the web site there was 10 discount. She said do I have the Id? Or application I could not understand her because her English was not to good. I said all I have is the sticker on the car. I said the guy outside did see it. She said am I outside? At this point I was like what do you want me to do take a picture of the sticker? She said no you are rude I will do for you. I just did not understand that she meant my app on my phone because at no point did she ever reference that. Still there was no need to call a paying customer rude. That is why this place has low ratings very sad.
I went to Bistro Isakaya with my friend although he did not recommended it but I still picked this place because I wanted to eat ramen. And this restaurant happened to be the closest ramen place around McGill University. I remember it was during finals so we wanted to eat something near campus so we can go back to the library and this seemed to be the perfect place... When we entered there were not many customers in the restaurant which was a little bit odd because it was dinner time.. I do not remember what else they offered besides sushi and ramen since I have already made my mind before coming so I did not pay attention to the other things on the menu. I picked their miso ramen and I was very very disappointed. The portion was small I wished they have given more noodles and the soup was pretty bland. I actually preferred Hakata Ramen although their ramen is not authentic to this place. My ramen contained a piece of Naruto fish cake also called Narutomaki some bamboo shoots a baton of carrot which according to a website are Carrot sticks that are 2 to 3 inches long and 1 2 inch by 1 2 inch thick. This is not an official restaurant cut but useful for home cooks green onions seaweed a lot of bean sprouts and a tiny piece of chashu. Conclusion I will not return to Bistro Isakaya for this quality of ramen.
A bad taste in mouth from a broken toilet NO pun intended! rounds 2.5 down instead of up... I was incredibly excited to get back to Vegas and finally my chance to try out the Mirage presented itself booked a badly needed 4 night getaway from the east coast and off I went. Off to a great start with the nicest most helpful check in girl I believe her name was Kara? I have ever experienced the night I arrived. She gave me 2 comparable room choices and explained the subjective tradeoffs in perfect detail. Certainly not in any way her fault that Murphy s Law was in full effect upon my choosing.... poorly. And down hill we go.... For the upper midrange cost involved the similarly priced Mandalay Bay room from my previous trip was the clear cut winner. Hands down. Here at the Mirage I supposedly received a high quality upgraded room nice high floor view with relatively private elevators separate tub and showers his and her bathroom sinks not to mention I became a little more than obsessed with their permanent fish swimming Aquarium Channel automatically preset to welcome the newly arrived guest! but the latter notwithstanding nothing my Mandalay Bay room had not also provided me and then some . So I thought to myself ok you ve dodged another bullet at the least this property wo not be a bad experience and at worst it ll be a solid average ... Waking up from a good night s sleep shocking I know but see footnote at bottom I turned on the shower. Water backs up immediately and I m standing in a filthy over flowing chamber of God knows what. I considered using the tub but that too looked like it had not been cleaned in a while. I make due I get out I get dressed. On my way out I flag housekeeping with my requests the woman gets a supervisor. He assures me they will 1 clean my room shortly as per my request it s early afternoon my DND sign now removed and 2 escalate my grossly plugged shower issue to maintenance and put a priority rush on it. I return late at night having made the mistake of assuming the hotel would do its job. Not surpass expectations just unplug the shower drain hopefully possible! and clean my room for which they had all day to do . Nothing had been done. No choice but to let it all sit for Day 2. By Day 2 Afternoon with no DND sign to have prevented anyone from doing their job still nothing and it s only a freak coincidence that I see Maintenance walking the halls so I have to grab them myself and learn they did not even have me on their agenda. It really bothers me and I feel it should when it takes so much repeated effort to get things resolved. Eventually they get someone called to my room who clears the shower drain with unbridled toilet plunging that sends myriad black mystery particles flying across the bathroom floor not to mention onto myself as well my fault for staying in the room? . I still had to go a whole extra day before a room cleaning that initial request also downright lost ignored forgotten at this point . Ok s it happens I m still willing to accept while trying to have a good time elsewhere... Day 3 the toilet breaks i.e. the handle does not engage . A couple calls and another admittedly nice maintenance man named Harold later this too is resolved by replacing some broken assembly parts. The upshot of all this is too much wasted time and energy to get too many disgusting things resolved. I paid good money to choose The Mirage to spend my precious vacation time... The prevailing feeling is one of being pulled AWAY from rather than BACK for one more try the Mirage and sadly despite the somewhat addictive myVEGAS app s that have earned my commitment to over the ears possibly straw breaking camel s back away from MGM properties in general. All in all there s just too much competition to waste time re frequenting a place that put the aforementioned bad taste in mouth. Other non MGM companies without the myVEGAS LP system to tempt you ultimately make up for it in other ways. Vegas I ll be back hopefully sooner than later! The Rio Paris Treasure Island and Venetian come immediately to mind... I did respond to their email survey noting my complaints but I m not holding my breath on hearing back. Footnote Ending on a high note 1 The pool s quesadillas were quite likely literally the best quesadillas I have ever had in my life and I ve had a lot and 2 The bed so important was admittedly very comfortable. A sincere shame these most excellent points are not enough to override the ever relied upon highly coveted clean and pleasant hotel bathroom experience when traveling. Things happen but sometimes there s just no coming back.
Wow. One of the hottest days of the year and lots of people with battery issues. So slow and the clerk who was here until 5 kept telling everyone his shift was over and he was leaving and someone else would help them. The guy who did help hung up on one person who he claimed he could not understand yet he understood them asking for a manager and then he asks is this a survey I ve been waiting an hour and nothing yet. Just wow. If they appeared to care or hustle at all I d be inclined to be appreciative it is a tough day. But the one guy manning the computers just makes excuses that they only have two mechanics At least one person got in and out ahead of me. This sucks.
I visited Stratum last night 9 17 16 with a group of friends. This was our first time visiting and initially I loved it! The folks at the front counter were patient and willing to work with us as we sat and pondered at our options but then it went downhill from there. We had a 45 minute wait for our game which was no problem so we went into the arcade which was cramped and had a very limited amount of games for what was advertised. The lobby space was constantly crowded as this is where they announced the scores. We could hardly access the bathrooms or front counter when we needed to ask questions. When the employees spoke over the intercom it sounded so whiny and overly loud. Once our game was finally starting 15 minutes later than scheduled! their briefing room could hardly fit everyone 60 people! . The guy running the briefing had no control over the group talked much too quiet and just ran on. When people were trying to come in and join the game he was rude and exclaimed WHY?! so that everyone could hear it. Talk about unprofessional! Once done with the game you go back into the lobby and crowd once again so that you can try and hear your number called by the same person who ca not project. 60 people in one game just does not work. In addition my gun would never work. No matter how I placed my hand on the sensor it hardly ever registered it. How about not using heat sensors and using buttons instead? The reason this got 2 stars was for the initial customer service and because the staff running the parties were very patient with the loud children. All other staff was unprofessional and rude when we asked additional questions. I would not recommend! Pricy for games too!
Their food is alright. But their service is terrible and rude. I m understanding with deliveries but all three times it was a two hour wait the third time I could tell the driver was either drunk or on some sort of drug. Bad bad bad. Wo not spend another dime there.
Not Mexican food! Most boring burrito and tacos ever. Chipotle does a better job. So sad that the burrito was also the most expensive 17 dollars. I think their favorite spice is water. The carnitas seemed boiled. Maybe they should call their burrito a wrap to avoid confusion with real Mexican food? My girlfriend wanted to cry she was born in San Francisco and our favorite tacos came from a truck on East 14th in Oakland California. She said the food from Lopez tasted like how a wet dog smells. I give them two stars because they played awesome music the whole time such as Pixies Bowie Radiohead and our server was good and made reasonable excuses for the food like it s SouthWest not Mexican. And the atmosphere was nice we sat outside friendly staff that works very hard.
I ve stayed here for a company conference once and my experience here could ve been better but hey its a solid yelpn two stars. The rooms here are decent its not too bad. I like their bath and their spacious rooms but the beds could ve been more comfy the sheets are thin and they should upgrade on their comforters. Back in the days I ve always wanted to stay here because of the name and the cool exterior design Pyramid but finally I get to experience the stay and I was like meh? I thought I was gonna stay in Luxury. Cool from the outside and okay inside is the better way to put it. Luxor has an awesome pool especially when you park here and walk before you get inside then you tend to stop and look at people having fun at the water park. Luxor maybe outdated on the comfort level side its better if you can get lucky to stay at a budget price and still enjoy the amenities. This place is connected to Mandalay Place the shopping corridor with Mandalay Bay and tryout their frozen margarita stand before you get into Mandalay Place its pretty good.
High expectations for this new restaurant in our neighborhood. Unfortunately the food was highly disappointing. My eggs were so overcooked they were almost inedible. Props for putting turkey bacon on the menu.
This is another show to avoid watching if you re visiting the Strip. I m huge fans of Penn and Teller and of dark humor so I was hopeful that this show would be enjoyable. Unfortunately the magic is mediocre and it was pretty much a comedy routine. I love good comedy but I felt his jokes were so predictable that it was embarrassing. Except at the beginning when he flashed my image on the big screen and labeled me a goat f cker. That was unexpected and kinda funny. You can easily find 50 off tickets on the strip. If you have netflix you could watch his DVD on there instead. I d recommend that you avoid this show entirely and that you choose to see Penn and Teller Rio instead. If you re lucky you can get tickets to that show for 50 off.
wishing we could give this hotel NO stars! from the moment we walked in the doors to the lobby we were greeted with THE WORST customer service by Vanessa... and that was just the start. they had four rooms under my name when we only reserved two. after about an hour we finally get the keys to our rooms and well they did not work. well one of our doors was already open sketchy . there were people hanging around the pool area which mind you the pool had no water and they were clearly not staying at the hotel. we ask vanessa if they normally have people roaming the property like that and she pretty much told us to deal with it because she has to deal with it everyday. we proceed to just simply cancel our rooms and ask for someone to speak with and she said no one was there but her rudely telling us her manager will be there the next day so we can deal with it then. she told us that she does not represent the company so we asked what are you then? and she replied with a representative LOL! we still have yet to get ahold of this mysterious manager Gina Padilla and it s now four days later. we have called numerous times greeted with a rude greeting and attitude by Shatalia or something like that as we ca not understand her rude ass over the phone . clearly this hotel SUCKS ASS and has the WORST customer service i have ever dealt with. who knows if we will get our money back but what we do know is that we will NEVER stay or try to stay here ever again and neither should any of you reading this!!!
Worst H and M EVER! Is this place a joke? It s so small what s the point? I actually found a jacket here one time but the only one in my size was on the mannequin and they refused to take it off and sell it to me. Screw your merchandising team you just lost a customer! Inexpensive or not this place is OVERRATED!
I do not understand all of the excellent reviews this place gets. Either the people who are rating the Irish Wolfhound are there just to drink and do not care about the food to soak up the suds or are imports from elsewhere in the country and have no taste buds. Let me just say Worst. Shepherd s. Pie. Ever. The menu says One of our most popular combinations shepherd s pie and a cup of your choice of soup. Since shepherd s pie is more authentic to Irish traditions than fish n chips I decided to go with that. The soup was OK enough as it at least had some salt. The shepherd s pie? Not even close. A small one cup ramekin half full of whipped potato topping on a base of no salt no flavor ground beef with an occasional knob of carrot or celery? For 10.99? Curry and Chips as an appetizer for 6.99 that has maybe and I stress maaaaybe three small red potatoes sliced into wedges and fried? ARE YOU SERIOUS?? The kitchen got my girlfriend s order wrong even though the waitress wrote down her request to hold the tartar sauce on her fish sliders we watched her as she put pen to paper. I tried doctoring my shepherd s pie with first salt then tabasco then some of the horseradish sauce served with her order of sliders all to no avail. The total bill came to 58 including 10 tip 16.50 of which was our bar tab. Our waitress did not check on our order which was incorrect until my meal was mostly consumed and her fish slider was cold. Shepherd s pie is supposed to be made with lamb not ground beef. It also has peas not celery as part of the base and should have rosemary and tomato paste for body and complexity. There was NO salt NO peas and the thinnest broth imaginable. If this is one of your most popular and you make one of the most traditional Irish fares this piss poor then I ca not trust other reviewers to know what the hell they re talking about when it comes to reviewing the food at this place. This was a one and done. I cannot justify a second attempt when the cost would have been equivalent to a serious steak dinner for two at Logan s Roadhouse Longhorn Steakhouse or Texas Roadhouse and leaving me still hungry.
My Husband went there today and took in 11 500 worth of watches that were appraised 8 months ago. One of them being a Tiffany and Co another Mont Blanc and the last being an Omega. The rude salesman offered him only 1375. That s just a little over 10 for everything s value! What a ripoff! The salesman said they have to make a profit themselves but my Husband briefly told him I know you people have to make a profit but this is just absolutely absurd! He asked for his watches back from the man and walked out! This place does not even deserve 1 star but I had to give it something in order to get my review across.
When a new spot in the downtown north central Phoenix area opens up we historic district folks get quite excited...still too few choices and too few great choices at that. So I was very happy to hear a friend say she went to The Living Room for an after work gathering and really liked it. We went back last night with friends for happy hour. We literally were screaming to hear each other across a small 4 top and asked three times nicely for the music level to be turned down a smidge. Here s the thing we all agreed we d make this a go to spot in the hood for happy hour and easy weeknight dinners. But if they do not get the sound level ambience right it s going to be hard for them to gain a solid and loyal following. Shared a cheese plate and hummus app...all good. Martinis and beers good. Service decent. Living Room has some strong pluses but sound level is going to make it or break it. Love a place feeling alive and full of energy just not fun when you ca not hear to have good conversation with the folks sitting at your table. After just over an hour of the ridiculous shouting we left and went to Tuck Shop for a wonderful fun delicious dinner with our friends 90 plus tip that Living Room lost . So Living Room are you a DJ driven music spot wanna be or a neighborhood wine cafe and lounge? A nod to Postino for getting the sound food ambience mix just right.
Worst experience ever. We were going to the Phil Collins show at the Q. Walked into this place to eat and get a drink. Food smelled great. Looked lively with people. Let s give it a try. There was no sign saying seat yourself or wait for hostess or whatever. So after 5 mins of trying to flag someone down we talked to the bartender. He was very rude and said.... are you a table of 6? We said no just the 2 of us. He said then I have no room for you . We said there are tables open just not cleaned.... and.... he interrupted and said are you 6? No. Then I have nothing. OK there were open tables. We saw a couple leave as we entered. There were 3 open tables plus the 6 table. If you do not have room or there is a wait or your short handed or whatever there is 1000 ways to say that nicely without being an ass. No reason to be a jerk. I am pretty easy going and give people the benefit. Do not be a jerk and alienate me when you could pick a few better words to communicate with me. This guy was a class A jerk! I will never eat there. And I m telling all of you not to eat there. There are a few hundred places within walking distance. Go anywhere else. Seriously this is what kills a good businesses employees who do not communicate well or are having a bad day taking it out on customers that have no clue about your issues. Be nice. Even when it s hard. You never know who your being mean to I could be a key customer that brings a group party to your business or your boss someday or something important. Do not be a jerk!
I hear it s much better here if you have a few drinks...maybe to keep your mind off the rude bartender whom actually snapped at me when picking up a to go order ....I m giving my money to Compound Grill now instead!
My family and I were on vacation in Canada. We decided to give Parc Safari a look. It cost 160 for a family of four to get in. We immediately went to the safari and had a pleasant enough time. We then went to go to the waterpark but it thundered and the park closed the waterpark section. We were there 5 hours and it kept thundering. This also means that most of the animals are brought indoors due to the weather which is completely understandable. On the way out I stopped as customer service and asked if there would be anyway I could come back the next day and visit the water park due to it being closed due to the weather. Customer service said they do not handle those requests onsite I would have to send an email to Parc Safari. Obviously I would not be able to get a voucher in 24 hours to go back because we were scheduled to go home so I emailed them after my trip. They ignored my first email then when they followed up they asked for a receipt which I supplied not sure how I managed not to lose it and then waited for three weeks. After 3 emails they responded that they would not give me a discount or a return trip ticket for a future date because I received a discount upon entering the park of 4.50 per person. This was incorrect. I paid 38.95 for each adult and 25.95 for each child along with safari food and taxes and these prices match up to exactly what was on the website. When I asked how I received a discount they began to ignore me. To me even with being able to see the whole park but not get into the water section the price is way to high for what they offer. God forbid it rains or you have to deal with their corporate office it would be a complete nightmare. I have given up emailing them and waiting for response and decided to post my disgust here on YELP.
I think Fresh and easy should go to Trader Joes and learn how to set up a little market. They have very little to offer and use their space terribly. No wonder they are closing so many stores. Besides from there sales they are also overpriced but the employees are very nice.
Mauvaises expriences rptition. Belle terrasse.. j aimerais voir autre chose cet emplacement.
OK yes the beer list is incredible. It s an amazing way to try new stuff and find new favorites to add to your drunky ass repertoire. The much discussed Orange Blossom beer is pretty good but not so good I would make a trip out of the way to get it. The food is standard bar food. Well despite the fabu beer list this is just a bar when it comes down to it. Vegetarians take warning eat elsewhere unless a overstuffed not entirely melted cheese quesadilla is your idea of a kick ass meal. To be fair my SO loved his brat and gobbled that sausage down like a pro. I ve always wanted to say that. Our server was helpful and attentive. The ambiance is somewhat non existent and as someone else mentioned the seating layout is fragmented. My biggest beef is with the other customers! I ve been to many a shithole bar and never have my eardrums been so bruised and battered my throat raw from having to scream conversation over the relentless mating calls of the idiot Woo Girls at the dart boards. I mean people were staring. The manager had to ask them to STFU multiple times. And this was before 9 p.m. And they were not 18 with fake IDs these ladies may have been older than me gasp! shudder! . If I wanted to listen to piercing screams while consuming a shitty quesadilla I would have gone to a Filiberto s in Maryvale. Ugh. My SO will have to get his Papago fix on his own.
It is 6 15 pm on a Sunday night .. I got here At 4 50 thinking I would beat the rush .. dining by myself .. the staff was quick to refill my water .. got 3 glasses .. enjoyed my Caesar salad and mussels .. waited 15 minutes .. was handed my bill with no question as to whether I wanted coffee or dessert .. not happy with service . I could understand if they were busy .. but they were not and had 2 waitresses ! I complained when someone finally came .. I ordered desert and coffee .. the dessert was explained to be on the house ..
Imagine... you are on a diet for about 2 weeks and you ve lost a significant amount of weight. Now you re on vacation with your girlfriends and you do not wanna be a party pooper or the stupid downer on a diet so you decide to have a HUGE cheat meal and enjoy really good food with good company possibly undoing 2 weeks worth of starvation. After much deliberation you decide on a buffet wait two hours in line and pay 40 upon entering the restaurant to have what you think will be one of the tastiest meals of your life considering you have not eaten any real food for the past 13 days . I was UTTERLY DISAPPOINTED in their food selections... or lack thereof. I kept walking around the buffet with my plate hoping that more variety of food would magically appear. I wanted sushi so I stood in line in the rolls section to no avail. ...just some sad looking California rolls that consisted of like 90 rice. SADNESS Other than the king crab legs the best thing there was either the scrambled eggs or pesto mashed potatoes. To come out of a buffet and say that their scrambled eggs were one of the best items they offered... is just really really sad.
Well. It s definitely a place that should be quick and on the go unless the staff member does not want to do her job which seemed to be the case in our situation. I bought 4 bottles of water for 21 so if you re looking for cheap do not come here. Find a water fountain or wait for complimentary drinks on your flight.
Guac was good tacos were flavorless and not enjoyable . If you are going to go wait for 1 tacos on taco Tuesday that way you wo not be as disappointed
We celebrated our anniversary there. They welcomed us with an anniversary wish took us to table that had rose petals and a nice anniversary card. All waitstaff wished us an happy anniversary and the manager came over to wish us happy anniversary. All very nice. We ordered our second drink as we were still absorbing the menu. 10 minutes later we had not seen any of our waitstaff. The manager came over and we told her that our waitstaff disappeared. Another waiter brought us our drinks. I ordered the lobster bisque. I found it to be somewhat boring it was missing something. We each had a filet. They were OK not anything to write home about. Both of our steaks were cooked very well but a bit fatty. After we finished we had to wait 15 minutes to see any staff to remove our dinnerware. I was literally calling the manager who had stopped by earlier from the table to see about having out dinnerware removed when they showed up. It is a great physical location but for the money spent I will take my high end steakhouse future business to Mike Ditkas or Ruth s Chris Sign Up and Post Cancel
The ordering process was cool. But they butchered my sandwich. My husband ordered before me and got what he wanted. My order had what my husband ordered on it. Certain dressings make me sick and they included those. Did not add what I ordered. The lettuce tasted funny. After my husband ate his he got sick. We will not be going back.
Took a drink of my ice coffee and almost chocked to death. Not really but it was not fun swallowing this.
We came here as a group and the amount of dish for nine people was too little. All the dish were not fresh and way too salty. Need a lot of improvement.
I walked in tonight and the whole deli is gone. No more sandwich meats potato salad mac and cheese ceviche. And the menu was about half of what is was. I will not be back for the restaurant. The butcher has always been fantastic it is a shame they screwed up the restaurant.
absolutely terrible im sorry but everything about this restaurant makes me want to hurl and i swear to all the ramen gods that i will NEVER set foot into this place again. first off i find the servers extremely awkward maybe it has to do with the fact that they are young and inexperienced yet but still second the ramen was just dreadful. i got the spicy flavoured one with sea salt pork belly and thick noodles. the ramen was not your typical Japanese ramen. to me it was like idk spaghetti noodles like EXCUUUUUSE ME I AINT GONNA PAY NO 10 for SOME DAMN SPAGHETTI NOODLES also it was not cooked throughly still tasted a bit hard the portion was too small for what i paid for and not to mention the presentation was just an embarrassment. i would ve taken a picture but i did not want to burden my phone with such a horrendous thing. the flavours were not very compatible and the chilli oil had a weird aftertaste idk anyways yeah overall just terrible. and i got a real bad stomachache after it now lemme say HOMEGIRL here has a pretty strong stomach but yeah this caused me to feel extremely disgusted and expect to sit at the toilet a few times just saying LOOL oh yeah another thing i find it ridiculous that I have to pay for extra toppings like excuse me?! WHY DO CHOPPED ONIONS HAVE TO BE 1.00?! AM I PAYING TO EAT ONION GOLD?! DOES IT TAKE THAT MUCH SKILL TO CHOP SOME ONIONS LIKE jeez sorry my opinion but yeah redonculous.
Delivery took forever. Sesame chicken was dry. Crab rangoons were just not. Mediocre at best.
Maes Norms Denny s Alertos... these are true 24 hour joints. This deli was a huge rip off. While it was the closest place open to us at that hour of night 3am at the Mirage it was still not a deal. Everything on the menu was double digits! I guess this place is ideal for rich or loaded people. For the three of us we ordered a pastrami corned beef sandwich which was definitely good I think a lot of it had to do w the fact that I ve never tried a sandwich like that . They charged us 3 bucks for sharing the food talk about a rip. I did not have anyone to share with so I ended up sharing with my other two friends... sigh. I think I ll save the money and get like five 5 dollar footlongs next time. P.S. The spicy yellow sauce in the squeeze bottle was good at least.
Like anywhere in this city it is a chore to drive there. Parking was next to impossible and after that the place is CLOSED
The service here was awful we waited patiently for over 15 minutes for our server to come by our table. Finally a hostess came by and noticed nobody was helping us and got us drinks. Another 15 minutes roll by and finally our server decides to make an appearance saying have you guys decided yet on what you want? uhh yeah! Overall service was poor and food was just okay. Wo not be going back.
Been here multiple times and been happy with service. Showed up today and told New ownership no longer accept copay 96 please. Last visit.
This company had an appointment to meet with me at 1pm yesterday at my home for an estimate. At 1 15 when he had not arrived I called him. He explained a job got busy but he would be there at 3. At 3 he called to say he was not going to make it and asked it he could reschedule for a week later. As I work next weekend I asked if he could work me in today.he agreed and would be here between 9 6 and would call me with an hours notice. Never called never came. Wasted 2 full days on this jerk who assured me the client was everything. Would have given a 0 star if I could. Really frustrating to waste 2 full days waiting on this jerk
I really feel bad giving this a one star as I do not want them to go out of business because of bad reviews and I usually never give one. Being of Indian background who grew up in Brampton I KNOW my INDIAN food. As I walked by the restaurant the aroma of the food just got to me and I was planning on going to banjara that evening anyway but I convinced my other half to give this place a shot. We checked the menu and were a little alarmed at the prices but since I live in the hood I still wanted to give it a shot. We orderd an appetizer and decided to split the butter chicken. I am not sure how anyone can get butter chicken wrong but this place did! It almost tasted like the butter chicken had been sitting in tupperware forever and they heated it up. There was no freshness in the spices. Secondly it did not taste like butter chicken at all. I was really disappointed since this place is located in me neighbourhood and they have so much potential. I hope they read this review and get their act together as there are a lot of young well travelled people moving into the area.
Embarassed I went in.. what a hack job! All dudes other than the waitresses btw. The shorter the skirt the higher the price.
The food is a sold 2 stars. It s not horrible but it s not exactly good. The banchan is a solid 3. The potatoes bean sprouts and cucumbers were good. The kimchi stole the show and was by far the best item I had. My veggie and beef soup was just okay. Maybe I should have gotten something else. Do not get me wrong it was not bad... but it was not great. The service was about a 3. The woman was actually friendly in a stand offish kind of way. With all of this said this is the best Korean place I have been to so far in Vegas this is no K town in LA or even Buena Park in OC. That much is certain.
They use pesticide that you can buy on Ebay for 30 a bottle will last 2 years it s called Suspend. If you do not believe me look it up and ask them what kind that you use. The service is terrible as they have what seems to be a high turnover. I wanted to like this place I really did but their prices are outrageous. The technicians are super nice but i m not going to pay a big amount of money for easily accessible pesticides.
I got the ayce option B. The pork was 90 fat and flavorless the beef was not much better. This place has the worst service possible. Takes 20 minutes to get your orders and that was through flagging the two waitresses down instead of waiting after ringing their bell . If you are coming with a group larger than 3 do not eat here as they have a 2 hour sitting policy and no matter how many people you come with you will only be provided with one grill. After being provided with terrible service they included a mandatory 15 gratuity on the cash only bill. I have never seen a place so eager to grab your money.
Watch out for this company. I went in the store trying to give a small business a chance. I found them to be over priced and not honest. They kept after me to put a deposit and sign a contract. After going to Home Depot which I had told them I was going to do I realized how over priced they are. They would not return my deposit and threatened me that I had to pay them the full amount even though they never did any work.
I felt robbed after dinner at this place. I do not understand what the raves are all about so I tried this place. I had a lousy seafood paella the salad was ordinary and yes there is seafood but I still prefer the seafood from Rio and the buffet from Cosmo or Wynn. Now the dessert part is good because of the crepe station but I m disappointed they do not have cotton candy
I wish I had read these reviews BEFORE booking a flight. Yes it s cheaper but you pay for everything but ONE 16 inch carry on. The planes are tiny with no room to put your carry on under the seat in front of you. Every flight was late which I guess they can do as they are the same planes that you connect with so both are late. They do not let you know when to expect to board after being told the flight is late so you do not know if you have time to potty or get food. The airport there is not enough room for everyone to sit. The counter to drop your luggage did not open until 1 hour before the flight even though the airport recommends a 2 hour window to get checked in etc. So we sat and waited for 2 hours. The gate in Ft Lauderdale was like the basement and very awkward in getting through their security. It was not anywhere near any food places so getting a snack after our 2 hour wait and before our 2.5 hour flight with no food service we could not get anything to eat. On our way to Florida we had to get off the plane at the first stop in Dallas. On the way home to Phx we could NOT get off the plane so we were starving by the time we got to Phx. Not very friendly people either. By the time we paid for our luggage we could have paid the extra 40 and fly another airline. That would have been the smarter choice.
no wonder this place closed. it was all looks and no substance. the food was ridiculously expensive in miniature portions.
Are our accounts are LOCKED! because we tried to take money out We have called and talked to 7 different ppl been hung up twice. We are deff going back to our old bank. If you need the FUND right away due to an emergency GUESS WHAT! they do not allow it. So much for those who service the country and cant get the service they need.
So far my experience with this company has not been a good one. I am leaving in a couple of weeks on my trip and I just hope that the way that I have experienced their lack of customer service does not set the precedent for whats to come on my trip. They have not been returning phone calls or emails. I have had to call back multiple times and I the people working there are unprofessional and lacking CS skills. Hopefully my opinion changes after I take the trip Im scheduled for in a couple of weeks. So far though not good.
How bad could it be? I thought. After all it s close to home and in the winter I ll be wearing a hat so it does not have to be a perfect cut. After I got home and showered let s just say I ll be leaving my hat on permanently. Laura I gave you a nice tip because it s the holidays but please put in more effort on your customers or sharpen your skills. Needless to say I wo not be coming back.
Horrible customer service. I took my 10 year old daughter here after school last week and the woman working there was so shockingly rude. She was bossy and aggressive and angry and just plain disrespectful. The cats there are not even friendly I ca not blame them considering their owner. I will never return here.
2Nd time eating here today.1st time was great but now i dont think so. My husband ordered chicken fried steak. The gravey tasted very strange. He scraped most of it off and continued 2eat. I ate1 2half of 1 of his hashbrown paties which had some gravey on it . W in 30 mins i threw up w in 1hr he also did the same and has not stoped all day vomiting. I finally called and spoke 2a manager the lady was nice and suggested i call the operarions manager. I said no . but u need thow that gravey shit away!!
This place doesnt take Health Plan Of Nevada PPO . That is crazy.Do not use them they hardly answer the phone then it takes you to a message 2 Good reasons to stay away
Stay away from this place if you can they ll rob you blind if they can get away with it. I happened to be in the area so I popped in for a peek. I was ecstatic to find these Adelaide Distressed White Wooden Plaque Set of 2 they were just what i was looking for. I bring it up to pay. Was charged 300 dollars for both. She says I can get 20 percent off if I sign up so I do. I think I m getting a deal. This was on February 28th of this year. March 18th I m on their website and I see the 2 pieces I just bought as a set of 2 for 112 dollars originally 150. So I was charged double! Of course I no longer have the receipt. Who would have thought in a chain you would be so blatantly ripped off? Who would have thought that the employee would not know the price of their own item? I have messaged corporate with not a single response. Stay away from this place if you can they ll rob you blind if they can get away with it.
The entire hotel looks like it should be condemned. The base boards of the hallway walls are removed and it looks horrible like mold is growing. We checked into our fresh room to find toenail clippings on the floor and dust everywhere. After seeing this we decided to further inspect the room. We went into the bathroom to find hair on the sink and ceiling. We went downstairs to complain and we were told we could be moved to a slightly bigger room with a better view in about an hour. This was at 11AM. I returned in an hour and was told it would be another hour. After that hour I was given the option to take another room with a lesser view since the room STILL WASN T AVAILABLE. So I accepted the room...the bellman helped move my things. As I m settling into the new room I find leftover things from a previous guest s stay. Obviously THIS ROOM ISN T CLEAN EITHER. At this point I informed the front desk and was upgraded to a GO DELUXE room. It s was beautiful.....until I looked at the bathroom. It looked like someone had EXPLOSIVE DIARRHEA and no one cleaned it. There was a dried BOOGER or some sort of food on the side of the tub. We noticed dried food on the decorative headboard. We basically had to stand and point out all the things that needed to be cleaned to the housekeeper. AWFUL experience....2 ridiculous resort fees were credited back. That s it....after spending my entire day trying to get a clean room
I went to the location at First Markham Place to get a ring resized. They said they could attach a ball to the inside of the ring for 40. We said sure but when we went to pick it up there was basically no change to the ring size it was still super loose. Not only that but the ring now had discolouration on the outside from where they attached the ball. I ca not believe they just gave it back to us like that. When we tried it on and told them it did not fit they said there was nothing else they could do. And we received no compensation for the fact that they ruined our 300 band. Now my husband s ring still does not fit and it looks absolutely awful with random splotches of dark metal around it. Just looking at it makes me angry.
BEWARE..!!!! Do your self a favor and go to another attorney Reza Athari will rememberer me as soon as I mention this He starts confusing you by talking about your case and all the mombo jumbo we stated the case will cost me about 3K which I think is average but the problem started at handling the money Mr Athari was writing the receipts on blank paper stating the amount of money received his signature date and the purpose for such money he did so about three times a total of 1 200 or so at the time I was unaware of the scam since we stated the amount at the beginning wrong 1 200 dlls but my case was not going forward instead Mr. Athari was asking for more money at this point I decided to face him whit the receipts in hand of course his numbers did not match mine I ask him where is the rest of the money....?? His answer was this is all the money you had given to me so far Which was 700 DLLS short at this point Mr. Athari threaten me and my friend to call immigration on us since it was a couple of steps away they would not take to long for immigration to get here so get out of my office right now he said I was in no way to place my friend in such danger so we left so Mr. Athari there you have it now you remember me..?? Thought I forgot.? You might reply just to make your self look good but look at this reviews they talk about the real person that you are.. If I can give you cero stars I will sad that has to be at least one which you do not deserve it because you forgot already why you are here which is to help people not to scam..!! Have a nice day......!!
Not very impressed with this place. However the front of the house staff were pleasant and friendly. I ordered the Alaskan Salmon and it was raw and had no seasoning. The veggies were cold and mushy and the mashed cauliflower had no seasoning as well. I sent back the salmon and they came back out with my plate that still had the veggies and mashed cauliflower and said they put the salmon back on the grill. Five minutes later they brought my original salmon back out barely cooked. I asked them to take it off the bill and I sent it back. Mind you this was a 25.00 salmon plate. I would suggest going to outback you get better quality food for cheaper. It really is a shame that this place left much to be desired since we live so close. I would suggest either lowering their prices to reflect the food quality of investing in a new chef.
Far out of the Toronto core near the airport. It s a giant cement box full of fluorescent lights and filled with whatever the event is.
My friends and I came here when there was no one in line and we waited for 20 minutes to get a cheese pizza and 2 other people got their orders BEFORE us even though we came here first. Rude af
Friday night not that busy got my order wrong took forever getting served. Entire experience was so annoying
First of all I d like to say Origin India does have GREAT food their food is delicious but my desire of going back quickly vanished after getting to know how HORRIBLE their SERVICE was. It was the second time I went to the restaurant Why? because I liked it the first time so I brought 3 of my coworkers in the second time along with a coupon from Origin India and here s exactly what the coupon said Buy one entree get another one 50 off Max 4 people so we have total of 4 entree that day I m 100 sure everyone here who read the coupon might think that we will pay two entree full price and get the other 2 entries half off since we ordered 4 total but to my surprise two waiters were arguing against me saying they only take one entree half off regardless of how many entree we have but wait a minute nothing on the coupon says there s a limitation so that is when I know how LOW they treat their customers they think we are stupid and ca not read the coupon I got frustrated and decided to be nice and pass along the coupon next table and then the waiter immediately took my coupon away and said Sorry the coupon is not transferrable WOW just WOW long story short we will NEVER EVER go back there again because of the horrible service we will go to Ghandi instead which is one block down from it they have good food and good service and kids eat for free there too.
If no stars were an option I would use it. Donna the point of contact is unbelievably rude and dismissive. We were told 3 5 days for the part for our leaking dishwasher sadly this is the service company authorized by our warranty it has been 7 days with no update and when I called I was told the part is back ordered and they do not know when it will be in um then call the warranty company to see if they can outsource it. I cannot do that the request MUST come from the service company . Then the tech did NOT remove the standing water from the dishwasher and today it started to leak onto the wood flooring. In addition it smells to high heaven it is unquestionably growing bacteria and there are two babies and two immunocompromised seniors in the house. We had to get our personal plumber out to clean it out. Oh p.s. they called the problem in incorrectly to the warranty company. I have called Spencer s to see if there is any other company we can use and have complained to the warranty company as well. I m awaiting callbacks from both. The combination of incompetence and unpleasantness is really staggering. UPDATE The part finally came in the guy came back 10 days after the original call and guess what? The problem was not what he had originally diagnosed at all. The pump was fine the hoses were fine. I hose was just in the wrong place causing a leak. Had he drained out the standing water in the first place he never would ve had to order the parts and we never would have had to wait so long because it took approximately 10 minutes to fix the actual issue. When my niece and my mother asked him why he did not drain it he became belligerent and hostile with them. He tried to say it was not his job then when he was reminded that in fact it is he said well it would have meant a second visit. Hey genius you were in the middle of the second visit when you said that. Never. Again.
It s terrible service. I use to love this place but after he remodel the prices have gone up and the staff just seems to have lost interests in customer satisfaction. They are rude and they re always on their phones or talking to each other while customers are waiting to pay or make an order. This is happening even if there are only 2 customers not busy at all. I will be standing there while they have a conversation and have to wait to pay for my food. Even right now as I m writing this the whole staff is in the back except for the cashier who is dealing with a long line and he s calling for help in the back. None of them can hear his call because they re all laughing so loud I can hear it coming from the back. It s just a shame for a place where I could have come to get some healthy food to now be just too frustrated with each experience I have when I come in. Safe yourself the time and hassle and go to elsewhere. If you do not mind dealing with shitty staff then I d try their sandwiches crab salad and smoothies.
Sept 3 called to refill RX Sept 13 called to check on status told IT IS IN THE MAIL..called Sept 14 15 16..same answer! Spent a total of 3 HOURS with numerous CSRs. They told me that once they ship the RX their responsability is finished. They gave me a tracking ...INVALID! Called my doc for a refill per their request local pharmacy was told by insurance it was too soon to refill due to the RX in the LOST mail! NOW this is my attitude adjustment med ...PAXIL...MY family will back me up when I say I NEED MY DRUGS!!! Here it is the 17th of Sept and I am still getting PROMISES...and NO RX!! Tomorrow I may be on Suicide WaTcH !!HUMANA and RIGHTSOURCE you are NOT my friends!
Will not be taking my dogs here any more . My groomers were booked for the day and needed grooming that day after being back from vacation. I thought pets mart would be ok from being a reputable place. Both my dogs have cuts burns pictures from a day after and applying ointment. Besides being expensive my dogs came out looking ugly with shaved faves after asking for a shorter cut on there teddy bear face cuts
Really cool view of the capitol building but the only thing that wowed were the cheese curds.
The food at this location is average on a good day and the service is awful. It nearly always takes forever to get your order and half the time part of it is incorrect. There is a reason it is always empty while the McDs is always busy.
If I could give a no star I would! Yes the experience was that BAD. We reserve our car with a package deal including hotel and flight through Expedia. The car rental was a deal at 11.00 day. So I have to say that you get what you pay for. If you ve ever rented a car in Vegas there is a bus pick up that takes you to McCarrin Center where almost all car rental companies have their front desk processing. You look at all the car rental companies and all the lines at the front desks seem reasonable. However the Dollar Thrifty line snaked around like a Disney ride. We waited and waited and waited for at least 45 minutes. If you re in a hurry or want to start your travels on the right foot this was not the experience you want. I highly recommend NOT using Dollar Are not A Car in Vegas.
I came here for a large dinner with a fixed menu so I m going to give this restaurant the benefit of the doubt when I say that that s probably why our food was not great. The one highlight was definitely the Moscow Mule cocktail which was not part of the set menu. Delicious! To start they brought out bread that was completely cold I m not sure if this is normal or not. We had some hummus and pita which was ok. Cesar salad was ok but not very flavorful. I had the corn ravioli which I thought was oddly thick in terms of the pasta itself almost as if it was not cooked properly. The sauce and inside of the ravioli was also not impressive. My boyfriend had the halibut which was pretty dry and fishy and the couscous underneath was not great either. For dessert we had a chocolate lava cake which oddly did not taste very strongly of chocolate. I do not really want to come back and try this place without a set menu just because this experience was pretty disappointing and I know this place is pricey.
They ONLY good experience today was the man working the register and shoe rental counter....he was very friendly. He seemed over worked and underpaid and stressed out. There were MAYBE 4 employees working including a manager. We ordered food......after standing at the food counter for 10 minutes or more waiting for someone to walk over there. The girl was rude and the prices were through the roof! 3 for a SMALL fountain soda with no free refills. Very dirty....trash on tables....greasy floors.....balls chipped in the finger holes. It was over 8 to rent shoes!!!! We bowled 2 games 6 total since there were 3 of us and it cost us over 40. What a waste of money!!
Omg do not come here I placed an order for 45.00 and some change get to the window and hand the guy the change and a 100.bill we waited and waited for along time still they hand me the food and we keep Waiting!!!!!!!my food mean while is getting cold till finally I gave them back their food and demanded my money I was so mad then the guy hands me my money but as I counted it I was short 3.00 they stole 3.00small price to pay to never come back!!!!warning do not come here they will steal ur money if u pay with large bills cause of course a person wo not notice until they actually count their money they were so rude and inconsiderate that the food was getting cold I was going to go back but decided not to I was just happy enough to get out of their they can keep those 3.00 and hopefully they put it towards buying some better customer service !!!!!!theifs!!!!!
Walked in and there was a weird smell annnnnnnd most important was in there 7 mins and no one spoke very rude terrible customer service
As you can tell from my previous review I loved them when they first opened and sang nothing but praises for them however this has changed drastically. I typically went every 4 to 6 months for various services and even brought my daughter s here for their hair. As they started getting busier the customer service started going down hill I d have to wait half hour to an hour past my appointment time to be seen once fine regularly not ok would say she d check her book and call me back with an appointment time but never did so I would have to follow up etc. Then one day I had an appointment at 11 Liz was not at the salon when I got there. The ladies there kept trying to call her and see where she was and finally at 11 30 she called them and said she thought the appointment was at noon so she was on her way. I could not wait so I told the lady at the counter Liz would need to call me to reschedule. She never called to reschedule never even reached out to apologize. I have not been back since.
Do not go! They will guide you the wrong way. Fck u up even worse and be discriminating against color and if you have a complaint. Rude. Disgusting staff.
Amazing food and really nice little cafe.. perfect for a weekend breakfast and sadly they removed the omelette option out from their full platter deal.. so now it s super expensive
They should let the guest know about the early morning construction. You have to go to other hotels to use the pool. They should talk to their maids because even with the door hanger up they still came in every morning while we were sleeping. When I asked for extra blankets they stood their waiting for a tip. When I tried and talked about the issue with the customer service desk they told me they would send a how we did email at the end of the stay. I walked away and said I will never stay here again. I wish I could of gotten my money back because my stay was the worst. I go to Vegas at least once a month and always stay at the Cosmo but I wanted to try something new. I definitely wo not do that again.
I would rather give ZERO stars. This is the third time coming to this location. I had to find a new doctor as I had changed jobs and my previous doc no longer accepter my new insurance. The biggest mistake was choosing this place. I signed up to yelp just so I can write this. I left the office in tears this morning. The receptionists are the worst. The second time I went was for a minor procedure and I opted to receive email notification so when my results came in I went on to their portal but I did not understand their terminology so naturally I called over so someone could explain. The woman who answered was pretty rude. I asked if she could explain to me what the results were because I did not understand it online she then said what part do not you understand . I was shocked and I said well everything really. She placed me on hold for about 10 minutes well long story short they later apologized. I was over it and was willing to go back to them when I found out I was pregnant. I went in this morning and they apparently did not have the correct insurance information. I told her I wished they would have told me when I called to make the appointment and she just said well its your insurance card... again shocked! I waited a while to get the appt so I asked if I could run home and come back in an hr. She kept going back and forth to double check to which I went back to my seat every time it is a super small waiting room so the third time she came out she said to her colleague not knowing that I could hear God where is she?! She keeps leaving! ... Unbelievable. I am a concierge and I know what good service is...this is not it! Please save yourself some pain trouble and DO NOT COME HERE.
Do not go..... Hair in my wife s food and live and dead flies all over. They could care less about hair in your meal and then it s like ok just bring another after I was done like oops sorry. Terrible place for Chagrin Falls.
Very noisy.... wood and brick interior results in poor noise absorption. Menu was EXTREMELY limited. I had a burger small but good. My wife had the strogonoff which was under cooked. The third possible main dish was trout and I forget the fourth. That s is. No other main dishes. The desert had no prices. I do not care less about posting prices other that the principle. We eat out too often in and around Middleton. Trust me this place is a bust. I can name 4 or 5 Middleton restaurants nearby which beat this place by a country mile.
Over time threading service has kept declining. A lot of inexperienced people doing threading. Make mistakes then dont take accountability. Have gone for many years when convenient but have now have had too bad many experiences in which I will not return or recommend.
The service was great. The Luna margarita was also good. So two stars because everything else generic and sub par. My wife had stale taco shells. My sons French fries were cold. We are normally not picky people and do not complain. But then my wife found not one but two hairs in her mass produced beans. This where I decide to complain and review. Expect good service but mediocre at best food.
This company falsely advertises a FREE SERVICE CHARGE coupon. When we called to schedule service done to our garage we told them about the coupon and they said they will accept it. After we had someone come fix our garage all he ended up doing is recommending that we change our light bulbs since that seemed to be the problem. Then he refused to accept our coupon. He said he did not do any repairs so therefore the coupon is not valid. The coupon did not state FREE SERVICE CHARGE WITH ANY REPAIR ... it stated FREE SERVICE CHARGE PLUS FREE SAFETLY INSPECTION WITH ANY REPAIR . From my understanding we were not getting a safety inspection because we did not have any repairs. It s company s like these that do not understand customer satisfaction is key to their business. Because of this we will find someone else to replace our garage in the near future.
Ate this food. Now I like guys. 10 10 would recommend. The guys. Not pita jungle. Food was decent. Ordered a flat bread.
I have been contacting her and her office several times over one month. No one contacted me back. They just took my 500 retainer fee and did not do the tasks I asked which is creating a simple business contract. well maybe they did but I do not know because I have been asking my status update no one answered . I really do not understand why they are ignoring their client s call.
Terrible! If you are in the Southwest I do not know why we would open these terrible chains of authentic Mexican food. First their design of ordering is not laid out well. For a first timer I was not simply understanding what to order is difficult. Second employee in training was nice but this location had 4 other people on staff and they could not handle 2 groups of 4 and me. Us customers were 1 short of taking them 2 to 1. Very poor service. My 3 tacos.... 17min. Third food was just terrible. Perhaps I m spoiled by some of the best Mexican food in the world but this was just wrong. Chips were good! If you like Baja Fresh this may just be a bad location or a bad day but you may want to try a different location.
I felt compelled to write a review because I do not want anyone else who loves sushi to suffer the same disappointment as I did yesterday. The albacore I ordered was dry not fresh and packed with a ridiculous amount of rice...basically ruined Japanese food. It got worse but I ll just say that if you know a good sushi spot go there because this is never gonna compare. Seriously bad.
I came here for a Brazilian friend s welcome back party to Toronto. If it were not for my friend I would not have chosen this location. Pros This establishment has a unique menu of AYCE meats in different cuts protein varieties and cooking styles On the weekend you will most likely have a show during your evening meal. This will include a musical artist and professional Samba dancers. Cons The price. After tax and an automatic 18 percent gratuity the bill came down to about 71 dollars per adult on a Friday night. This was my biggest gripe with this establishment as I felt that the quality to price ratio was very off albeit having a decent performance. I found the meats to be extremely salty! The servers do not provide readily available non alcoholic drink menus and you will have to resort to asking them for the price of individual beverages on the fly A can of pop cost me 4 which is double the normal market price at most restaurants. Trust me you will need pop because of all the sodium you will be consuming. They lack a variety of desserts. They serve grilled pineapple and they have some fresh fruits at the salad bar but that s it. The audio system did not seem well tuned or had a poor bass quality
Do not waste your time money happiness etc. I ordered a large which was two small scoops that barely even filled the large dish. AND IT COST ALMOST 6. Go to a store and get a pint. You get more bang for your buck and you wo not have to deal with the lines wait and everything else.
Horrible service and sushi slathered in every kind of mystery sauce you can imagine. Not even good value for what you re getting. The server was flying around like a a headless chicken even though there were only three tables she was looking over. I know you have to be open minded on the service in places like these but slamming down food and ignoring you completely even when you walk up to the counter to pay the bill is a little too much
Spent 15 minutes in bar area and received no service whatsoever as they catered to the regulars. 6 people walked in after my wife and I and all were taken care of before us. We walked over to Chilli s next door and service was excellent. No manager in sight...I see them going the way of their neighbor Lone Star which is now closed and vacant. Cold day in hell before I visit this establishment. Give this place 6 months ....
I called 10 days ago to refill a prescription. It took forever to get the Rx processed so I was told I d get a call back. That was 9 6. On 9 10 I got a voicemail saying my Rx had been sent. Ok I thought that s good. Well they sent the wrong Rx. I called back on Friday 9 13 to get this sorted out and their entire system was down. I was told they d call me back. No thanks I said I ll call back myself. Well I called back today and the system was still down. Now I m out of a Rx and seriously annoyed. What s the point of using a mail order pharmacy that saves you absolutely no time?! Back to Walgreens I go!
Not impressed! We walked in and waited almost a half hour to even get seated after they said it would be 15 to 20 minutes. Then when we sit they tell us that on the weekends it s dinner prices only we were somewhat okay with that just wish it would be publicized somewhere. So we are about to order and now our server proceeds to tell us they are are out of half their appetizers side dishes. If you want me to pay full dinner price then do not be out of your supply especially on a weekend you need to be better prepared for a weekend and high demand! Not a first good impression! We were looking forward to a new restaurant at Galleria do not think it will be an asset to the area unless they get their act together. Oh and ALL hostesses 6 working at the front counter need nicer attitudes as they are the first person you meet when you walk in. I think all you can eat sushi would be a better choice and money better spent.
I have been dying to try this place out but sadly I did not ...and probably never will. Reason being sorry ass customer service!! I wo not stop there though so let me elaborate. We walked in and immediately made eye contact with the bartender who said nothing. We continued to stand at the hostess counter for another 5 minutes as we skimmed through a menu without any recognition whatsoever. All while 3 female servers moseyed about the empty restaurant one refilling water on the sole occupied table one clearing off dishes from a previously occupied table that was empty when we arrived and another walked up and down the hallway with her empty tray. Let s get back to the bartender though who continuously made eye contact with me...more than a handful of times yet said nothing at all. Yeah you guy with the tattoo on your neck...your customer service skills suck!!! Sadly the empty martini glasses you moved about from one side of the bar to another were clearly more important than attending to two very hungry customers that were anxious to give Lucky Foo s a shot!! Oh well off to Tokyo Boys where customer service and food is always at it s finest!!
My husband daughter and I attempted to eat lunch here today... after waiting 15 minutes we still had not been seated or told someone would seat us soon or anything we left. We rarely go here for just that reason... we actually refer to it as Steak and Wait!
My review is based on my multiple very pleasant exprience in San Diego in comparison. Hash house has been our brunch go to spot in SD so we did not think this location would be this bad. We ordered two dishes salmon benedict and corn beef. I think it is a crime if benedict s egg white is very thin and yolk is not runny and that was how the benedict was made here. Hollandaise sauce was way too cheesy and thick. Mashed potatoes at the bottom was cold. I could not even finish a quarter of the portion because it was really not enjoyable. Corn beef was cheesy as well. The browned potatoes were good though. English muffin was way too dense. This location did not fully display the farm to table culture and was definitely not on par with the original location in SD. If I had taken the warning from the SD peeps that this location was a franchise and different from the SD one I would not have to have two brunches in a day. No wonder this location did not have a line and an hour long wait. But franchise or not HH should make sure the food quality is consistent throughout different locations so you do not get bad reps and damage the brand!
Food was good but took about 30 mins for 2 burgers to arrive. When we were told someone else got our fries and we would have to wait on ours. Only 3 other tables at the time that s un called for. Waitress could have cared less as she only came by 1 time after taking our order. We also had to wait forever to flag someone down to get our bill. The staff was too busy gathering at the bar to socialize.
Drove out of our way for coffee bean. Me and my friend Ordered 2 drinks and asked if Mathew or Matty could split our tender at the front because I did not end up having cash. He seemed very irritated and told us next time tell him first. So I proceeded to ask if it was a serious problem for him... And he said yes. Will be contacting the manager for this terrible service.
Went back and thought I would give it another try Store is dirty and product is just jammed in anywhere with no consideration to freshness. I do not think they are in the confectionary business concentrating on mini golf and adding to their secondary businesses. Wo not go again
The waiter here was very good. He was knowledgeable and helpful but it just could not make up for the food. We waited 45 minutes for our food to arrive and when it finally did it was cold and somewhat plain. We sent the steak back and explained that it was cold. They attempted to fix this by taking our sides as well and saying they would get us fresh sides so everything would be hot at the same time. At first I was impressed by this. Yet later when our slightly warmer steak came out we were left with no sides at all. After finishing our steak by itself we requested not to have the sides after all since we had been waiting so long. The waiter apologized and said he would pack them to go for us on the house. Fast forward the bill came we paid and left. We realized after discussing the bill the we still paid for the sides. We walked back and brought the situation up to the manager. He seemed frustrated that we had come back and said that we must have misunderstood what the waiter said. Eventually he stated us he could do us some favor by removing the sides we never ate.
I have visited this particular store three times. The owner Janet is very unkind as will as her employees. The store has very BAD energy. Please use a different outlet for your spiritual needs as this store possesses lower level energy.
This place has horrible customer service. I walked into the service center and stood there in front of the people s desk like a bump on a log for 5 minutes before anyone acknowledged me. Then when they did they said someone will be with you. By then another customer came up and walked past me and strait to a guy at a desk and started talking to him. So I m standing there thinking what the heck? I m a big dude and there is no way they did not notice me there. So the person who told me someone would be with me asked how she could help. I said I needed parts. So she showed me where the parts desk was at. I walk up to the desk and there is a sign that says ring bell for parts. So I press the button but I do not hear anything. I was not sure if it rang in the back where I could not hear it and if it did I did not want to make the guys in the back annoyed by pressing the button to much. So I wait about 3 min and then let my son press the button since he was begging me to. Again no sound. So I m thinking maybe it s in the back and we ca not hear it. So I wait another 3 5 min. Now I m getting impatient and so I press the button again but hard this time and I hear the chime. Sooo I wait another 4 min and someone pokes their head around he door and says someone will be right there . Well after another 5 minutes someone helped me. I ca not believe how much time I wasted here.
I d give them more stars because they are nice and all... BUT I just pulled my car out of the lot with nothing done to my car because they tried to charge me 75 for an oil change no tire rotation no alignment nada . 75!!?? They said they did not have my oil filter in stock so they had to charge me 7 for going to pick it up at another shop. OK fine . THEN since my car takes fully synthetic oil it s about 5 more per quart 25 extra for this type of super awesome oil apparently . I was expecting to pay 25 30 for an oil change. I HIGHLY doubt that any other place would charge as much as they wanted. And to those who can pay that more power to you. I ll stick to going to my car dealer.
First try with Shake Shack and it will be our last. Horrible customer service. We placed our order on the Shake Shack app and arrived 5 minutes early for pick up. The crew behind the counter all but ignored us when we came in to pick up our food AND left half off the order completely out of the bag we had to turn back around and spend an extra 20 minutes in the car because of their mistake. Tried calling multiple times on the way back to let them know what had happened but no one ever picked up the phone. Do not order to go from this location! UPDATE to put the icing on the cake the service girl behind the counter rolled her eyes at us when we asked her to remake the food so we could actually enjoy it.
So... Where do I begin? Well let start with the fact that this business has the absolute worst customer service skills I have ever come across. Candice the supposed owner was the first person I spoke with to make an appointment. I first called due to the fact that they had a Groupon with what looked like a good service offered. I called first as I always do before purchasing a Groupon and she openly stated that she treat Groupon customers differently should have been my first red flag . She said that if I purchased the Groupon I could not get scheduled until after the holiday but if I purchased through her directly I could have my cleaning done when I needed it done we have family coming in for Christmas . I understood though and went ahead and scheduled the booking for tomorrow the 20th. I received a call LAST Tuesday from a person who I have never heard from stating that they were on the way to my home. I informed him of the error and he apologized. I never received a call from Candice to confirm that I had been rescheduled correctly so I decided to look her up on Groupon again to contact her my mistake to not save her number . I was unable to find the company as I m assuming they removed their Groupon deal. I was finally able to find her business on Yelp and low and behold they had HORRIBLE reviews! I called them back to cancel and the man who answered would not even listen to my concerns his exact words were Okay BYE and hung up on me!! Please do not risk letting these people into your home you may very well regret it!
Have been there twice since the colossus location open. Customer service is really poor the guy wear glasses looks like the manager and he was throwing keys to the ceiling in front of me cuz he was boring this kind of people can be a manager? Give me a break! And I order a bread to go he give me a clear plastic bag for it is that suppose to be a Paper bag? I feel like I am buying left over stuff.
Told the wait would be 1 2hr. Took an hr to be seated. Another hr for appetizers to come out another 30min for the rest of appetizer another 20 min for main course. 3 1 2 hours for Thai food! Food was JUST Ok. Tapioca dessert was the highlight.
I just do not know what happened to the orange peel chicken. The new recipe is awful. What I thought I ordered was yummy chicken fluffy white rice carrots snap peas orange peels and a delicious orange sauce. What I received was honestly a meal I could find in the frozen food section at Wal Mart for 1.50. The chicken was mushy the rice was half overcooked and half undercooked I have no idea what happened to the vegetables the sauce was watered down and really sweet and to top it off was a warm slice of orange. I did not finish it. Would not feed it to my dog. I ve also had better more courteous service from gas station employees than the two teenage girls behind the counter. Needless to say I am disappointed.
I wish I could give this place zero stars. It all began when we pulled up to the place. I could immediately tell it was a trashy trying to be classy situation. We walked in anyways. My friends and I are from the states and only two of us had exchanged our money. When we went to pay the 20 CAD cover they gave the girl 20 USD expecting change usually in Canada this happens with US money I ve never had an experience where it has not instead the girl said 20 for 20 and gave my friends no change even though they owed them about 5. When we walked in I noticed that despite the all white furniture the place was so dirty. Uninhabited tables were left uncleaned. We tried to order a drink and we were told we needed a table to do that. So we sat down waited about 25 minutes and a waiter never came. So we went to order drinks again and they were literally miniature. And so overpriced with almost no alcohol added. I could not even taste it. We hung out for a little while longer and then realized that doing anything else was better than spending time at Cabana. Do not go unless you re looking for a trashy crowd and shitty everything else.
Good food. Neat environment but consistently slow service. Recently had an order take 45 minutes before I had to cancel it and leave. Disappointing because this spot could be so much more enjoyable.
What a shame. Definitely has not lived up to the hype. The cupcakes are extremely dense almost bagel like and taste store bought. They were barely average. Also we bought the blue cake with brown polka dots that is shown on the show quite a bit. Just average and kind of chemically in taste. On the bright side the cream puffs were amazing. Overall it most certainly was not worth the hour wait and was way over priced. We live near Retro Bakery in the NW part of town. Their cupcakes and cakes are WAY better than C.B. s desserts.
Avoid parking here or staying here! We lost our parking ticket on Christmas Eve. We spent approximately 8 hours on the property and we spent money eating shopping and going on the rollercoaster. Despite having receipts for our activities their rude staff did not believe us and charged us 30 instead of the usual 12 for a 24 hour parking spot. How ridiculous and rude to do to someone on Christmas Eve. We had PROOF of our activities and they did not care. Crooks. They ve lost my business for a lifetime and I will continue to leave bad reviews everywhere until they reimburse me my 20. Thanks for scamming a teacher on Christmas Eve. I will tell my blogging audience and large social media audience about your crookedness and LIES on your website.
Had a nice experience 1 month ago. Told they ha no problem if you bring food from any nearby restaurant. Had a party there this evening brought food. Owner proceeded to come out and very rudely told us to leave. His rant continued as we offered to out our food away. We went next store to pita cafe and had great service. The owner came over there to say we had not paid our tab. Brought the bill for two bottles of wine we did not drink. We paid. Had to go get our own bottles. All he had to was say sorry no food. We would have put away and probably a whole lot of wine. For now he s lost 12 customers. Learn some customer service!!
Totally disappointed. When I saw the review I though it would be better than the North york store. It turned out to be totally wrong. I ordered the take out and the girl totally forgot to call me and just let the food sitting on the counter cooling down. So the noodle tastes awful when I got home 5min away from the restaurant . Then it is about the side... it tastes literally like someone else s left over had to throw away... They do not even bother reheating it not even pretending it s fresh So basically I paid 12.99 plus tax for a customized combo and it s a delayed delivery suspicious left over. While the Original combo comes with a noodle soup side. Something even funnier is when I asked for the food the girl super busy forgetting girl just opened my package and took away the soup. Do not know why but she just did. Just want to share this personal experience with others who may want to customize their combo or may want to order delivery. Never had in store so maybe it tastes better in store. But with this experience never ever want to give a try again. It s just worse than the North York one...
Waste of time! Drove here from south chandler to eat breakfast website shows serve it from 8a 3p to find out they stopped serving breakfast months ago.
We waited almost an hour for our food and the food was pretty awful. This place was so much better before it became Campbell s. This is corned beef hash? I think not....dry as hell chunks of fried potatoes with cubed corned beef that was mostly fat and onions that were almost raw. Very disappointing.
I ate at Somburros for dinner around 8 30 or 9 00pm. The place was not too busy. It was clean and brightly lit. I was greeted by a nice young lady behind the counter who too my order. I had the 1 combo a chicken taco cheese enchilada with rice and beans. With a medium soda the check came to just under 9. A small tray of tasty chips was included. Not cheap. Mexican food in Tempe has to be great just to stay in business. There is so much competition. So my two stars would probably be three in another town like French Lick Indiana. It s a real town without many Mexican food places. The taco was just ok. A little on the small side. The corn tortilla was fried in old oil which gave it a burnt stale taste. The chicken was tasty and the lettuce was crisp. There was a little cheese in there too. It tasted cheesy. The enchilada sauce had a burnt taste and was dark brown. I m not an enchilada expert but I ve had better. This cheese enchilada was flat and I could not taste any onions. The rice and beans were average. On the bright side the food was hot. I did not find Someburros to be a very good value. I have had much better tacos and enchiladas at full service restaurants for less money. I m going to keep looking for some great tacos.
This is a rip off POS service. DO NOT get it. They only would cover 1 labor hour ONE. I m furious with this company.
I stopped in after seeing they had Mexican food. After hearing a girl yell sit anywhere I found a booth. The lighting is horrible everything looks red and dark. I had to use the light on my phone to read the menu. I was told it was happy hour so all alcohol was but one get one free and they had a bunch of margaritas. So I thought oh wow the coconut one sounds creamy and good. She brought me two margaritas on the rocks at the same time. So apparently you ca not drink one and order another. Which means if you are slow like me the other one is watered down. I did not even touch the other one. Heck I could not even drink half of the first one. The margaritas were not creamy or even good. But had a fake coconut after taste. I ordered the queso fries nacho style which was a huge portion of steak fries with some cheese melted on top and some whole pinto beans a scoop of sour cream and guacamole. They were super dry I would not order again. Also ordered the Taquitos. My server asked if I wanted steak not beef or chicken. I chose steak. What I got was ground beef shoved into flour tortillas and deep fried. They were on top of a bunch of romaine lettuce and had a side of sour cream and guacamole. I would not order these again either. The server walked past me several times. Finally I had to ask for the check. She asked if I wanted to go boxes since over half of everything was there and to go cup for my margarita. I said no because I wo not be eating it later. I will never go back for food or margaritas. But I guess the 2 for one happy hour might work on shots.
With the explosion of coffee shops in CenPho these days Fair trade Royal Copper Star Hob Nobs Lola at the Gold Spot Sbuck and the soon to come Giant its going to be hard for me to get over here routinely. The coffee tastes similar to other places that I ve just listed and the ambiance is just confusing. Is it an art gallery a boutique a coffee shop I d just prefer it picked one. The best way that I experience this place is grab a coffee and dessert to go. The lack of seating just makes it tough for me to want to routinely come back and relax. The desserts especially the cupcakes are truly tasty and you should go out an try them. At the end of the day though there are other options.
UPDATE Go to Bobby s Burger Palace if you feel you must eat a celebrichef burger while in Vegas. Half the price better burgers better service little to no wait no tipped employees. Do not believe everything you see on TV! I m so disillusioned. Gordon you were my favorite celebri chef. I forsook Anthony Bourdain for you! I have been following Gordon religiously and watching every show of his I could get my hands on ever since I discovered F Word and the original Kitchen Nightmares on BBC America 12 years ago. My husband and I have been quoting him for over a decade. I have even made Amy s Baking Co references in a Yelp review. But the food here was NOT simple fresh and vibrant as Gordon could often be heard barking at hapless failing restaurateurs. The fries were hard and over seasoned. The burgers which we ordered blue rare came out well done. Sending it back did not fix it and I fear the saliva added by our disgruntled waiter did not improve the flavor either . They also tasted burnt and oversalted and both burger and bun were dry and crumbly the former because it was overcooked the latter because it was old tasted even older than the bread we used to throw away for being too stale at the bakery I worked at while putting myself through college . The shakes were too sweet to choke down more than a mouthful or two and had way too much crap going on. Not just the shakes EVERYTHING down to the sauces was needlessly complicated some additional flourish for the coolness factor or something not actually contributing anything to the flavor and often going one step beyond to actually detracting. The food was as gimmicky and smug about its cleverness as the name BURG ordon R amsay . No hint of simplicity freshness or vibrance. Just over complication massive overcooking and smugness. We left 3 4 of our food untouched which is like a 9th circle level sin for us. The servers just cleared our plates without caring to ask if there was a reason we did not eat very much of it. So not worth the hype the price or the long wait. If I were Gordon I would want to make sure that every restaurant that bore my name and likeness had service and food I was proud to put my name on but I guess he would rather watch his bank account grow than work to protect the reputation he sweated blood for years to attain. The only reason why I ca not say this was the worst overpriced meal I ve ever had is because BEAST exists.
personally I do not think any vapor shops in Vegas is worth going to. My first impression of Sin City Vapor? Grungy... looks dark and dirty. The owners got his dogs running around in the place and if you re handling e juice you really do not want that kinda stuff going on in your store. But more than that I recently found out that they cut their juice with Vitamin C... I do not even know if their nic is organic. Meh whatever... the point is there s so many better places both online and brick and mortar... The juice starts out all right at first and then starts turning rancid. I think their PE bottles are so cheap that it is causing whatever mixture in their juice to volatilize. Which actually freaks me out. Since I m sure they use both alcohol and vita c to cut their juice. Do not get me wrong. I used to love their juices... but I ve had so much better since my days at Sin City Vapor. If they stop cutting their juice with Vita C and clean up their store I may go back again. But as for now I order all my juices from New York area. Oh btw their cartomizers and coils are total crap! GARBAGE! Half the time its DOA. I had wrote about them not charging taxes on cash sales here on this post but Genie C I do not know if she works for them just noted my review that BEGIN QUOTE It s called a cash discount you get to pay the base price if you pay in cash. It works out to your benefit I do not see any reasons to complain. END QUOTE So I stand corrected... although I m not an expert on taxation I ll take her word for it. Because of this explanation I will adjust my rating to 2 stars and kindly thank you for the explanation.
Hmm western union money services is not a priority here! I would suggest any other cash center that does not make you wait a total of 30 min. Teamwork definitely makes the dream work. Good luck.
I wish I could give this place a zero to be honest. The staff is terrible the place is dirty and oh yea if you want to get punched in the face by the promoters be my guest to visit this place on a urban Sunday night.
The worst customer service I have ever come across. I ordered a bedroom set in November and was told it would be here by Christmas. It did not come which was understandable given the timeframe. I was then told it would be here January 11. No furniture. Then told by the end of January still no furniture. Then I was told it would be here by February 4. Still not here. I called today and they said it s in a warehouse in Bloomington. They cannot schedule delivery and there was no manager to talk to. They said someone would call me back Monday which I am sure it will not happen because every time they have told me they would call me back nobody ever has. They have had my money since November and I have no product. I will never order from Ashley furniture store again!
Went to go watch the movie Showman last night. Very disappointed with the concession stand ! My husband ordered a hamburger. Took forever to make as we waited forever and our movie was already starting . Once we get into our movie my husband eats his burger. I asked for a bit turned the burger over and has mold all over the bun!!!!!! I had to leave the movie walk all the way back to the stand and ask for manager. He was sorry and gave us free movie tickets . It s seriously this is a health code !! We could food poisoning!
With the amount of HK cafe that has sprout up over the years it always bewilders me why anyone would go here. If we talk about the food it is pretty average and quite typical of a HK cafe which means there is not anything to write home about. They tried various Asian fusion dishes that comes up quite bland. Typically average dishes is not bad at these type of restaurant because the prices are quite comparable. However I find Phoenix is simply overpriced for what they over and I usually come here every 6 months hoping they have changed. The main reason I come back is because of the location which is a horrible excuse with kitchen M just down the street and a billion times better.
Had an appointment at10 20 for only results. 3 hrs later and still waitin to see the doctor. They just took me in the back to weigh me and take my vital signs. I just cant u derstand why is has to take this long for a follow up when i have an appointment. Horrible service and all the receptionist say is the doctor is busy. He takes his time with eqch patient. Do not come to this place. I sure wont ever come back. Left a star cause it wont let me post without a star that they dont deserve.
Stay away!!! If your not use to staying at Hilton s and mostly stay in motels you may like this place.. for those of us that know what the Hilton brand tends to represent do not stay here. Terrible customer service no bar sink was clogged and the maintenance guy did not show up for 12 hours. The place has a bagel sandwich for breakfast so if your looking for a good breakfast you will have to leave the property if you want to gamble you have to leave the property... the location is sketchy and far from the strip. This location made me and wife so upset that their time share presentation had little chance.. but Hilton Vacations did not stop there.. they defended their awful customer service and were rude and angry when their offer was declined.. the timeshare is not competitive. I am now a Wyndham owner because they at least treated my wife and I with respect. Sorry Hilton you have turned this loyalist to rethink
currently standing in line here with another 25 people in line. the banks atm is broken and everyone is very upset because theres 1 teller in line this is ridiculous working this poor girl so much while the rest of u walk around smiling its 3 40 in the afternoon and you are not giving your customers the satisfaction that you guys talk about.. simply pathetic... manager is no where to be foind when asked.
I guess I m not cool enough to understand why people love this place so much. I certainly do not think it deserves so many 5 star reviews but maybe I am just looking for something else when it comes to drinking establishments. Yes this place is extremely small. Anytime I have gone it s been crammed full of hipsters and I ve never enjoyed the music playing. Going to this place when it s full is simply not an enjoyable experience. Squeezing between people to try and get to the washroom and then finding out 4 5 people are also waiting to use the facilities. I walk by here a lot and there s usually a gang of chain smokers standing outside. One quick peek through the window and it looks like a closet full of drunk kids. Meh. Maybe I m being overly harsh. I just think there are much greater bar options in the Dundas Ossington area. By no means do I think Communist Daughter is a hidden gem because everyone seems to know about it. And if your idea of a fun time is standing shoulder to shoulder with hipsters or fighting over seating then you ll love this place.
The owners either do not care about this location anymore or they have not been on site for quite some time! This place was so dirty and is completely run down. We watched 2 guys bus 3 tables that were pushed together. The wiped everything onto the floor put the table in order and called it good. They did not touch the floor. Straws paper food and other things... they walked right over it all and left it. A perfect opportunity to clean when they separated the tables but they left it. We watched them clean other tables while we were dining and same thing. So that got me looking around even more. I felt like i was in an episode of Kitchen Nightmares or Restaurant Impossible. The food was ok at best. Nothing special. Our waitress was the only thing that made our visit bearable. Our table was dirty. Our syrup jar was so gross i would not touch it. I asked our waitress to get me a clean one which she did. So 2 stars at best. People were friendly but the place is run down and no one seems to care.
This place is clean staff is welcoming but I honestly was very disappointed and still scratching my head at how this place has 5 stars. We came on a Friday night hoping to get a quick meal in before my boyfriend s basketball game. He had the spinach cheese stuffed ravioli and I had an alfredo dish. The pasta was cooked very poorly and was very clumpy it seemed like we could have made better at home. The alfredo seemed very oily the bacon I had added to it was sparse and lacked flavor and the ravioli was unappetizing. We also had an order of garlic knots that they forgot about but once we did get them they were underwhelming and both the sauce and the bread lacked a lot of flavor. My fiance is normally a garbage disposal when it comes to leftovers but after packing up most of our food and taking it to go we ended up throwing it away the next day. I think this place is still working out some kinks i.e. the cashier seemed to forget to give a lot of tables their utensils which the runner had to end up doing . I do appreciate that they make their pasta fresh and they have fresh herbs growing in house but nothing about our experience made us want to go back. It looks like the place has a lot of fans though and I m sure will continue to thrive and improve. Great concept but I think I will be sticking to Custom Built Pizza when it comes to my customizable Italian food needs.
The gimmick here is meatballs. But once you exhaust those options there is nothing there. Choose your ball meat of some type or vegetarian and the vehicle by which you ll receive it sandwich slider pastas and on and on. And choose one sauce the problem is that none of the sauces have much flavor. also the veggie meatball is a dense mass of mess. Appetizers are extremely limited. Do not get cheesy garlic bread. It lacks garlic and is otherwise just dumb. They have a good salad with mozzarella. Meat eaters at my table were content with their choices. The fries and tater tot s are both really good. Oh and they upcharge for everything even croutons! Just do a one and done here. After that you will have exhausted the menu.
Expensive. Not that great. I am quite not sure what they have is NY style.
I was playing poker at encore and I saw the guy next to me order what looked like a Pad see ew that really smelt good so I decided to order a dish from the wazuzu menu. I ordered the pineapple fried rice with duck. I had a few drinks at this point but I can clearly remember the dish tasting amateur. Tasted more like Cajun fried rice than the typical Chinese fried rice. It was overpriced and I typically mind over paying for something that taste good but I honestly could have bought better fried rice in China town for a third of the price.
I m not sure how this place gets 4 stars. It s probably unfair of me to give a bad review on only one visit but I wo not be back to try it a second time. From the lunch menu I ordered the chicken with vegetables which comes with a spring roll and soup. I also had fried rice as a side. I opted for the egg drop soup which had a tinny taste reminiscent of the can it most likely came out of. The spring roll was ok but the rest of the food was utterly bland. I tried giving it a good douse of soy sauce to liven it up but it still just fell flat. The fried rice did not taste freshly made although there s no real way to know for sure if it was. It was not awful but I ve had Asian food at other restaurants that was SO much more flavorful and satisfying. At the end of the day the only word I could use to describe my lunch today is meh .
I m still feeling my regrets for coming into this place. What a joke. My mom and I have this thing about Mexican food tex mex restaurants in the valley we ve eaten at most all of them. When we go out for lunch we generally look for a new one to try in the area we plan on being in around that time. Unfortunately this is the place we stumbled upon. Our server seemed already put off by us for some reason..I m blaming it on the fact that I was wearing something with a pattern so he automatically knew I must be one of those artistic types who like real food and not some shitty Mexican version of Fuddruckers. We were doomed from the start. I ll save you the details just because even I M annoyed by how annoyed I was with every interaction with my server. After looking over the menu I decided that I was not that into anything and just wanted a burrito. Word for word Me Can I get a burrito beans rice and sour cream only. Oh and can you grill it or put it on your flat top? Douche WELL YEA THAT S HOW THEY DO IT ....pFFFTttt HOW ELSE DO YOU MAKE A BURRITO. WE ALWAYS MAKE THEM LIKE THAT .... ... ... Me Oh. I usually have to ask. Okaaay. Server puts in the order then comes back. Douche SO DO YOU WANT THAT ON THE FLAT TOP BECAUSE IT LL FALL THROUGH ON THE GRILL. Me Yea that s fine. Douche LIKE TACO BELL Me Ok. ... inner monologue Me LISTEN DICK YOUR MENU ISN T APPETIZING SO JUST GIVE ME A FUCKING TORTILLA A BEAN AND SOME TOMATO SO I CAN HAVE A MEAL WITH MY MOM THAT DOESN T REVOLVE AROUND YOU BEING AN ASSHOLE. ehem.. Food came and I ate about a third of it before noticing little chunks of bacon in my burrito. THANK GOD I m not a real vegetarian even though I say I am I eat seafood and will try meat when I feel the quality of meat is on par with excellence at restaurants worthy of my money.. I also got the pleasure of witnessing about 11 plates of food up on the line for about 5 minutes just sitting there while the servers folded silverware into napkins and talked about Carlos Mencia...or something equally as boring. Needless to say I reluctantly left a tip. I walked away immediately feeling nauseous and thoroughly grossed out by the whole experience now 24 hours later I have a headache that wo not go away what feels like the stomach flu and an intense feeling that I can never enjoy a burrito again. ..I hope the lack of interest in burrito s is a phase Blanco for your sake. I ll never betray you again Taco s Jalisco s.
I have never had a bad experience at this nail salon until today. The tech I requested was busy so I unfortunately had to go with a different tech. My pedicure went fine that was just fine. As for my manicure...this is the first time I have ever recieved a manicure that the tech did not soak my hands in soapy warm water.. Instead used a squirt bottle. She barely wet my finger tips and then proceeded to barely push back the cuticles. Needless to say there was not much cuticle to snip off. Granted it had only been 4 weeks since my last manicure but I could see that there was plenty she missed! I was irritated and told her that I had never had a manicure like this and she gave me some lame answer. She had been talking and talking to the other techs the whole time until I questioned her about the job she was doing. Then she got real quiet. She did not even put lotion on my hands and massage them like the techs always do there. She painted my nails and by then I just wanted to get the hell out of there. I was there an hour before closing time so my guess is she just wanted to get the hell out of there too. It was the lamest most unprofessional manicure I have ever had. I ca not believe I paid for it. I should have complained to the girl at the desk but instead I m on yelp. Her name starts with an H and ends with a N. Good luck to you if you are unlucky to get her. I ll go back to the salon and make sure I stick to the techs I know do a great and professional job. Again it s the first bad experience I ve ever had here. I have been a customer there for the last two years.
Used to really like this place and you cannot beat the atmosphere but last night was a bust. I was meeting a friend who had never been before and was so excited to go. I sat at the bar waiting for her and wanted to order a drink and appetizer. The bar tender was so beyond rude. When she finally greeted me after 5 minutes of talking with her friends while I was sitting there I could barely get out my drink order before she flew off. Even the lady next to me was like wow really when she finally came back with my drink I literally had to speak up just to order an appetizer. When my friend got there she asked for a drink menu the bartender just replied you have it right there I flipped the menu over to show her. Dinner was ok once we got out of the bar and our server was great. My chicken was over cooked and had a lot of fatty skin. I took about 5 bites because I was starving and was done. Little disappointed but hopefully the menu changes up and you get someone nice behind the bar so
This location has really gone down hill. I Had a late night at work so at the request of my family I went to Wendy s. Worst decision ever!! The meat looked petrified. The new Gouda bacon cheeseburger had maybe a teaspoon of the cheese sauce and it was overloaded with fancy lettuce. The baconator burger bun looked like it fought its way into the wrapper. It was falling apart and the meat patty looked petrified as well. Now let s move onto the fries. Soggy and loaded with oil like they had been recooked a second time. Needless to say I will be phoning this location in the morning in hopes of speaking with a manager who actually cares about the quality of product they serve because quality was definitely not their recipe this evening. The food went into the trash. Feeling robbed of the 27 dollars it cost for three lousy meals with frostys which by the way was the only thing we did not throw away.
This place is hella expensive!!! With that price I was expecting something good! But noooooo!!! I ordered a plate of seafood grill or something and it was 40! There are sooo little food it was only enough for a baby! And its main dish! the food did not even taste good! and it was REALLY SALTY!!!! YUK! is salt really that cheap you just sprinkle it everywhere??? the shrimp i can taste is not fresh it s frozen. I mean with that price i would expect something fresh... it was not worth the price!!! And there was a potato to fill up the plate. I did not pay 40 just to eat a potato!!! It s a seafood plate!!! Will never go again!!!!
I recently purchased a used Lexus SC430 from Mercedes Benz of Henderson. Since I came from out of state to purchase the Lexus I spoke with the customer relations manager and asked about the condition of the vehicle. He said it was immaculate with no problems and never been in an accident. When I arrived at the dealer after a 5 hour drive I was surprised how un detailed the car was. Numerous body marks from adjacent doors a couple of minor door dents etc. and I was not to happy that this immaculate car looked so poorly. My decision to go ahead a buy was based on the mechanical condition which was outstanding all services were performed at the local Lexus dealer every 5 thousand miles. Next the finance manager wanted to sell us a extended warranty of course and we kept saying no as our credit union had a very attractive warranty available at a good cost. Well he kept dropping the price and said he could sell us a Lexus 6 year 60K warranty for 1900 with zero deductible. Well this sounded pretty good so we said yes. When I got home the next day I started detailing the Lexus and found that the clear coat was flaking off the rear bumper. I took it to a body shop I have been using for over 20 years and they told me the rear of the car had been in an accident and the paint job on the rear bumper was shoddy and needed to be re painted. A week later we get the Lexus warranty in the mail and the expiration date is in 2 years! I called Lexus to find out why and they said the effective date of the 6 year warranty was from first date of sale of the car. The finance manager seemed to have forgotten to tell us this!! We thought we were purchasing a 6 year warranty not a two year warranty. Now this was just deceptive sales. I called Mercedes Benz of Henderson and complained to deaf ears. Finally I filed a complaint with the Better Business Bureau of Las Vegas for non disclosure of the accident and the actual terms of the extended service contract but they never responded. I would suggest if you feel that you have been taken advantage of like I do that you go ahead and file your own complaint. I think anyone that finds and reads these issues with this dealer should be forewarned. My next step is a complaint to Mercedes Corporate as suggested by another reviewer.
I was disappointed as I expected much more from a high end Vegas venue like this inside the Bellagio. It was so dark that everyone in our party had to use their cell phone lights to be able to read their menus. The quality of the sushi sushi mi was adequate but I ve had better Sushi experiences in Colorado thousands of miles from the ocean. Very small portions for very high prices so you have to order 3x as much. Made the mistake of taking our waiter s recommendation of the tuna pizza which was little more than some thin slices of tuna on a burnt 8 tortilla for 26. Saki prices STARTED at 30 for a tiny carafe and beers were 12 each for Sapporo and Asahi. Our bill with just 2 beers 2 rolls 3 two slice orders of sushi and the nasty Tuna Tortilla Pizza came out to just under 200 for the 2 of us. The food was ok presentation was better but the service left a lot to be desired. Later
The staff at the pharmacy is extremely rude. The older gentleman working the night shift was very cold and rude. I waited for a good hour before getting a response from anyone about a transfer from another cvs location. I will not be returning to this location.
I just had the worst experience in a beck taxi. First of all the cab driver refused to take my credit card which is a visa and is advertised on your business cards as an acceptable form of payment. When I said that is all I had he said well I will take where you can get money. I go well I have 10 American and that s it. He claims he saw 2 Canadian coins in my wallet and wants that with my 10 American. I give it to him for my 11 cab. Which is not appropriate in ANY way. I cannot believe this is in any way appropriate. I currently live in New York City and cannot believe this is a way you would treat a patron. I would normally expect to be refunded but I highly doubt they will care to refund me for this ridiculous experience.
The worst! All the staff manager included were just standing around talking the floors were so slick and dirty it was hard to walk and the bathroom was horrible. And to add a cherry on top the health score was a 92.... avoid at all cost!
I agree with everyone on this post. This is the worst cfa I have EVER been to and it sucks because it s right by my house. I have been multiple times. ALWAYS painfully slow! Each time I ve been it s at least 20 minute wait! One time I was sick between people and sat there for 45 minutes! The food quality is not to cfa standards as well cold miniature sized pieces of chicken do not even cover half of the sandwich wrong items even my milkshake was a liquid mess. The worst part besides how slow is the service of the employees they are all rude never smile or say my please or any of the normal cfa service. They honestly do not care that you wait for 30 minutes they go about talking and joking and just standing around? There s a line completely all the way around the building and your moving like a slug. It s not a welcoming environment it s like they all hate their job! The employees even argue and yell at each other on multiple occasions in the dining area and the drive thru. YOU HAVE ONE... I REPEAT 1 STAR ON YELP TOM ELLINGTON! DO YOU NOT THINK IT IS TIME TO HIRE NEW MANAGEMENT!!! Also I ca not believe CHick fil a as a corporation is allowing this nonsense to go on. This is horrible for the chick Fil a name to have such an establishment!
The worst experience in my life. I thought I was emergency helicopters to a slaughter house. I was in an out of of it and when ever I cam through I was very cold and my mouth was dry like wood There were no feeling of a human touch every thing and everybody cold as in a slaughter house no empathy. After all the checks were done and I came through they took the IV out and told me was dismissed. I had a severe concussion swollen shot eyes and my left arm was hanging out out the soccet. I could not sit up right was throwing up had no shirt on and my jeans were cut off. Sombody gave me a blanked and slept me to the waiting room. Waiting for my wife to pick me up. Because I was unable to sit up I tryed to lay down on two chairs . That pissed of the Secretary guard. After 40 min my wife came with a friend they were not allowed to park in front of the door to get me in so they slepped me down the walkway to the car. No assistance no wheelchair. I m very diapointed. I still can not get up after 7 dayes and are recovering at home in my bed. If I ever have an accident I hope I will never end up in that SLOTTERHOUSE again.
If I could give this place a 0 or negative star rating I would. My fiance and I had were staying one night since we had Friday Saturday off. He bought the room off of Groupon for about 100. Anyways upon arriving to the room I noticed the room had a nice view of the Strip. Once I opened the curtains we noticed there was a large crack hole on the window along with some lipstick kiss marks on it too. EEW. We ignored it since we are just staying one night. Once we left and arrived home I decided to go through my bank statement. To my surprise I noticed the hotel charged me about 162. Now he payed for the hotel with his card and I payed a 20 fee with my card so whats this charge about? When we called they said it was for the broken window WHICH WAS NOT OUR FAULT!!!! We explained to them what happened but all they did was give us attitude mute us put us on hold while we were still talking. We eventually spoke to the manager Lily and even she gave us attitude basically saying Do you want me to help you or not? . All they did was give us a number to contact some guy but we have to call on Monday to get everything situated . The room was pretty bad but like I said we were not going to complain since we were there for 1 night and leaving in the morning After this ordeal I have to complain!! The bathtub was slightly stained the broken window with no screen the tv was those old big box ones with a fuzzy picture there was even a carpet stain next to the tv entertainment center the sliding door for the closet was not event attached properly. Unbelievable!! How is it that no one noticed the broken window previously??? The customer service was HORRIBLE !!!!!!!! I understand that we were upset but the fact that they did not try and help out is unacceptable. Pros Right off the strip. You can walk there. Cheap As for the Cons read my review as well as others posted. This place is grimey. 5 stars from me.
My first thought is that I would never go back to this establishment given all of the choices in this price range Picasso just downstairs is far superior. We started with drinks at the bar the bartender was friendly and we thought we were going to have a great evening. The dcor is fabulous and so much fun too bad the wait staff seemed grumpy and put out to be there. Our table was small and on a crowded wall it felt more like a bistro table than a fine dining experience. I do not know why they sat 3 couples in a row on this wall given that there were other open tables that were never filled while were dined. We opted for the full tasting menu and the highlights were the amuse bouche and the cheese plate. Nothing stood out and I was most disappointed by the signature sea bass it was kind of dry. While I do not expect to love everything on a tasting menu I expect at least one standout dish that blows my mind. Not a single standout. The service was terrible do not know if we just got the B team or what but it was just off here are some examples waiters calling out to each other across the room the servers standing at our table waiting to put down our dishes because no one came around with new silverware a lovely fork with bent prongs I ve never had such cold service in my life and I do a lot of fine dining. I m sticking with Michael Mina and Picasso next time I m at the Bellagio.
I always try new BBQ joints I run into. Traveling a lot I have visited many. The area needs a good BBQ joint and I was hoping Big Eu es would be it. Sorry to say it fell far short. Ribs while well smoked were undercooked and tough. So much so that no one in my family wanted the last one. We usually fight over them. The chicken was roasted no smoke at all. Bummer. The wings were nothing special either. Really need to start smoking those Mr. Big. I wo not be back.
If I could rate this place as negative 5 I would! Beware of the place people! My cousins and I came to celebrate my sisters bday here and got a whole booth for all of us and our friends OR so we thought .... they ended giving half our booth to another people while we sitting there and they told us that we only bought for half a booth! Which was NOT what they said! After arguing with the manager they refunded the money back but ONLY the booth not the hookah which was never brought out to us! We never even saw the damn thing and there excuse we that they ca not refund hookah once it s been ordered! Stay clear of the place people! There just scammers out of get your money! Also there was a 20 cover fee for everyone that went males females! That also was not refunded to us even though we were there less then a hr!
Rented a house for three years took amazing care of yard and house. They only gave us half of our deposit for repairs on items that we did not break ridiculous! Also make sure you read contract because people will be in and out of your home for the last 30 days when you re still paying full price and need to keep paying bills for 5 days after you move out. So sad to get this deposit check and see how we got screwed!
Was there for dinner with the fam. Seated in the private room requested for the outside area better ambiance in the main hall took a few minutes before the waiter asked us to come out and to bring our glasses with us. Yea I m sure that can be done by you in a tray. It s a nice restaurant not a run of the mill fast food chain where I d carry my tray around. The chairs were literally all wobbly. Seriously? I even asked the waiter to get me one that was not the second one was just as wobbly as the first one. C mon people get it together. Sat down 1938 first time a server came in to ask for our order 1948. 10 min sitting no one even asked for drinks or appetizers. 20 min before the first appetizers and 30 min prior for the dinner. That s pretty darn slow service if I say so myself. How was the ambience. Dated is the correct term. Very dated. All in all comes down to the food. Ordered an assortment of stuff. Veggie platter and Lamb Kabab Minced lamb wrapped with chicken grilled both were quite decent. Not exceptional but quite decent. Dal Handi Palak Kofta Lamb Roganjosh Chicken Jalfrezi were ordered for dinner with Garlic Naan and Rumali Roti. Dal Yellow Lentils simmered in spices Handi was sad. The palak Spinach was excellent albeit the Kofta part was decent. The Lamb Roganjosh Lamb in a gravy was barely edible. Too over done. The Chicken Jalfrezi was actually quite excellent. Tangy with ginger.
Most other reviews are useful. So I ll just add that the 27 sashimi was horrible. I got pieces of fish that I could not even chew through.
They have a person there named Stephanie that is incredibly rude and insensitive. It is understandable that they have policies in place to maintain safety at the gas pump but it would do this woman some good to learn how to talk to people in a professional way. I FULLY support safety measures but I do not support the lack of professionalism in which she spoke to me. She seems to think the tragic shooting that took place on the Las Vegas Strip was funny because she laughed when I told her that we were in a rush to leave town and that she should be sensitive to what happened. She actually laughed. Apparently Costco has employees that think people dying is funny. Anyways we wo not be getting gas here anymore and Stephanie should not have a job there anymore.
I love Starbucks and generally they do a great job in making your specialty coffee but this location needs some work. I ve been here a couple times each time they either they make my drink incorrectly or they forget my food item I ve ordered. It s a nuisance so I ve just opted for a different location kinda sucks since this one has a drive thru but not worth the aggravation
I wanted books. Everyone said how great this place was for books. NO. It really is not . Very few a shelf that spans a wall that it shares with VHS DVDs and crates of useless vinyl I collect that too . I found six books that interested me and let me tell you they were hard as hell to find they just threw books on that shelf no categorization alphabetical order? You re out of luck. Good for everything I did not want. Useless for bibliophiles. It s cheap but you can get books cheap from the Carnegie Libraries. Save your money and go there.
Check your receipt very carefully! We filled the tank right before dropping off and had the receipt but a gas charge was added without them telling us. We noticed and went back very unhelpful both staff and supervisor weirdly blamed it on the car and took no ownership of what is apparently a very common error there.
I was really excited to finally go to Handlebar. I love beer I love bicycles and I like bar food! We went tonight a hot humid summer monsoon evening. They keep all the doors and windows open but as nice as that sounds that means that it will also be hot and humid inside. I grew up in Arizona and run long distances so I m used to heat. I was wet with sweat after about 30 minutes. Meanwhile I order my 6.50 beer and sadly discover they pour 12 oz draft beers not pints like ummm pretty much every other place there is. So for prices that are about 33 too high you get 3 4 of a beer. I was not going to do that again so I switch gears. It s Tito s Vodka night. There s a rep from Tito s giving samples. She mentions that Tito s Vodka drinks are 4. Which ones? All drinks with Tito s vodka she says. Cool we ll order some I say. She is so proud of me she gives me a T shirt. Our waitress comes by and asks for our 2nd round order. We ll have some of the 4 Tito s drinks . We ask which ones are on special. She too says All drinks with Tito s Vodka are 4 She s nice and we chit chat and discuss the drinks shown on the Tito s placard on the table. We ask for suggestions she motions to the placard and says All of those are really good especially for 4 I order a vodka sonic soda tonic my wife gets the vodka martini which the waitress the table placard and the Tito s Vodka rep all said was 4 We get the bill. My drink was 4 and the martini was 6. We ask about the discrepancy. She says Yes the Vodka part of the martini was 4 but the rest of it was 2 more What do you mean The rest of it was 2 You told us at least three times the Tito s drinks were 4 RIGHT HERE on the table it says Tito s vodka martini 4 Yes the vodka part is 4 but the martini part was 2 extra. That totals 6 Then why did you and the Tito s person say it was 4? WELL everyone knows a martini is extra I guess olives are 1 each. P.S. The place kind of smelled like pee.
I loved this place until they closed all of a sudden without giving their customers any notice. I had just purchased a gift card in August to use at my appointment in October. Now I m out 70. Have not been able to reach anyone through Facebook phone or in person because they shut everything down immediately. Very bad and inconsiderate way to treat customers who had been loyal to you.
We found this dog park on yelp and we thought it might be a good place for our dog s first swimming lesson. The water looks so clear in the picture. HOWEVER! We found that s not a clear pond anymore it s actually a swamp! So dirty! It was smells like toilet! So disgusting!
It was all good until Tim left. It s way different now longer waits and less professional... The cuts are still on point though but if I m paying 25 it needs to be justified
I ve been this place yesterday with my family. Someone was always smile to us and really friendly so we were having a really good time by her favor. We were three and I felt stomachache and my aunt was not that hungry so we order three and shared the dishes. But suddenly the old man came to our table seems like manager he just took out our folks and knives and plates by saying that you guys are done right? and he only left my spoon. He seems that because we ordered dishes small amount he was being freaking ruuuuude. I really did not want to give him tip but our waitress was really nice so we gave her tip. I hope it does not go to him...
The noodles and fried rice are okay but the service is really bad especially the cashier his attitude force me not to go back again.
My boyfriend and I came here for lunch today. Apparently they do not have any lunch specials for the weekends so we were forced to pay the all you can eat dinner price. Which was fine considering you have the option of a lot of different menu items. Let s just say the food was awful. Not worth the price at all. The slices of chicken they give you to cook are large and misshapen very hard to cook on an open flame no knife to cut them up to make sure that each area of the chicken was fully cooked. This would be fine if we were eating beef but chicken is very dangerous to potentially eat raw. I found myself biting around areas of chicken to make sure it was not raw. The side dishes that are already at your table when you arrive look like they ve been sitting out all afternoon. And they do not remove the plates that your raw food comes on so you re basically sitting next to raw poultry juice all while eating your meal. The food that you can order that s already cooked clearly looks like it s been sitting out as well. Also the restaurant is just generally filthy bus tub dish carts everywhere. And food crumbs on the seat and floor. I can honestly say I left feeling sick. Paid 40 to leave hungry and grossed out.
Waiters are rude to customers. They ca not even take a simple order properly. Took over 30 minutes to get a simple drink order that a child could make. Waiters do not know who ordered what throughout the restaurant. People at a table would get their order when the rest of the table have finished their order. One lady tried to walk to the washroom but the waiter was taking an order and he told her to walk around the other way SO RUDE!!! . This place is a zoo. I would highly recommend NOT coming here. This restaurant is over priced. They charge 2 extra to add ice to a coffee.
If i can give this place a zero I would. The service was terrible. Our waiter got all of our orders wrong and charged us for something we did not order. The portions are small and the food was not cooked right. Scramble eggs were undercooked. I would never fo back to this place.
Breakfast is not very good. The potatoes are old and soggy. Sausages were dry. I would not experiment too much here as they ca not even get breakfast right.
The woman who was helping me at the beauty counter made me feel incredibly uncomfortable. I was holding a couple of products and looking to compare them and she took the more expensive one from me and insisted I keep it behind the counter. Usually I do not read into these kinds of encounters so much but her distrust of me was pretty blatant and completely unwarranted. Also after I made my purchase amounting to 200 later on she bagged all my items and somehow forgot about giving it to me before she went off to help another customer. Really do not feel good about my experience here at all.
It closed! I was about to finally try the oyster poboy everyone raves about. It was not meant to be....
Too expensive for the quality you re getting. Blair was terrible at listening and tried dictate the cut style while also forcing her opinion on how my hair grows insane since I ve been grooming my hair all my life and she s seen it for 1 minute . In the end it was not the worst I ve had but was terribly crooked and not what i had asked for.
I came here with my husband to celebrate a job offer about a year ago but the poor experience really stands out in my mind. We had been here once before but did not remember anything in particular about that experience just that it seemed like a nice place to celebrate. We ordered a few appetizers to start one of which was a dumpling lard dish. Emphasis on the lard. Whatever you want to call this nasty concoction was dripping in grease and fat. You might wonder what we expected with the description of lard but we could not find any flavors other than fat with the texture and consistency of a loogie spat onto Toronto sidewalks. My husband and I have never been in a situation to send anything back to the kitchen but leaving 90 of the dish on the plate when the waitress comes to clear it away should be an indication of some dissatisfaction right? She never commented or even asked how we were liking the food and when we brought it up to her her response was along the lines of that s what you ordered. ??? Our main was a serving of fish presented over some nettles greens that were lit on fire to infuse the fish with their flavor. They did this in front of us and it seemed a bit pretentious but i can forgive anything if it tastes good! Yet again though the fish was heavy with oils although more edible than the snot appetizer. We had only finished about half of this dish and the waitress without any communication seemed eager to throw all our dishes away. We had to prompt her to pack it up it was close to 50 so not inexpensive . She looked at us and said in a VERY blunt tone what do you want to pack up. Oh we want the burnt nettles and greens lady duh. I ve had mediocre food before but in an establishment that presents itself as high end I expect the service to compensate. I ended up spending close to 200 that night on that dinner for a truly disappointing and sometimes disgusting meal having to deal with a waitress that frankly did not deserve to call herself a waitress for the lack of attention that we received. I would never return to this establishment because a of the way they seem to pride themselves on being a holes and b the food is not worth the price.
I have visited several times in the past few months and have come to the conclusion that this place is seriously overrated. Let me explain. The restaurant is in a great location which I think plays a huge role in its allure. It appears to be clean. Service is just OK. Food came out quick and we were able to pay and leave very quickly at the end of our meal. Drink refills never really happened and I have only went on nights that were not particularly busy. When it comes to food I feel the restaurant does not live up to the hype. Let me start off by saying that The Mission does offer many unique dishes such as a duck confeit. I commend them for that. However when it comes to taste it s not anything special. There are too many other great local competitors that specialize in Mexican cuisine especially in the Old Town area. For example what is supposed to be a spicy guacamole is actually quite bland. Most proteins are excessively salted. With portion sizes being somewhat on the smaller side I had high expectations for the taste and texture of food but there really was nothing to set The Mission above other options. Worth a try just to say you have eaten here. Otherwise I would rather just go to Bandera down the street. They have excellent Southwestern food the ribs are particularly exceptional . If you re craving Mexican head over to Barrio Queen which is on the north west side of Old Town.
Stay far away!! Go to Desert Auto on McQueen and Guadalupe they are honest and you wo not have to bring your car in multiple times for the same issue!
I hope your parchment paper is edible. I ordered a large poutine via delivery. As I was eating it I realize I was chewing on parchment paper that was stuck on all the french fries. They must of overcooked it and got stuck on the paper. I had to completely throw it out. Maybe try using aluminum foil.
We went to this place with my family and I was so disappointed because the food is not even close to what the other yelp people were saying. If you do not know Vietnamese food maybe it s good. Price was too high and the portion was small. I ordered the combination platter and some of the portion in the menu is missing. I ask the owner or manager and he told me oh we do not served that anymore . If you do not serve that anymore take it out from the menu. But I paid for that portion because it s suppose to be included in the combination platter. Wife ordered the pho special and some portion mentioned in the menu was missing too. Grilled chicken come on!!! you boiled the chicken and you put some char on it and you called it grilled. Smell the food you ordered from this joint like my grilled chicken was old maybe left over from yesterday. Wow what a waste of money I spent at this place. The server is creepy and does not understand what we re saying. The soup is too sweet my wife only had few sips. Also my sister ordered an egg roll and received a spring roll. They do not want to take the order back anymore so she just have to eat it. I would not recommend this place at all.
Store 419 has brutal customer service Wasted so much time trying to get help from the employees. The store manager did not even help. One employee literally walked past me. Wo not come to this location.
Food was fine. Service was abysmal. I thought we were on a hidden camera show it was so bad. Aloof chick server who could not remember my order no matter how manny times I repeated. Awful.
This is my neighborhood JITB. I have to say whomever is managing this franchise really needs to look at their cooks and counter help. It s had been months for reasons their food is cold and bland. After ordering from drive through I get home only to find my coke was nothing carbonated water and AGAIN they screwed up my order by giving me mini bacon and burger with onions and pickles when I ordered a breakfast jack! WTF these people ca not get it right. I will never give them my business AGAIN. I will drive to Reems and Waddell or to the new Burger King on Dysart and Thunderbird.
Disgusting not worth the money or wait. Everyone hypes this place up but its not good. Only reason people think its good because they are probably drunk. Also the meat is not seasoned at all.
Food was mediocre and drinks were expensive. I thought I was getting comp drinks when gambling and was not due to a policy they say I should have known. I would have complied if I knew. I asked if the drinks were comped. I feel I was hustled The front desk responce convinced me to post. I did not have 20 in since I used a ticket from yesterday. I guess they penalize repeat busisness. I was planning to visit periodically but not now.
Customer Service the associates were accommodating and answer any questions I had that s great Store Cleanliness the store appear to be well maintained and clean this was also great. Shopping Experience I had no issues in finding what I needed everything was in eyesight nothing was appeared to be the awry. Bought Merchandise I paid 66 for a used snoogle being sold as new at Bed Bath and Beyond in east Madison WI yesterday. I paid 20 for the cover. Look at the picture would you give that used and deflated pillow to a loved one? I hoped to provide my pregnant wife some relief I m in disbelief of this.
The girl serving on Christmas Eve had less Christmas spirit than the grinch. Had a sour face. Attitude. Got my order wrong and then just poured it out the plate and tried to dump something else in and I walked out. Complained to an employee as he walked out. Girl has 0 customer service skills.
We all have an off day or a poor eating experiences but my trip to the Liberty Cafe was a disaster of epic proportions. I d like forewarn anyone heading there of the quality of their food and service. We arrived at 11 15 for brunch and did not leave until after 1 00 of which 90 minutes was waiting for food. The server took our drink and food order and then forgot us until 12 15. We then started to get a bit annoyed when the table next to us got food while we waited another 30 minutes for our order. Our discussions with the owner was a litany of excuses and an apology only after it was suggested. Apparently it was our fault for coming after they had served a large group earlier in the morning which we would have appreciated hearing about when we arrived that they had run out of eggs etc etc.... The meal was horrible food Eggs Benedict with curdled hollandaise sauce every order wrong or missing items and bad service had to request butter for the cold unbuttered toast had to go get our own cutlery . A complete disaster. And to make the experience complete they were so kind said with full sarcasm to take off the Eggs Benedict that we had sent back off the bill. As a former bad waiter this is the only time I have not tipped for a meal. The server the kitchen and the owner all provided a truly horrible experience. And I ll return the favour by sharing the experience as much as possible.
I joined planet fitness at the opening of this facility and have paid my monthly dues referred five people to the gym and have been an active participator in this gym. Upon joining it appeared that the staff were disorganized and appeared uncertain of the regulations rules and were less than helpful at explaining how to use the red light therapy machines and hydromassage beds. The inconsistency in managment remains a deep concern but not as deep of a concern as the way I was treated tonight. I came to the gym and like every night laid my coat and bag behind the machine I was using. Never has anyone said anything to me about this prior and I was not given a list of rules or any paperwork upon joining. Tonight out of the blue after I had already started my workout I was asked if an employee could take my belongings behind the desk. My response no I would like to workout. My bag has my personal belongings and necessary items for medical issues that I keep close by while working out. This worker walked away. At the end of my work out the manager franchise operator approached me stating that he did not like my attitude and he would give me a sheet to withdrawl from my contract. When I asked to take these sheets home for my husband and I to complete and return he refused to allow me to leave the premises with these sheets and actually snatched them from my hands. Upon checking the website it states that I would be allowed to return these via certified mail. Once again another inconsistency. Due to the buyout fee that comes with yearly contracts and the fact that our contract is up after three more payments we will continue the terms of our contract and the minute this contract is up my husband and I will be leaving this gym. In an economy that is falling it blows my mind that someone would treat their custormer in such an unprofessional way. Upon my husband contacting the gym and speaking with the associate manager it was reported that the general manager was visiting the facility this evening. Apparantly the incompetency of the gym to educate and kindly enforce their regulations on a day to day basis caught up with this manager as he scrambled to save face. Sadly in the eyes of many customers tonight he indeed did not save face as I was not the only customer who was bullied by the manager to comply with rules that were never spoken of or enforced prior to the general managers visit. The only comfort that I took was that I saw this same manager treating others in a similar fashion which as a female allowed me to feel less threatened by this behavior. If you are looking for a gym where you can work out destress and provide good self care this town is packed with gyms that can offer you this this unforturnately is not one of them. If you are on a budget Charter Fitness offers an affordable package with competent staff who are respectful and professional in demeanor. Upon placing this information on Yelp I had a message on my personal cell phone for my husband. Upon discussing this with my husband I returned their phone call myself after all we are all adults. The manager refused to speak to me and then stated that she was returning a phone call that my husband placed. I knew that this was not true and told the manager that I just spoke with my husband and knew that he did not call and if he did certainly he would have left his number. The manager refused to speak to me. This manager then told my husband that she did not refuse to speak to me and that I was rude to her. I was hoping for a conversation and was most certainly not rude to her. In my definition rudeness involves manipulation and lying which is most certainly what this manager was doing. I was appalled at their inability to speak to me about me and their belief that my husband parents me and would tell me what I can and can not say or do. Upon my husbands contact I was informed that I could remain at the gym if I removed this post. In review of their membership rules which I had to scour the web to find there is no rule which removes my freedom of speech. The only lunks at this gym are the people who operate it I m sounding the alarm on this gym. I have contacted corporate offices and was treated very kindly and am hoping for resolve having cancellation fee removed or in the very least a professional apology and conversation.
My wife and I ate here and in our opinion it is horrible. This was our first and last time eating at The Spot. I ordered the Original Spot chicken sandwich and it was still pink in the middle. So I ate around the middle. We also had the sliders and they did not even taste like meat to me. My wife also had some onion strings with her order which were overcooked and tasted really bad. The mac and cheese was ok. The chairs were also very dirty. I would not recommend this place to anyone ever. As I write this my wife is now getting herself a bowl of cereal at home instead.
Never again. I m still trying to find a good nail salon and this aint it!! I opened the door and almost fell onto the polish bar right there. Weird. There s no separate tables where the girls do your nails it looks like a bar. An older woman did my nails and I was condemned to listen to some loud New Jersey girl talk incessantly at the other end of the bar . I thought MY New York ass was loud. Anyway they came out ok but days later I broke a nail others were lifting and it looked like the fill was growing out already. I had to get my nails done AGAIN in less than two weeks. Never will I go back. That bar is banned!!!
A big disappointed! Tried schezwan chicken with gravy schezwan rice chapli kebab and bhuna ghosht...tasteless!! Chapli kebab are as thin a paper...and even close to real chapli kebab. Bhuna ghosht with lot of fat. And let s talk about service. So very slow. Got appetizer after 20 mins and meal after 1 hour. And they forgot to serve cold drinks.
Signed in waited for an hour and a half before they called me to the front desk to speak with someone only to find out that they no longer accept my insurance. The wait could have been avoided if their sign in process was not so screwed up and they were not so understaffed. Customer service was generally slow and somewhat rude. The wait times of other people ranged from 1 2.5 hours. I do not understand how they stay in business. Avoid if at all possible. If you must go make sure you make an appointment and print out proof of the appointment.
Got to the spot around 3 in the afternoon and its seemed to be jumping.. Followed the droves of people headed towards the food! Paid the folks at the table n got the night club bracelet.. Ok now my mind was set on getting sum Good food but lines are all I can see to my left n right. So we decided to stroll around n gain a better idea of how the place was set up get the game plan together! Lol . We noticed the kiddie stuff super slides basket ball shots basket toss etc to the left and most vendors n trucks to the right with a stage and live music to the right n middle. We Did a couple laps n smelled a lot of food n some posters n skulls n seen a lot of people at standing tables digging into their food truck treasures but did we indulge? NopE! Lines were just a bit too long not really well set up. The trucks were all over n a few places I did stop were out of quite a bit of stuff which I can understand it being day 3. Talked to a few cool folks n enjoyed the sights n sounds live music was cool but no food... Got some homemade chili cheese fries at home. Maybe catch this food fest at another location or in San D another place in town.. Oh we did get red velvet bundt cakes to make it all worth it! Lol
first off. crazy sales people chasing us around the hotel all week drove me INSANE!!! you want ticket? how long you stay? . Every time i walked out of my room... I MEAN IT! i ca not imagine a hotel would want this kind of crap. We had to figure out how to change our routes through the damn place to avoid these people.. just to find MORE! also.. they spam the phone in your room with commercials for their shows! Within the first 3 hours we were there... FIVE messages! the rooms were kinda gross too. everything in the room made us itch. also the pool was closed! we went by many other hotels the same week whose pools were open AND quite busy. we called them before we book our trip and they told us the pool was open until December 1st. Not true.
RnR I tried to like you I really did. I ve lived in Scottsdale for a few years now so I am used to the restaurant night club trendy spot but I just could not get into RnR. I ve been there for dinner several times and did not enjoy myself. The place is loud the food mediocre and the service ranges from good to plain awful. Nothing on the menu ever really grabbed my attention so I had the Rock shrimp appetizer and a side of Parmesan fries. My two dinner mates each ordered a sandwich with fries as well. My rock shrimp were ok nothing to write home about and my side of 6 fries was tiny. My friend s side of fries on their sandwiches was a larger portion than the side I paid extra for. Before I wrote the place off I wanted to stop by for breakfast since I had heard about their endless mimosa and blood mary special. The special is a little confusing if you are not ordering a breakfast entre it 25 but if you do order an entre it is 15. Our server was busy that morning but also was very spaced out. Forgot to bring our joiner a water or silverware and was very non existent. The place was a little busy so I wanted to cut him some slack but he never wrote down our orders and then would come back to clarify on what we had ordered because he forgot. The endless special seemed like a good deal until I realized they did not make each refill on your mimosa but came around with a pitcher of pre mixed mimosas so some tasted like just OJ and some like a weak mimosa. My friend who had the endless bloody enjoyed his deal each bloody was a little different made each time once with a slice of bacon once with bacon bits once with no bacon at all but all in all thought it was a good for the price. My 3 cup of coffee was not refilled even when I requested. The food on the menu was a different story. I ordered the 3 breakfast tacos and requested a side of hash browns instead of home fries. Our waiter did not write down my order so of course it arrived with home fries but the food runner was happy to bring me the side of hash browns. My friends enjoyed their build your own burritos but my food was subpar. My tacos were greasy and lacked flavor. Every time I picked up my taco for a bite grease ran out the bottom. Even my potato and egg taco was greasy and flavorless. The hash browns were soggy and covered in cooking grease as well. I m all for a greasy spoon hang over breakfast but this was over board. The server was happy to oblige our request for separate checks but again because he failed to write down our order all our checks were wrong but by this time we were ready to leave so we paid what he gave us and left. The people watching WAS amazing. It was noon on a Sunday and there were girls in full make up and going out clothes not walk of shame either and d bags galore. If I wanted to start a drinking game at RnR it would be drink when ever some dude in a plaid shirt high fives another dude.
Got my lasik done here a few years ago and was happy with the service and results so I ve been coming for my follow up annual eye exams. That may be changing since the doctor I made the appointment with was not going to be in on the day of my appointment called me the day before to let me know . No problem rescheduled with Dr. Christenbury himself. They asked me to move the appointment earlier in the day so again luckily I was off of work so I could be flexible. I ve been here 45 minutes and have yet to be seen by anyone. I even called an hour before my appointment to ask if my eyes would be dilated and you think they could ve informed me then that I might as well wait at least 30 minutes to come in but nope. Instead I ve had to waste my day off sitting here waiting on them after I accommodated their schedule. It s just rude.
I do not know how to rate this. The kid side of me wants to put 4 stars but the adult side says 1.5 2. Kid opinion The big snake hanging down in the gift shop is cool. The rain falling down and the fake thunderstorms and sparkling stars and atmosphere is neat. And the desert with sparklers is awesome! Adult side The food is blah. The alcoholic beverages were boring or too sweet. Both Customer service was good.
This place is very hit and miss. Selling can be a nightmare. If you re selling be prepared to WAIT for a long time and do not expect them to take much of your stuff. I tried selling an expensive purse beautiful expensive designer jeans Dr Martens Chuck Taylor Cons and they would not take anything and what they do take they wo not give you much. Would that employee wear those items you re selling? If not then they likely wo not take them. Come back later to a different employee you might get a different result. I know they do have to be kind of picky about what they accept but it s just ridiculous sometimes. Buying I have struck a pretty good deal a couple of times. Though they sometimes do needlessly over price a lot of stuff. I have not been there in a while after a bad experience but judging by the recent reviews maybe things have changed?
It was not a good experience. The food is not worth the money. The service shows the poor quality.
Thank you for your reply. But take this review as constructive criticism and not something to find fault with your restaurant. I really do not care if you mop the floor or not or serve leftovers as I will not be your Customer ever again. When we entered you had no Customers at all But the Biriyani in your rice cooker was barely enough for 2 people. So if it was made for dinner I wonder why it was just some scrapingss at the bottom only? It s not the number of years you are in business that counts it is how happy your customers are that s important. Yes I did not purchase the Groupon because the lady I spoke to at the restaurant earlier that evening told me she would give all 3 of us the 50 off and free drinks and I need not purchase a Groupon. You keep mentioning the free drinks but let me make it clear it was ONLY 1 can of sprite. Maybe it cost you 1. No one had a drink except me. My Husband wanted a coffee but he decided not to have it. Yes you did come and ask me about the meal. What did you want me to say? That all the food was bland? Would you have made all the dishes back again for me? Really? I think you should take a review as something good for you to improve on and apologies to a customer and end it there. We pay much more for food. 20 means nothing. It s just the policy. You do not promise something and then do something else when we get there. You just keep talking about a 50 discount which I am entitled to anyway if I did purchase the Groupon but I was told I do not need to purchase it and just 1 can of Sprite.
Pretty good bagged up seafood. Better quality seafood than most but their bathrooms were unkempt and disgusting. They should really hire someone to just take care of that if they ca not have people rotate in to clean it. Decent service but also it s all hands and not forks or plates so it gets messy with lots of used napkins. It was good but a little dirty in there.
I personally was not a fan we ordered their Manchurian chicken and sweet and sour chicken. It smelled fantastic but was very lacking in flavor. The dishes were very soupy and bland. The fried rice was not bad until I chomped on a massive piece of eggshell. I think they could be better if they tweaked their recipes. The dishes were in dire need of salt more garlic would not hurt either
Great Effin Cucumber Martini. Really bad service. Ordered 2 sodas and 2 drinks from outside table. Got sodas and waited for drinks for 30mins. Asked multiple servers for help. Eventually went up to bar myself to find them sitting there awaiting the waitress who never came. Old wash rag left on table. Asked one of the servers if they d like to take it away and they replied it was not theirs. Enough said.
This is absolutely the worst experience checking into a hotel I have found anywhere. When you drive up there is no sign saying where to go or what to do. I called the hotel the person who answered the phone was rude and hung up on me but I gathered that what I had to do was go in the ramp that said Self Parking find a parking space find the elevator no signs for that either go down to the ground floor walk outside and around to the front go in dragging our suitcases up three steps no ramp then down three stairs on the other side of the door no ramp . The next day I found the ramp but it was not obvious and of course there was no sign. Inside there are no signs just noisy slot machines. A ton of them. I found a bar and the barman pointed me in the right direction though I had to ask someone else after walking part way. The registration desk has no sign over it at all. It is easily a city block to walk from the parking garage to the registration desk and it requires you to walk the whole length of the casino to get there. Then you have to walk through the casino again to get out. The room was OK in the World tower. At the foot of the bed was a sofa facing a large TV on the wall. No chairs except a very small and uncomfortable one at the desk in front of the TV. There were large mirrors on each side wall surrounded by fluorescent lights you turned on with a switch. BUT nowhere to unpack any clothes. If you remove things from minibar so as to put your own things in you will be charged fot them even if you put thrm back unopened. Front desk took those charges off. Refrigerator is extra none in room .
This gas station sucks! I went to get a 7 automatic car wash. The sign says Fold in mirrors if truck or van type vehicle. I have a Nissan Sentra so I did NOT tuck in my mirrors. The car wash hit my mirrors and I had to reverse with soap sudded windows i.e. I could not see anything! to stop the machine from ripping my mirrors off. When I told ADAM the attendant what happened in his car wash he was condescending and acted like I did something shady wrong in the car wash area. It was so rude and ADAM should be reprimanded for his poor customer service. Mobil should also be concerned that this MANAGER of their name brand is treating its customers so terribly. Meh!!!!
Is this true? I ordered a PLAIN burger and it was brought out the total opposite and the manager came to our table to say that a new law was discovered today that if an order is delivered to a table the customer has to pay for it regardless !!! On top of that the server came back to our table and wanted to argue with me to tell me that I DID NOT order it plain. She was very rude and was shaking her head at me....with that being said I asked for the burger to go and came home and gave it to my dog! It was a bad experience and merely do not understand because we were nice customers. We ve NEVER had this experience and will not return.
Smallest pool ever! Basically have to stand in one spot and not move because it s so crowded. Ca not even enjoy it. There s nowhere to sit and relax besides at the bar and they charge 100 for a lounge chair which is ridiculous. Drinks are small and extremely overpriced compared to anywhere else in Vegas. And do not count on getting a limo because we got a van. Voodoo beach at Rio is 1000 times better bigger and cheaper.
Visited approximately two weeks ago. I had just had a spa appointment up the street and was walking back to the subway when I saw the sign in the window to try their flavor of the week red velvet crumble. I m a sucker for cupcakes especially red velvet so I thought I d pop in and give it a try. Went inside and the employee was on the phone. I had a look and what was around and tried to make some small talk asking if it was a new place etc she did not seem interested so I just grabbed a red velvet crumble and a regular red velvet. Mmm... Underwhelming. They both had buttercream cream cheese icing which was great because I hate whipped cream on cupcakes but the amount of icing was super stingy. They did not taste fresh moist or any of the other things you want from a really good cupcake and were of average size. Would not return. For around the same price I can go to Prairie Girl and get massive mouthwatering cupcakes from a happy employee.
Overpriced unspectacular food 7 bottles of beer and shoddy inattentive service... But man you re not gonna find too many places to sit under an umbrella in the sun on the water in the city couple beers and some peel and eat shrimp... Rode my bike out to meet my old man. Bike path comes directly to the dock Definitely do not stop here if you re in a rush or on a budget. Almost left it 3 stars... But seriously there are still restaurants that allow smoking?! Thankfully they were not next to our table. 2.5 stars.
Wow what the hell happened here? It s been a long time since I ve been to this spot well before we moved to Vegas but man the difference between then and now was night and day. I ll start by saying the bulk of this one star review is for the service which was abominable. Right after our food was dropped off our waiter buzzed by to see if we needed anything and that was it. We did not need anything at the time but half way through our meal my wife and I would have both liked a drink refill and my wife wanted some butter or jam for her biscuit which the restaurant offered up dry. Despite several efforts to flag this guy or anyone else down we were ignored. He finally popped over once we were well done and had been waiting for the check for about 10 minutes and asked do you need anything. I said just the check at this point and seeing I was pissed he did not even bother to ask how everything was. So how WAS the food? Well my wife had a salmon scramble which was just ok. It was supposed to have brie cheese in it but she was given one extremely tiny blob of brie and that was it. The rest was eggs and fish. It came with the aforementioned dry biscuit seriously who serves a dry biscuit when there is no gravy or sauce and provides no butter or jam and some terrible home fry style potatoes our waiter s recommendation for the best potatoes on offer . I had the pounded pork sandwich with salad. The salad was middling with just about past its prime veggies and an overly sweet cucumber dressing. The pork sandwich was good though I ve liked it in the past and liked it here. I also had the Hash House Bloody Mary which was disgusting. Easily the worst bloody mary I ve ever had. The bloody mary you get on an airplane with the from a can spicy tomato juice and little bottle of booze is far superior. Overall this was a terrible experience. I doubt we ll ever be back. I m not sure what happened here we liked this place a lot on our first few visits but ugh.
I honestly wish this review was about the pizza. However after being on hold for 20 minutes I decided to call a different local pizza spot. If I was mr popa I would be disappointed at the loss of money from customers just trying to place an order and going some place else. pizzafail
Horrible service this evening! Had to file an extensive complaint to the corporate office because of this establishemnt. Do not get me wrong I like their wraps and smoothies and have visited other locations without any issues but the service here is TERRIBLE! The representatives do not seem to have any kind of customer service skills and the ones making the food seem to still be in training for weeks now . Hopefully corporate can get this issue resolved otherwise I do not see this facility being in business much longer.
Was disappointed tonight for dinner. I ordered the peel and eat shrimp. The shrimp were either frozen and not thawed properly or they were prepared yesterday and served today. Thought the seafood was supposed to be fresh. Not the case here. They were very tough and no flavor. This is somewhat surprising as I am a frequent patron and have not had any significant issues. My family had salads and wings. There food was fine. Service was quick despite the restaurant really busy for the basketball games. I did alert the waitress of the issue with my food. I told her this as she gave us the check. She did not come by between food being delivered and check. Another disappointment tonight. I will give HT another try maybe but tonight was not good.
I do not recommend this practice. The staff seems friendly and helpful however the bed side manner of Dr. Leonard in unacceptable. He refused to speak to me about more than one subject per office visit even though all was related to one greater issue and required me to schedule additional appointments just to talk about blood work results. These results should have been explained in detail instead he rushed through them because that was not part of the well woman appointment. Scheduling appointments has been a constant struggle due to the restrictions placed on what you are allowed to talk about in each appointment. I would not recommend this practice to anyone.
I have traveled all over the US listening to radio stations. This is the lowest scummiest station I have ever listened too. The radio broadcasters are low lives. Talking and laughing about poisoning people old disabled people and things that nobody cares about. 100 trash!!!
Worst car buying experience I have ever had! Purchased my wife s new car here with a promise of getting a few extras installed one being a factory GPS. After several trips them trying to weasel out of the deal by installing cheap windshield mounted GPS over a month of waiting AND getting Dodge involved we finally got the GPS we were promised. I also HIGHLY recommend not giving them your keys. Because of these issues we will not be returning. Not to mention we just purchased an 80k RAM 3500.... In Arizona.
I came here just last week and the quality definitely was not as good as before. last few times I came was probably 1 yr ago Agreed with the Yelper below that there likely is a change of management. The dishes were oilier and just did not leave me too impressed. This used to be a good dimsum place The dimsum items on the menu remain the same though! And for some reason the waitresses that serve the dimsum were being a tad rude. Soya sauce normally gets served with the cheung fun and vinegar comes with the beef balls this is customary practice. We asked if we could get the accompanying sauce and on multiple times they told us to ask the agent to get it for us the one that seats you takes your reservation deals with the bill not sure how to describe it in English.. Essentially like a head waiter . Are the waitresses on strike or something?! But regardless the agent was not impressed with their attitude and apologized to us which was nice of him but this restaurant has got to get it together. Decor and everything os the same Not your typical Chinese decor. Instead it s filled with European style paintings and sculptures. But regardless this place used to be good.. Now it s just meh mediocre quality.
Long wait poor service cold food bad food...need I say more? To make things worse no one even attempted to say they were sorry. Tried the restaurant due to purchase of a Groupon was not worth the money I paid for the Groupon. Obviously will never return.
This place was just ok not sure about all the other reviews. We tried to AYCE Sushi and bbq combo. Definitely not worth it. The servers did had no clue about anything and the quality of food both bbq and sushi was mediocre. The sushi is only till 10pm and they re open till 3am??? Thats not cool!!! We wo not come back here again
The manager is a complete hole. Tall gentleman with glasses. So incredibly rude and abrupt. I frequently bring him pre paid packages all he has to do is scan the package so that I am not liable for loss of its contents. He is always so rude when I ask him to scan it. He s doing nothing the place is empty and he just expects you to leave a package there without it being scanned into the system. It s like leaving cash with someone without a receipt. Sometimes these packages are worth thousands of dollars it is YOUR JOB at UPS to accept the package for the customer. It s a very simple job and it s incredibly self centered and rude to hassle customers when they ask you to scan pre paid packages. I left a package worth 450 with him and the vendor has yet to receive it. He refused to scan it while I was in front of him. Now I m nervous that it will never get there. There s something about him I do not trust and this is the last straw. Avoid this UPS. To the manager I hope you re reading this and change your practice. If you do not I hope everyone else reads this and does not ship from your store anymore. There s no place for rude and self centric customer service in 2015. You will be exposed.
I ve been wanting to stop in and try this new place...sounded interesting so I did last night. Unfortunately the super size me mentality of American fast food culture fails miserably here. A relatively large somewhat difficult to eat burrito size roll of sushi turned out to be a bad idea. I have no doubt the ingredients are fresh but trying to create a Mexican Japanese style does not work. Burritos tend to be messy and we expect that. Sushi rolls are more delicate and we consume them in more bite size pieces. Some people may like this place but it s not for me.
Went in as a group of eight and a child. Sat us out in front area in dark. Finally turned lights on. First thing you notice is the bullet hole and cracked glass in front. Ordered food and waiter brought 1 2 the drinks. He forgot the others. Food served to 2 3 of us at a time. Others had to wait. Just as we started eating a cockroach Brown German ran over my niece s hand. Killed it and tried to go on with meal. I ordered Pineapple Fried Rice with Shrimp. Shrimp looked great on outside but was raw in the middle. I bit into lukewarm clear gray mush. I will say Spring Rolls were very good. Waiter very unconcerned with issues. I will not be returning
I ve been to this salon multiple times since it is so close to home but I will never go back. I called ahead and they told me to come right away and they will get started. Well 20 min of waiting they start my nails wrapping in tin foil then I m told that he has 2 appts so he stopped working on me and I sat there for over an hour waiting for him to come back! Then I m switched to another person with no apology. Just a way to get me in to make money. And to top it off they charged me 10 more than last time I showed him the receipt from last time and the date he said oh yeah hmm idk and charged me more with sitting there for over an hour! You d think they d at least compensate for that. Every single time I go the price magically changes. I m not one to leave bad reviews but this was horrible. I was there for 2 hrs for a gel manicure..
Completely awful. I ordered my food an hour ahead through the new Panda Express app it s suppose to be faster and more convenient. I go in at my exact pick up time 8 30pm and was told to get in the back of the long line of people ordering. Why? If mine is already ordered and paid for. You re making me wait in line for cold food I should ve just ordered in store at least it would ve been hot! Never coming back to Panda Express again sticking to real Chinese food. And not only that but they were out of the food I ordered when I got there.... I ordered the food an hour ahead of time they could not cook more of my order in that hour?
Horrendous experience. My SO and I had a groupon for 3 Works car washes. So one day after work we decided to meet there and get our cars cleaned up. He got there 10 minutes before I did and told them I was on my way. They washed his car but when I showed up they told me they had closed. It was 5pm and their website says they are open til 6pm. After I demanded to speak to the manager they said they would wash the outside of the car but not the inside. He said they closed early for weather it was cloudy with no chance of meatballs and it was upper management s call . I then explained that I was in a bind because I planned to refund my groupon why would I want to support this business much less go there again if they close on a whim? but they had already washed my husband s car. He said that s your problem . Never apologized. So if after reading this you still choose to go call first to see if they plan on staying open for the whole day. And do not go if it is cloudy.
Disappointing evening at 5 Church! Service was terrible. On a bright note the cauliflower soup was very good. However the rest of the meal was a disaster. I had the roasted chicken which had good flavor but it was not hot. The mashed potatoes were practically cold. My husband s hanger steak was also served cold. For desert I was supposed to get a brownie with toasted marshmallow on the side. Without any explanation they decided to serve it with ice cream not what I ordered. Will not be back. Even the decor is looking a bit tired there were rips in the seating.
greasy spoon diner that has not been cleaned in forever. perfect if you re a student or hungover or broke. nothing to write home about. it s a breakfast diner in the basement of a small corner building near the old montreal forum now an AMC movie theatre open 24 hours btw
Only giving 2 stars because of the supporting staff and the fact Dr. Lori Straub excellent Dr. talked to me told me what was wrong and would give recommendations on how to fix it was there for a short time. Other than that people I know that went to Wolfson medical centers Believe it or not there s more than 1 told me if Lori Straub was gone do not come back. I shoulda listened. Wolfson does not believe his patients does not seem to want to help and could not care less if you go somewhere else. Overtly cautious and unwilling to care. The last thing people are looking for is a robot for a doctor. Steer clear of this place unless Lori comes back.
Got a pecan pie and a banana cream pie and neither of them were very good. Definitely not worth the price I kind of wish I d just gotten some from smiths.
the place is extremely clean and well put together but the people there are extremely rude and cold. i did not feel welcome what so ever. the men that were helping me were so distant and awkward. terrible customer service skills all around. i did not even get an explanation of the process of how they sell shoes or anything. i will not be returning and if there are other places with the same service i suggest you go there.
Gorton s in the toaster is better than this vile crap. They charge extra for their bad tartar sauce. Avoid.
The girl on the floor was too busy setting up a display. One cashier with 4 people in line. We walked up to the Pickup area and a woman was on the phone with a Customer. Manager walked right by us without looking at us or acknowledging us. What s crazy is that there were maybe maybe 10 people in the entire store. Long story short. We drove a little further and bought our spirits Total Wine More.
Terrible service belittled my daughter big tough hygienist picked on her and negligent with leaving a device in her mouth for a year too long to the point we have to take her to another dentist to have it surgically removed because they said they ca not . This place is a joke do yourself a favor and look elsewhere anywhere else. You ve been warned. They ll find any way they can to pass the blame from themselves.
Have not eaten at this restaurant a lot because the food is too pricey for the just a so so taste... but decided to give it another chance the other day because the restaurant we intended to go to was closed for lunch on that day. The food is getting worse since the last time I was here 3 mos ago . Ordered a bowl of noodle soup and the shrimps in the soup were all rotten you can see the yellowish color on the shrimps and what an awful smell they have... notified the staff but not even an apology was given... Will not be back for sure...
this place sucks !!! do not bring a credit card or debit they will decline it and skim your account i have had 5 accounts hacked by this business two different business american express rest visa mc and debit. spend hours pulling parts and no atm everyone just shrugs and knows nothing. bunch of no care mexicans go to broadway you will regret it if u try to use a card. never again!!!
Do not expect any employee to know he answer to your question. You are smarter then the employee. Robots are smarter. Every time I get in line at a register something goes wrong with the person in front of me. Most of time their will be a customer with 400 worth of groceries and their card declines and they argue with the person at reg that it should work. And that takes about 30 minutes as line builds up. Or something does not ring up so it will take the person at register 30 minutes to find out he price. Need a mgr? Prob hr on that! It s awful. I try to avoid Walmart at all costs. And many groceries they carry are more expensive then other places.
This location is way different than other ones. I ordered a single fish taco plate and waited 20 mins! The manager was more concerned about getting the to go orders right that she didnt notice my plate was sitting right behind her. The fish was heavily coated in batter the refried beans were cold and had to much pepper. The mild red sauce tasted like it had ketchup in it. Overall not a good experience
I was very upset with this club. My husband and I signed up online for the limo and free entry. I verified with the market director that we would be getting picked up. We waited and waited. And guess what never got picked up or even called saying that they had to cancel. We were in Vegas in our anniversary vacation. We would have liked to go out Super Bowl Sunday night but we got stood up. I emailed the guy the next morning and never got a response yet. Beyond mad feel like one of our nights were wasted. Should have just went elsewhere. Next time in Vegas we re not even gonna think about this club. And I will be telling our friends that are traveling out do not try to use there free limo service cause they wo not come and wo not call
I really wanted to like this place. I craved Chinese food tonight and let s face it I m a sucker for crappy Chinese food I was hoping this place would hit the spot. The decor was decent had a good look. The overall theme was cohesive. It s the food that missed the mark for me. I had the Crab Wontons for appetizer. They were.... eh. I could not tell if they were cold in the middle or if they were just in so much cold sauce that it sapped the heat from the fried goodness. The consistency was off too I found the filling to ooze out all over the place which was a little awkward considering I was not given an appetizer plate. For the main course I had the signature dish the Evil Jungle Princess Chicken with the fried rice. It was a disaster. I had expected a chicken dish with a side of fried rice. It all came in one bowl like a trough of food. I could not really make any distiction between the fried rice and the underwhelming chicken dish. There was nothing memorable about this dish just a steaming pile of disappointment. I will not return here by choice.
The only reason I m giving a two star rating is because the food is outstanding otherwise it would definitely be a one. The service at this particular location is terrible they rush you through the line with rudeness and carelessness. I visited this location this afternoon 4 11 and the kitchen area was a wreck with piled up dirty equipment and dishes. I definitely wo not be returning to this location. Whoever owns this restaurant should really look into their hiring process because what their doing now is not working.
DJ is terrible! Could not keep a dance floor if his life depended on it. Could go to a bar and pay less to hear the same songs
I live in Vegas and have seen every Cirque du Soleil show and this was by far my least favorite. I m a huge fan of Cirque du Soleil but the acrobatics were inferior to other shows and the comedy was so bad that it was not really funny. You could hear a few sympathy laughs and applauds here and there but overall very disappointed. The concept was similar to other shows that they have but the quality was way inferior especially the attempted comedy . When i read reviews I always wonder if the negative reviews come from people that just hate all shows and want to find flaws in everything just to be negative but here I am writing a negative review about a show I truly wanted to enjoy and thought I would and was disappointed and wish I had read the reviews before buying tickets. If you get a free ticket or a comp its better than not seeing it but if you re gonna spend money pick another show. This was substandard in almost every way especially the comedy . Hope this helps
Two Words.. Panda Express. OK 4. With handmade noodles. Not my thing!
Ok so this review is for 03 27 2009 which was over a week ago. I usually review places that I love right away so that just tells you this was a forgettable experience. We had a large party of about 10 people so we had to get two tables together which the staff here did accommodate our needs very quickly. However that was probably the best part of my dining experience here. A very abrupt rude waiter took our order. The food literally took one hour to get to us. By the time it got to us we were debating on whether leave wait for the food or butter our napkins and eat THEM instead. I ordered the petite fillet with asparagus and mac n cheese. For me the steak was ok but I have had much better at Craft Steak. The mac n cheese was pretty good but not fantastic. Definitely NOT memorable. They took forever to bring the bill to us when we were finished. It was about 65 85 per couple. I would not have paid Black Angus prices for this place. I gave this place two stars one for the friendly hostess who accommodated us right away and one for the fresh crisp asparagus and the mac n cheese. I will NOT be back!
The young guy at the front door was very pleasant and helpful. After that we received literally the worst service I have ever gotten in my life. Bartenders were rude and continuously bad mouthed us right in front of our faces. I have never seen anyone in the service industry seem this annoyed by having customers at their bar. We even had a former Salt Cellar employee with us. We will not return. Too bad because the food was excellent as always.
We saw an item available that we needed through the website for same day pickup so went to the store to find it knowing it was in stock. After getting there we asked for help from an employee who not to her fault had been just hired but had no way to help us. Apparently employees in the store ca not locate items online that are in stock in that store. We called the store number and got an assistant manager after a few minutes who decided to come meet us. After learning that she could only locate the item through the public Walmart app which was not working for her I downloaded the app myself and told her which aisle the item was in. Apparently nobody there knows which aisle N is because she asked a few people. The assistant manager was nice but the item still was not there after we finally found the right aisle we wasted an hour. Really our fault thinking Walmart could solve our problem.
I went to this salon for years and originally had great service. Within the past couple months the customer service went from friendly and welcoming to rude and lazy. I used to go here for acrylics which they advertise 15 for a fill and basic polish. Last couple times i came for a fill I was charged 30 for two toned nails. A very simple fast polish. In addition I always make an appointment ahead of time and end up waiting a half hour after my scheduled time. Plus any time I ask for any type of designs that take more than a minute or so to do I m told that 1. It cannot be done or 2. I just get an attitude. I used to love going here and was very loyal to this salon up until all of this has been happening.
The customer service here is the WORST. I was buying their expensive but good quality yoga pants at 100 each and had nobody ask me if I needed help and even when i thanked the cashier all I received was an icy stare. I shop there because their yoga pants feel and look amazing on me...So I recommend their product for yoga and tai chi but definitely not customer service.
Its a hick bowling alley. Cheap bar food.
My wife just took our car to Auto Bell paid 50.00 for a wash and interior cleaning and what she brought home looks to be worth about 20.00. The outside still had road grime and spots they left water spots everywhere and the interior was not as clean as it should have been. For as much as she spent I expect far better than what they provided. From now on I am going to pay the extra amount and take my cars to Dillworth Car Wash. They charge substantially more but I was blown away with what I got for my money there.
The food and service here is as bad as it gets. I would give it no stars if I could. Ordered a turkey bagel sandwich with the bagel toasted. I asked if they could add salami offered to pay more since they had an Italian sandwich menu item that had salami on it and she responded like I asked for something outrageous. She said there was no way she could do it. Then I waited...and waited....took forever. After I got my order I opened it up to realize....they gave my sandwich to the wrong person! They had mixed up our orders in giving the person in front of me my order and their order to me. So I went back to the counter and patiently explained what had happened. She rolled her eyes at me grunted and made it seem like this was my fault!! Above all she then did not even bother toasting the bagel and did not put any condiments on it at all. The sandwich was dry and tough to eat. I had to go to Port of Subs closer to my gate because I could not make it back in time to tell them grabbed a packet of mayo and mustard which thankfully they had out at a condiment bar because I would have been too embarrassed to ask...and it helped but definitely did not satisfy the bagel sandwich craving I had. Avoid this place if you can.
Warning IF YOU RE NOT INTO SQUISHY GELATINOUS RAW FISH THAT S NOT WRAPPED IN RICE THIS IS NOT YOUR SPOT. Otherwise your kid could make this kewpie mayo on sushi rice with squishy raw trout bits and wasabi crunch peas and a couple flecks of edamame for 10.95. I ca not say I ve had an extremely positive experience with food here or I guess I m just not a poke bowl person. The trout came out was lukewarm though not fishy. I m just not fond of it not surrounded by rice in a sushi and the addition of wasabi peas made for a strange combination of soft and crunchy mouth feel. It just did not sit right with me with mayo added. The rice was lukewarm too and that s strange for a salad bowl. Nothing to write home about.
Food absolutely horrible. We went there because of the reviews on this yelp. Chips are stale. Burgers burnt. Took forever to get waited on. Worst meal in Arizona. Horrible ....yuk!
The reviews on here are dismal...primarily due to what I deem as a management or mismanagement issue really pertaining to the back office staff not returning calls which is inexcusable and quite solvable if they choose to do so...been there and solved that elsewhere..... Armed with that info in my pocket I went in head strong and insisted on speaking live to folks rather that the many offered suggestions of leave a message .... We will call you back... Ha I read the reviews... Momma did not raise no fool. My efforts were 100 successful today.... Was able to garner some great armor breaking success and secured a same day appointment which was critical to my situation. Chad a technician helped me out by issuing a new CPAP machine. He was off the charts patient knowledgable and extremely helpful. He promised support of any kind down the road if I ever run into the chronic problems mentioned in the reviews! In fact I had a couple of questions after I got home... I called and left a message to call me and low and behold he called me back 40 minutes later. Hats off to you chad!!! Spread your influence!!! One year later....update.... they still have serious issues on phone support... called three times today... on hold for at least 15 20 minutes each time!!! In today s world totally unacceptable... these people need management to step up and solve the problem... as I noted previously... u dare not leave a message as i am assuming it will still will go unanswered.....
The customer is always wrong with USA Bus Charter. DO NOT BOOK! DO NOT BOOK! DO NOT BOOK! They are the worst company! Russel argued that he contracted correctly when written in the initial quote was quite different. Partly my fault. Read his contract thoroughly. He WILL refer to the fine print blaming the you for your stupidity. He told my employee to keep her nose out of his business. He is a rude individual.
Went to Scottsdale RV because they were the only dealership that carried the brand and model that we were interested in. I totally ca not understand the great reviews on this place. I have never seen such a dirty disorganized place of business in quite awhile. My husband and I were treated rudely and the guy that helped us was totally uninterested and dismissed us quickly. Showed us one trailer then was finished with us. No offer to call or follow up in any way very rude and unhelpful. We wo not go back even though they were the only ones to carry that brand anywhere in Arizona. I would rather drive to the factory in Indiana!
We had high expectations but were disappointed. Food was almost cold and just okay!! Sad because we are huge Ramsey fans!
If I could give King steam negative 5 stars I would. This company is an absolute joke and a complete rip off. We called to have a quote on our rug to be CLEANED and what we got in return was a rug that is now crusty which was not before we gave it to them to have cleaned and still soiled. The technician that came to give us a bid was a nice guy and I trusted him to give me a fair price to clean a rug that only needed a small section cleaned. The technician again was very nice but had zero idea of how they were going to clean the rug so he tried to call the owner several times with no answer after he finally got a call back the from the owner about 40 minutes later he stated they could completely clean the rug back to new condition but had to take it to their shop to do so... Four days later we received the rug back which was left out on our front patio... then when we unrolled the rug it looked like they had literally not done a single thing to it?? When my fianc called to ask the business why the rug was not clean she was given a run around excuse of why the company could not clean it and then eventually hung up on. If you could not clean the rug then why are not we getting our money back?? We will be getting in touch with the better business bureau tomorrow if we do not receive our money back on services that were not provided. I hope this company does the right thing and gives us our money back.
At CVS last week I was behind two ladies buying some valentine candy Mark at 90 off the clerk then charged five dollars for one and 10 for the other one if this was 90 off they would ve had to of been 50 box to start and a 100 box I did tell the clerk that he was doing something wrong but I believe he already knew this and register was probably set that way. I d be interested if anyone could just prove this
Do not waste your time or money. Service is not the best. Very slow and mixed up our order. Over charged us for our drinks. Watch your bill. We left after our drinks. Had to wait half hour for our drinks and place was not even busy. Place is half empty and they made us wait half hour to get in. What a waste of time!
the charchiterie for two was pathetic. more mustard on plate than cheese. the tiny slice of brie was hard on edges. i did like the olives. low on staff and poor waitress was swamped so had to wait over five min to be greeted drink order. AND they were out of pinot grigio!!!?
Great renovated suite. The lobby gym and surrounding areas were just great. However when I first arrived at around 10 p.m. the valet was not outside but watching from inside. Hubby and I had to lug our luggage in as the front desk guy and valet guy just watched from inside. Apparently 60 degree weather is too cold for Arizonans to go outside and help their guests. Upon check in the front desk guy said we could park in the private garage for something like 15 a day or and he recommended this option go park in front of the hotel on the street or across the street. The valet perked up at this point and pointed toward two spots available on the street near the corner. He was very clear and said Look there s two spots right there. Hubby carried the bags to the room and I moved the car exactly where I was told. In the morning I found a parking ticket. That strip is apparently no parking because it s a trolley stop. You d think the hotel would know that or at least NOT recommend that I specifically park there. Not cool Marriott not cool. I ll be writing a letter to the manager with a copy of the ticket asking for a check to pay it.
Very difficult to enjoy a meal when the lone server is literally RUNNING from table to table in order to clean and prep no busboy answer all the phones nobody on cash and serve meals. Not sure what was happening in the kitchen but I d finished two servings with no sign of the naan. This one is not on the staff though the poor dude working the floor was tireless and smiled the whole time promising me better service next time this one is on the owner cutting corners. I give it two stars since it s usually better but if the servers are thrown under the bus again the next time I go i wo not be back even though I ve likely eaten here a dozen times before.
This shop is a total joke. Jim I guess the owner makes a lot of promises but does not follow up on them. Brought my vehicle to them to rebuild the transmission and all they did was made it worse. I do not recommend this shop. A job that a normal shop would take 4 days took them almost a whole month. Every time I asked if it was complete it was the same answer tomorrow .. do not go here. Honestly.
Went to him for over 20 yrs. Started well. Wondered why I never really needed work in these late years... Endured a hygienist that was...insufferable with inane conversation Presently had extensive periodontal work... Now I am told that the decay in one of my molars I needed 5 crowns THAT should speak for itself is so extensive I have to have it extracted and have an implant. I respect my current dentist and we review the X Rays together I am an RN so I do have medical experience. Yeah nice guy and all. Just did not get the job done. Phoned it in as a friend put it...
Paid for three drinks they gave me one. When I asked for my other two they treated me like a liar like they had given them to me and I slipped them away. Feels like GARBAGE to be charged for 3 drinks and then treated like a criminal when I ask for my full order. I will never come back here.
I ve been to this place several times because I like spicy food even though their service is always so so. But the last Saturday Aug 27 when I visited with may family was worst so I decided not to go again to this place forever. At that time I ordered 4 dishes with rice but our food was not served until waiting more than 30 minutes. The most upsetting was that other guests were served first who came later than we though one of foods I ordered was cold food always served quickly and firstly. The feeling that we might be ignored intentionally other than Chinese guests made me more upset and we re actually informed of nothing in spite of so long wait. Their staff ve been always so so and not well trained so I did not expect much but it s worst that I ve experienced. The food? spicy like other Szechuan food but not Szechuan delicious I experienced in authentic Szechuan restaurants.
The blowout was amazing Austin this was my first time ever! I loved it and I love him so he would get ten stars however the staffing of the salon was quite ridiculous. If you re not bothered by your stylist taking phone calls for the business every 4 5 minutes then you re golden. I however appreciate full attention when I m in a salon it was annoying and unfair to everyone at the salon me the stylist and the person trying to get an appointment. If you ca not afford to staff your salon properly then maybe you should have waited to open. Austin was apologetic for the interruptions and tried to smooth it over but the process took over an hour just because he was interrupted. Not sure I could recommend this place until they are fully staffed.
Unfortunately I can no longer recommend this gym based on the way they handled my cancelation. I loved the gym for its ease of access and the fact that it was never too busy that I could not get to the free weights or bench. The equipment is not state of the art but I do not need that. I never did classes so I ca not comment on that. The tanning is basic but it gets the job done and is cheap. The reason why I can no longer recommend them is the fact that I had called in July about canceling my membership since I moved to California. The guy who I believed to be the owner said I would have to send in a copy of my lease to cancel it. Ok fine. Well I called two months later to officially cancel as I just had not had time to get a copy of my lease and send it in to find out that I actually could have canceled as early as June with no extra requirement since that was when my contract had actually expired. So I then asked if it could be effective immediately and the representative said no that I have to pay an additional month since I did not give 30 days notice. At this point I am fuming and explained how I had called back in July to no avail but she did not care. She said I ca not do anything about it. Mind you this is an independently owned facility. They are more than able to fix things on their own. I m not upset about the extra 25 that I paid so much as the inconsistency with customer service and the fact that the previous representative told me false information without any qualms about it. What else will they not tell you the full story about?
JJ! It could have been beneficial to both of us had u given me a chance. I wasted alot of time coming back everytime I was asked only to get told No. For nothing! It s bad business to treat people that way.
The good my facial with Lori was great. Very relaxing and felt great after. My skin felt awesome. The bad went back a week later for massage. Showed up for my appointment and was told by the receptionist that there was a problem with the schedule. While telling me this she did not make eye contact with me but remained typing on the computer to inform me that I did not have an appointment. She told me they tried calling me and left a voicemail..which after I looked they did. When they called I was unable to answer and it went to voicemail and I had forgotten about it. However I did receive a confirmation via text so I figured it was fine see pic . When they attempted to reschedule for the next week they did not have a time that worked with my schedule with my preferred therapist. I said forget it and walked out. Btw I had taken the day off for this appointment and I let them know this. I realize it was a mix up and they did try to reach out via voicemail. However I find it poor customer service that they did not call back and try to work something out after I was obviously upset.
I find that people who excuse poor customer service because of the product being sold are misguided. I do not care what you re selling if you re acting like a jerk without cause you re just a jerk and do not deserve my business. I went in last week to inquire about some firearms and was pretty much ignored until I made a point of asking for service and was treated like it was a huge hassle to answer some questions and show me some guns. If you do not want my business just say you re not interested and save us both some time and aggravation. I m more than happy to spend my money elsewhere and get treated like a customer instead of an annoyance.
Larry H Miller Volkswagen is the worse car dealership I have ever been involved with. I have purchased personal vehicles for many years I have been a buyer for fleet vehicles including both cars and trucks for numerous businesses over my professional lifetime. Larry H Miller has the worse customer service I ve come in contact with. Do not do any business with Larry H Miller Volkswagen or I might have to tell you I told you so. Larry H Miller Volkswagen is in the dictionary listed as the definition of Liars. The only reason there s one star given in the rating is because you have to pick one to post. Larry H Miller Volkswagen deserves a 10 .
So we decided POPEYES CHICKEN sounded good So we drive 10 miles round trip to get hot fresh mild 6 1.69 Tuesday specials. And the 1 2 lb popcorn shrimp meal for my wife. Her second piece could not be harder if they left it under heat lamps for 3 hours the biscuit was brick like so such a degree butter would not obsorb. I feel horrible that some how she always gets screwed when it comes to her food. How hard is it to make a meal fresh. Guess that will be the last time Can someone fix this?
Brought some people from out of town there for dinner.... we had the lobster roll poutin lobster bisque soup. The server suggested we would all be full and that was enough. I m sorry but we were all looking around after our meals like that was it? I would not go back...
I came in at 2 30am in the morning on Sep 18 2013. I ordered a chicken club which was not technically on the menu but they made it for me anyhow. The server was friendly and they were open late good... The bad at 4am 12pm I was vomiting with diarrhea. Never before had I been so sick. I felt like a character in a movie sleeping next to toilet because I could not go 15 min without vomiting the pain was so intense I nearly called 911. I think the only reason I did not was the lack of insurance. By 1pm the pain finally stopped. I slept it off but it ruined my vacation. All week my throat was burning in pain from the acid. I ve vomited before in my life but never like this it was horrifying. I called the restaurant where they tried to blame it on something else and used the phrase Well you did not consult a doctor so how could you be certain it was caused by us oddly they said this before asking if I was okay! I had not eaten since 9pm the day before it was the Lux. Someone in corporate relations left me a voice mail and I will update this review after I talk to them on the condition they do something. So far I am incredibly disappointed in how the manager handled the situation. I will be filling a report with the Nevada state health board. If you too got food poising always report it to the government agency do not just rely on the restaurant. This morning Sunday I ran into a random person at the pool who ate at the Lux also Wed Morning and was also just as sick. They too were given the well you did not consult a doctor did you... story by a manager there. So stay away!
Went here today with 3 friends for lunch and we were all of the same opinion mediocre at best. They have Sushi burgers salads etc. but all options in our opinions were over priced. We were the only table occupied at noon and the service was still very slow in coming. This is at least the 4th restaurant in this location which I must say is great that has tried to make a go of it. It wo not succeed with prices this high same as those restaurants before them. It s just another sports bar with high priced food. Wo not go back.
I went to this place for a bite to eat. I asked the bartender to make me a non alcoholic drink something with pineapple in it. He could not . He did not have the proper ingredients to make it! I ordered the Nachos with chicken not bad but the chicken was barely visible. It was pretty tasty though. The bartender was the only one there so getting any attention from him was almost null when the football loving husband of a woman sitting at the bar appeared. The worst thing was when I went to leave. I pushed the bar stool back and put my foot on the ground but the bar stool was not moving and it tilted back and I went for a very nice fall! The bartender came out and the manager. I told him the bar stool did not move back it tilted and I lost my balance. He gave me this look like I must be drunk. The bartender told him I had not been drinking. Although I was not hurt right then I was sore and bruised the nest day and my back was sore and achy. Nothing was done. No report nothing.
Pho has a lot of growing up to do if they are going to be a part of the culture in downtown Gastonia. The food is not great the hours are unusual and there is little to no alcohol selection. The service is good so I do want to mention that but the menu selections atmosphere and food quality are all things that need work.
Went here for lunch. The food was not bad but since it s a franchise I did not get the local feel for being in Montreal. Lunch is filled with business attired folks so I may bring my team here rather than a casual dining with friends. As said earlier the food is just ok and the music could be a bit too loud. It s also part of the condo so you have to walk up two flights of stairs to get to the dining room. Food 2 5 I got the mango chicken as recommended and it was just ok. Service 1 5 quite slow and the waiter just came once to attend us when he took our order took about 20mins to pay. Ambience 3 5 the decor is nice and cool dining place. It s lighter than other moxies possibly due to multiple stories with an open concept. Price 2 5 about 30 with drinks. Not sure if my food was worth it. Please note that I understand chains and Moxies failed to wow me several times. I prefer Baton Rouge they are more consistent and give you a more fine dining at a chain experience.
Totally shocked by all the great reviews. My husband and I both thought it tasted like cafeteria food. After our first few bites of pizza we decided to text each other at the same time what it reminded us of. I sent that it reminded me if Totinos frozen pizza and my husband thought it tasted like Digiorno pizza. We had a laugh. The cheese app tasted like soap or rubbing alcohol and the pita was nothing fabulous. We love all of the new restaurant popping up! Not this one.
Mes collgues m ont recommand l endroit mais malheureusement j ai t trs du. Mon poulet tait cuit mais disons que j aurais ajout quelques minutes de cuisson c tait trs borderline. Beaucoup TROP de frites... et la salade? Un tas de salade en trs grosses tranches donc difficile manger avec une fourchette en une bouche avec une tomate des oignons et beaucoup de vinaigrette. 10 pour cette assiette. Autre le fait que la portion est gnreuse je n ai pas aucun autre point positif. Le staff not ait pas trs souriant non plus d ailleurs. Je suis normalement une fan de la nourriture portugaises et ce diner tait une grande dception..
Found this place before reading the reviews because my friend and I wanted something quick to take out. I got the shrimp tempura as appetizer then the sesame beef. My friend had the pad Thai chicken. The shrimp tempura was good but the sesame beef was awful I ate two pieces and could not eat more. The pad Thai barely had any chicken in it but it was average. I do not think I ll be coming back to this place.
Took 1hr 30 Minutes To Deliver A Medium Pizza and 8 Wings... p.s. Microwave Time For Cold Food Not Included!!!
Wo not be going back again. Ordered ultimate with the sea food extras. Server stopped by with Shrimp one time. Meats were over cooked and under seasoned. Was not busy but waiter must have had too many tables as we had to wait for refills on drinks. The killer is they burned the pineapple. Salad bar was so so. Overall service and food was very disappointing.
Sorry they lost two stars because I asked three times for them to get me a spare tire and rim for my car. I had to keep calling back and Larry kept telling me he d call me back. Then I gave up. AAA Automotive on 10th and Camelback found one for me in less than 20 minutes.
I come here weekly to fill up both of my vehicles and get them washed today 10 30 17 at 5 30pm I stopped in and went in to pre Pay for my gas and there was a little skinny woman looked like a crackhead by the way she was twitching was talking on her Bluetooth earpiece while customers including myself was waiting in line. She never said a word and just rang up the sales and took the cash without saying thank you or even making eye contact. I could care less to hear her phone Conversation but had no choice because she was loud and laughing. I would think if this was my business I would not want such if a person taking care of anything much less in my cash register! To the owner maybe teach the crackhead a little customer service? I m sure you wo not miss my two tanks of gas a week but with trash like that running the show it wo not be long before others will stray away also. If I would have thought about it I would have taken a picture of the employee of the week to post!
Customer service is poor! Each person at my table received their food 5 minutes apart for all 4 of us. Food lacks flavor! They try to charge you extra for things and act surprised when you ask about it. Overall I ll never be back to the place!
Went to Holsteins tonight for dinner. When we arrived the hostess asked if we had a reservation. We said no. She told us the dining room was closed to only those who had reservations. Mind you it was 11pm the restaurant closes at 12am and the dining room was basically empty. We had to sit in the bar and try to eat our food off low tables while seated in high chairs. Keep in mind I ve eaten here at least 40 times and never had this experience before. Our server was excellent. We complained to her and she agreed with us. She summoned the mgr Curtis who was less then helpful. He said the hostess was wrong and said it would never happen again. He also told us he would discount our bill for the inconvenience including my wife s burger dripping all over her due to the seating design. So when we received the bill we got a whopping 15 off. Wow what should i buy first! Curtis could not have cared less about our frustration. I told him I d fire her if she worked for me but who needs to included in that firing is him. Disgraceful conduct by both.
I see things have not changed here at all. Was not my choice to return here for food but with 15cm of snow falling down and hungry stomachs we gave in after moving furniture out of my uncle s townhouse all day. Our take out order 3 chicken biriyanis 1 order of beef shish kebab and 1 order of tandoori chicken. My previous review I ripped this place for the ridiculous amount of salad they gave out here with their food. Seems they have not learned one thing. The amount we received for 50 worth of food was insulting the fact that they expect 4 people to share this is ridiculous. We specifically stated that we want a big container full of salad with our biriyanis and instead got a very small container. Salad was not seasoned no dressing and just packed halfway with cheap iceberg lettuce. I personally did not have the tandoori chicken but looking at the portion made me want to laugh. It s a shame because the chicken biriyani flavour was very good although again they use the cheapest cut of chicken and there s a scarce amount of meat in the container. The manager is just as arrogant as the last time doubt things will change here. This is one place I hope closes down.
Says they re open till 6 got there at 5 needing an inspection and was told they re closing and come back tomorrow....no thanks
Delayed delivery 3 times. Couch was delayed over a month. I cancelled my order after being told for the third time that my couch could not be delivered on time. Salespeople were nice but something is wrong with their delivery system or communication. You can find the same products they have somewhere else with a better guarantee that you wo not be sitting on the floor of your living room for a month. There are plenty of other places to buy furniture in Mentor. I hope the salespeople there can find jobs somewhere else.
I heard great things about this hotel but it did not live up to its reputation. I would never stay here again. The decor was awful you can tell it used to be an old apartment building probably from the seventies. But what really upset me is that they charged an early check in fee... WHO DOES THAT! If a room is available by all means let a tired traveler in. I planned on paying about 125 plus tax but I ended up paying well over 200 dollars for a mediocre hotel. They charge you for every they can possibly get away with. To top it off I left my extremely expensive flat iron in the room never to be found again I called and never heard back. SIGH The only reason I would ever return to this hotel would be to eat at their restaurant.. I left Gallo Blanco a great review.
We had a new garage door opener installed a few days ago. When we initially called the day before to inquire about pricing we made it clear that we were interested in a belt opener and not a chain. When the tech came out he recommended a nicer model than the one we were quoted. I asked him if it was a belt opener and he said it was. We were also charged for a belt opener. I am not familiar with a chain vs. a belt opener so I was not aware until my husband pointed it out that the tech installed a chain. I called and was told that our invoice clearly states we were given a belt opener and sometimes it s hard to tell because the grooves on a belt can look like a chain. On further examination my husband confirmed that it was a chain. So my husband called them and after discussing the mistake they ve agreed to come and make it right . My husband and I started talking about the price difference of a belt vs. a chain that we were both told separately and it did not match. So now I m feeling like this is a bait and switch situation. Even though they are coming out at no charge which was ridiculous for them to even mention I m feeling annoyed and frustrated. Our time and aggravation has not even been considered. We are the type of people that will stick with a company if we have good service and a good experience. This is our second experience purchase with A 1. I m sad to say that is might be our last since they do not think our time and aggravation amounts to anything.
Do not waste your money!!! I purchased a very expensive Canadel kitchen table at a local furniture store here in Chicago. It was custom made and shipped directly from Canada. It had white marks on the legs of the table and scratches on the table top that were only visible in the sunlight. The Chicago furniture store contacted Canadel and was told by Canadel that the only way the scratches could ve happened was by every day use. This is impossible as I barely used my table I was told to wait 30 days for the coating to saturate into the wood and so kept the table covered. Every time I used it after I always used a placemat to protect the wood. Canadel made a subpar product and tries to place the blame on the customer instead of taking responsibility for their poor craftsmanship. I will NEVER be buying anything from them again. Save your money.
All this person does is take your money and half ass do everything that you request. She does not even spellcheck before she prints things out and files them in court as the judge pointed out over 15 incorrectly spelled words on my documents. I paid 250 for our motion and it and it was never filed she took my money and DID NOT do her JOB. Do not waste your time or money going here. She had no idea what She s doing. I bet she s gonna try to comment now to make yourself look like she did what she was supposed to do but she did not
Checkers has great food. But this location is terrible. The customer service is non existent. I just waited 30 minutes for cold food. Rude staff and there is an obvious lack of management here.
Bad experience the delivery took an hour an a half the pizza was ok the wings were horrible and they forgot the garlic bread that we ordered. Wo not be ordering from them again.
I feel bad for giving this place 2 stars. It s a nice salon in a great area! I came in for a pedicure and I was just not satisfied with my experience. For the price it definitely was not worth it. No compliment tea coffee etc I know it s not about the free drinks but it does make for a good atmosphere WEAK massage I felt as if I were being teased. I look forward to the massage. I later noticed my nails were a little uneven. They were filed weird. I had to fix them myself. When I first got there two co workers were bickering. Awkward. My manicurist was not very warm and inviting either. Sadly I will not be going back.
My friends and I went to get gel mani reg pedi s before a bachelorette party and we will not be going back. The girls were nice but not very professional. There were three of us and it took over two and a half hours. Granted there were only two girls but it still should not have taken that long if they would have focused a little more versus watching TV and answering their personal cell phones. The gel mani s were okay but the pedi s chipped a few days later. Definitely not worth the price!
Moved out clean everything and yet not able to get response for someone to do the move out inspection. Zero stars.
We have been going here for years and the amount of meat and food we get gets smaller and smaller. Not sure what s going on here but the last 3 visits we had were poor. I used to love going here but for the price it is not worth it. I even called to ask them why so much as changed and they did not understand what I was saying.
Do not let the four stars fool you. This restaurant is just wrong. I went to this place today during my 7 hours trip from California to Arizona. First of all this is owned by Korean. There is no one in this restaurant speaks a single Japanese word. But that s not the problem. When it comes to costumer service and food you literally want to stab yourself with the chopsticks. The waitress rushed us to take order and she came three times in less than 15 minutes. After ordering the food they just drop the plate on the table. Since the soups and salad was free I wo not complain about it but I have to say they taste horrible. The sushi was so poorly made that they even forgot the most essential ingredient the rice vinegar. Yes the sushi was half off but I did not expect the quality of the sushi half off. Of all the sushi place I went to this restaurant is the only one has no idea they are doing the sushi wrong. Then here comes the big play of Mido sushi s costumer torturing game. I have never had such a boring Tepan chicken. There is no caramelization on 360 degree views of the chicken breast cubes. Yes chicken freaking breast cubes! The most boring part of chicken ever. And they cost me 16 just for that huge chunk of tasteless bird. I beg you please change the name if the food you are cooking is not the dish on the menu. Thank you for worsening my already 7 hours tiring trip.
Rude staff mediocre food. If you want to be treated like you re not cool enough to be served by a grease jockey and pay for an overpriced sausage on a bun then look no further.
I like Taco Bell. I like KFC. I do not eat much fast food but these are the two I prefer. So I love that I can get both at one place. Sadly the experience does not live up to the expectation. I would give this place more stars for the food but both times I ve visited 3 years ago and this week the service has been the absolute opposite of fast. I literally could have gone into a regular restaurant and ordered food and probably had it on the table faster than I got my food here at the drive through. No joke I waited almost 20 minutes start to finish. And you ca not get out of the line once you are in due to the layout. When I got to the window for my food finally I could see the same few people waiting in line inside so it does not seem to matter where you order you will be waiting a looooong time. I d give the drive through zero stars except the girl at the window was actually very pleasant and apologetic and she got my order right. Everything was hot and fresh. If you go I recommend the Nashville Sweet and Spicy Chicken. The coating kind of reminds me of sweet BBQ potato chips with sriracha.It s actually quite hot enough that my lips were slightly irritated. And I regularly eat and enjoy spicy food Korean especially as a reference. So f you do not like heat you should not try this. So two stars for the food and the window employee. If they had one of these anywhere else convenient I would not go here due to the horrendously slow service.
Decent experience and Shellac looked OK right after having it done. However after 2 days my nails all started breaking under the Shellac and chipping! I have never had this happen before with Shellac. It s now been a week and my nails look absolutely awful! I m not sure what they did but my nails look way worse than they did before going to Mani Pedi Spa.
Folks I am an Ordained minister so my review may upset folks I apologize if it does but I cannot be quiet..we live in a world where Morality is Passe and unwelcomed in Church or anywhere...one would think a Church as this landmark church had... well at once it did...Now the say they do not support Abortion yet they were at Preterm Praying a god bless the killing field...they stopped being a Church that second they approved of baby killing.. then of course they disregard Gods word on the Homosexual lifestyle and marry same sex.....coupling... so if you can sit there knowing all they do please check your salvation as a Born Again person can NEVER agree to what this church stands for....well If you love art stained glass windows....all pretty trappings and there music is outstanding...BUT if you Love God and have accepted Jesus as savior... you will come under conviction you will feel the Holy Ghost leading you to leave.... so sad it breaks Gods heart.
My wife went here for her birthday and was very descriptive of the length cut type and color blonde . This ding dong colored it brown with blonde highlight that were almost an inch ABOVE the scalp so it looks like she needs a coloring again. Along the back it s so unevenly cut it looks like he used a weed whacker while blind folded. Seriously 120 for this? What a terrible terrible place. When my wife described what she wanted he just said yeah yeah yeah and did what he wanted to. The cut will have to be redone and the coloring looks like someone from kindergarten got ahold of finger paints. Even the highlights are all crooked. The thing is he was not even busy...he just did not care what kind of product he was putting out. He sure took that tip though and made it seem like his work was the very beat in town. Since some of my business partners look to me for places to indulge after our meetings I think I will steer them away from Summerlin all together so that they stay on the strip at the high end salons. At least there they make it right when they jack you up. He was not even willing to acknowledge that his work was a hack job. Too bad...at least now no one that reads this will have to walk by that stinky yoga place next to his...all you smell while your getting your hair done is sweaty ass and mildewed towels.
Service good in the beginning but terrible at the end especially when ownership is just a sorry. Child has eaten many times here before and never an issue and same waitress takes order and is told each time of his allergy but this time something was different. Had a cross contamination reaction from fries and a cheeseburger and what followed was itchy watery eyes and swollen lips. Spoke to kitchen and asked what was on his food ie seasonings and got no reply of what they used so was Perturbed by that and our waitress came back and all she said was sorry. We left the food and wo not be back. Very disappointed. Rating F
I stayed here because I was going to the Gwen Stefani show which was great by the by but the hotel was disappointing. It nickel and dimed everything. First there s no coffee pot in the room. Second when you try to sign on to the wifi it says that you need to have purchased the resort package. I got the room through Orbitz and did not remember buying any package so I spent lots of time and money finding coffee shops with wifi so that I could finish grading my online class. I forced my friend to spend 3 hours in a McDonald s with screaming kids playing tag all over the restaurant so that I could grade one assignment. Third I have a plug in Prius hybrid and they only have charging stations through valet. So I had to valet 20 every night. And the last night the night it mattered because we were heading home the next day THEY DIDN T PLUG IT IN. So I had to drive all the way home on gas! Finally on check out they charge me 40 a night for a resort fee. WTF is that and why was not this included in my overall bill from Orbitz? Oh that s the fee that gets you the resort package that really just means that you re a guest. So I could ve had wifi in my room the WHOLE TIME if they had been more clear. No screaming kids in McDonald s. No cranky waitresses who do not like me taking up a table for hours. Ugh. I wo not be back. I mean maybe for a show but not to stay there. There are plenty of places to stay in Vegas.
My friend and I were talking about Sega Genesis and Altered Beast at the bar tonight. A guy walked by and said how the ending of the game is bogus and the biggest let down ever. I explained that Altered Beast teaches a valuable life lesson. The idea of reaching the goal and journey far surpasses the accomplishment. When you beat a level boss or game it is always a bummer because you thought it would be better. Maybe the graphics or celebration should have been more grand. I then discussed life and how it is sometimes hard to find a purpose or point. Why then would anybody play a simulation of something that may not have a point. That is more pointless than life itself. Aladdin s Eatery is like a video game. In fact I wish this was Aladdin s Castle video game arcade in Westgate Mall and the year was 1991 and I was celebrating my 10th birthday. The food is a big let down. A video game compared to real life Arab food down on Lorain.
Worst meal l ve had in a long time. Service was not great either. Pizzas are flavourless. Kids meatballs are way too spicy for kids. Even my kids said the pizza sucked. No stars here. Will not go back.
Where do I start? Waited a long time to get seated. Waited a long time to get drinks. Waited a long time to place an order. Waited a long time to get our food refill etc. Waited a long time to get out of here. We basically just waited and waited and waited. Lobster and crab were cold and like rubber. No hot melted butter!? It was nothing special. Worst part of it was I tipped 15 and the girl still called me out in front of everyone. Oh was everything OK because you only tipped this much. Blah blah blah... And on our way out we she was still complaining. I was being nice when I tipped really should have given them NO TIP or a bill for wasting my time. I do not know what she was thinking but someone clearly does not belong in the hospitality industry. Definitely the last time at this location.
Diverse selection of push cart dimsum but unfortunately the lack of flow meant that some of the dimsum sat on the carts too long. On the day we were at Peter Wong some of the flavors were not quite right. The tasty pan fried chive dumplings stood out and is probably the only thing we d order again.
Terrible service this last Tuesday at approx 515pm! I ordered a few items and repeated my order. What i got at tge window was sok wrong i handed the bags back and told tge manager what my order was. She keep trying to give me the samw wrong items and was grossly incompetent. She spoke englisg well enouhh so that was not it. I as told the chicken and beef tacos were both on special...NOPE charged me full price for chux glad i caught it. The manager would not make it right and honor what the cashier promissed me. I would take 30 more mins to write up everything that went wrong so i will juat say that 10 mins at the drive thru window is the last 10 mins i will ever waste at this place. Del Taco you lost a frequent customer for life! I will never patronize this location again.
I miss Paradise Bakery so much! This is nothing like it and such a disappointment. More expensive smaller portions and poor quality. I really wanted my favorite stand by soup and salad ice tea and the chippers. I used the kiosk to order which was confusing and took forever. I ordered the pick two with chicken and wild rice soup. the soup was still delicious. I thought I ordered the garden salad which I wanted with ranch like Paradise used to have. they did not have ranch so I chose the southwest ranch and minus the onion. the salad came out with onions did not have tomato like the menu said so it just left the greens and cucumber. the greens was more kale than anything. which with southwest ranch was gross. I did not eat it. I did not see on the kiosk menu that chippers were an option even though I saw them behind the glass I ordered the chocolate cookie. it was very chewy like taffy. the ice tea was good. this whole meal was over 12. I wo not go back.
What s the point of the Red Robin cards if when you walk in the waiters get to decide that they re expired ? Note there is not an expiration date anywhere on the cards. We refused service and left. It was a gift card from my mom by the way.
I was referred to Dr. Kevin Bigelow by the ER due to a kidney stone not my first one but apparently I had stones that had made it out of my kidney and numerous stones still in my kidney. I did some research and see unfavorable reviews on medical websites but I need to get this taken care of so I ignore my instincts. This will come back to bite me hard. I called on a Thursday and they had an opening the next day but I had to do get a specific x ray just for him. I was in pain so I was like whatever. No one in the office could agree on if the imaging office took appointments or not or which location they would send the orders to a little frustrating. First appointment the nurse is a complete wench decided to tell me an epileptic which type of seizure is important and which is not. The doctor does not go through a history with me and basically tells me surgery is my only option. I scheduled surgery paid my deposit even though there was still money in my HRA and was told I should be back in 3 5 days for stent removal barring complications. There was no complications but I was given an appointment for 10 days post op for stent removal with no reason for the long wait. I was also only given pain medication for 5 days. When my husband called because I was in horrible pain and almost out of medication the office refused to be of any help. The message sat on someone s desk until I gave the office manager an earful. Before stent removal my neuro changed my seizure meds as expected. I go back for my stent removal and the urologist decided to lecture me about changing my medication. I finally shut him up by saying I trust my neurologist . I requested my records that day and I m blown away to see that he has basically lied in the notes of my first visit. He spent maybe 10 minutes with me and billed for a 45 minute visit. I know that he did not spend 30 minutes dictating. I ca not speak to the surgical notes because I was out. I received that note from the stent removal and again the note is completely untrue. The next day I find that he has billed 1000 more than the original procedure to remove the stent he put in. According to my insurance I can appeal the charges I do not agree with and also file a complaint about the way I was treated by the office. I spoke with the office manage again today and warned her that I would be speaking to my insurance along with other necessary agencies and she would be smart to get this problem under control. No once did she deny any wrong doing she just stated that it was not her problem. I advised her that I had previously billed for medical doctors and seen that office managers are just as responsible as they are expected to know right from wrong. It sounds like there is quite a bit going on at this practice no one wants to admit. I m filing the complaint and appeal will do so with any agency I can find. This fraud is only worried about the bottom line and needs to be removed from practice. He spent more time trying to tell me what to do about something that is not is specialty exposed me to infection because he was more concerned about his surgery schedule once I d had surgery and did not care about my well being. I would not advise my worst enemy to go to this practice.
pfffff... not to be harsh but this place wont last long. ramen is becoming more popular around the city and this place puts ramen to shame! my instant noodles taste better then this. but i do give credit for the decor of the place and the service. the meat also is nice and tender but you only get two pieces of this goodness. the soup base is thick and constarch like. not my type of preference. two thumbs down. will not return.
We were looking forward to patronizing Roux hoping it would be our new local go to. Not off to a great start as the table service was very slow 20 minutes to get our drinks 40 minutes for food and 45 minutes for cutlery to eat said food. We had heard their chicken and waffles were good and were excited to give them a try. Sadly the waffles were over cooked the chicken had broken bones and no meat just gristle. The cheddar grits were under cooked and the apple and cashew salad had no cashews and the apple was mushy and flavorless.. As a final insult the chicken and waffles which were left untouched remained on the bill. Overall a disappointing brunch experience we certainly wo not be returning for any of their meal services.
Seeking out a great sushi spot keep seeking. They have Thai and Chinese food on the menu too....hardly anything for us to eat. Unless you eat raw fish that is not fresh and not temp controlled. Common sense would have told us not to go...next time we will listen to our inner voice of common sense.
Avoid this location! I received terrible customer service yesterday. The salesman Ryan I think was his name was completely rude and not at all helpful. They were out of cars and he refused to do anything else to help even after I asked him to call the prospect location to see if they had cars. This location is vastly understaffed. Ryan was taking calls and completely ignoring me. I will NEVER rent cars from enterprise and NEVER visit this location again.
Looks better than it tastes. Very doughy pizza needs to be thinner and better cooked. Second time we ordered hoping it d be better no more
Customer service very poor. Sat next to a homeless guy that kept bugging me and my wife. We got very concerned and uncomfortable so we left. He decided to drink our drinks after we left. The staff let him stay after they saw him go up to our table. Very unprofessional. Do not recommend if you want to go for a nice meal. Ps waited 32 mins to order before they came to our table!
stay away from this place they come off nice but they are ruthless and do not care about you. for as empty as this restaurant is you would think they d be different towards the customers. we would go in here 2 3x a week some times and itd be empty and id always take care of the sushi chef and servers....not anymore. this place is a joke when it comes down to true character. stay away stay away stay away....... most sushi chefs dont mind a little suggestion here or there dont bother talking to this one he takes things way to personal......want spicey salmon mixed in with a roll???? no chance!!!!! haha what a joke this place turned out to be actually upset how much time money ive spent with thai basil. i will be sure to let all my friends family know to stay away and there are much nicer friendlier places in the north to go to get better food than this. its ashame because the food isnt bad its mainly the real rude chef behind the bar but no food is worth crappy service no matter where you go. id leave 0 stars if i could.
If I could rate this place a zero I would almost 50 a person for food worse than Hometown buffet. Chicken was trash nothing has flavor. Eating ass is more enjoyable than this waste of money.... Never ever again!
I am extremely disappointed with their service. Caused me an infection on my toe. I will definitely NEVER come here again.
Good beer selection but food was slow getting to table despite the place being empty and not well prepared. Breakfast burrito lukewarm at best. The chef is busy . BS! Skip this place.
Adequate burritos. Slow even with light traffic. What can they possibly be doing to a burrito for 15 minutes in the back?
WHACK SHACK. Sorry but this place is all hype. I would rather go to White Castle or better yet In n Out. Got the Smokehouse burger which wasnt juicy at all. Meat was waaayy lacking in flavor. Ordered the fries with cheese on it which wasnt too bad. To drink i had the cold brew. The idea of iced coffee sounded amazing in that awful heat. When i recieved my refreshing beverage I was horribly disappointed with the fact that they dont provide any sort of creamer. Not sure if thats what they do over in the east coast but it was pretty unbearable. I just sucked it up and chugged that chalk water.
Worst place I have ever had the displeasure dealing with. The billing department say I owe them money but when I call my insurance company the money was paid. I then called the billing person again and said the insurance company paid the bill. Her response was well you owe us 75 and we have still seen you. Good bye Caring for Families. You suck.
Meh Been here once during the 4th of July Weekend There are better Buffets out there. Pricewise it is okay compared to other buffets and prices. Quality of food pretty low and not that great. Mexican Latino Paella 1 type of empanada tacos fajitas etc Pasta you can ask to be made 2 3 options of noodles Seafood a bit fishy but okay Chinese Food not that great noodles soggy and fried spring rolls soggy Prime rib steak it was great not too dry or hard pastries cookies ice cream. Servers were a bit laggy... but not that bad. very nice servers working so hard. it takes a bit to take away your used plates.
At the tender age of 3 my adorable brother had declared that when he grew up he wanted to be a penguin. Alas he grew up as a human. A human with super dry skin. So of course when I saw Holika Holika s penguin cream I had to buy it for him. No penguins were hurt in the making of this cream. A fruity mostly floral fragrance the cream is encased in a plastic screw cap bottle shaped like a baby blue or black anthromorphic penguin. I find that the cream itself is not particularly hydrating. You re really shelling out your ten bucks for the cute factor. Ditto the rest of their products. Truth be told their products are hardly the highest quality. There are many more cosmetics brands from Korea that provide much more noticeable effects. The primary draw really is the packaging. The other item I bought today was a Pure Mellow Moisture Tint in Pink for lips. Providing the sheerest stain of roughly 12 colour the stuff inside this shiny metallic pink tube has the texture of soft jelly or custard. Not sure how much it really moisturizes but it s a lovely truly soft jelly texture. Do not forget to sign up for a points card before you make your first purchase and let the cashier know you have an account before you are rung out otherwise you wo not receive your points. The lowest reward tier begins at 100 points where 1 purchased 1 point. At this first level you can redeem 2 for 100 points. Pretty crappy system but it s something?
Donatos is serviceable pizza for what its worth. My issue is when it takes longer than 2 hours to deliver especially when the answer I received on the phone is uh we are running behind.
To start off best in town that is definitely a big statement to back up.. Best of Phoenix is an even bigger one. Typically yelpers are not from the Hispanic community. Because of my Hispanic palette I would say that this place has very bland food. Watered down shrimp cocktail and al pastor tacos that were really not flavorful. The restaurant itself is nice and cozy. Decorated very well and Mexico City looking with lots of color.. Staff is very nice. But there are definitely better Mexican sea food places.
The food itself is good or at least what I ate the pad see eaw but I ve got to say that the service here is one of the most terrible out of everywhere I ve ever been...and that s saying something! The food would get a four star service would get one star..and I m ALL about service. Anyway the attitude of the waitstaff is I do not care ..they re the type that are only attentive if they feel like it and if they re not they do not care about apologizing. Kinda like when you re in the checkout line at a store and you tell the cashier you ve been waiting for a long time and she ignores your statement completely rings you up and sends you on your way. Thats the attitude here. Maybe its because they know they re in a good location so business will come regardless of a few unhappy people. If you tell them they have horrible service they ll literally respond I do not care we do not want you back anyway ...then when YOU start to have an attitude one of them will follow you out the restaurant and scream Do not come back okay!! ......thats right I definitely wo not !
The calzone I ordered was good and it was delivered within a reasonable time frame however the homemade tiramisu came in a package that definitely did not look to be homemade but worst of all it was dated in the bottom and was more than 1 week old!
We went here because of the deceiving number of stars and thought it might have promise. Wrong. First the decor and ambiance is sort of crappy. Just feels slapped together on the cheap and not done well. The bathrooms were gross too. Also it feels like they use swamp coolers in there. I was hot and humid. But most importantly the food not great. I m a sucker for some good dahl lentils and all they has was one kind with a description including mustard a few other things which did not sound appealing. Big disappointment. When we asked about it they told us sambar is the same thing. We ordered it and got soup. Not the same thing. I ordered the vegetable vindaloo and they used frozen beans which did not impress me. It was not great. My wife ordered something that was a number 1 in one part of the menu forgot the name and it was bland and tasteless. We could not even identify one of the vegetables. It was somewhat like a potato in texture but had no taste like the whole dish . We had to ask 4 people to help identify it before we were told it was a plantain. It did not taste like plantain. Nothing was good about this place even the rice was subpar. Save your money and try Curry and Scoop for a treat or Chutney s for really delicious Indian food.
Order took 2 hours to get here. When it finally did pizza was cold. Delivery guy said that it was not paid for even though I paid online. First and last time I order from here.
A friend and I went for the Friday night comedy show. We thought we might have some BBQ ribs since it is a BBQ restaurant. Big mistake! We wanted to share a full rack so we asked if they could cut the ribs into pieces not hack them all up...I have never seen ribs hacked up that bad. I could have dealt with that but all the taste was boiled out them and there was not even enough sauce on the ribs. There was not even a smell of BBQ inside or outside of the place. The mac and cheese was a macaroni salad did not taste bad but was not macaroni and cheese. The baked beans tasted like can beans and the corn bread was tasteless and tiny. The worst thing about the night was the owner screaming at his employees loud enough for us to hear him over the show. The comedians even commented that we could hear him out there and he just ignored them. Continuing to yell at the employees he was unprofessional. I would not want to go back to eat at that restaurant I must say the comedians were ok some were very good. However the owner made it a horrible experience. You are a businessman please be professional and respect your customers and respect your employees if you want people to continue to come to your restaurant.
Arrived and promptly greeted at the desk and was handed a pager with 20 minute wait time. After 25 minutes we re we re 5th in line and told 7 8 minutes. After another 20 minutes were 4th in line and told 11 more minutes. I have an idea... how about be honest with your customers and not try to hold them and waste their time. Get your act together Concord Bonefish.
The girl at register messed up with my order should make two different sandwiches not the ones I ask and then she was laughing!!!! No respect for their clients
Been going to Grassroots in Scottsdale since they opened. Food has become inconsistent wine pours are short and pricy cocktails are all shaved ice and what passes for background music is nothing but noise. Owner needs to spend more time there and get his act together. There are lots of better places in the area to spend your hard earned dollars.
Had the worst experience with Safeway this week. Although I used to love their delivery service I scheduled a delivery for Thursday between 6 00 and 10 00 p.m. and at 9 45 I received a call that they could not make it that day but I could schedule a 2 hour window for Friday once customer service opened in the morning. Called Friday morning and scheduled a delivery between 1 00 and 3 00 p.m. then worked from home to accommodate this delivery since I need my groceries for a dinner party Saturday that I ll have to start prepping Saturday morning. At noon I was called and told that no one would deliver my groceries today. After speaking with a customer services manager AK I was told someone would call me to make their best effort to arrange the delivery today. An hour later I get a call assuring me my groceries would NOT be delivered today but that I d be called by customer service about delivery first thing Saturday morning. It s now 3 30 and I ve heard nothing from anyone. Looks like I ll be waiting for my refund and getting my groceries at Fry s Food Stores tomorrow morning.
Laughing so hard... There is nothing Hawaiian in the market. Not even L and L. The joke is on you.
Absolutely dirty movie theater from the snack bar to the bathrooms to the theater garbage all over the seats and the floors. It s not worth the money. Your better off renting a movie and staying home in a clean environment.
BUYER BEWARE ON GROUPON. Entire ad is misleading. Basically for almost 100 you are only getting a prescription and B12 shot. As stated that I would get a 30 day appetite suppressant not administered on site. Upon checkout I am told it does not include the suppressants I have to purchase them through a pharmacy. All the clinician would say basically is yes we need to word it differently. Other groupons are much better than this one for weight loss. Do not get fooled into buying this.
I have only been here 2ce. The first time I got a gel mani pedi. I was unimpressed with both as they actually peeled on the sides within 2 days. The second time I got a basic manicure. The girl was nice but she was clearly new as another girl sat next to her and watched her. i didnt like that they filed the sides of my nail it makes them break easily. Seemed like she was untrained. Then I got cut with the cuticle clipers and I bled a little. They put something blue on it i have no clue what. then I was using a light color so i asked for an extra coat they do 2 I asked for a 3rd . She did it nicely which was good but on the last nail she stabbed it a bit and it pulled up but she did not try to fix it. Looking at it now the coats dont all go all the way to the cuticle and it is pretty sloppy. Super unimpressed wo not return.
I got a waffle that was so undercooked. I would not recommend this place to anyone. I asked for the vegan blueberry and got a mix of mint when I never asked for it. The kid making my sandwich did not seem to really have a grasp on how to serve ice cream. Sarcasm I do not think I made it clear I do not eat mint to the guy by saying I do not want any mint when I saw him grab at it instead of the blueberry. But yet he still mixed it in and would not change it when I said something. Really crappy that happened...
This was my first visit for dinner around 6pm which you would think would be prime dinner hour and the food would be fresh. I had a coupon for 2 free buffets 20 value for spinning the wheel on Web Pass. The Eastside Cannery Casino was located on the Boulder Highway. They had American Asian Italian Mexican Salads Desserts and a Beverage station. Most of the food looked dried out. The server took our drink order and brought us drinks and cleared our empty plates. The fried chicken was good when they brought out a fresh batch. There was brown sugared sweet potatoes mashed potatoes baked potatoes creamed spinach corn and overcooked broccoli. There was a carving station of meat but the carver was not there the whole time. The potstickers were stuck together and the wonton skins were dried out. The Green Beans with Beef stir fry was decent. There were 3 kinds of soup. The sushi looked dry. The Orange Chicken was heavily breaded. The pizza was decent when they brought out a fresh one. There was a very small salad and fresh fruit section. There was a made to order pasta station where you could have shrimp in your pasta. The beef ravioli lasagne pastas and sauces were dried out. All the Mexican looked dried out. The enchiladas cheese sauce and taco meat. The desserts were the best part of the meal. The peanut butter cookies were soft and chewy. The coconut cream pie was good. The cheesecake was meh. There was bread pudding small cakes diabetic pies M and M cookies ice cream Boston Cream pie etc. My friends told me that Sunday Brunch is the best time to come when they have the Omlette Station. We will be back on a Sunday because we won a bunch more of the free buffet coupons.
You walk in and you have to seat yourself there is only one server and you do not get greeted till 10 minutes later .. I ordered my food at 11 10 and it s already 11 45 and still nothing . Stay home and make your own breakfast
I eat out a lot but never made reviews until today but I felt I had a civic duty to warn you especially with these rather suspiciously positive reviews. This place is horrible. This food is not authentic and poorly made. The food came instantly out showing this is not freshly made. It s sad that even the Chinese food in Vegas buffets are even more authentic and better quality than this place. Run away and be wary of any positive reviews of this place!!!!
Did not get what I paid for today. I paid for The works fuel saver package from the service department at Camelback for my 2004 Lincoln Town Car. I have had my car serviced here and only here since it was purchased in 2004. Included in this service was to be a tire rotation. I became aware upon returning home that the right front tire had not been rotated. It is the only tire with a small gash at the whitewall and was noticed when Carlos measured the tread depth. I cannot trust that any of the other services were even completed as promised. I did speak with someone who offered to appease me his words by having the work performed upon my returning. I declined Matthew s invite instead I chose to not drive 20 miles round trip to a business I no longer could trust.
What a huge disappointment. Came here for Father s Day dinner. We decided to go at 3pm to avoid crowds and the place was only about half full. Unfortunately the service was horrible. Our server must have forgot to put our order in as it took over 30 minutes to get our appetizers. Once we did get food we had to track down another server for silverware and drink refills. There was no offer of dessert and getting the check was as hard as getting refills on drinks. We ordered some sushi which was ok I ve had better here in the past. We also had the Pad Thai and Pulled Pork sandwiches. Overall the food was just ok. Bottom line when you spend almost 100 for four people for dinner you expect great food and great service. Huge disappointment.
They canceled my appointment without telling me and when I showed up they were not even apologetic about it. The woman at the front desk is always stressed out and rude. Staff turnover seems to be high as well. There are lots of other options in Bloor West Village.
Meh. Staff is hit or miss on the service and friendliness. Try to charge you for extra chips etc. Food is mediocre. It s close to me so I really wish it was my fave place ever. But I ve been probably 6 times and have never left impressed.
Do not order the nachos. Hormel Chile beans lines of watery fake avacado watery fake sour cream fake melted cheese chopped black olive and bell pepper. All for 11.00. Terrible.
Meh thats really the first word that jumps into my mind when I think about my experiences at Toby Keiths. I went to the one in Vegas at the Harrahs Casino and it was ok nothing special though. Very loud and crazy bar at least that location is. Mesa location is a bit tamer but still kinda crazy. Food was typical bar food burgers fried food etc on both occasions Vegas and this location drinks were ok service was fine both times. I ca not really complain but this is not one of those places I would not choose to go to. Typical sports bar in my opinion. A couple of positives I can say is that they do make a hella good fried twinkie dessert and the waiters at the Mesa location are hilarious and a blast. Bottom line this is one of those places you go to party be loud and obnoxious. If you are looking for a quiet place with tasty terrific food you will most likely not find it here.
LIve in the area and have walked past many times. Finally decided to take my wife for dinner one Friday evening. Outside presentation Building looks historic which is nice but walking south on Jarvis if you miss the obscure entrance to the patio you have to walk all the way around the patio. There is no central opening which lead pedestrians to the main door. Bad design. Secondly the main door is this narrow unwelcoming entrance. I had to ask a smoker if this was actually the door to the restaurant. I walk up to the door and there is half a door handle. LIterally there is a lone thumb latch which opens the door minus the actual handle. Not a great first impression. Walk in and the greeter is nice but I ask for a table for two and with open tables in the dining room she asks if my wife and I want to sit at the bar. Strange. Also it s Friday night at 7 30pm and the restaurant is at 30 capacity. Across the street at the Keg Mansion you have to wait 45 min for a seat at the bar. Not a good sign if the restaurant is empty. Time to order. The menu is totally different than the online version. I was expecting to order a 14oz T bone but no such thing exists on the actual menu. Sit down and notice there is no fork at my wife s table setting. Not a big deal but given the experience so far a bit annoying. Further inspection of the dining area and I see 3 inches of stacked coasters supporting a table. Naturally the coasters are ripped mangled and dirty. So I ordered French Onion soup as my starter. Soup was warm. Not hot. Cheese was minimal. Bad combo for French onion. I ordered the 10oz Rib eye that came with Mash potato and veggies. I look around my table and realize there is no salt or pepper and once I try my food I know why. The mash potato s and steak are extremely seasoned with salt. Half way through my meal I stopped tasting my food because of this. I am a salt over sugar kind of person and this was still too much for me. My wife ordered the Salmon and was given the option to sub mash for more veggies. She opted for more veggies but when the dish came the waitress acknowledged that potato s were put on the plate instead. She asks my wife if that s ok or if she would like veggies....Umm yeah. Please bring her what she ordered. If the waitress noticed this when she brought the plate to the table when did not she just have the dish re plated with the correct order? Anyway I was dying to stick around for dessert to see what else could go wrong but we decided to pass. I paid my bill and tipped 15 but I wo not be coming back.
Unfortunately a very disappointing experience. We had four chaotic servers taking care of us the food was not tasty at all either. We had to return the falafel since they tasted like fried in oil that is also used to fry fish could ve also been very old oil. At the end we got two checks one for beverages one for food and had know clue why. They expected us to tip twice which we did not do. We will unfortunately not return to this place.
Yuck would be the best way to describe this place. Walking to our table my shoes were literally sticking to the carpet. The general scent was of a public restroom and I could see many booth seats just torn up. I m glad I could put my 2 year old in the booster because it looked like the high chairs have not been cleaned since they opened his place. If we were not so time pressured and had to shlep our little ones back to car I would have never stayed. I m not delusional and I have no big expectations from the food at Denny s but let s just say that after this visit the bar went even further down. I am never going back to this place.
STAY AWAY!!! This place is full of crooks con artists and thieves. DO NOT give them your credit card. They attempted to run over 13 000 on my CC. Luckily my damage was limited at 3 000 and the CC ceased all future transactions. They will tell you to sign two receipts stating that the first one did not match the signature on your card. Their receipt reads like a court document because they apparently have been perfecting this scam for years. They get second rate talent that is beat down from making an honest go at the profession and willing to dupe lie and steal from anyone who comes through the door. In a city with SO many other options go ANYWHERE else. Lesson learned only pay with cash in any establishment with no windows and an exit door guarded by 300 pound goon.
So today I bought a lemon berry slushie and there was a fly in it so it would have been great if i could have enjoyed what I paid money for but whatever throw a fly in there thats cool too.
Was excited to try this place out.. Been waiting for them to finish renovations.. Finally got the chance to try The place is renovated for fine dining however the food was not worth the fine dining price. We had a table of 8 tried the Geo duck lobster and king crab combo it really was nothing special for fine dining... I ve been to other places were we ate the same type of food for a cheaper price and bigger portions... I would say that the fried oyster separately ordered was really really good and the fried rice at the end was really really good those two dishes were the highlight of the evening.. Crab legs and lobsters were just regular Chinese food We did not have anything to drink the bill was 120pp for that price you can actually have fine dining downtown... Not just regular Chinese food in a fine dining environment.. All in all I would not go back but did not regret the experience. Lol my brother ended up going to McDonald s right after dinner. My biggest pet peeve I heard so many things about their fish tank during pre renos even in Ottawa I heard about them having problems installing their fish tank I expected to see a glamourous fish tank but was so disappointed.. I should just go to Ripleys aquarium next time lol
This was my first time traveling to sun devil stadium for the Washington ASU football game. The stadium is rundown bathrooms are old food could be a lot better. It costs a whopping 8 for a bag of kettle corn. It is also the most unsafest stadium in the PAC 12 in my opinion.There are not handrails at this stadium in the end zone seats. How do you expect my grandmother to make it up those stairs without falling? Awful
Glad to be the 262nd review. Let s start by mentionning the parking in this residential area is a challenge. I had the spinach omelette and it was good and nicley balanced with spinach cheese and all the other veggies. Homemade taters was served cold and little blend in the flavoring department. Busy kitchen with contant staff traffic walking around the back tables. Crowded and noisy environment limited brunch menu but gets the job done with great coffee options and friendly staff. Lucky s 777 not so lucky as a first visit. But would definitly give it another try when patio weather permits.
Update 8 25 17 Against my better judgement I gave this location another chance. Ordered a venti iced coffee with whip. Totally uncomplicated order and yet again the order was botched. I will use the remainder of the balance to purchase gift cards and stick to Dunkin Donuts. Super crank a saurus Rex. Thanks for the 5.00 concoction of milk and green clumps! Potentially the worst tasting green tea latte ever. I get you re busy but really how hard is it to shake or stir!? I m given a mere straw to perform this task you on the hand have instruments specifically designed for this. Booger milk is not what I had in mind.
A friend and I got together to catch up for lunch and looked around and decided to try Akropolis. The price of the food was affordable and they had a decent menu to choose from. Unfortunately we experienced very very poor service at our visit today. The man who took our order was very nice and patient with us since it was our first time and was the only person to really check up on us during our time there. After we ordered our food we waited a long time for our food to arrive to our table. A few moments later one of the servers approached us with an order and announced it as the 9 meal which is what my friend ordered. Five to ten minutes goes by and a food runner drops off a plate of hummus and pita bread. The server dropped it off at our table and maybe mumbled some words then walked away. I was not 100 paying attention to them them so I we just started eating the food. Like I mentioned my friend and I have never been here and we honestly just assumed it came with the food we were confused as to why we got it but we just went with it. We understand that we probably should have asked and that was our mistake on our part but like I said we did not know. A few minutes pass and another server comes by and says she has a 9 ...... my friend already had food in front of her so I simply asked Do you mean a number 10 because that s what I ordered. The server was rather rude and did not respond in a nice way at all all she did was just repeat what she had in her hands. So I took the plate from her and she walked away. No apology no sympathy or anything just poor customer service skills. Turns out the first server who approached our table gave my order to my friend but called it the wrong thing. Our meals looked completely different so I am confused as to how she got them mixed up. Then during our meal I assume the manager comes up to us and asks to see our receipts. This was when we found out the hummus and pita did not come with our meal she said You did not order the hummus who gave you this food? I personally do not remember who dropped off our food because we had THREE different servers approach us and like mentioned whoever dropped it off kind of quickly dropped it off then walked away. My friend and I told her that we do not remember who dropped it off and the manager started raising her voice and catching an attitude saying I know you know exactly who gave it to you and I need you to tell me who dropped this off. I already told her the first time I was not sure and this happened 30 minutes ago. I was not fond of the manager talking down to us as if we were pesky teenagers trying to mess with her. She then continues to yell at the employees from our table and got even more angrier when no one would speak up. Very unprofessional to see. We were checked up on once but the man who took our order and he offered us refills but that was the only time we were really ever checked up on. For the most part the food was mediocre but the service really put me off and wo not see myself coming back here again due to the poor service and the lack of care for their customers. I am a server at a restaurant myself and I will always give other servers some wiggle room when things do not go as planned but from the look of this establishment it is very poorly ran and unorganized.
We came here for brunch on one occasion and dinner most recently. I ordered their steak and asked for it medium but it came out well done. My gf s scallops were burnt. Not sure what was wrong with the kitchen that day but the food was not good at all. The best part of the meal was the outside view of the Bellagio fountain and the free bread and butter. 100 not well spent at all. We left dissatisfied.
Horrible service. I placed an order for delivery today around 12 40. I did not receive my order until a full hour later around 1 40. Also the delivery driver must have been chain smoking in his car because he stank of cigarettes and SO DID MY FOOD!! FUCKING DISGUSTING!!!!! I will never order delivery from this store again.
I will never go to a VW ever again. SanTan Volkswagen treated me so poorly and had absolutely ZERO customer service after I bought my car. I tried to go back not a week later to have some very minor aesthetic things fixed with the car along with a concern about an oil leak. They said there s nothing they could do about it because no funds were set aside at the time of purchase for repairs. Well here s the thing about first time car buyers WE RE IGNORANT. We come to you and we TRUST that you re not going to take advantage of us but rather educate us and help us with the process. The salesman that helped me should have mentioned that you need to set funds aside prior to closing when we were out on the test drive and I was saying hey this looks broken hey can we repair this before i buy? But NO! NOTHING! They were extremely unaccommodating and it took me MONTHS to even get them to agree to look at it! Finally after I brought it in I was told nothing was wrong and they would give me a quote for the other aesthetic items. Today I took it in for my first servicing and found out over 4000 worth of work needed to be done! My oil change was 3200 miles over due! I have not even driven the car for 3200 miles yet. ALL of the fluids in the car were empty and there were a couple of hoses broken that were causing oil to leak all over my engine. IMAGINE THAT They only want to implement this wonderful customer service until the car is off of your lot and then your e done. Is not any businessman s plan to have REPEAT customers? Well Let me repeat THIS all over the internet San Tan VW is a fucking JOKE.
I like to give every place a second chance but this place received one by default. I went here recently having just come from out of town on the way to a job interview. I am trying to grow my nails out strengthen the nail beds so planned to forego gel polish but since no one asked offered or recommended anything in the way of gel polish specials combos etc. when directed I chose a regular polish. None of the three technicians were occupied when I entered. The tech did show me the card to choose my pedicure. The chair was very relaxing no real complaints about the pedicure though I was a little embarrassed by the cleavage of the young lady and I m not a prude pretty decent callous removal even though I only chose the regular pedicure leg massage was very nice. When it was time for the manicure same tech I was asked about filing a little and evening out and what shape to which I said yes just file a little and square rounded. Next thing I knew she had clipped my longest nail with a pair of big clippers then proceeded to clip them all no need stopping her at that point because it would have looked weird however the one nail I had expected to be clipped and filed was not even touched. I thought it had been fixed during the cuticle work but even hang nails were missed as discovered later. The polish went on and even then seemed a bit thick but hey I m not the technician. After she started the polish she asked why I did not like gel I told her no one mentioned it but I did not want my nail beds filed on like I have had done before to which she replied they do not do that there even though I expressed interest she made no suggestion to do it or start over. I was moved over to the UV drying station and just left there for 10 min. or so. Needing to get to my interview I looked at the manager standing behind the counter and asked if he thought they were ready he said oh sure...did not even check but I got the feeling he was waiting for me so I gathered my things carefully and went to pay. When I asked the name of my technician he did not even know but did find out. I noticed one of my nails smudge so asked if I could should dry some more. I waited another ten min. and left. Within a few minutes even though super careful three nails looked like they had just melted...the whole shebang had slid down toward my cuticle! Not having any time I smoothed them and poured water on them ASAP a quick set trick from an old manicurist and hid my fingers during the interview. Note toes were just fine even after slamming into shoes for interview four hours afterward my fingernails were still mushy and pitting! I planned to chalk it up to lesson learned but found myself in the area the next afternoon and decided to see if they would fix my manicure. While much busier the lady manager I think no one introduced themselves ever! came right over and loudly proclaimed they would fix for free though she denied anything being wrong with the polish that it was probably my fault for rushing...but why had not I done gel nails? I explained. She called up another technician the guy manager did remember my technician s name from day before still loudly declaring they would fix but I must stay longer. When I mentioned my toes were fine that I thought they may want to take that bottle of polish down they said toenails dry differently than fingernails and the polish works differently. REALLY? Which turnip truck do you think I fell off of? I decided to ask if they would discount a gel manicure and they knocked 10 off handed me over to the new manicurist amid much foreign chatter and what appeared to be an attempt to hide me from the previous manicurist. I see someone else mentioned the huge amount of giggling seeming side exchanges and foreign conversation which I do find to be a little disrespectful. My new caretaker was polite made suggestions created my color but did ask why I liked my nails so short though I think that was a little impertinent but not as much as her cleavage no I am NOT a weirdo but worse than the day before! I responded I did not that her colleague had snipped them off! This gal did some prep continuing to extol the wonders of gel polish had me wash up without soap and finished the manicure. I ended up being moved near my manicurist from the previous day explained what happened suggested she may want to take the polish down to which the present manicurist rolled her eyes and clicked her tongue. While she did a decent job the polish ran over my cuticles to some degree and now 4 days later polish is beginning to flake off at edges . I paid I left...and wo not go back. I m sure this place is good for some but not for me. Note The shop is quiet enough no fumes fairly clean though never did see sterilized equipment and the restroom hall area were kind of dingy.
Guest No 4522 8 06 Jan 20 ordered are 3 DB L DB 2 W Raw GOP O Inst ! animal style 2 FF Car in front of us apparently changed order when they paid. Are food sat there getting cold while they prepared new food for them. Why woudnt the employee have them move up until their food was done and give us are food sitting there ????Yup cold food extra sliced onions on burgers and half full fries in each container....Had to MICROWAVE burgers and fries to warm up. Been coming to IN N Out for 30 some years and this food was no good
The decor the live music and the Moscow Mule were the best part of the experience. The service was slow and not attentive. We were sat between to the Golden Tee game and an empty table. Where the hostess and wait staff were rolling silverware commiserating about work. The 2 men playing the game were practically on our table. We had the pretzel bites which were good. But the beer cheese sauce served with them was disgusting. I did not think cheese could be ruined. This was my second visit. The street tacos I had on my first visit were not good and the service was slow and inattentive but I gave it a second chance. I do not think there will be a third.
I really wanted to like this place because I have a soft spot for diners and dives not so much drive ins . And this place has the traditional diner set up on the inside located in an area of town the Melrose that I m really rooting for to turn into something truly special it s already pretty cool . But I just did not like the food. I ordered the breakfast sandwich which was eggs sausage and cheese on a croissant. The croissant was ehhh ok. The eggs sausage cheese was greasy and not very flavorful. It came with a side of potatoes which were also pretty m eh. I ll give this one another shot at some point.
I got a rate quote for a package online at 12.44. My parcel weighed about 2 1 2 lbs...i used my scale which I callibrated using a 2 1 2 lb free weight. However when I went to this location I was told the package weighed 5.1 lbs. And was quoted 16.50. This may seem like a small difference however if I am running a business I depend on proper quotes and service in order or I m just losing . This is not the 1st time I have had this experience with this office. Also now that I am home online again even if I put in a 5lb weight for a rate quote I get 13.50 which doesnt jive with the 13.76 I was charged...only because I was able to send it out to a business vs. residential address...
I researched for months before I decided upon Altius for my best friend s bachelorette party. After reading the reviews I thought it would be perfect. As far as views go I m not sure that there are better views anywhere in the city. The atmosphere and the views are what got this place two stars. That s where the trouble began. We got to the restaurant at 8pm and there were 9 of us. We got tap water which they said was quadruple? filtered. It had a weird fishy taste and it was not the least bit cold. It was at least 25 minutes before our server got our order which was okay at first because we were ooing and awing over the view and drinks came fast. Once we ordered we waited and we waited and waited. While waiting bread service came. They came around a second time and completely skipped two of the guests never asking whether or not they wanted bread. About an hour after we ordered our food it arrived. I had the special which was a deconstructed beef Wellington. It was cold when it arrived. One girl ordered salad with no tomato it came with tomato. Everyone who got hot food was unsatisfied with the temperature of their food but flavors were there and the presentation was spot on. After eating our plates were cleared. We were given dessert menus. Nobody had dessert. We waited and waited. Waited some more. I had to physically get up from the table and ask about our checks. At least 40 minutes passed between the time that we had our plates cleared and the time that we got our checks. ... then when we finally got our checks 5 8 checks were wrong. Extra drinks charges for things that were not ordered no drinks on checks for people with drinks. So that was an additional 20 minutes to fix. What makes me upset about this whole deal is that there were 9 of us. We had one server who had at least one other table . When it came to serve food each person brought out a plate so my question is where were all of these employees when we were waiting and waiting. Could SOMEONE have assisted our server with something to make it less of a wait for us? It s a group so yes it will take longer I get that but this was completely brimming on ridiculous. I cannot lie when I say that we did not leave Altius until 11 15pm after arriving there at 8pm. It is a fine dining restaurant so I expected some time between and relaxation but we are talking 3 hours here imagine if we would have had dessert . I would likely try Altius again just because the view is unlike any other but not with more than 1 2 other people.
Very mediocre food. Very friendly and nice staff but we went on a Sunday and I do not think anything was fresh. They had almost no bagels the sandwich bread was hard the corn salad did not seem fresh and the breakfast sandwich was greasy and gross. They comped me the breakfast sandwich since they puzzlingly forgot the egg but the waffle I got was not as good as the one I made myself at the Hampton inn free breakfast bar a few days ago.
I came to this place some time ago and yet the horrible experience still haunts me. Matter of fact it s a running joke between my son and I. When I ca not decide where we should eat he always chimes in let s go to Tony s Mexican Food it s your favorite! . I walked in with a certificate from restaurant.com and was seated promptly. We were the first customers of the day. The kiddo had nachos. I wish I had a pic to show how sad this plate was. Chips were stale the ground beef were so dry hard and dark brown that I knew it had to be old meat left out or uncovered. The cheese was some generic shreds that was not melted at all. Those were the only 3 ingredients for these nachos. The plate looked so dry and sad even a 5 year old was disgusted by it. I got the shrimp cocktail and chili relleno plate. Shrimp were so incredibly rubbery and the cocktail was way too acidic for my taste. It literally gave me heartburn upon tasting it. The chili relleno was so greasy it had about a tablespoon of oil under it. The batter was also falling off of the chili. I was so dissapointed in the food that I decided that all this crappy stuff was served to us because I had a voucher. The service just made me feel uncomfortable. Why give offers if you re going to hate when people redeem them? To top it all off they overcharged us on a to go item. My son seemed to like their rice and beans so we ordered it to go. The rice and beans plate he had in the restaurant was about 2. The to go price... 6! I never stepped foot in this place again after that bad experience and I have long lasting memories of why I wo not come back in the future.
I budget a pants on Zara for a gift to a good friend and the size was a little bit small. I did not find the receipt so I tried to get to the store in the Fashion Show Mall in Vegas and just replace it to the same item in a bigger size. but Allen the store manager it was very rude to us he said that they do not have this sizes in Zara witch it s only 45 man s. He did not tried to help us And even told us that the size that w re looking for is Too BIG for Zara fits. No other words to add.
What a disappointment. Came here to watch the Yankees in the playoff games requested the game half a hour in advance and 1 4 hour into the game they still ca not find it. You call yourself a sports bar?!? On top of that pathetic next to none existent service why would anyone come here? Updated as I was about to send this they FINALLY got the game on. Raised my review from one star to two. I feel sorry for my server she tried hard to get the game on but the bartender looked pretty clueless on how to find the right channel. Train your staff better!
Not a typical experience. The ladies were very clicky. They made us feel unwelcome. Some new lines but not a lot of stuff. This is my second visit so unless it s a paper emergency I wo not be back.
Worst Citibank ever. Tried to get a cashier s check reissued teller could not do it branch manager Daphne had to take over. Then she gave a bunch of BS about waiting 90 days and all that because apparently she does not really want to deal with the paperwork. Got it done at another Citibank down the street in 30 minutes with no problems whatsoever. Avoid this branch or just Citibank altogether. After they closed my branch on Jones the overall service level is just horrendous.
I m not happy with the service that was provided. A simple sink malfunction turned into so many other plumbing issues that I began to question thei r Integity. After I drew the line when my kitchen faucet began leaking I called their bluff and asked them to leave. Magically the problem was gone. So beware those Plumbers who can create problems in your house for more work
I was really hoping for good things....First of all unless you live within walking distance it is next to impossible to find parking anywhere near this place. I was simply wanting carry out to enjoy after work. After making multiple loops around Euclid Ave I finally swooped in an opened spot on the street. Upon entering the decor was fun and hip. There was no hostess at the front so I confusingly made my way back to the bar. I noticed that they had a very diverse and excellent beer selection. I then ordered 2 Steam Buns and the Spicy Octopus Noodle bowl. Coming in at around 11.50 the price was not bad. The next part is partially my fault.... I get home open the take out bag and realize that they forgot the Broth for my noodles. Are you kidding me? This is like forgetting the meat on your hamburger. I should have checked the bag before I left. I ate the Spicy Octopus noodles dry which actually had good flavor and a nice kick. However due to the horrible parking and bad experience I probably will not be back anytime soon...
Worst customer service I have ever received in my life. I bought a nonrefundable online coupon for 3 of their LipoLaser treatments. The front desk lady Debbie was beyond nasty to me every time we spoke. I decided I d rather lose out on the money than ever step foot in that place again. When I called to set up the consultation it was about 6 weeks before the expiration date. I tried asking Debbie if I would have enough time to get all the treatments in if I waited a week because of my work schedule. I knew nothing about the LipoLaser stuff like how long to wait between appts. She retorted snottily with how she does not know my schedule and that ca not tell me when to make my appointment. So rude!! Regardless I made an appointment for the consultation for the following week. Upon arriving there was no one at the front desk or in the waiting room. I stood at the front desk for about 3 mins before Dr. Gallagher greeted me and told me to have a seat and Debbie knew I was coming and should be right back. I waited for over 10 minutes wondering why I was not filling out paperwork or something proactive. Debbie never showed. The Doc came back out and gave me some forms to fill out. I did that. Then waited another 8 mins or so. It finally became apparent that Debbie was not coming back so the Doc gave me a brief tour. He was friendly enough the consultation seemed pointless and definitely unorganized. The tour took about 5 mins. I made an appt. for my first session the following week. I gave myself 30 mins to get there for what would be normally a 15 drive. However it happened to be the crazy fluke day that it started snowing in Scottsdale. Traffic was significantly worse than normal. Five mins before my appt. time I called Touch of Health trying to be considerate and explain that because of the random insane weather I may be a few mins late. Debbie answered. I explained that I ve been sitting on the 101 for 20 mins and could be a few mins a late. She snapped at me and said Well I m sitting here waiting on you! I was flabbergasted and appalled. I was not even late yet and I was being scolded by a receptionist?! I could not even handle the rudeness anymore. So I responded with Well funny. I was waiting on you for my consultation... She cut me off and got super defensive with how No no. You re were not waiting on me. The Doctor helped you! I realized it was pointless to argue with this awful receptionist yet I was enraged at this moment. I told her I certainly was not planning on traffic being awful and the situation. We ll if you re more than 15 mins late you ll have to reschedule. I decided to just forget it at this point and told her I wanted to reschedule. I had no desire to be yelled at further by this lady with a severe attitude problem. Instead of rescheduling me then she told me to call back tomorrow. I did not call back. What a terrible experience from beginning to end. The coupon I bought was not cheap but I refuse to have any interaction with Debbie again. She made me feel unappreciated and just plan awful with her nasty tone and nasty words. I do not know if I received such awful treatment because I was using the coupon but I should ve been treated with the same respect as everybody else. I do not know how the place would still be open if Debbie treats all patients customers in such a rude despicable manner. I wish I could leave no stars!
Went here for breakfast on a Sunday morning. It was almost empty inside which means A it s new and people dont know about it yet or B the food sucks. The ambiance and decor are excellent as was the service. No complaints there. We ordered the Veggie Fritatta and Bangover Burger. Both were unacceptably poor quality. The Bangover burger patty had so much cartilage and gristle in it that I had to pick it out with my fingers from my mouth. It was the poorest quality of ground beef I have ever had in my life and should never be served in a restaurant. The burger meat was akin to chewing on a rubber band. Additionally it was burned on the edges. I lost my appetite after a few bites of greasy bland gristle burger. The Veggie Fritatta looked good but the goat cheese was lumped to one side of the round Fritatta instead of dispersed throughout. I kept tasting a burned taste the whole time and could not understand why until I flipped it over and the whole underside was burned to hell .... totally inedible at this point. We didnt even complain at this point because it would be useless to say your food quality sucks and expect anything to be different so we paid and left as fast as we could. On the other hand the coffee was decent...
Me and my family have been going to 7 Hills Car Wash for several years now and while there has been a noticeable decline in the quality of work and customer service lately I always gave them the benefit of the doubt and attributed it to the fact that maybe they were just having a bad day. However a recent incident there has angered me to a point where I thought to myself enough was enough and I had to say something. On 4 Apr 18 I brought my car in to be washed and was told when I arrived they were running a special 2 for 1 on the 31.95 wash. When I paid the cashier she told me to bring in the receipt the next time I come to receive the second car wash and that s exactly what I did on Tue 17 Apr 18. As soon as I told the attendant at the drive up that I had a 2 for 1 receipt he looked a bit puzzled but politely asked me if I could wait a minute as he needed to speak with the manager later identified as R.J. I saw R.J and the attendant talking at the side entrance and after they finished the young man came over to me and said that the 2 for 1 is only good for the same day of service and that I would have had to use the special on 4 Apr 18. When I told him that nobody informed me of that when I purchased the special he said there was nothing he could do to help me. After being told this I went inside and saw the same man the attendant was speaking with earlier and asked if he was the manager R.J . He said he was and I explained the situation to him. Being a long term regular customer and having spent literally thousands of dollars there over the years washing my family s 4 cars I felt certain he would rectify the situation. Unfortunately this is not what happened. R.J explained the 2 for 1 policy to me and after telling him that nobody informed me of this when I made the purchase he simply brushed off my concern and said that the girl who was working the register that day was a new employee and must have gotten confused...as if it were my fault. R.J then quickly told me there was nothing he could do to help me. After asking him for an exception to policy based upon my long term business he shook his head and re stated there was nothing he could do. At this point I told him his decision was very near sighted and that if he did not fix the problem I would take my business elsewhere. Hearing this with his arms crossed gave me a very condescending smile and said good bye . At this point my wife and I retrieved my car and we left. It should be noted that during my entire exchange with R.J he was rude sarcastic curt and answered with a sassy attitude one would not expect from a manager. The whole exchange was uncomfortable unnecessary and most of all unprofessional. If he worked for me and treated one of my customers in such a manner I would have fired him on the spot. I will not return to 7 Hills Car Wash ever again and would advise the readers of this review to do likewise.
I need to cancel my membership ASAP and get my money bank! Stupid facility is a fucking joke! The machines are always broken! The showers smell like shit! The water fountain is always giving hot water! Let s not forget how stupid and lazy the employees are! 5 years of paying a platinum membership for crap service! Golds Gym needs to come back and get rid of all these EOS lame fucks!
I have been takeing my 91 Honda here for a few years Last summer I had them replace all my belts 265.00 and of course regular oil changes and maint. 3 months after they replaced my belts everytime I turned my A C on it would squeel like a pig for about 5 10 seconds and then stop. It got soo bad I took it back not once but twice to have it rechecked they kept saying its my inner dash fan motor I explained to them I had been a automotive service writer for 13 yrs and that I knew it was not the blower fan but a loose belt they checked it and said no its tight after the 2nd time of them not doing anything to remidy the problem I took it over to Sun Auto on Craig Road and they turned the tensioner screw one turn and the squeel went away. HMMMM ??? Ok so I just got a oil change coupon in the mail I use amsoil in my vehicle and called to see if they would use my oil Randy said no problem. I figured its just a oil change I should be ok.. Well needless to say things havent changed. He called and told me it was done I told him I would pick the honda up and drop off my jeep for a oil change also. I had marked my drivers front tire with a ink pen in order to varify if the tires had been rotated Part of the oil change service... I thaught . It was listed on my bill. When I checked the marked tire was still on the drivers front no finger print marks from the tires being removed and when I got the jeep back those tires had not been rotated either... A HONEST automotive service buisness would have appoligized and tried to have made it right. No appology. So now I wonder if the oil change even got done??? on either of my vehicles. A auto shops reputation lies on the shoulders of good mechanics and if they are not doing their jobs that is a direct reflection on the service writer.. so I voiced my opinion to Randy and asked him if they have regular meetings with their mechanics to go over customer complaints and concerns he said No but the mechanics know what is expected... OH ok... I will NOT be returning to Tireworks on Centennial Parkway Commerce and I wonder How many other of theyre customers have NOT gotten what they have paid for ??????? Be careful who you intrust your cars safty to it could cost you alot in the long run.......
I wanted to love this place. I wanted it to be my go to after work place. I was so disappointed. Location Main Street Newmarket. Parking Not going to sugar coat it depending when you go parking can be tough or easy to find. Get a ride Decor It s cute inside. Some booths and tables. It s nicely decorated. A place you think you want to eat. Open concept kitchen so you watch everyone in the kitchen including the dishwasher. Not sure why. You ca not see much because ledge and it only really made the restaurant really really warm because of it. So you order at the counter and go sit down and they bring it to you. . It s hard to tell that this is what you are supposed to do. The only menu is a giant one on the wall next to the cash register. I hate this. It s a sit down restaurant why ca not I sit with friends poring over the menu. Instead you have to stand awkwardly at the cash and front door with people standing behind you and a cashier staring at you.Hard to ask questions when you feel so rushed. Staff Nice. Not sure why there is so many. One thing when I order at a new place I like to ask what they recommend I get. The person taking the order who everyone deferred to so I m assuming he was in charge had no idea. I asked if there was some sort of signature dish or something I had to try because it was particularly great crickets then he just started reading the menu to me. Um ok. Food So I ended up ordering the Bao Shanghai moon and sesame balls. Bao soft pillowy bread just like I like it. The flavours were just ok. Not the best I ve ever gotten. With some tweaking could be great but it was the best of the three dishes I ordered. Shanghai moon Shanghai noodles. Pork dumpling Chinese broccoli crispy chicken skin. I did not like this at all and did not quite finish it even though it was pretty small. IThe noodles were weird over cooked and undercooked and the broth tasted very watered down with hardly any flavour or aroma. The dumplings fell apart when I lifted them out of the bowl. The broth was the most disappointing. There were 5 people in the kitchen. Did not anyone taste anything? Sesame balls. When they came they were 4 tiny balls im glad they were so small because they were not very good. The filling black sesame was good but the breading was oily. It was like they were cooked at too low a temp and the balls absorbed a lot of oil. I could only eat 2. I had a bit of the 3rd and could not do it. I originally gave it 2 stars but it was so disappointingly bad I had to change it to 1. I ll come back and try in a few months to see if it s better.
First off if I could put a negative one I would. The guy was a white guy I was coming back in with my black friends and he said we were drunk. We re were not . We tried going back in and he did not let us. I m from Cali first time I ever felt discriminated only in cali. I m never coming back.
We had just went through the unpleasant experience of mistakenly purchasing a 2014 Mazda 2 that was a certified used car by camelback mazda see yelp review under Jesse V for details . The documentation they gave us stated they went through the factory approved inspection process and assured us many times over that there were no issues with the car. Not more than 36 hours after bringing the car home it started to LEAK OIL. We brought the car in the next day and they held on to it after 2 days then sent us home with the car. The night I brought my car home my boyfriend checked under the car and it WAS STILL LEAKING OIL. We unfortunately took the car back to camelback madza where several days went by with no phone call or communication from the service department. We had to contact them to see what was going on with our newly purchases and defective car . After a call with the service director he admitted they knew about the oil leak before they put the car on sale and attempted to repair it. This repair was NOT DISCLOSED on the Mazda Factory Certification paperwork there are literally two check boxes specifically stating if engine oil was leaking from the car and if the car needed to be repaired nor was it disclosed to us when we were purchasing the car! Needless to say after the 3rd failed repair attempt we took the leaking car to Earnhardt Mazda a far more reputable dealership they discovered a CRACK in the ENGINE BLOCK. Earnhardt Mazda repaired the issue in accordance to factory specifications and did a wonderful job making sure I was taken care of. STEER AS FAR AWAY FROM CAMELBACK MAZADA AS POSSIBLE no pun intended
We waited over 30 minutes to get our food. When it finally came out dishes were mixed up and we had to re arrange our plates. My sons pancakes were dry and flakey. My husband and I both got omelettes that were just okay. Our potatoes that came with the dish were hardly cooked and they had no flavor. It seriously tasted like they cut the potato warned it up then served it to us. The toast that came with our meal was hardly toasted it was basically a fresh slice of bread. We absolute will not be back.
Should get 6 stars. Had steaks last night. Both were done perfectly. Meat cuts were outstanding. Marbling was perfect. Shrimp on the Barbie reminded me of some Italian anti pasta but they were ok. Nice salad warm bread shrooms and veggies were cooked to perfection. Crispy veggies but not raw. Baked potato soup was good. A little cool but not cold. Topped off with Shiraz which made it a perfect meal. Compliments to the chef. We were at the bar and the service was outstanding. Great job!! Had steaks twice this trip to LV and the quality of beef seems to have lessened. Tougher and less taste. Service was good. No lettuce or salads. And no Shiraz. An Aussie wine that is served at most outbacks. And no Dos XX beer.
Went on sunday evening manager does not know how to run his crew. Waited almost 30 food to be completed. Manager hides behind the rack of chicken by the drive thru window so he doesnt have to deal with the irate customers at the register. Slow very slow service
Never been to Wild wing before. Ca not say I ll go back. At least to this location. Service was terrible and the food was decent. Bartender Server was to focus what seemed to be her boyfriend at the bar and occasionally going out for smoke breaks out front with him. Later told a customer you should have came out and got me! I did not see you go on ....
I think I am done ordering from here. I used Grub Hub to order my usual General Tso tofu lunch. When I received my order it was chicken not tofu. Chicken is combo 1. Tofu is combo 15. I called in and the woman who answered did not understand what I was trying to convey. I contatcted GrubHub and they got it straight and the order was redelivered. Lunch was over by then so I was disappointed. Listen if youre going to order from here USE GRUB HUB. They will sort out any issues easily. Between this and the long delivery time I will pass.
Girl working the to go window would not say a word to us. I ordered a vanilla milkshake but received a strawberry one. I did not send it back because I was scared to push my luck with her. Guy in front of us had to honk to get someone to help him at the window.
Shady is all I can say. I was quoted a price of 60 99 to take a love seat. The rep on the phone said this would fit in the requirement. As a just incase I added an ottoman to the order. That would fall below the 149 rate. I opted not to have the ottoman taken so just the couch was the only thing the guys took. He told me 118. I asked him why the price difference...he said cause we had to go up steps Are you kidding me?????? Your rep knew this when I reserved online then called to confirm. Shady company.
I went to Greek Pita without doing a Yelp check. Came out of the movies saw the place and thought that spanokopita spinach pie would be a great snack before going to bed. A spinach pie. What could be bad about that? Took an appetizer portion to go and drove home anxiously awaiting that delicious pie. Opened the container and saw a bed of lettuce under it nice I thought. Then I made one mistake. I lifted the spinach pie. And there is was a pool of grease not only on the lettuce but on the entire bottom of the spinach pie. It was shiny from the grease and four paper towels DID NOT absorb all of the grease on this unworthy pie. So after shocking my husband with a view of this greasy mess he shook his head and said You re not going to eat that are you? I told him that I had to take a bite in order to do an accurate Yelp review. He watched me to make sure it was only one bite. After all he did not want to have to drive me to the hospital if I got sick or on a lighter note have to get up from bed to get me the Pepto bismol. So I tasted it. It was not bad but it was not good. Not enough feta cheese and did I taste a bit of mozzarella in there? That s not the Greek way of making it. I know. I make it. So my laziness of not making a tray of spanokopita led me to craving it and ending up with something my own kitchen would not produce. Ever. So I give the spanokopita one star for the price. A total of 2.44 with the tax. BTW after the bite taken on behalf of Yelp the kitchen disposal totally enjoyed it. GRRRRRRRRRRRRR.... I heard the disposal say Is it mad at me??????
I normally do not order from Domino s due to lack of creativity but accounting for the time I needed a pizza delivered on a Sunday night it was the only store open. Ordering the pizza online could not be any easier but when the pizza came to my door the delivery guy gave me a receipt that was not only more than what I paid for it was the wrong receipt. Obviously I used my card online so he needed a signature and he made me sign the receipt that was not mine. It was late he probably had a long day so it was not that big of a deal. I ended up tipping the guy anyway. The pizza that was delivered were prepared horribly! One pizza was overly cooked and had almost no cheese at all. The other pizza had a fair amount of cheese but the crust WAS NOT thoroughly cooked. It was a huge let down and definitely made up my mind to stay away from Dominos.
Not worth the money horrible in every way especially the value.. I really expected more from a Hubert Keller restaurant but maybe I caught them on a bad day..
Besides the server being on top of it and accommodating our table this experience was awful! Our calamari was not fresh. It was over cooked and mediocre at best. Chicken parm was over cooked on edges to the point of burnt. The sauce on the dishes tasted like it came right out of a jar. My chicken parm sandwich was just okay. There was nothing to it at all and no marinara on the sandwich. Just chicken and bread. The blue cheese dressing on the salad was delicious and homemade!
Got a padi and the tech stopped for a while to eat. then i got a new tech to finish my pedi. my total was different than the quoted price. when paying my total was 25 i hanede them a 50 and they cashier tried to keep all the change for a tip. he refused to give me my change until i told him that is not gon to happen. My feet were so dry afterwards. I DO NOT recommend them
Disappointed. Was really excited to stay here since it s supposed to be one of the nicer hotels and could finally afford it due to a corporate discount. But after the treatment my family and I received here...definitely not coming back. I ve stayed at Hampton Inns nicer than the Spa Tower but the real problem was the rudeness of the staff. I noticed a lot of other people commenting on this if they tried to change rooms etc. But we did not ask for anything extra and still could not avoid the attitude of the hotel employees. I do not know the details of my mom s experience with the concierge but she came back to the room upset one night after trying to pick up show tickets she reserved with the hotel a week ago which the people at the front desk would not give her until she talked to about 5 different people. My experience was at the pool one afternoon I decided to treat my sister and I to some cool drinks and ordered two when approached by a server. She came back with only mine and I casually asked her if my sister s drink would be out soon and I about fell out of my seat when she practically screaming said that I never ordered another drink and she would have written it down if I did. My sister and I looked at each other in disbelief and said politely that she must have confused us with some other guests and she replied even more defensively No! She said she was full and did not want anything and I even asked if you wanted anything else!! I was in shock so shocked I foolishly gave her back my credit card to charge for the additional drink without asking to see her manager. When she got back I told her I did not appreciate being called a liar and of course she said I did not call you a liar! I m sorry I did not hear you! All I can say to that is sign me up for a job at the Bellagio because all the time I served food to people I never got to be so rude to customers. Seems like fun! Anyway the Bellagio did not seem to get the memo that there are other nicer hotels on the strip now and they probably want to treat their guests better to avoid losing business. Even if you can afford it the cheaper hotels are way more fun in my opinion anyway especially the casinos
I am vegetarian. Buffet is not worth at all as the veggie options are limited. I came here on a busy day I have to wait for a while for the items to be refilled.
My husband and I went for lunch. He had the Pot Roast Sandwich that could have been ordered at any fast food sandwich shop. The side of fries that were ordered were seasoned. I had the Ham with the pretzel bun. The sandwich was good but again any fast food place would ve been just as good. The side I chose was coleslaw. Again this was typical and nothing special. Our total for lunch 35.00. My suggestion go to Blue 32 next door or in the same plaza check out Gino s. You ll get more bang for your buck.
Service awful I think waitress came by once all meal. Food was cold. My wife actually watched our order sit in the window for 5 min before she picked it up. Very few tables with customers and awful service. Will never go back.
Too many tables were crammed into the dining area. You literally cannot walk to your table because the tables are jammed in this place so tightly. Expect to be bumping into people at adjacent tables throughout your meal. Steak wet aged not prime or AAA whatever in canada . On par with Costco steaks which I enjoy very much but not for 50 Really over rated steakhouse that must have been amazing in its hey day but now just tries to jam as many diners in as possible and offers mediocre food.
This review is for the WI. Stoughton Hospital Sleep Test Clinic Center.Not the Stoughton Hospital in general. Most people that works here are friendly competent and provide good services except for this one center. I m just perplexed by my recent experience. When a costumer call this center you ll get a recorded message that will say U have reach the Stoughton Hospital Sleep Disorder Center we are proud to provide you with exceptional personalize service. What a joke.! This is very comical.! This falls in the oxymoronic category.! Lol..! What kind of exceptional personalize service is that.? Every time a costumer calls this center of yours ca not get a live person to talk to just schedule an appointment. I understand that this center is not open during business hours If an attendant does not fit in your budget why not change the recorded message..that says..you reach the Stoughton H. Sleep center... Sorry we re not open during regular business hours if you leave your name no. best time to call you. That is what u call exceptional quality service.! But know what I tried calling many times at night no success it took 3 weeks phone tags to finally get connected to a live person. With my frustrations with your process I then decided to call UW Health clinic I got connected to a live person for the first time I call then got scheduled for an appointment the same day. This center of yours have a sleep disorder problems needed a doctor to fix the problem.
Obviously its not the best place to stay when you re in Vegas but you know what the service staff is nice and the location is great! Smack dab in the middle of the strip.. If you do not want to spend a lot of on a hotel room this is the place for you!
This was our initial time at this Iconic Restaurant. We had a business lunch and made reservations a couple of weeks ago. Unfortunately they gave our table to another person with the same first name. Not Kool! When we were finally able to sit down 15 minutes we found the menu to be quite pretentious and all over the global map. Our server was neither engaging or user friendly and was not an asset in navigating the menu. I ordered the Burger which was literally falling apart as I tried to eat it. I requested the burger a click above medium and received a burnt dried out tasteless mess. I mentioned this to the waiter and he said that s how I ordered it. Really I did not recall asking for a burnt lifeless dead on arrival Burger. So taking the high road I asked him to take it away and that I ll just have the fries for lunch. Unfortunately The fires were a greasy quagmire and not eatable. The waiter to his credit said the Chef wanted to make another which he did. However it was not any better. My associate s had their fish Taco and a Chicken appetizer which were excellent. Their only complaint were that for a 16 price point the appetizer was hardly enough for one and not shareable in any manner shape or form. It was same case for the Fish Taco not enough food for a the monetary outlay. So if you want a little well prepared good food at a high price point this is the place for you. Just stay away from the burger and fries!
Absolutely worst place I ve ever lived. Staff is the most unprofessional people I ve ever came in contact with and I had to break my lease due to a cockroach infestation. Literally got to the point they were in my T.V. I could not even go to the pool without a roach swimming past me. So if you like lazy people with an education of a grade schooler in control of your living environment and hundreds of roaches living in your home this is the place for you.
Although with a friendly service this place does not serve very appetizing food. The food are not fresh. Their lemongrass chicken vermecelli seemed like it was cooked a few days earlier and was reheated to serve. The same thing with the fish sauce.
Ok so first off the food was ok good. That s the only reason why I give this restaurant that extra star. Their service was horrible when we went! First of all there were only a few families there other than us so there should be no problems with getting our food cooked right? Wrong! They forgot about our fried sesame balls and we were almost done eating when we decided it was enough. We called a waiter down and asked him about it. Before we could even explain though he just hurriedly said yeah yeah we got it cooking and rushed over to help new just entering customers. Did he even know what we were talking about??? Then we actually saw the male waiter talking to another waiter about us probably and how they forgot one of our menu items. We were basically done eating already so we decided to just leave and ask for the check without the sesame balls. But the waiter just said wait! It s coming it s coming we just have to make it by hand so it takes a while. YEAH RIGHT! I can almost guarantee you that they do not mix the flour and then make them right in the kitchen. More like they forgot our order! If it was busy it might have been more tolerable. However there was hardly any people in there and now I know why. Finally at the very end we were all pretty fed up with them already but they made us pay on an iPad. That s not the bad part. It s the fact that they stood over our shoulder and and looked at how many tips we left them. The iPad forces you to pay at least 15 tips to them. AT LEAST! If you do not they dont let you proceed to the paying section. Overall I think the food was average they had pretty good noodles though.
OMG this place is the total pits. I was moving across the western U.S. and had to stop in Vegas over night. I picked this place. I had my tiny puppy with me cause I m moving. Walked into the lobby put the dog on the floor and walked the dog to the room. No problems no one even ask about the dog because they saw my puppy when I check in. Right in the open never tried to hid the dog. Ok go down to the casino for dinner like an hour. Get back close my door and in ten min I have three guys with GUNS telling me to take my things and get out of the hotel. No joke the dog apparently had barked while I was downstairs unknown to me. These thugs tell me they do not allow dogs at the hotel. At 11 PM in the middle of the night the hotel kicked me out on my face with my puppy and no where to stay and they charged me the nights stay!! This place is the worst hotel in the WORLD!!!!!
The park playground is excellent. Lots of trees nice lake area picnic ramadas splash pad etc. The train is another story. We spent almost 40 for tickets for our large family to ride the train. The train broke. No big deal we ll just get a refund and enjoy the rest of our day right? NOPE. Train tickets are non refundable apparently even when the train is broken. No apology. Nothing. We live 50 miles away so it s not like we can just drop by the next day. So now I m stuck with 40 bucks of useless train tickets that will never get used and a bad taste in my mouth for this otherwise great park.
The majority of the food here looks great however my zuchinni fritters looked nothing like the photos I ve seen. Mine were very dark brown and covered in an extremely thick layer of batter... They looked like overdone battered fish and were dripping with oil. Although the salad and rosemary fries are pretty good this is a restaurant I do not like coming to. I ve only been here twice due to birthday celebrations otherwise I would never come. The main reason why I m not a fan of this place is that it s a struggle trying to find out what allergens are in the food here because they do not have a document on their website or even in person that they can provide which outlines if any of the major allergens are ingredients in their menu items. There are restaurants especially large chains that provide this and it s really lazy that they do not . I wrote to head office ahead of my visit for help and I m still waiting on a response. Due to the lack of info what happens instead is a back and forth conversation with the server and then the server checking with the kitchen to ask questions... It really all could be simplified. We had three people out of seven at our table with allergens so you can imagine none of us like going here.
Nous avons tent l exprience pour le djeuner Alors que les assiettes semblaient originales. Elles not aient pas mauvaises mais vraiment trop sales je ne suis glralement pas plaignarde P . L allong not ait pas bon mais ce n est vraiment pas surprenant dans un restaurant alors on passe vraiment par dessus ! Sinon le service tait bien. L ambiance tait un peu bizarre nous nous sentions comme dans un restaurant de banlieu avec peu de personnalit. Bref nous n avons rien vcu de dsagrable mais tellement rien de phnomnale non plus. nos choix croque monsieur au boeur brais et pommes caramlises Bn Franais. 1 filtre et 1 allong
I would not know if the food was good or not but their customer service is garbage. I arrived and waited a few minutes for someone to greet us. During this wait a table opened up there was know one behind us know one in front of us. Yet the greeter told me there is a 40 45 minute wait for a table of 2... And asked about the table that was available and he just simple looked at me with a blank stare and repeated the wait time.
I purchased several car care products from Rich Light via his Gloss it website. The products included several paint correction polishes and compounds. After getting the products in the mail I discovered that he had mistakenly sent me one wrong product. I contacted Rich and he told me he would send me the correct product I had ordered but only after I returned the wax sealant he had mistakenly sent me. I was fine with this but was sorely disappointed when he told me that I would have to pay the shipping to send it to him and also for him to send me the correct product. This is bad customer service especially since he was the one who made the mistake of sending me a product that I did not purchase. I did not feel I should have to pay for his mistake. Buyer beware! As far as his products are concerned the Tire Dressing Wheel Cleaner and T.R.V. Dressing are good products but his companies Paint Correction Polishes are awful and extremely overpriced there are better options out there.
Unbelievably inept TSA staff! Hugh lines people missing flights ZERO SENSE OF URGENCY. Arrive early and plan to be in the security line for an hour or so. I used to live in Fiji. They were faster! They deserve a minus star rating.
One star for not serving breakfast past 11am on SUNDAY! Flew in for work came highly recommend. Waited an hour sat down and ordered at 11 07am and the waitress said sorry sir breakfast stops at 11! UNBELIEVABLE!! I will never be back!
I am staying at the Luxor for the first and last time as I write this review. I am getting more light off the computer screen than I have from the super dim light bulbs in this place. Perhaps they only use low watt bulbs to try to hide the fact that this place is old and dirty. The bed is as bad as any I have slept in in fact the bedspread is thread bare and and the underside of it has those little balls you get from things being old. The pillows are like the ones my Granny uses that she has had for about 50 years. Super dirty! The bathroom only has a shower in it and I am a bath kind of girl. However I would not sit in it anyway. I think the towels are suppose to be white but they are a nice shade of dirty. Getting back to the lights good luck putting on make up in there the light in the elevator is better than these. I m seriously thinking about checking out of this dump and going to the Marriott. DON T STAY HERE!
OVERPRiCED!! SLOW SERViCE!!! it look just like regular rolls nothing special and not even alot. very small portion.. only good thing they let my cousin change drinks when she didnt like the one they picked out for her..1 star thats it
I have to agree with the other negative posts. I ve been coming to this clinic and these doctors for 15 years following them to 3 different locations. THIS LAST YEAR HOWEVER since one of their best beloved doctors left Dr. Gramstad the other doctors are overwhelmed with new patients and service and quality of care is a negative. Not even a one. This has been my so called Clinic for 15 years and I ca not even get in for an EKG before surgery? I was even told once that my Dr. was over a month out?? Worst of all... I too find it hard to get anyone on the phone but the worst part is I had to wait over a year for a referral to go through. They drop the ball consistently and instead of admitting the mistake they constantly cover with excuses. Something is terribly wrong with the management here. Anyone good is gone!! It was not always this way. I was so frustrated I decided to take a different Dr. from the Osborn walk in office. Nightmare. Dr. Lee was rude arrogant. His staff on Osborn a joke. Not one smile 5 women working behind the desk one is filing her nails!! Not one can I help you or a smile. Like it s torture waiting on you or your their worst enemy. The first appointment the front desk person gave me the wrong directions. Never made it. 2nd try......Dr. Lee was behind could not say how long the wait would be and when I asked he jumped down my throat and told me if I did not like it I could go back to the 19th Ave clinic. Gladly Dr. Lee. You have NO manners and your Osborn clinic is a joke. It s a walk in clinic they had me come in at 9 15 at 10 05 nothing. I saw 4 walk ins come in and every single one was treated rudely especially if they did not have insurance. It was obvious you are there for the money not quality care or the patients! Why replace a great Dr. like Dr. Gramstad with the absolute worst Dr. Lee. I do not get it. I am looking for a new family practice Dr. who takes my insurance. If anyone has a good or a great Dr. please write and let me know. The quality of care is abominable! I do like the old staff at the 19th location it s not their fault.
These workers here earn minimum wages and they are not happy with their life so they provide bad customer service with a bad attitude. Not to mention the products they carry have poor quality. Birthday balloons started to deflate less than 12 hours. Balloons from Party City lasted about a month. You really get what you pay for! I would rather pay more to get good customer service and quality products. But again someone asked me to get a few things from this store because they are cheap. Will not return!
I tried this place because everyone seems to rate at least 4 stars but it ai not even close! The pho noodles are not even fresh. It seems like it was made by putting the noodles from the bag into the bowl and then poured the soup on rather than dipping the noodles in the boiled soup first to soften the noodles. If you re from Bolsa for real then by all mean avoid this imitation Bosa pho. The bun bo was not close so avoid this as well. It seems like they use the same soup on pho and bun bo. Needless to say that the service was typical asian bad service. The environment is stuffy and not very comfortable.
Well... my Omelet was actually pretty good but there was a live fly in my mother s food. Also coffee tasted like they used the same grounds twice. They reduced the bill for the order that had the fly but honestly they should have comped the entire bill. If they had I might not have posted this.
I was not impressed with the Donut Bar. The French toast donut and latte I got were pretty good but everything else I tried was flavourless. Like a lot of other reviews mentioned the sugar topping on the creme brle donut was way too thick the red velvet donut was very dry and did not taste like anything and the Nutella donut was less dry but still had almost no flavour.
just had lunch here today and boy this is a sad excuse for Mexican restaurant. in fact it really fails on both fronts..no real mexican flavors and the service is earnest at times but overall weak..big green pond big deal who cares!! It is an old and tired spot that does have really good chips and salsa..it s a long way to drive for way average food and bad service
It was late and we got there just before closing . First tried their wanton soup. The waitress bragged about the soup. The skin was a little thick . The meat was dry was taste less. Tried their beff pastry roll. This was passable not much flavor and dry. We ordered two noodle dishes. They were both overcooked. I would pass on this restaurant . The service was good otherwise one star
The interior was surprisingly spacious which was unexpected when looking in from the outside. It was slightly dimly lit for my taste but that was minor. Waitress was friendly and seemed to know the menu fairly well. Foodwise I was a little disappointed. To start the lobster cappuccino was served with a giant dollop excessive if you ask me of crme frache. As a soup I would expect it to be served hot but instead it was lukewarm at best. A staple for any good lobster joint has to be their lobster roll. The bun was well toasted and easy to handle however the filling was under seasoned. The surf and turf tartare was pretty solid but it would have been perfect if they kicked up the mustard horseradish amount a bit more. Both the lobster roll and the tartare dish were both served with a giant mound of homemade chips. The chips were the worst part as they were cold seemed stale and tasteless.
Wow what a terrible spot. I mentioned that it my first time here. I ordered 3 drinks with friends and the drinks came out so so so sweet. We took a drink of our boba and mentioned to the worker that the drinks were way extremely sweet. The girl looks at me and said yeah we make it super sweet. My response was it s not even drinkable she said yeahhhh and walked away. What a joke that big drink was thrown away right into the trash. The worst spot in LV.
Beware Groupons for Skinny Wimp Moving Co.! The Groupon does not state a one time trip charge which they charged me over 100 for! So much for a half priced move! Edit in response to replies the Groupon did not state no trip charge or anything of the sort hence calling to find out about the additional charge makes it seem like not such a great deal after all. When i called them to book and mentioned the lack of information the rep said something like the marketing people are working on it which is fine and dandy but the deal is not such a deal when you still have to pay more than the Groupon amount for the services indicated on the Groupon. As a frequent Groupon user the lack of information and the increased charge reflects poorly on the part of the company and their marketing folk. A simple note of trip gas charge may apply call for details would have solved the issue before it was an issue.
Started bringing my yorkie puppies to Valerie s for grooming right after she opened because she was close to home. At first I was very pleased with the service. For the first few times I only had them groomed no cut as they did not have enough hair. On Nov. 21st I had them clipped as well. They looked so cute when I picked them up! I put Little and Big in their crate for our 3 minute ride home. Big would not come out so I carried the crate into the family room opened the door and after about an hour she came out and seemed to be limping. The next morning we took her to our vet to be checked. On the way there I decided to call Valerie s to see if they had any idea what might have happened. The young lady I spoke to said nothing had. 176.00 later we took our baby home with a sprained leg on antibiotics. Needless to say we will not be returning. Be sure you check your babies before walking out...just in case.
This restaurant s ventilation was insufficient as soon as you walk in. You are overwhelmed by the grilling atmosphere in the whole restaurant. We had a pork and chicken plate and calamari. The chicken was very dry and same with the pork. The salad and rice were very bland. The calamari was mediocre as well. I do not think I will be goings back to this restaurant anytime soon.......
I ordered the Mango Bon Bon and was disappointed. The drink is definitely not worth the 15. I could ve made this drink myself mango juice whip cream and mango fruit all for less than 5.
Yup there really is nothing good to write about this place. I went because I thought it was Kalua pig night only. I am not even sure what I ate. It s pretty greasy and oily here.
2 weeks ago I would have given 5 stars. I joined just 16 days ago. Upon first impression this was heaven in the form of a gym. Availability of machines variety of class schedules friendly staff gorgeous and welcoming facility great pool and cafe. It was totally worth the 120 a month. Today I am not having those same feelings. I go to the gym to work out this place has become more of a teenage hangout I feel like I m at the mall on a weekend. Their parents are no where to be found so they just act like disrespectful rude obnoxious little rodents! They crowd the stairs and act as if they own the damn place. I sent an email to corporate about these issues. I even saw one of the employees friends flip off a group of 8 year old children! I am waiting to see what corporate has to say I am contemplating leaving this gym. Parents should have to accompany anyone under 18 to the gym instead it seems they drop them off for social time.
It s ridiculous how they never answer there phone!! I m trying to make a phone order but they do not answer what ever then last time i go there! I prefer Federico s but since filibertos was closer i THOUGHT ill give it another try. But forget that! Its like they dont want business! In Federico s they always ANSWER there phone and get a really good customer service from them and always have my food ready on time. So there I go.
This place had just okay sushi. The prices are good. HOWEVER the service is the absolutely worse! The waitress hostess was unaware of people waiting to even turn in their order. When I received the wrong roll I approached the cook and his response was not that he was sorry but that I should have told him exactly what I wanted. I thought that was what the menu was for? Worse ever. Do not waste your time here. Three tables were used and all three while I was there complained about the service.
Horrible horrible horrible oh did I say horrible service and my pedicure sucked. The only decent thing was wine my best friends nails looked like literal smeared poop after we paid 20 dollars for gel polish and another 16 for three little diamonds on her nails it was the worst I ll never go back. I thought NC of how nice they would do good. It they were unprofessional and rude and could not understand English. I also got an infection at the nail bed of my big toe after pedicure. Within days all this happened.
I ve held back thinking our first visit was a fluke. Our first visit included a decent pizza and a very inept server. I would give the pizza a 6 10 but the 40 minute wait in a uncrowded restaurant till served was inexcusable so much as the manager apologized and offered us a discount. While there another customer told us how great the Philly steak sandwiches were. So second visit was for the Phillies. Being from the Philadelphia area I do know what makes a good Philly cheese steak. This was not it. Very bland with tasteless cheese melted on top. The only part of the sandwich with any flavor was the diced green bell pepper. It did come with greasy but tasty battered french fries and since the server told us we could have a choice of onion rings we did one of those. What she did not tell us was the extra charge when the guest check arrived. In her defense she did come to the table a few minutes after the food was served to ask if we would like or guest check at that time. Nice atmosphere but that is not quite enough. There are better venues with better food and better service. In our book we are 0 2 at Gus s. Game over.
The owner is a liar and a cheat. He treats customers like S t Do not do business with this place and avoid it like a plague. All the reviews here reflect his careless attitude and disrespect.
The last time I was there the place was FULL of flies. And whenever I ve been there the barista s do not appear to have a systematic way of taking orders and money. It s this kinda whoever pounces first cluster around the bar. And So Dark! for a cafe. It s not for me.
Meh ... I really have had better. I will say the service was good and when you order a combo plate they will give you a kids portion if you need it for free. My husband and I ordered the boneless wings and I never thought I would say this but I would rather go to BWW. The boneless wings at Chicken Bonz where too large more of a strip than wing the chicken was chewy and the breading batter did not stay on the wing. If I ever venture back it will be for the bone in wings and I do not eat bone in wings.
This location is the worst I have been to! Messed up my reservation time! Then the customer service is very blah...no personality and some workers look very confused of their surroundings lets hope the food will offset the horrible beginning. I will update this post for now it get 1 star!
This place is okay. Some rude employees and some nice employees. The employees in the Salt River Cafe are not friendly at all. You have like 4 people back there and when your ready to order they just look at you like what do you want or yes! They do not ask can I help you or acknowledge you. I got the chicken strips with fries and paid 8 dollars for chicken nuggets I kid you not. The strips were so hard I broke my plastic fork trying to cut and hold I m not kidding. They are hard and crispy go to Buffalo Wild Wings or somewhere else for strips. I would not recommend this place to anyone for gambling and dining.
Took my car in for a simple alignment because she pulls to the right. I waited in line for about 20 minutes to tell the attendant what I was there for. He proceeded to shoot the shit with a regular customer and ignore the fact that there was two people waiting for his assistance. I work in customer service and felt that there was a lack in a sense of urgency in even acknowledging that there were people waiting in line. However he was honest and stated that they were going to need a few hours to work on it. Four hours later they called me and I picked it up paid 100 and my car pulls to the right more noticeably now. Also this might not matter very much but when I told the attendant the make and model of my car he clearly did not listen and put down the wrong year. I m extremely disappointed with the whole experience and it is very unlikely that I will ever go back to get my car serviced at this location again.
My boyfriend and I were provided this hotel by Air Canada after our delayed flight from Montreal to Toronto made us miss our flight to Houston. We arrived late and barely made it for dinner. We took our food up to the room and I accidentally dropped some in bed. It left 2 VERY SMALL light orange stains in the white sheets. I am talking as small as a single tear drop. THEY CHARGED US 150 DOLLARS FOR THE TWO SMALL STAINS. First of all we did not even plan on having to stay the night in Canada. I do not think two tiny stains would have been difficult to get out of the sheets. A hotel was provided to us by the airline we should not have had to spend ANY money there at all. Ridiculous.
DONT EAT AT THIS BUFFET! It is the worst buffet known to man. The meat was chewy and tough the pasta tasted like it was expired and there was too much oil in everything. Along with the little selection and the 17 for parties over 8 I never been to such a bad dinner buffet. Definitely would not recommend and never coming back. The food was probably poisoned too because 7 8 people in our party had diarrhea. Terrible. Absolutely terrible.
Primary Residential Mortgage obtained our loan quickly and with little fuss. I am happy about the initial transaction performed but even before our 1st payment they sold our loan to Wells Fargo. That disappoints me! It would seem after the fact and reading the reviews they did us a favor selling us to Wells Fargo. Wow
Worst coat of my life. I noticed it was broken as soon as I got it home. Only when I posted the horrific photos all over Twitter facebook and Instagram is when Rudsak rushed to try and make it better. A 600 coat should not be broken the second you get it home. I wore the coat once and noticed a rip under the armpit the sharp metal bar shaping the fur came out and began to stab me and the zipper fell apart before my eyes. I could literally put four fingers between the zipper and the fabric. Mackage is 10 times better. Never shop at Rudsak. Rudsak also has horrible customer service.
SUCK!!! Just signed up my membership on Thursday but cancelled that Saturday. The staffs are sucks. My 16yr old son is schedule for personal training but made him WAIT for 1 hour and 30mins for NO ONE... personal training this and that. Fuck all of your excuses...If you know that person ca not make it to work then let me know. Not make my son come to your facility and make him wait.
My husband and I come here when ever someone is sick and we get our kids prescriptions here and with my most recent visit I was basically called a thief by the manager Marcella. She is absolutley disrespectful and has zero customer service I bought a few things including baby soap for my son who has eczema and this place is the only place close to home that sells the soap he needs and once I got home I noticed my soap was not in there i called the store got out on hold was holding for so long that the phone automatically rang back the Marcella answers with an automatic attitude does not even greet me me she only picks up the phone and says yes ? I explain to her what I told the previous lady she the says no I cant help you until I review the video footage and you bring your proof of purchase. I say I have my reciept and I m on my way down there now and she then says no I m too busy to look at anything or help you you can come at another time. And is arguing with me about me paying for this soap and then hangs up on me!!!! Completely disrespectful!!!!! That is no way you treat your customers
Very disappointing the server had no Knowledge of the menu Very small servings for the price of the food food was very salty and deserts very small and not tasty at all. Over priced and underfeed! We wo not be gong back unfortunately because we need a good restaurant in this part of town
Do not rent from this car rental location. Their terms and conditions are written in a way that they can apply it to your rental agreement in which you will lose and forfeit your money by force. I rented a car there did not receive the car nor did they refund me my 230 back. Called corporate and they were not helpful just kept shoving the terms as I did back to them to let them know that they are not well written. Staff is very unhelpful and this is by far the worst car rental location. I have rented from numerous locations for both personal and business reasons and I will never think of renting from this location. Please do not rent from here save yourself the headaches and your money. I would say from my experience that enterprise have been the most helpful and I am just giving this as a suggestion to help not endorse. Either way just do not rent from this company. I wish I could give them less than 1 star. Do not fall for their low prices hidden charges will happen and unexpected prices will happen.
This is not a review on the food I think the food at PF Changs is pretty standard it s delicious and the same everywhere. However this particular location has huge organizational issues that I blame purely on management. First I made a reservation specifically stating 4 adults two children with high chairs. Our party arrived 10 minutes early and yet we re still seated after 40 minutes. Our food was brought out in three separate segments for three different people. In an hour time span. We had a table party of five who were eating their dinner wrapped up and left sitting next to us. Another party of five came sat down ordered their food had their dinner even had it wrapped up and my husbands entre still had not arrived just to give you an idea of the time span. at this point with two toddlers and after 2 1 2 hour time at the table they were getting pretty rowdy it was never our intention to be there that long a child s patience can only last for so long. The server was always polite and courteous the entire time constantly apologizing. After we paid for our dinner my husband asked to speak with management and this is the fundamental issue my husband explained the entire situation to him the manager simply replied that they had a lot of new staff new cooks even an excuse saying they had so many takeout orders etc. etc. he offered my husband to comp the appetizer when he declined that he offered my husband a 25 gift card which my husband told him we have already paid it s not the money that s the issue. He declined the gift card because he simply said there s no reason to return. My husband was extremely polite and courteous even gave him a handshake. The issue is that the entire time the manager did not once offer an apology. All we were looking for was an apology I do not know where it is that they really need to work on their organization and delivery. We are very reasonable people we understand that there are bad days we do not blame our server but I do blame the management it s their job to assure that things are running smoothly and executed properly. This chain has such a high customer turn out that I guess if they lose a few customers it makes no effect on their profit margin. I do not think we will be returning to this particular location anytime soon we never had a problem with the location in Fairlawn we live in between both so it s very easy to drive south versus north for us.
Well I went here to eat Menudo of coarse. I ca not say it was awful but it had no flavor. I had to add salt and I do not ever like adding salt. I love that you have a choice of bread with butter or hand made corn tortillas. I got bread. The meat in my Menudo was not cut right so I had this big chunk of meat. I also did not like the fact that the waitress was hard to get. She was in the back somewhere the majority of the time. We had to go get her a few times and we were not the only ones. We ordered Horchata and a coke.She came back with Jamaica and a coke. If the place was busy I would understand but it was just us and 1 other lady. Like I said it was not horrible just not for us.
Worst Total Wine store I ve ever tried to shop. Extremely rude arrogant employees and after spending some time shopping this trip they blatantly denied my coupon issued by Total Wine because it did not come up on their computer. What really got me was they acknowledged this 20 off coupon but refused to enter it manually. Not the first time I ve had a problem at this store but guaranteed it will be the last never go back. Other than that this is a good company for your wine adult beverages requirements just stay away from Desert Ridge! By the way I m not a casual shopper but a Grand Reserve member of their rewards program.
I really really really wanted to like this place! I brought my two daughters here for afternoon tea service as a little treat for us over Christmas break. I m glad that they are such wonderful sports. I was just a bit unimpressed by this alleged high tea service. You re certainly paying for the ambience and not much else. There are 3 options for afternoon tea service standard service for 17 for 3 very small tea sandwiches 2 scones 3 petit fours and a pot of tea Royal service for 24 everything above plus your choice of a champagne cocktail kir royale or a mimosa Mad Hatter tea service for 10 kids 10 and under includes 2 cookies one small PB and J and a small banana sandwich The service was very inattentive. It took about 10 or 15 minutes for our server to arrive and take our order. With only 3 items on the menu there s not much suspense here for the server. There s a pretty good chance I m going with one of the two tea options and since I came with two girls aged 4 and 7 they re going with the kid version. The treats were tasty enough small portions and it took quite a while for them to arrive. The kids were pleased as can be to be on this outing and they were just taking it all in as they should. Daddy on the other hand was wondering where our server was with my check and then what was taking so long to process my payment. When I hear afternoon high tea service I was hoping for something along this lines of this recent experience in Victoria British Columbia at The Fairmont Judging from the other reviews clearly this hotel is an institution. But for the price I was hoping for something more in the food and service departments. You can come out ahead if you just sat in the lobby and ordered a tea and scone from the Starbucks that shares the same space.
I m eating here right now and I ordered Omurice 75 on the menu it s basically just a fried rice with basic vegetables green peas carrots corn pieces and chopped pork pieces. The fried rice has lots of oil I could not eat it all. Also the miso soup tastes like old soup that keep reheating. It tastes awful. It s just cheap but the food is below average. I do not recommend it to everyone. The waitress could not communicate well and very rude.
The worst show I ever saw. Story is horrible and makes no sense choppy with too much going on to grasp. It tries so so so hard and instead only creates a mess. Who ever wrote it...yikes. It also gets boring in certain parts. The coolest part of course is what the stage looks like before and after and the fact that these divers are diving from serious heights. But its not enough to keep your attention and you start to get angry and you want to complain to mr. wynn about it.
Eh. Their pizza is ok. I bought a Madison Perks deal and took a chance to try them out. The crust is incredibly thin. I am not a huge eater and I ate half of their large before I got full. Their sizes are not generously portioned out. Their largest pizza is still pretty small. We paid a bit extra for more toppings. I got my usual sausage and green pepper. I had one or two sausages on each square. More like one on each truthfully. It was very chintzy for lack of a better term. I want to like them more but they are just sub par. The only reason I did not give them a one because the pizza was decent. It tasted ok. Nothing stood out to me. I appreciated that they put the pizza in the paper bags. It seals up the heat allowing you to get a better product home. Thank you Buck s for the bag pizza. Unfortunately I will not be back again.
Cashier needs a serious attitude change. I went to order one thing and she gave me the dirtiest look and said um is that it? Her face expression was rude and overall attitude! She s so lucky I was the bigger person!
Wow. Taco Bell has better food. Went here with some friends at lunch Saturday...you d think by their lackadaisical attitude about serving us that we had done something awful to them like we d peed in their salsa or something. I had the taco salad with ground beef flavorless and the sangria. Sangria was fine but the salad was such that I ate 1 4 of it before I gave up. Service was just downright abrupt and rude. I ordered a plain cheese quesadilla for my two year old...ten minutes later our server emerged from the back and barked Plain right?! Like NO CHICKEN or anything?! He was not smiling. We diners exchanged looks of surprise. Let s also note that no one took home any leftovers it was all left to the trash. The staff here this was the second visit for me did this the last time I dined here...it seems that they feel inconvenienced or put out at either having to be open during lunch time or for actually having to work there. This place is not like having La Fiesta it s more like having La SIESTA . Never again!
I am still on the hunt for delicious shrimp and grits. Thought I d try my luck at Liliana s since I ve never been before. We came on a Sunday night abs the place was pretty tame few patrons at the bar with drinks in hand and a handful of tables already served. Our group of four were sat by the friendly host who have the girls beads upon arrival. Sadly that s where the great service ended. The server took our drink orders of Pat O Briens and disappeared. He came back later to take our food orders and said the bartenders were backed up. 20 min later we finally get our drinks. I will say the only winner of the night was the corn bread. Moist crumbly and fragrant of honey they were perfect morsels to satisfy anyone. Our group ordered the pasta Liliana tilapia Diablo chicken shrimp and grits scallops from the small plate menu and a cup of gumbo. First I d like to point out that all of our dishes arrived lukewarm. The pasta 17 had almost no flavor and the chicken and sausage were greasy with very little Cajun flavor. I would not name this dish as my namesake pasta. The tilapia 17 was very good with perfect amount of breadcrumbs covering the delicate fish. The bed of veggies was again lukewarm. The Diablo chicken 17 looked more impressive than it tasted. The Sirracha sauce was very tame not spicy at all. The shrimp and grits 7 were a let down. The grits were poofy almost the same texture as marshmallow fluff. However I will say that the TWO shrimps that arrived with the dish was very good and cooked perfectly. The scallop dish was average. It came again with TWO scallops that looked almost flattened as if made from one lump scallop. I guess I had higher hopes for the 7 price tag. The gumbo was the biggest let down. We ve had many bowls of gumbo in NOLA and none of them had rice on the bottom. My dining companions believe it s a strategy to serve less gumbo for the price at 6 for a cup. The service was painfully slow. The dishes were disappointing. We probably will never return again. For the 125 bill the service and food was not on par for the price. ...and the search for great Cajun food continues...
An awful hospital! No conscience person should ever go to this particular hospital!!! The hospital admitted their wrong doing with my visit! Telling me that because of my experience that they are going to change their procedures on how they deal with patients in the ER not only at this location but all of their other locations as well! I was awoken by a nurse at 5am and immediately told that I was having security called and that I was trespassing! I at no point during my stay was aguementive or combative! I had insurance and I did not understand why I was being treated like that? At no point did I ever get an explanation on why I was trespassing ? The hospital was completely empty at the time I was asked to leave! I was later told by upper management that the nurse did not follow the hospital procedures! The staff at this hospital is the worst I promise you! If you do not believe me go there yourself and see! Do not say I did not warn you! I would not go back to this hospital if I was shot between the eyes on their property! I would rate a NO 0 star if yelp allowed!
I pass BLVD everyday on 4th Street to get home it is an enormous corner building it looks stupendous from the outside and it has dim lighting and literally has two flaming centerpieces outside. It is a place you want to keep at the back of your memory for a special occasion. I was so excited when a friend choose this place as her Bday bash of choice I was going to yelp it all up. My conclusion is this...what a disappointing dining and dancing location. Entering the lavish interior is absolutely divine it s like walking down the red carpet the flaming entrances the huge glass doorways. Upon Entering the bar is set up as the center focal point and the tables cascade to the sides in rich textures comfortable seating with throw pillows. The waitresses I found dressed tastefully but were a bit too standoffish and a little cold as servers. I was extremely careful not to eat much during the day as I was expecting 5 star plates. What Blvd offers is simply small plates to share most of the substantial stuff is not on the menu anymore the lamb the beef... so you are basically filling yourself up with light meals and alcohol. I had a hummus with focacio and lamb I expect the lamb to be skewered instead it was ground and not much of a serving tons of hummus and bread though but eating that for a main course is just silly. My one friend had the chicken pizza and it was not anything to write home about basically she said it was like they ordered out at Boston it was sliced up and served on her plate. Another friend had some taste temptations thing you can check it out in my photos basically 8 servings on wonton spoons and we thought it was a joke so we called it the anorexic dish. So basically my friend of course not in the least bit full ended up sharing mine. Presentation was okay but the food was so so and definitely not up to par with all the decoration hype. Blvd menu could use some tweaking from the Hotel Arts Food group in the city to bring their menu items up to the standards it should be. The DJ then came on and it was more lounge and trance we were going to stay to dance but there just was not a groove happening. My biggest disappointment was when the bill came it automatically got tagged with a server fee which I am assuming was the tip I think around 12 . I really cannot tolerate this ... charging your cliental a mandatory gratuity as if we were somewhere like New York or Toronto. Get your menu updated so it is mouth watering have things on it that are actually available and put a warmer smile on your service staff to deserve that gratuity. Read the other reviews on this yelp list BLVD you re looks just ai not enough I am afraid.
very slow customer service i waited for almost an hour... this is a reserved rental for mini van thru travelocity and it s taking soooo long! never again! should have stick with enterprise
They served imitation maple syrup with the waffle that had absolutely no flavor and barely a sweet taste. It is a rare occurrence when a waffle is not entirely consumed while we dine. In this case we barely ate half. No point unless it tastes good. An up charge of 1.50 for real maple syrup? Why do not you work that into the price of the meal? Considering the area you d think that would be the case. No desire to go back.
I made an appointment with the doctor to have a spot on my skin examined. They tried to convince me to sign an arbitration agreement. By signing the agreement I would forgo my right to a jury trial should the doctor make a mistake in my medical care. Instead of a jury trial any complaint that I filed would have to be presented to an impartial arbitration panel and their decision would be final. These arbitration hearings are rarely impartial. I told them I would not sign the agreement. They said I would not be treated if I refused to sign it. I walked out the door and scheduled a visit with another doctor that did not have such a policy.
Pros Outdoor space is great! Also the bar area of the cantina also has a great dcor and great drinks! Cons The service is not the best as far as responsiveness to drinks taking food orders properly and checking in to see if we wanted anything else. Also the queso fundido is a joke. Do not order it especially if you re expecting real queso fundido! I also had the chorizo tacos. Not bad however not great either. The real con of this place is the food made me sick! I lived in Mexico and not once did I ever experience the punishing after effects of food like this place gave me. Surprisingly I would go back to this place. Only for an alcoholic beverage though.
Not sure why it s rated so high the breakfast burrito was watery and had barely any meat. The chicken fried steak was a frozen hunk of junk and the gravy is not good! We never were asked once how our meal was so I did not tip and wo not go back
I love the look of this place and always drive by the one in San Diego. After having crappy coffee all day at my hotel I was in need of a decent cup. I ordered a latte and received a cappuccino. Whatever the sixteen year old at the counter is not working at Starbucks. The espresso was decent and the foam was nice... I did not complain. My banana walnut pound cake was a gritty sugary disaster. The sandwiches looked good though.
DO NOT BUY FROM FURNITURE CREATIONS I bought a bed through their amazon store front. As a prime customer this has been the worst buying experience from amazon ever. First they contacted me to inform their shipping will be delayed by 10 days. Second this is CURB SIDE only delivery. Dont be fooled by free shipping. If u want it to delivered to your home in an apartment you have to pay extra to the delivered from curb to home. Assuming this is buyers mistake for not digging into their shipping policy. After all this drama if the product is damaged dont accept it. I had box 1 of 3 damaged and didnt accept that alone and accepted boxes 2 and 3 When contacted them to ship the missing product they initially quoted 1 week time. After a week and followup they quoted that item was backordered by coaster and will have to wait 2 months to get the item and didnt even care to inform me forgot about apologizing . I told them this is unacceptable and issue a refund for the missing part. They quoted way less for the part in the market. I then filed a claim with amazon. All amazon can do is ask to ship the product back and ask the seller to issue refund. First of all cost of shipping 300 pounds high volume bed back to seller is way too high for individuals which neither amazon nor this company will take care although its their fault. So I withdrew the claim and asked the seller to atleast refund the original amount they quoted. They wont do that also since I filed the claim. Amazon understood the issue and issued a refund for me finally. After 3 months all I have is half baked product and not even a equivalent refund. I already escalated the issue to Amazon about this seller and inquire about their misleading shipping refund policies.
Nice person but did not really listen to what I asked for. It was not busy so I got helped very quickly. Very unclean and hair was everywhere and on all tools. He sprayed first clipper to clean it but once he needed another one he just put new one on and clipped my hair with the clipper visibly having someone else hair still on it. Disgusting. Needless to say I will not come back.
My Sister and I had lunch at Bobo China up the street and decided to get a pedicure since we were out also is more fun when you have a buddy along. So we cruise down Sahara looking for a nail shop as we did not have one in mind. We thought would stop somewhere in the neighborhood to save on travel time. We both got pedi s. They advertise 25 pedicure and 30 for manicure pedicure combo. The pedicure itself was simple and easy some filing and a nail polish application. There was not really much extra to be done as the lady working on my feet even commented on how well my feet are taken care of smooth and soft. I felt cheated and honestly it was the fastest and shortest pedicure I have ever had. I was not impressed they have cheap polishes as my toenails chipped the next day! They are NOT honest about their pricing. My sister got a simple clear coat french tip which is simply white nail polish painted on the tips of the nail. The nail technician did not inform my sister would be 5.00 extra. So we pay and leave and as we are literally to our car the lady runs out after us screaming as if we had robbed a bank. She stated my sister owed her 5.00 more because the lady who charged my Sister s credit card did not know to charge the extra 5.00 for french pedicure. We were in shock I just remember my Sister and I looking at each other in disbelief! Wow I was livid and took a step back and decided in a nano second this was not the time to wig out and tell someone off. Also did not want it to ruin our Sister s day out we had just had lunch and sis is preggers so need to keep calm. I should have told the greedy nail shop employee how unprofessional that was to do and that she should have let the 5.00 go not to mention we just spent 60 bucks in their shop. It was after all their error they quoted a price and my sister paid it to run after us like we just stole their freaking newborn baby was uncalled for! My Sister handed over the extra 5.00 while we are standing at the car. My Sister should have told her to take it out of the tip she was left! These idiots lost our business for good! They can kiss our ass! With greedy and shady pricing we will not be spending another dime in their shop. Horrible service and lousy pedicures will not keep them in business considering there are so many other shops in town. Just like Bank of America who is the Mc Donald s of banks there is one on every freaking corner! SCANDALOUS! SHADY BUSINESS PRACTICES THEY ADVERTISE 25.00 PEDICURES AND DON T INFORM OF EXTRA CHARGES THEY TACK ON! BAD SERVICE CHEAP POLISH CRAPPY RUSHED PEDICURES YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED.
In my 30 years of living I have never had such an abhorrent experience as I did today at this restaurant. I d like to start by saying that I d heard so many wonderful reviews on M and M Soul Food Cafe and my expectations were quite high. I got to the restaurant with my family 5 other individuals at 3 30 PM and stood waiting to be greeting by a host. After several minutes of waiting the host who also happens to be the manager came to greet us. She informed us that there was a wait of 25 minutes. After waiting for about 45 minutes we approached the manager and asked for an update on the table. She informed us that we could not be seated because there was a shortage of fried chicken and there was another table who had not been served their food yet. Fast forward 1 hour. We are irritated that we still do not have food. The manager came over and started to have a friendly conversation in which we informed her that serval parties have left because of the long wait and bad service. Verbatim she replied we do not care! Our food is good and we only want to serve customers who understand that it s going be a long wait Fast forward another 25 mins.. still no food! The server came over and told us our food was up next . My cousin asked what up next meant and then all hell broke loose. The server replied that she did not know what it meant but that she saw our ticket up next at the counter. My cousin asked if the server could go and ask the manager how long up next was. The server replied no I already asked my manager 3 times and she just told me to get the hell out of her face Wow. My cousin said you do realize we have been waiting for 2 hours and the server replied what do you want me to do about it Fast forward 10 minutes our food finally came! BUT our orders were wrong the food was cold and the vibe and experience was ruined.
The pluses are that they come out promptly and are very nice and professional. My major complaint is the charge for Freon. My unit uses R22 which is being phased out for 410. These folks wanted to charge me 75 per pound of freon. The whole can only cost between 300 350 family in business in another state. I do not mind a business making a profit but since I needed 14 pounds I could have bought three cans. That is not profit that is rape.
Okay I LOVE LOVE Starbucks but this location gets my order wrong every time! Each time i go back thinking it will be better it s not. Not to mention the staff looks like they just rolled out of bed and went to work. I do not typically share reviews but i am beyond frustrated with this location.
Waited 10 minutes for a drink. Never received. Patron next to my wife saying worse things than the f word. Constantly loud and cursing. Left with disappointment that no worker would handle the situation.
My boyfriend and I were going to a rockabilly convention in Las Vegas from Wednesday April 4 2012 through Monday April 9 2012. He chose to use Priceline.com to book our reservation. The Monte Carlo Resort and Casino took our offer on name your own price. We were rather enthused when we read their motto Luxury can mean different things to different people. For us luxury should not be stuffy. Or opulent. Or exclusive. Or make you feel uncomfortable. We believe that luxury should make you feel special no matter who you are. It should make you feel rich even if you re not. Luxury should make you feel like a VIP every day. This is what we believe at Monte Carlo Resort and Casino and it is what we promise throughout our resort. We want our guests to enjoy the unique inclusive Las Vegas experience available only at Monte Carlo unpretentiously luxurious. Little did we know that this four diamond hotel would not even live up to a Motel 8. Wednesday April 4 Upon arrival 10 30 pm we were immediately greeted by three things. 1 The manager of one of the casino clubs. He wanted us to go to ladies night. We were uninterested and stated as much. He persisted until we took a bracelet. 2 The intense smell of perfume. So intense that you could taste it. 3 A broken revolving door. After receiving our unwanted bracelet we proceeded to stand in line for check in. The line was relatively short and we only had to wait for approximately five minutes. The lady behind the desk greeted us and we started our check in process. She informed us that we would have to pay an additional resort fee of 20.00 per day. My boyfriend said that the Priceline deal stated that the hotel was paid in full. We were then informed that the 20.00 fee was stated at the bottom of the page. My boyfriend produced his original paper work the verbiage regarding the resort fee was not on the paperwork. Regardless we were told we would be required to pay the fee. We then asked what was included in the fee structure. We would receive bottled water coffee a newspaper gym access local long distance phone calls and internet. We told them we had cell phones and did not need anything we were being charged for. Again we were told that this fee was not negotiable. My boyfriend gave them his credit card to charge for the resort fee. We completed check in and headed to our room 10 122 . I noticed as we were walking through the corridor that there were stains on the floors and walls as well as rips and gouges in the walls. We arrived at our room and the first thing we notice is that we were put into a double queen room. My boyfriend immediately calls downstairs to request a king room. Guest services inform us that there are no king rooms available but that they can change our room on Thursday. Whatever we are tired and agree. After a long day at work and a short flight I am in need of a quick shower before bed. As I turn on the lowest shower head that I have personally ever seen I m 5 4 I ca not help but notice all of the black mold growing on grout lines of the shower and that the plumbing is deafeningly loud. After my very quick shower I notice that our bathroom exhaust fan is not working. The room smells funky and so before bed I try to open the window only to find that the windows are sealed shut.
Came in from Diego was told how delicious the ribs were we got our order within 5 minutes they tasted if they had been sitting there maybe under a heat lamp for hours dry and not juicy or meaty. There was 3 of us and the waiter refused to give 2 separate checks 2 of wanted one check and the other person wanted his own for rewards points I have gone to restaurants with a party of 12 and we even got separate checks. Another words bad service Luke warm dried out bones ribs my advice find another place there are a ton!
I came back and changed my rating from a 4 the first week or two that they opened to a 1 fast forward a month . They have a bunch of kids working there that do not care what type of food they serve. We got burgers that were cold with rock hard buns and dry meat. As you can see in the pictures the cheese was not even melted. When I took them back the manager said It s not supposed to be like that. YOU THINK. He did make it right but this is not the first time this has happened. I really wanted to like this location.
This place is lucky I ca not leave Zero stars. I called ahead of time to see if they had a pillow in stock in which they stated they had quite a section. I arrived at the store and was greeted by someone who then told me they do not carry pillows and that they were only available at the warehouse. I was then approached by another representative who was able to assist me. She informed me they did have the pillow I was looking for but that it was only available to purchase at the warehouse even though they had 4 in stock in the store. I Purchased the pillows and made a 20 min drive to the warehouse in the slums of Phoenix where I was told there would be a 30 40 min wait since it was a Saturday. This has been the most unpleasant experience and way too much work and effort just to get a pillow. Go elsewhere also majority of the staff seemed rude to one another at the store. Seems like an awful place to work.
This is a tough one. This restaurant is a lot of fun has reasonable prices and very good food. Unfortunatley you can expect a wait of 1 2 hours seemingly anytime during the week night or day. Even take out usually takes over an hour! I suppose that s evidence of the restaurant s overall quality but their general nonchalant attitude about the situation has frustrated me to the point that I rarely even bother with the place anymore which is too bad because they probably have the best wings I ve ever tasted.
DO NOT RENT FROM AVIS AT MANDALAY. The front desk was rude and they make you clean THEIR CAR since they have no cleaning facility on site. We were told that their 35 to 75 cleaning fee was assessed on MOST OF THEIR CUSTOMERS upon return. I could not get ANY answer as to what constituted too much dirt. Evidently ANY dirt inside or out results in a fee. It s completely up to them to decide if you get the fee. This is ridiculous! It s just a scam to get more money on top of the extra they charge for the Convenience of renting at the hotel. Then to top it off the car we got was dirty on the outside with FOOD spread around the inside. To avoid the FEE we cleaned the car. What a great SCAM rent dirty cars then charge people if they do not clean them up! We had the rudest bartender at the Beach Grill. He actually insulted my Fiance because she tried to get his attention from the girls he was flirting with. A total a ole.
Quaint little place. I have to go back when the temps drops because it was a warm when my sister and I went. The sliders are amazing! Nice place to meet a group of friends for a beer or 3.
This is the worst service I ve ever experienced. We go to get a simple tire rotation and balance and come out with a freshly placed nail or metal object in our tire. Simply because someone does not want to upgrade service does not mean we would not of become a repeat customer. So we get guys just sitting around our car you know the idgaf attitude. Claims that our tires will definitely explode with our children inside if we do not upgrade. Meanwhile we go down the street to our everyday technicians to take out this object. No problem! Your tires are not going to explode etc Working hard very nice professional. No negative salesman gibber jabber. RYAN I just want to thank you for the sloppy work your team did by leaving indents from the screw driver you used the jam the metal object into our tire lol thank you for reminding us why it s just not worth trying new places sometimes.
Went in here today to get a tattoo I ve been waiting forever to get. An Anchor tattoo because I finally got my captains license and so this tattoo was really important to me and I was super stoked to get it. It was also really important that it be perfect exactly how I wanted it and done by someone who had the tattoo style I like. So I went in talked to Emilliano who is the manager and the best artist they have. I loved his portfolio. I asked him if he would do my tattoo for me and he said yes as long as it was in the next few hours because he had something at 2pm. I left my ID in my hotel room so I got my pricing 475 let them make copies of part of my ID and I said ok I m going to Aria to get my birth certificate I ll be right back. They said ok. Nobody asked me for a deposit. Nobody told me that I did not have an official appointment. So I go to Aria get my stuff and come back 20 min later. The girl at the front desk says oh hey Hun would you mind if Travis does your tattoo? Or Nathan? . I told her no I did not want them that s why I asked Emilliano to do it. Not that they are not good artists but they re not as good as he is period and their tattoo style is not what I m into. This is the most important tattoo on my body I wanted it to be perfect. She then explains to me that while I was gone some guy came in and asked Emilliano to do a huge piece for him and so because mine was only a measly 500.00 he scheduled this guy in my time slot and passed me off to Travis. She asked me if I could come tomorrow. I m leaving tonight so that would be impossible. I asked if he could please do the other people later and they said no they want my time slot. The girl felt bad and kept apologizing because she knew it was wrong of him to do that and ruin my tattoo but no apology from Emiliano he did not give a damn in the first place obviously and even when I was super upset like almost in tears he never said a word to me just avoided eye contact and waited on his new higher paying customer. I asked the people if they could reschedule since they stole my appointment and they said no. Terrible customer service zero integrity zero aloha. You guys suck. Thankfully I found a much better artist Bob Simmons of Pussykat tattoo who s now doing my tattoo for almost 200 cheaper as he works at a real shop not an overpriced tourist attraction. Thanks a lot Emiliano ! Since you are the management there I think it s safe to say your whole shop is effed.
This was the worst experience we have had at the groomers. We just moved here from Chicago and never had a problem back at home. It was our first time at this petsmart to get my dog s nails grinded and they got mad and frustrated with him because he was terrified. I do NOT recommend this location.
Is there a rating lower than one star? They had issues when it used to be Danny s but now it s 10 times worse. Came here to get a car wash today full service and waited and waited and waited and everybody was hanging out around the computer chitchatting nobody would come take my car wash order and when I went inside they could not even find a manager. What a waste of time this place is.
I just transferred to this practice and the wait times are insufferable. 10 minutes is reasonable but 3 4 times I ve been its been 30 minutes. Good luck with these wait times when you re waiting with kids!
Am sitting here listening to one of my favorite bands in the world sister hazel and hating it because majestics sound system SUCKS! It is downright terrible! If I were a band I would not touch this place with a 10 foot pole. Never again.
This is definitely not the place to go if you d like to sell some gold jewelry for a bit of extra cash. We were offered 2000 and bargained up to 2300 for a small lot of jewelry we wanted to get rid of. Thankfully we were smart enough to get a second opinion or two because what we found was pretty surprising. We were offered 3100 and then 3700 and two different pawn shops for the exact same lot with no bargaining that Mr. Fish wanted to generously offer us 2000 for. Quite a surprise based on the other reviews we d read on here and especially considering what Mr. Fish said as we were leaving and I quote You wo not find a better deal elsewhere. I guess we did Mr. Fish. At a pawn shop.
You get what you pay for. I always feel rushed and like I m bothering them. They usually always forget something. I have a had a few nice people but for the most part not really. Just disappointing because I potentially love Wendy s. And if other fast food joints can make great experiences why ca not they?
Long line up and making the food is really. I ordered 2 coffees which takes me 25 mins and counting .... I do not recommend this place. Same food quality but not worth the wait
Crudo...the name says it all. From the service attitude and raw food we received this restaurant wo not be seeing me or any of my friends again! First when the reservations were made we let the restaurant know we were celebrating a birthday with family from out of town and that there was an allergy. The host nor the server ever threw out a happy birthday thank you for celebrating your birthday with us that night which is not only rude but careless as well. When there are notes on a reservation call me crazy but the restaurant should be reading them. Failure to do so means they do not give a shit about their customers they are not paying attention to details and their customer service sucks. My brother ordered a pasta with braised hen. There was a neck bone and another miscellaneous bone in there which he ended up chipping a tooth with. At this point we were not upset. He just wanted to let the server know so she may inform the kitchen so they can check other dishes coming out for other guests. Her response was so appalling that this is where it turned south for all of us. She not only gave us a shit face but she also said well that s normal. We use fresh chicken and shred the meat here. No fucking way!!! Fresh meat?!!! This whole time I was expecting for you to serve me decaying rotten meat. Thank goodness for fresh meat! Listen I m an Executive Sous Chef and I think I know a thing or two about food. Food is not supposed to have bones in them unless you are serving a bone in piece of chicken or meat. End of story. Just admit you re wrong apologize and offer the guest a chance for the restaurant to fix it. But you d think she d stop there...absolutely not! She gave my brother attitude after he explained he just wanted to let her know so she can let the kitchen know and they can check all other dishes. After this she still looked stupefied and kept making excuses and made him feel like he was wrong with a how dare you question me attitude. I wish I would ve gotten her name but she is blonde tall and obviously arrogant server that was working this past Friday evening. Moreover the entire table did the tasting menu and one of my sister s dishes she chose was the butterfish. I chose the same dish but they came out at different times due to the other items we each chose. Mine came out first and it was delicious. When hers came out it looked perfect until she cut into it. I know the restaurant s name is Crudo which means raw in Spanish however this dish was supposed to be cooked. The fish was seared and the entire inside was raw. My sister cut it in 4 pieces to make sure it was inedible before we said something. We let another server know because we could not find ours for a good 5 minutes. The one that came over was very apologetic and when she saw the fish she said oh wow yea that s very raw. I m so sorry about this. She took the plate and the rest of the table finished their courses by the time hers came. When her food arrived it was the same piece of fish she received earlier in 4 chunks. Really? They could not give her a new piece and cook it correctly? By this point I would not expect anything less. Anyone that actually knows what they re doing knows that cooking a piece of fish whole is not the same as cooking 4 chunks of fish. By doing this the fish was overcooked and dry. It lost all the moisture and was dryer than the Sonoran desert. It was awful. Clearly they do not have a chef back there in the kitchen and only wannabes that think they re chefs just because they watch Food Network or Cooking Channel and now think they are Michelin star chefs. A chef would never sacrifice the integrity of the fish and take short cuts like they did by cooking the same piece of fish in 4 chunks which looked more like fish tacos to me. When my sister mentioned this to our server what do you think happened? The attitude came out once again! This lady is clearly in the wrong business. She should be working behind a toll both where no one needs to see her nasty face or hear her rude comments. We finally get the bill and instead of her shutting up and not saying anything she gives us a snarky apology. She was sarcastic and rolled her eyes about the fish. Exactly like when your mom tells you to apologize to someone and you do not mean it and just say it. She seemed like she was clearly annoyed and had a better place to be. She obviously was not sorry because when my siblings told her something was wrong she acted doubtful and defended her lame excuses. But then at the end she comes and apologizes which was not sincere at all. She clearly knew it was time for the bill and her tip was resting on her piss poor attitude and service. The food at this restaurant was not that bad with the exception of the bones in the food and raw fish that was served I d actually say it was about a 3. However with the lack of service and attitude from the server I d give this restaurant a negative 2!
Great shop on 43rd avenue to visit. A lot of donuts all the time and more than those as well. They have smoothies and other foods as well. Cool place to visit.
The check out service at this place is the slowest and most inefficient I ve ever seen! Their register counters are so short that you barely have any room to put your things and the end tail of it also did not have enough room. If people decided to buy a ton of things the cashier would need to keep walking around the counter to put the bags in the customers cart! The place is no seafood city but it s a good neighborhood market to buy meats fishes and groceries. Mostly Filipino brands but there are others mixed in there too like Japanese and Chinese. Some of the veggies do not look fresh anymore. Also random observation ... The workers are dressed in regular clothes some even looked like they were about to hangout with their friends so they almost look like they re just shopping and being nice that s why they re restocking the wall. Other places make you wear a uniform or at least an apron or a name tag or something where you can clearly distinguish that they work there in case you have to ask a question. They have to remember not all their consumers are filipino. They need to able to easily find someone they can ask.
Worst service ever was yelled at by the head cook when we asked if take out was available because he was too busy and its not worth his time for a small order. His words. Avoid this place much better options Mariachi on Yonge street 2 mins away. Playa Cabana downtown.
One positive the bartender was on top of it. That is where the positive experience ends. My group was here in the restaurant to eat some food and not watch the fight thus got a table away from all the TVs. They still charged a 10 cover even though there was maybe 10 minutes left in the fight when arrived and no clear view of the TV. 7.50 pitchers we found were 14 after the pour. Could not get a waitress to serve us food. The lady who collected the 10 had a smart and vindictive response to everything. Bathrooms smell horrible. Maybe the worst experience on Blue Diamond? Maybe this place has a better and friendlier wait staff at non peak times? Would not recommend to anyone who wants a cheap drink and good atmosphere. Glen Take things personal much? How about not mocking customers and be situational with it? If one person asked if there was a problem at the time that would go a long way towards displaying good customer service. Just saying.
I wanted to rate them zero stars but I guess there s no way to do that. This company is super unethical lol... Took my dry cleaning to them and they stole one of my tops which was almost 150 because it was blinged out from bebe. The owner gave me an attitude treated me like crap in front of everyone and wanted ti compensate me 15 lol. Please do not go there!!!! Unless you want to get robbed.
Leaving this church today I feel extremely disappointed. It was my first time here and I do not know why it is so highly recommended because this place is far from a community church. The second the paster came on the stage he demanded that the church give 10 of their income whilst a giant camera sweeps overhead and fog machines shoot smoke into the crowd. It seems to me like this church likes to put on big productions clearly this does not come cheap. If this church was running out of a high school like the church I previously attended I would have no problem whipping out my wallet but this was over the top. Do the people really need to feel like they are at a rave to get the message of God? I do not think so. Also the pastor Luke I believe... Well there was more than one time he told everyone to direct their attention to him he even told a woman to take her baby out of the church as it was interrupting the Holy Spirit lol. Never in my life have I ever heard someone say to a mother that she had to leave with her baby. Especially when earlier in the sermon he spoke on how abortion is so horrible and how God has a plan for everyone even before they are born! He also spoke on everyone being a child of God and how Jesus returned dignity to a prostitute when others tried to condemn her... That brings me to my next point. There was a woman shouting who was clearly troubled and possibly on drugs. He demanded the usher remove her immediately as she was a distraction well I m sure Jesus would do the same.... Not really. Bottom line this church is full of smoke and mirrors quite literally. The pastor is more concerned with his ego and everyone paying attention to him than he is concerned with the people actually attending and what they are going through. Glory should be given to God not to a church or its pastor. For me I like a small family like community church that is more geared towards people and how the word relates to their everyday life. I like listening to humble people who articulate well and have a caring Christ like demeanor. This is absolutely not that place. When he told a woman to not bring her baby in the church and to leave and that her baby was ruining what he was trying to say.... That was it for me. God spoke to me and told me to run! Far away from that church. How rude? Babies are beautiful and are also God s children and a mother who does not want to just drop her child off at a nursery with people she really does not know I do not blame her! Fussy babies will always be a part of church. No need to blame the mother that does not leave her new born out of sight and who still managed to make it to church with no sleep. You go mama! That pastor tried to embarrass her in front of everyone and have his ushers escort her out.... This church should be called dream crush city church. With all that money they should hire someone who is kind to all and can actually lead as example to be Christ like. Also I usually do not give negative reviews but this really pissed me off. My faith is so important to me and I just believe no one should preach God s word who ca not practice what they preach!
I would give it a zero star if I could. The waitress who greeted us was nice. Once we were seated we waited a long time for our food. The waitress never asked if we needed anything. Just dropped the food off and kept moving. Finally there was a piece of hair so long and thick that it seemed it was put there purposely. I m so appalled and upset. I will never visit this establishment again. Totally unacceptable.
Disappointing. Ordered the flavor of the day Mint Oreo. Asked for extra Oreos. I think there was only one Oreo in the whole thing...
Do not bother...that is 30 I ll never get back! Worst food hockey pucks for burgers dry pulled pork way over priced seriously 11 for a BLT salad! No kids menu ran out of almost anything we tried to order that should have been a sign to run! and charged for refills iced tea and pop... 2.75 each...seriously . I will never go here again and do not bother wasting your time or money. Incredible disappointment.
I did not really enjoy this place as much as I though I would menu was a bit bleh..or maybe it.just was not my day.
I ve been to the several shows at the Marquee. The majority of the staff are fine. I even pity those who have to pick up the ridiculous amount of trash in and around the venue after the show. Not too many complaints about the actual shows. The sound quality is good enough and the AC seems to be fully functional hence the two stars. Last night I witnessed some despicable behavior displayed by some members of the security team towards fans waiting harmlessly outside the venue to meet the band. Since I ve been here before I know that the security typically creates ridiculous lies to deter fans from waiting...obviously because they want to leave work early. Instead of respectfully asking fans to leave the security threatened to call the cops...seriously? I also heard from others about the misogynist inappropriate comments yelled at them. Hopefully the Marquee considers hiring staff who can at least communicate and act in a more respectable manner. Pretty sure at least half of the security team is composed of ex convicts. It s truly a shame that many of my favorite artists play here. Maybe I ll have to reconsider returning?
Not a very friendly customer service vibe. Something s missing at this location. It s too bad because it s really in a convenient spot
The service here is pretty bad we were seated and waited about 15 20 minutes before we had to flag someone down to find our waiter. Then a waitress just took our table because apparently our table was unassigned? We had ordered the pizza while waiting for our table and it came out tasting like it had been sitting in the back for awhile. We also had two toddlers getting cranky in the booth with us. My husband had to take our daughter outside as we waited another 20 minutes for the bill and a box. Our second toddler started crying and then the waitress came. Overall it was a pain in butt for food that was not even good.
Came here for the first time. A Filipino Asian Dentist came in looked at my teeth and did not introduce herself. Came back in I asked a few questions then she left without saying anything. I was all confused if we re done LOL it s funny coz before I even said anything to my husband he told me the exact same way I was treated. Bottom line I thought the dentist was very unprofessional. She did not have to be friendly but I do not think not interacting with me like a normal person is just not right. I do not think I was treated right that s all. The assistant was very nice though. I feel the dentist was in over her head but whatever. Definitely not going back there. Way to go
I would like to start this review by saying that I regret the purchase I made in October 2013 7 months ago every day that I am driving in my 2013 Nissan Altima. I am not a super skilled car shopper but I know when I have been taken advantage of and with my experience at Pinnacle Nissan I was certainly taken advantage of. It started with me being stuck at the dealership for 4 hours before I even sat down with the finance dept. Not only did I end up paying 5000 over the list price due to dealership fees getting it used certified and purchasing the extended warranty.. But even after all the headache they did not honor the deal we made prior to the purchase. I told them I wanted the car detailed and the windows tinted. After my 5 hour purchase I walk out to drive my new car home and the windows were not tinted nor was it washed and detailed. I asked why during all this time was it not at least cleaned and they said I can make an appt to have it cleaned I live 45 minutes away . I was told multiple times that they will make changes necessary to make me love my new car after all when buying a used certified vehicle it is supposed to be like new . While driving it home that day I go to turn up the radio to hear the sound in my car.. All I heard was an intense rattling from the back speakers. Turns out they sold me a car with a blown speaker. I called immediately to inform them of my find. It was a fight to get them to fix it without my extended warranty being activated yet. I also noticed there were not any floor mats throughout the vehicle. After 3 separate visits and two months down the road the speaker was fixed car was detailed and windows were tinted.. But floor mats were out of the question. I wish that was the end of my review.. After only a month or so of driving my like new vehicle I had squeaking brakes rotors that will need to be replaced soon and the car makes a deep rumbling sound when I accelerate that vibrates the inside of the car. When I originally brought the car in I was told by Angela in the service dept. that some cars make noise and just have quirks. Almost turning purple in fury I told them It is not only annoying to hear loud noises come out of my new car but something is not right. I was told I would have to wait for my warranty to activate to get more man power on it. 7 months later I have yet to know why my car sounds like a helicopter. I spent waaay more than the car is worth and I hate the experience I ve had with the purchasing of my car. This review is just the first of many I plan on writing for Pinnacle Nissan until they are able to prove otherwise. My hope is that this review deters others from shopping Pinnacle Nissan and maybe even Nissan in general. Please save yourself the money and headache. The only reason there is 1 star is because my post would not go through without at least one.
Ive gone this store several times and become more and more weary lately as it seems the prices selectively get higher and higher each time. Owner is charging 21 to send about 10 pages of paper certified mail and says UPS prices would be even higher... This is normal shipping not rush or anything. Friend called post office and its around 4 through them for same service. Sent a package with him sept 8th explaining that it was a very important package which contents had already been lost once in the mail... Made sure to get tracking yet the package never shows as going outbound out of the store. He shipped USPS and shows scanned in but never shipped. USPS shows no packages ever received from their store and he is saying because we didnt choose UPS which was more than the ridiculous prices he was already charging. If you like to waste money and have your packages lost in the mail... Go ahead here. Otherwise theres a post office in Albertsons across the street.
Customer service was excellent. Food was subpar. Boba was watered down Ramen was the instant kind my poki bowl was slimy tasting.
Poor quality. The wheels still had brake dust on them there was a wet rag laying on the seat I assume this was so I can clean the wheels my self. Very low quality. Do my recommend. If you sit inside do not expect them to tell you your car is done. They will just park it and wait until you come looking for it.
i was really excited about going to Vivace. Unfortunately the terms Big and Britches come to mind when I think about the restaurant overall. Seems like the early buzz has gone to the head of some of the staff. In particular the hostess I think she was the lead was downright rude. We were seated at a table that had a plush bench seat. It looked comfortable but when I sat down the bench rocked. When I reached for my water glass my chair rocked. I asked the very nice woman who showed us to our table if we could move. The lead gal was summoned and was incredibly patronized claiming that yes indeed they designed the chairs to rock. Seriously? Rocking chairs in a fine dining restaurant. This is not Cracker Barrel! After some more chatting she very reluctantly moved us. Our waiter was fantastic and suggested a great Italian wine that the pinot noir lovers at the table adored. Sad to say the food was just ok...my entree of triggerfish and crab ravioli did not have much flavor and I could not detect a speck of crab in my ravioli. We loved the meat and cheese board appetizer but had to ask for bread. My husband s veal salimbucca was very salty. The pasta dishes were good but then who ca not make a decent pasta ? Gelato servings were generous but I m doubting this was homemade...just not enough butter fat content. At least our meals were not outrageously priced. But given the snotty gal hostess and the mediocre flavors we ll go elsewhere on date night next month.
Your review helps others learn about great local businesses.this hotel is miserable it took them 4 days to sort out the ac issues. Our room was over 85 degrees 4 days running and then they thought a fruit tray was an adequate solution. I got stuck in an elevator as it has inadequate elevators and people crowd them. Nice location and that s it
Honestly the food here is pretty good. However given my overall experience I d have to give this place around a 2.5. We had the beef tataki gai lan gomaae salt and sansho pepper grilled pork cheek corn kakiage ika maruyaki saba miso ni chicken nanban anchovy potato salad and chips braised pork ribs and taro ice cream between 5 adults and 1 toddler. Something like that. We were not particularly hungry so we decided we d start with that and order more if necessary. A large part of how I determine how many stars to give a place is based on how satisfied I was upon leaving. For restaurants this takes into account things like value taste portion to price ratio service ambiance etc. with the bulk of it being placed on those first two. The ambiance here was fine but I found the value and the service lacking. For the price of the dishes I listed above I was expecting quite a bit more food. For example the corn kakiage was 7.5 and had two flat pieces about the size of the bottom of a mug. There were no garnishes and I did not see any salt that it was supposed to be served with unless they just sprinkled salt on it and decided to include it in the menu description. That s 7.50 for what is essentially two corn fritters. Corn is cheap. I was also expecting the food to come significantly more rapidly than it did. The service was friendly but most of our dishes came one at a time and we d finish rather quickly because the dish was so small and then have to wait at least a few minutes before the next one came. I do not mind that so much if we re doing a menu with multiple courses but if I m at an izakaya style place I do not want to sit there for an hour waiting for my mains to come. Our toddler was the epitome of hangry. Her parents asked for the rice in one of our small teishoku meals to be given to us first so she d have something to eat. The toddler had the entire bowl of rice then had bites of most of our other dishes saying she wanted more after each one and us finding that there was no more food on the table and then finally got the miso soup and main that came with her rice. Flavor wise everything was average and above. The beef tataki was tasty but a tad chewy. The gai lan gomaae had a really delicious sauce. The pork cheek was flavorful and surprisingly crispy in a pleasant way. The corn kakiage was incredibly delicious and one of highlights of the night. The ika maruyaki was prettily presented but not particularly tender and a tad salty. The saba miso ni was not bad but not particularly noteworthy and when they say small teishoku they re not kidding. The saba was served on a plate approximately the size of a coaster. The chicken nanban was not particularly special although I quite enjoyed the pickled veggies on the side. The anchovy potato salad was tasty but I did not taste the anchovies. I find that dish interesting because taro chips potato salad starch on starch. The pork ribs were incredibly tender but flavor wise I ve already forgotten about them. The mustard sauce that was on the plate was good at cutting some of the richness of the ribs though. My favorite bite of the night was the Japanese toast under the taro ice cream. The entire dish was tasty but that toast was fried to perfection and the crispy oily toast worked wonderfully with the ice cream. After 15 tip I paid almost 24 for my meal we divided by 5 . I had parts of every dish we ordered but somewhere between a bite and two bites for the most part of each dish and some bites were not very large bites. Because of the portions and the time it took for each dish to come out I actually left just about as hungry as I went in. Should there be a next time I think I m going to order the ramen because I ve heard it s good and then just call it a day.
Horrible service.....made dinner reservation and the sent us to bar area with kids after specifically asking for celebrating birthday dinner with girlfriend
We purchased a RV at their big sale in February. We were traveling thru AZ so read reviews about LaMesa RV. We have been very disappointed in many ways since our purchase. We were promised our 5th wheel to be ready by 3 p.m. on sighing of final papers. It was not ready until after 5 and when it was it still was not fixed properly. It was 5 o clock on Friday so the entire service department left for the weekend. Now we are trying to get our license plates and it was titled in AZ and we live in SD. We have emailed and called the business department and still no return call. At this point I would never recommend LaMesa RV to anyone. Seems they take you money and then you are not an important customer anymore. A very dissatisfied customer. Vickie G from SD.
The view and open air earns the two star rating. Honestly they just opened and if you want a beer or something simple you re fine but nothing remotely fancy. It was dead and we were escorted out of the casual patio seating because it s for 6 or more people even though 0 of the seats were taken then only about 10 of the menu is available. The hard liquor is served over small ice cubes which waters it down the helpfulness of the staff I was even willing to get the drink a martini downstairs and walk it up the 3 simple but flights of stairs myself two stars was nice they ve got Some work to do!
Be careful renting from Reilly. There properties look good but tend to have serious underlying infrastructure problems. I will not get into details but after being s tenant for several years the ceiling in MBR collapsed in a storm. When I expressed safety concerns to a principal who came to my home and banged on the door in an intoxicated state in the middle of the night I was verbally threatened and seemingly almost physically harmed. My young son witnessed this and developed severe anxiety. They proceeded to handle everything that followed in the least ethical ways possible. I would never rent from them. They also charge above market and their promised regular proactive maintenance is a total sham I am happy to share texts and a police report that fully support my story
Conveniently located on the way in to the movie theater my mom and I popped in here for a snack to smuggle in to the movie. Nothing makes my mom happier than a good bakery but actually nothing here looked great to me. Perhaps it was the time of day? I think we stopped in at about 7pm. I settled on a big chocolate chip cookie that was WAY too sweet. Like inedible. My mom loved her danish thing that she ate the next morning though. And service was very friendly.
The pregame buffet meal was good. Definitely not 5 star quality but better food than what you get on the club level here. As others have written in reviews here there are temperature issues in the food at the ballpark level along with items running out and not replenished. I also would have hoped for more drink options in the cooler than coke diet coke and bottled water. For a cold afternoon they did have plenty of coffee and hot chocolate to warm is up. My wife also noticed the restroom here was not as clean and maintained as the club level upstairs.
Very nice staff clean space but damn is it slow. I ve visited and tried around 4 different smoothies and juices they ve a all tasted rad but at 7 8 bucks a piece I feel like I need to take out a small loan to make this a regular thing. I would suggest to the owners to visit to chop shop an take notes. Pre portioned containers of each offered beverage an just add ice. An boom you do not have my hot body crowding up your store for the 20 minutes I wait for what should be a 5 6minute process.
During our first visit the host was snotty and acted more like a bouncer. When he called my name to be seated he would not let the rest of my small group follow me to our table. Then our waiter did not know the drink menu and asked that WE go to the bar to find out. Our waters arrived in glasses that were warm and cracked not once but twice after explaining the issue. Getting service took forever too and nothing was comp ed. No managerial attention and staff was incompetent. The next visit to the store the owner ridiculed me for my selection of beers while at the register. And what is it with him showing off his flashy cars to his patrons? This place rubs me the wrong way. Needless to say we wo not be returning.
My family and I were extremely disappointed with the service. We were told it would be a 15 minute wait but it turned out to be about 45. Additionally we had multiple aspects of our order ignored which were corrected only after engaging the manager after at least 15 minutes we had to get up and ask somone for help because our server was M.I.A. . The manager staff offered absolutely no apologies. I would never eat here again solely on account of the poor service.
We bought almost all of our furniture for our new house from here living room dining room and two bedrooms. The prices are pretty good compared to other places and they have some good looking stuff. However do not fall for the expensive warranty that they try to sell you. The sales guy made it seem like it covered almost anything under the sun but when it came time to use the warranty I found out that that was not the case. I had all four recliner handles break at pretty much the same time. They are held by some flimsy wire that was bound to break eventually even with the best of care. Also I had two dining room chairs with bent broken legs. We have to tighten the legs on all of the chairs with an allen wrench constantly. Anyway the sales guy said that the warranty covered so much stuff even said that we could take a knife and stick it through the couch to make a big gash in order to get a new sofa. That s how good he said the warranty was. Well when I called to make claims for my couch and chairs they said that none of what had happened was covered. They would not even send anyone out to look at it. The rep at the warranty place said that she would call the manager at this store to see what they could do for me but I never received a call from the store. That was probably a year ago. So I spent over 200 for a worthless 5 year warranty. Do not fall into the same trap I did skip the warranty.
I m from Idaho and I bought a car in Phoenix. I bought the car sight unseen but had a friend that lives just down the road from A Tac take the car in for me to have it looked over. They changed the oil and replaced my brake pads rotors a caliper master cylinder and a brake line. They said everything else checked out fine. This was all before I flew to Mesa to pick it up. So I get to AZ on a Friday and Have to be back on Sunday night. I had just started a job and had not accumulated any vacation days. First things first the battery was completely shot. Apparently A tac does not test batteries when they inspect cars. Had to jump it to even drive it to the gas station and then had a new one put it.. Then I did not even make it to the gas station. The brakes started locking up after a block of driving. So A tac had to have it towed back to their shop for further diagnosis. After 24 hours they decided that I needed a new proportioning valve and while they did an amazing job of getting a hard to find part for an aging car i had to leave a day late. So I left on Sunday knowing that I had to make it 1 000 miles in one shot hoping they had fixed the problem. 600 miles later my brakes are boiling in the middle of nowhere and I m stranded. After a couple of hours of limping and having to stop every time my brakes locked up I finally figured out that my brake booster was bad. So I drove to Salt Lake with no boosted brakes and stayed the night with a friend. I limped the rest of the way home the next day. Needless to say I was late for my new job and now I m in the whole big time with sick leave. I get the brake booster replaced and have no more problems whatsoever with the brakes locking up but I m still out the money I payed for the part that did not need to be replaced. Then a month later I m driving my regular 25 mile commute to work and my brake light comes on. When I get to work I notice PUDDLES of brake fluid. The caliper A Tac replaced failed and so did the brake cylinder on one of the back brakes. So I have to fork out another 200 bucks to have that fixed back here in Idaho. The car is still in the shop!!! While I was impressed with A Tacs customer service and willingness to help they are paying for the new caliper they still cost me hundreds of needless dollars and hours of sick leave at work. Not to mention the headaches. A tac has good customer service but in my opinion their technicians are clueless and their parts are trash.
Wow. Ca not believe I have to downgrade from 5 stars to 1. Everything about my last visit was very uncomfortable but the cherry on top was the PORTIONS. They were running out of so many dishes but we did not think anything of it. When they brought out our food it was like there were legitimately 6 or 7 pieces of rigatoni in my friend s bowl and maybe 2 or 3 more in mine. 2 people in my party ordered the shrimp spaghetti and one got less than the other. Very unacceptable for any restaurant especially one on the strip and at this price point. The server made it awkward by telling me it s always like this . No it is not . This was probably my FIFTH time dining at Giada and I ve never had such bad service and little food. Needless to say none of us will be returning.
My car is fairly a year old and I only needed a basic lube and oil when they were all done. They found a few issues with the car like needed new tires filters belts whatever they can find. Plus the service lady was very rude and ugly. I told the service lady I believe there is nothing wrong with my car. So I take my car to another dealership and they find absolutely NO problem! They even told me my car is still brand new and there is no issues with the car. So I call Tempe Dodge service department about what happened and of coarse they re standing behind there service people. So I totally do not recommend these douches unless you want them to be rude to you lied to and have a laundry list of issues. These people do not deserve any stars and need to be looked at by the BBB!
Sadly TSInn has fallen in quality about as far as it possibly could. Do not bother anymore unfortunately.
Wo not shop here again. Its not worth the bad service the bad smells and the generally unclean feeling you get in this place. Here s the final straw Adonis down the street was out of fresh not frozen mackerel so I went to Sheng Tai which also has a wide fish selection even if its self serve and most of the fish is frozen and you have to pay extra to have it cleaned. After walking through the Sheng Tai produce department which smelled like rotten meat I picked up my frozen mackerel a watermelon and two boxes of blueberries which were on sale and got in one of the very long lines at the checkout. When I finally got to the cash the bill came to 8.85. I had no cash and wanted to pay by debit but I was told that there was a 10 minimum. I said that if they enforced that rule I would either have to go pick something else out and make the people now assembled behind me wait or I would then have to go and come back and wait for another ten minutes so could not she just bend the rules. She said no. I pleaded with her some more but she refused. I just left the fish and fruit there and took off back to Adonis where the workers are helpful and polite where the place is odor free and clean and the friendly fish guys will gut your fish for free.
This was my first visit at Fist of Fusion. I was running late for work. Decided to try them out. I placed an order over the phone. I arrived about 10 mins later. My order was ready within 5 mins of my arrival. I ordered a Notorious RIB taco 2.99 an Island mango chicken taco 2.99 and a Mixed plate 9.99 my choice of protein was Notorious RIB x2 1 per serving 2 scoops rice stir fry vegetables and salad for my 2 sides. Overall order with tax was 19.43. The chicken was good by itself. If I have to come back I ll order just plain chicken with just the mango avocado salsa. The beef short ribs were too sweet for me. I would have liked it to be a bit less sweet. I could not put enough lemon to kill the sweet taste. Then again it is Hawaiian. duh! The stir fry vegetables were mostly onions and red peppers and came with 1 slice of green zucchini and 1 slice of yellow zucchini. They forgot to add the kimchi salsa on my Notorious RIB bowl. Yes this place is good to hang out and chill. I m glad I tried this place out before I took my family and friends here. When I m hungry and it s convenient I ll come back for another try.
Lets start with the good. The bed was comfortable our view was good and the pool was nice because it wasnt overly crowded. Now lets get to the bad. First of all....its Trump and its Vegas so the expectations were understandably high. Instead we got a hotel off the strip with no casino. THATS crazy. Second...there are absolutely no bells or whistles here. You basically get a room which is moderately surface cleaned but pales in comparison to the Trump in Chicago. Little things like dusty shampoo bottles and mystery spots on the towels were surprising. We had a leak in our room which created a big wet spot on the rug. There was no mini bar no alarm clock no turn down service and they forgot to clean our room once during our stay. One would think because theres no casino and no entertainment at the hotel that at the very least guests staying here could enjoy the spa. And they can. For 12.00 a day. Seriously? ? Guests have to pay for basic use of the spa?? Theres no buffet so we had to either pay 80.00 for two breakfasts or walk over to the Wynn for their awesome buffet. The gift shop is lame full of cheesey Trump stuff thats also over priced. Next time...its Ceasars Palace or the Wynn for us. This place doesnt care about its guests or its reputation. Its trying to get by on its name. That will get it a first time customer but not a repeat customer.
This is a sad day. I have eaten my last meal at New York s Best Italian. This has been my go to place for years and it WAS an outstanding restaurant. The New owner new chief new menu have destroyed an iconic restaurant. I will not be back!
I had great hopes for this place but was disappointed. When I go in to a diner type place for the first time I either choose the nost basic breakfast or an apparent specialty of the house. This place has as bare a breakfast menu as I have seen. That in itself is not a problem but the basics must be done very well consistently to meet the standard. My favorite local breakfast joint takes that approach and succeeds well enough that I do not want to tell anybody about lest they become too crowded or change. Jim and Lou Lou has that potential but are not there. I had bacon and eggs it does not get any more basic than that. The breakfast came with home fries. At first glade ther was a lot to like about what I saw. Healthy portions or should I say unhealthy portions? Maybe I will change that phrase to abundant portions for today s health conscious society. The bacon was thick and prepared properly. It had a nice bite and a flavor that was porkier than typical. The did not fail in the one area that weakness is so common. The wheat bread was actually good. The potatoes were tender and tasty. All that is good right? Unfortunately a diner must be able to cook eggs. My over easy eggs were not. I ca not be sure since the kitchen is not visible but I would guess that the eggs were basted or worse yet just blinded. All were over cooked some completely inedible. If you run a diner you ve got to know that over easy people like the yellow rivers and gently cooked whites. If you screw one up throw it away. If you serve it we will either not eat it or eat it a not like it. Either way it makes us less likely to return. With so many good things I am surprised that my inclination is to write this place off.
The pasta is really good but the customer service is terrible. The girl at the cash actively ignored me for almost two minutes to talk to another coworker about a guy she just saw. Made me feel very uncomfortable. Lasagna and manicotti is fantastic though!
We were so excited to try this place. We ordered three burritos one was served ice cold and the other two had hardly any meat and it was not the meat we ordered. Totally disappointed and felt like we just wasted money.
I ve been here before and the pizza was fine but last Friday I bought a pie that was burnt on the bottom and seriously lacking sauce and cheese. I was hugely disappointed. What s worse is that I listed a complaint on the company website the very next day and never got a response back. Nothing worse than bad customer service AND an inconsistent product. Usually I say support local but I would give this place a pass.
Well the crooks down at Sonoran are still hard at work screwing hard working people. Its time everyone single person who has had a negative run in with these guys file a conplaint with BBB and make sure to leave some kind words on their website. After all....they like to say they have a stellar record on ebay.....from people they buy parts from. Companies like make it difficult for anyone to trust the small guy dealership.
If you ever need anything fixed DO NOT go to Jonathan in the main office he is TERRIBLE!!!!!! ever since ty left the front office staff has gone to shit. Our dryer was not working so we set up a maintenance request with good old Jonathan and he asked us what was wrong with it and what not and told us they were a little short handed that day but they would fix it that day or the next ok no problem.. Then a few days go by still no dryer fixed my girlfriend goes down to the office to ask about it and another woman says that you must be on the list they will get to you. Now over a week goes by still no one.. I call yesterday and speak to a nice woman named Brie who informs us that the reason our dryer has not been fixed is that there was never a request put in!!!!! Great so why was Jonathan asking us all these questions about the dryer and telling us it would be fixed who knows!!! Because he never did anything!!! Absolutely awful ca not wait to move out of this place but first get my dryer fixed so I can have some clean underwear...
The pictures are very misleading and only show the smaller new section. They only want things to look good on paper for state audit. They have been keeping their staff short with a 25 1 patient aide ratio. They are cheap on supplies and only care about your business.
Was not at all impressed and when it comes to restaurants I m pretty easy going. The first turnoff was a constant snorting sound maybe clearing phlegm?? that I kept hearing. I thought it might have been a patron but soon realized it was the employee that refills the drinks busboy. It was constant and lasted throughout our stay. I m surprised they would allow their employee to walk around like this at this type of restaurant. Now our waitress...she seemed very unfamiliar with the menu even though it was only one page. When she realized we were not ordering dessert she said really that s it? and had an attitude. The food...the bread was good but that s hard to mess up. I ordered the Classique Steak which was not tender at all and stringy when trying to cut. No bueno. The crab cake was very good as were the frites. Mac and cheese eh pretty decent I suppose. Bottom line this food and service was not at all worth the price! There are way too many great restaurants in Las Vegas to ever try this place again.
I ordered from to go before I read the reviews. I ordered the flank steak and it was the toughest and one of the most disgusting pieces of meat I have ever bit into. I also ordered the Asada tacos they were in a very close first with the Flank.
SAVE YOUR MONEY...Better to do a Dollar cinema and save 90 more bucks. Buffet was Shockingly BAD. Overcooked meatless mush. Every ride is 1 HOUR Wait. I drove for an hour with large family. Next time I ll do AZ AIR TIME !!
I usually love Cold Stone ice cream but after my last two visits I wo not be back to this location. A few months ago I went and my ice cream was so melted the guy could barely scoop the ice cream into a cup. I ca not believe I paid for that. Also later on that night I got pretty sick!! So anyways me and daughter decided to get ice cream tonight so I was going to give this location another chance the girl working acted so miserable you can tell she hates her job. My daughter wanted a smoothie and she basically rolled her eyes when I ordered it. We will go elsewhere for ice cream from now on.
I got a gel manicure and a pedicure. The pedicure was amazing and they really took the time on the massage but my gel manicure started to chip two days later. I called to get it redone and the lady that redid them just put more polish on top which completely changed the color. It also looked just really bad. I had to reschedule another appt and when I came in she told me that I was too early and it was at 4 pm not 130 but I KNOW I would not have agreed to 4 because I had another appt then. So I said to make ANOTHER appt at the same time I was there 1 30 . The next day I call at 1230 to make sure the appt was set and she tells me that my appointment was actually at 12. Are you freaking kidding me?! At that point I hung up and I basically paid 30 plus tip for nothing.
The other evening I saw someone eating a burrito on Mill Ave. and it looked pretty good so I inquired as to its origin and was directed to Hippies Cove. I continued on my way with a burrito in mind for another day. Today I got that burrito. Walking through the doors I felt rather awkward. There were no signs directing me where to place my order just a worker and two apparent patrons huddled silently together. As I made my way towards them patron 1 dispatched and quickly walked out the front door perhaps to secure the perimeter grumbling all the while. It was then that I was greeted by a pleasant woman who prompted me to give my order. As I glanced at the menu I suddenly became aware of patron 2 again who was making his best effort to look as menacing as he possibly could was it possible that I had interrupted some important negotiation? I found him humorous and concluded that he only posed a threat to my appetite for he smelled a bit. Reenter patron 1. Patron 1 apparently found the environment of the restaurant more suitable than the outdoors perhaps he was afraid of being picked up on an existing warrant. Upon receiving my burrito I bid the menace his counterpart and the pleasant woman farewell exited the building and returned to my car. Once home I devoured the burrito out of sheer hunger it was rather tasteless and I questioned the freshness of ingredients. Needless to say that while the burrito was not as rich as I d hoped the characters involved certainly were.
I got my windshield repaired with them and everything was fine until it chipped again a few weeks later. The warranty only covers chip repairs and if your chip is located close to the edge THEIR machines cannot reach it and the warranty is null and void!!! Since their machine is not capable of fixing a chip based on location they will not repair it. The warranty does not cover cracks. They charge almost 300 for NOTHING!!! If the chip spreads you have to purchase another windshield. Bad customer service as well! They do not care that they do not have machines adequate enough!
This is by far the worst carpet cleaning company in Las Vegas. They say they can give a quote over the phone. They quoted me at 60 for three rooms and a hall. Like everyone else has stated they came and did the spot check and said I needed the deep cleaning. So the price then jumped to 240. Who the hell pays 250 for a 2 bedroom apartment to be cleaned? They are ridiculous. So after I told them they could leave they ended up doing the deep clean for 140. But the main stains I wanted them to pay attention to were evident the next day. I called and complained and they have been saying they were going to send someone out to re do it for the past month. I really do not leave negative remarks usually but after a month with no recourse I am warning everyone to STAY AWAY from this sorry company. Please give some recommendations if you have them!
Not very happy with the service today. My husband and I came here today to eat and both were served cold food. We ordered mashed potatoes which were cold and I ordered crab cakes. Crab cakes were also cold so waitress warmed them up in the microwave. I mostly likely will not be returning to eat cold food.
Went to the lunch buffet here and everything was pretty forgettable. I agree with everything Carly said...except for the cute waiter part. No point in coming back here when there so many better Indian lunch buffets.
Great Indoors is really great if you just want to look. Fantastic selection of everything you could need and want in your home. Unfortunately that s where it ends. Their prices are far from great. I expect any brick and mortar store to have higher prices than online retailers but I have found their sale prices are still higher than what you can pay if you re willing to wait a few days and know what you want. And forget service. It s virtually nonexistent. Recently we have been in several times as we re updating a bathroom. I m pretty sure the bathroom will be outdated again before it s finished but that s another story. We asked for pricing on a mirror. Over 20 minutes later the sales guy returns stating he ca not find anyone who knows. No offer to take our number and get the info to us just sorry I do not know. Lighting? No better. I asked if a fixture on display as an uplight could be mounted as a downlight. The lady confidently replied no xenon lights have to be mounted up. Interesting since we later noticed the same fixture in a hanging model in an adjacent area. Not to mention their own website pictures the fixture as a downlight. Returns? Forget it. Said light fixture shorted sending sparks flying and melting the screws. When we went to return it there was some big issue made of the fact they need the box from the new fixture to send the bad one back. Okay would a bag be too much to ask for? Yes. My husband ended up assembling the new fixture at the counter. When he handed a blown bulb back to the lighting patrolman the guy remarked oh maybe that s why it shorted. Yes we all know that every time a light bulb blows you need a fire extinguisher nearby and an American Express card handy to replace the fixture. And if that s not enough to dissuade you we also purchased two different drawer pulls. The gal scanned them as two of the same item. When we went to return both it was a fiasco since they could not make the return on the one that was not scanned because their inventory would be wrong. Uh is not it wrong already? Would not the return actually correct the inventory? I ca not even imagine attempting to do a major project through this store. But how I love to look at all the pretty new ranges and showers. Even if I have to put up with my husband begging me to sit on a toilet and pose for a picture.
I m new in Toronto and recently visited to buy a coffee. I was the only client at about 8pm. The two baristas were talking about their boyfriend troubles. It took me 10 minutes to get their attention and get served. It is the nearest Starbucks to my home but I wo not be back.
Worst service by the staff. The place is busy and the staff is very rude and looks tired of their job. Food quantity is very less for the price we pay. Will never go again.
I lived there for a year and one month the staff was friendly but I think Cheswyck has a few bad policies. 1. They have a 2 MONTHS notice period rather than one month. 2. I gave my notice one month before my lease was up and for the next month they charged me 125 extra when I was perfectly willing to vacate the apartment by the end of the first month which I feel is really unreasonable. 3. They charged me 191 dollars for a could of bleach stains in the carpet but they had told me before that they will be RIPPING OFF THE CARPET and converting it to hardwood floors. That I found really distasteful. 4. Parking is a pain and if you every want to park your car after 9 00 PM get ready to park on the other side of the apartment complex. Overall not the best apartment complex I have lived in.
OK I love sandwiches. I was the kid who had the same Turkey Sandwich everyday for lunch growing up by choice because I love sandwiches. Now with that being said I live near Old Town which is lacking a good sandwich spot in my opinion. So when my girlfriend and I stumbled upon this place thanks to Yelp! we were excited. First of the place looks really cool. It looks like sharp and somewhere you would want to eat. It was a Sunday afternoon and we walked in around 2pm the place was relatively empty. After we looked through the cold case and the menu we walked up to the counter and waited.....and waited....and waited. There were 5 employees standing right in front of us really enjoying themselves until one finally realized we had been waiting to order. We ordered panini style turkey sandwiches paid and sat at the counter top bar. The food also took a while to come out. As we sat there we just watched the employees play on their phones make fun of each other hangout in the back and overall very unprofessional. When our 9 sandwiches finally arrived they were only OK. Nothing we could not have made at home with a 10 panini press from target some deli meat and bread. It gets two stars because of the restaurant decor and OK food. The staff kills this place they are loud unkept and unprofessional. I ll spend a few more dollars and go to many of the other great restaurants in Kierland.
I was a volunteer driver for two years for URRKN. They are a nonprofit 501c 3 organization run by Tina LaBlanc and her husband. I was very excited to be a member with all these cat lovers taking cats to their forever homes. Unfortunately there is a dark side to URRKN. Tina LaBlanc was asking members to donate to various causes that covered personal not URRKN related expenses for Tina and other Administrators only. From trips vacations car repairs and clothing to house upgrades. All members including management are volunteers and provide their time free of reimbursement. URRKN is not a rescue foster or other pet related organization. It is a transportation group only. Moving cats from point A to point B all free of charge. Any expenses for the cat is absorbed by the adopter and adoptee. It was also brought to my attention that transports were based on how big a donation you made to URRKN not the first come first serve basis we all thought. Some transports were taking up to 5 months to organize. Others in two weeks. Just recently a You Caring request for 3000 in funds was posted on the members page requesting donations to fix a administrators car. At this time no administrator is taking a salary or being reimbursed for expenses. I questioned these donations and was banned from commenting. I since realized that URRKN was violating 501c 3 nonprofit operation rules and found another group to drive for who is totally transparent. Before you join or donate please research this organization. Do not be taken advantage of like I was.
food was ok and the beer was actually nice. But jesus christ the service...we walked up and asked the older waitress if we could sit on the patio she seemed annoyed that we even asked and said in a negative tone you ll have to wait until i can clean all these tables then rolled her eyes. Cool so we waited myself my wife and my 5 month year old daughter. We sit and then are greeted by a nice young waitress we ask for menus and she goes to get them upon her return with them we tell her that we ll need a few moments but i do order a beer and 2 waters. About 1 minute later the older waitress comes back and asked if we we re ready to order we said no that we just got the menus. She rolled her eyes and scoffed and then said well just hurry. Just hurry are you kidding me. I m a server I ve been one for 4 years now and i would never speak that way to a customer. Fire her really quick cause she will send others packing. Maybe she was mad cause she had to take a table on the patio or cause i had a baby but either way it was uncalled for. The other young lady came back to take the order she was sweet and then she took off and then another waitress came over and was nice as well. Just tread lightly while there cause you may get that old mean waitress. Will not be going back anytime soon thanks to that waitress.
A very confused concept with a misleading name. The extent of their French Breakfast Sandwiches is ham and cheese on four different types of bread. The ham is painfully sparse and the cheese is processed cheddar. Drip coffee is 2.25 per cup with no refills a dagger in my book. Service was friendly but very unenthusiastic and slow.
Probably one of the most deceiving places I ve ever lived at. Could not wait to get out of our lease. They are extremely helpful and friendly before you move in but once you sign that lease they treat you as if you re a burden and you re wasting their time. Every time I placed a work order I would give them a time frame in which I was available and they would not only miss it most of the time they would not even show up. Or they would show up specifically when you said you were unavailable. Every time I would call the office with a question either they would not answer the phone or they would gather you information and say they would call you back......and they never would. And parking is a joke. Especially if you get off late at night you ll be parking halfway across the complex. When you move in they ask you if you want a garage when you say how much they say well they were on sale for 35 a month but let me check . Then they say oh you just missed it. Do not worry they come up all the time at that price but they never do. They re always 80 a month. And the apartment itself. It may look nice but it was so cheaply build. All the fixtures fall apart and need to be repaired by maintenance. In ours we had 4 cabinets fall apart our toilet stop working our faucet in our sink break our kitchen light fixture needed replaced our washer break our deadbolt break and there were multiple places in our kitchen where the floor would feel like it was going to fall through and bow but when I told maintenance they said it was normal and happened in all the apartments . And we are not rough on our things. We ve never had so many thing break in an apartment before. Especially one that s only a couple years old. And do not get me started on the poor grounds keeping if you re not by the front office. We were in the back of the complex and people were slobs but they did not do anything about it. There was an old dirty mattress thrown in the rocks surrounded by dog poop just at the bottom of the stairs that was there for a month before I called and complained. Then April at the front office said well we ca not know about these things unless our residents inform us . So obviously they do not care to check the property. How could something like that be in plain sight for a month without a worker noticing it? And there was always dog poop........EVERYWHERE!!!!!!! And so many lights in the parking lot and walkways were out. Making it feel so unsafe. Speaking about safety forget about it. The community is not gated. And it s just off of a hiking trail where shady people hang out at night. I ve seen cars broken into mopeds ripped apart and my motorcycle saddlebags being broken into and having all the contents stolen twice . When I said something to the office they said well we have security . Meaning a 21 year old kid with a flashlight who would sit by the front office on a bench playing on his phone all night. When I told the office this they said oh that s not good yet nothing was done because he works for a private company . When I asked for a cheaper garage because if my motorcycle being broken into twice they said ok well give it to you for 20 off a month. But then they still wanted another deposit. I asked if we could work anything out. They said they would call me back. Which they did not . Remember they never call you back. Especially if you re upset about something . Had random people knock at my door throughout the day. One guy was even going door to door trying to look into apartments. Metro was called and responded but the guy already left. The front office also did not seem to care. Remember unless they re trying to get you to sign a lease you re a burden. And speaking of. After all this excitement when you re nearing the end of your lease they ll send you a letter saying because of the cost and high demand for a safe and luxurious community you need to pay another 40 a month on your next lease. So you can go through the same crap for a higher fee. And they ll send it three or four months in advance and tell you that you need to make you re decision within a couple if days. Trying to bully you into it. Oh and they had the same dirty and torn US flag flying the entire time I lived there. They would never take it down even in a storm. It bothered me. I said something. They did not care. So to end all this. Do not trust them. Have insurance on everything because it ll probably be vandalized or stolen. Carry a gun with you. The only time I ve ever drawn my firearm was near the parking lot if this community when a couple of guys were trying to break into a car with a crowbar and I said something so they started walking towards me with it they then ran off. Oh and do not park near a street lamp on a windy day. Remember cheaply built they were always falling over in the parking lot and breaking.
Waited for 12 minutes for two iced coffee till I finally asked for a manager and got a refund. They were busy and I also noticed staff standing around not working on orders. Never coming here again.
I visited Kona my first day in North Las Vegas based on the recommendation of a friend. I was not pleased with the overall quality of food or service. I arrived at 2PM and was seated in the dining area along with a dozen or less other patrons. I ordered the soup and salad along with a sushi roll. It took nearly 20 minutes to receive the soup and salad and another 15 minutes for the sushi!
It s fine...I m sure it s a standout for szechuan in this city and maybe even for Chinese food in general. However it s becoming very obvious that this is just not a particularly discerning or interested szechuan eating town. Which is fine! I know there s a lot of good food here just not this kind. The menu was pretty limited and the flavors were executed in a merely ok fashion. Dan Dan noodles were fine but the whole brothiness of the dish which is apparently common in Montreal detracts. Also it was very light on meat. . The Fish in spicy broth with tofu tasted like it had been seasoned with hot sauce which does not belong in this dish. It overwhelmed the other flavors and made the dish very one note. The beef with shallot was not good. The beef was not cut properly so that it did not chew well and the dish was made with overly stewed onions. It really is not the worst food you ve ever had it s ok and it s not entirely crazy to think I might order from them again. It s just kinda sad that this might be the best that Montreal has to offer.
Went for breakfast was starving so I sat at the counter only four other patrons in the whole restaurant but I sat there no menu no waiter no nothing for 10 minutes! Finally some guy gives me a menu and asked my drink order. OJ and water got it pretty quick but only one straw! 5 minuets later another person comes for my order simple bacon eggs and biscuits and gravy! 10 min later I m finally eating. Food was NOT worth the 35 minute wait service was shit! And I will never ever eat there again! You have been warned ! Oh and it was noon and only 4 others in the whole joint!
Contacted the internet sales department about an Explorer I was interested in. Spoke to Kerry and was informed about the KBB cash offer link on the website. He told me to use that and get a hold of him later on that day after finding out what my trade in value was. Per Kerry s direction I proceeded to the KBB link. After completing the questionnaire I received a phone call from David from the sales department. I informed David that I was in contact with Kerry already and would like to speak to him however David said he would take care of me. I told him I was interested in a vehicle and had a vehicle for trade in. I gave him an offer and he said he would get right back to me..... Never heard back from him...... Called e mailed even sent a text to the number listed that claims to receive text messages.... so far my first impression is not good....
As a native Chicagoan I grew up going to Giordano s as well as the other top Chicago style pizza joints. I know good Chicago pizza this is NOT it! The pizza was undercooked and frankly gross. My husband myself and my daughter could not eat it. We even thew out our leftovers the moment we got home. They are doing Chicago style pizza a disservice. The chopped salad was delicious. The mozzarella triangles were great. The wait for a table was minimal. The wait for the pizza was 45 mins as expected. The restaurant was nice. The staff was nice. The high chair was even clean harder to find then you think . But if a pizza place ca not put out amazing pizza nothing else matters.
I will never return to this ghetto fabulous hot mess of a barber shop. The reason being is it was my first visit and all the black barbers acted like they did not want to cut my hair so they sent me to the latino guy who was nice however I showed him two pictures of what I wanted and he still fucked my hair up. This barber shop SUCKS! they over charge for bullshit service.
Staff is incompetent and worthless. Management equally lacks competency. Establishment is extremely disgusting. There is a wonderful 3rd party MVD provider just minutes away THANK GOD
Checked out and my wife forgot her brand new hair dryer. Returned later in the day to find it was gone. Housekeeper states she remembers seeing it but not sure the present location at the time. Ultimately it was our fault that we left it behind. The housekeeper disposed of it or just outright stole it. I would not recommend staying here as your belongings could mysteriously vanish in to thin air.
Bland and tasteless dry rubbery chicken. Shrimp did not taste fresh. Naan was 0 5. Same with the food. Service was on the slow side considering only two tables were occupied on a Friday evening. I had to walk up to ask for the bill. Decor was well done and in good taste however sadly not the food.
I agree with the post 4 months ago by Alicia. The sermons lack the Gospel. The teachings are self serving rather than Christ centered and lack saturation of Scripture. Will never recommend this place to anyone.
I flew from San Diego to Las Vegas and the flight was delayed for over two and a half hours. They would come on the intercom every thirty minutes and say that we should be boarding soon. On top of having to wait two and a half hours you do not even get water for free on the plane. They may have reasonable prices but definitely not worth the time lost from the delay.
Come here if youu want to wait an hour or get told to make an appointment. The blonde lady with glasses in the front is basically useless. The tellers made me get back in line when I forgot to mention something. Literally switching banks over this I m done with chase lol
This is an Asian food market on a much smaller scale than say Night It Up or Taste of Asia. The familiar smells of grilled meats and stinky tofu dominate the air. Many of the usual night market vendors are present Chatime Tea Shop 168 Formocha Osaka original takoyaki okonomiyaki AA Grills raindrop cakes Wei s smelly tofu Mama Bear smelly tofu and several of the grilled skewer purveyors . Kanto by Tita Flips was also present selling calamansi ice tea and pork skewers. Because this market occupies the parking lot at Metro Square attendants direct drivers to park at the nearby Greek Orthodox Church parking lot. There is a main stage but there was no entertainment at the time hubby and I were there. Worth going to if you have time to spare this weekend but probably many wo not spend a lot of time here mainly because of the relatively fewer food options available .
Subpar food. The waitress was aggravated every time we asked for anything. I will not come here again. Frozen pizzas have better flavor than this food.
We went there last week and they have CHANGED everything from their original menu to cut costs. And They have not updated it on their website. They now only have 5 6 options to choose from. So the only option we had was noodles and they were canned ramen noodles without any flavor for 13 each. If you change the menu atleast update the website so that people can decide to go or not. The food did not taste good either and as others said waitress was very busy on phone.
WHAT? We never even got into this place because the security guard told us we had to finish the drinks we bought at another casino before we could go onside. Wait is not this Vegas?
I have never waited this long to be seated before. Also I have never waited this long to have my drink order taken before at any establishment anywhere at any point in my life. The waiter whichever one was ours either had a legitimate disability or was ailed by sever idiocy as he could not understand that we actually wanted our orders taken even after prompted. My party could ve driven to Charlotte eaten and returned home within the amount of time it took for us to receive our food here. My wife and I most certainly will not return... Update I along with 2 other people in my party got very sick not even 15 minutes after leaving. Since the gestation period for most severe food born illness is 5 hours I d guess that we ingested some spoiled food. I had a great night full of vomiting and restless sleep...
This location lacks customer service in any form. They are a fan of public humiliation and will call you out in front of a line full of people for something ridiculous. I previously had a PO Box there and used this location frequently but from now on I will take my business elsewhere.
If you enjoy eating at the Cheesecake Factory but want to spend more money to pretend that you like eating at nice places then this is the restaurant for you.
Quite honestly one of the WORST places ever and it s definitely not authentic either. Their flavorings all taste like artificial flavoring powders. It tastes nothing like the locations in California or other cities. I ve gone there half a dozen times and each time their services gets worse and the food get worse as well. I took my family there for a family dessert night after eating elsewhere for dinner. I ordered shaved ice with a side of the chewy not fried taro balls ON THE SIDE fried sweet bread and fried taro balls. The waitress smirks and says Ummm that s not going to taste good because the shaved ice is cold and the taro balls are hot . OH YOU DON T SAY REALLY?! I know that because I was born in Taiwan grew up eating this stuff so I think I know what I m doing. Not to mention I order this EVERY TIME I m there...so she places my order and comes back later and tells me she does not have anymore taro balls but she can do rice balls. So I asked her again so if you re out of taro balls then what are you serving with the red bean soup when people order that? She smirks AGAIN so I just told her to forget about it. Each time a dish was dropped off at the table it was literally thrown on the table and not a word mentioned on what the dish was. Long story short I m in service industry and I ve never given someone a 10 tip. But I did last night. I ll never go back. Worst customer service if any and worst food beverages!!!!
My frist time staying on a low budget hotel and it was not a pleasant stay no wonder it only has 3 stars or less. They where rude and dose not care of there guest. They harass me and my mother they made us feel like slums and they had no respect just pay a lil bit more and stay some where else
I ve tried this place over 5 times in the last 5 years. Every time I hoped it might have gotten better. The food is decent at best for Chinese Vietnamese food. The problem is not the food though. The place is almost divey but I m used to that. The problem is that the food takes sooooo long to be served. Even if you order over the phone they will tell you it should be 20 30 minutes. 20 30 minutes for a bowl of pho and a couple spring rolls at a non rush hour time? When you go to pick it up you wait another 10 15 minutes. This has happened every time I ordered. For Vietnamese food and I ve eaten at over 50 Vietnamese spots this place is VERY slow. Especially for the quality. I would only recommend if time and quality are not an issue for you
Went here last night after seeing they had 5 stars. Was not impressed... The guys working seemed pretty out of it and as a first time buyer they were not helpful at all. Went home with 4 vapes and they did not even sell me a charger..
All sales and no service. Steer clear of this company. I never complain but everyone has their limits. I purchased a 2 500 elliptical and it did not work. These things happen so I followed with their service which they outsource. What ensued over the last year was a terrible experience a cat and mouse game that never fixed the machine. Now I am stuck with no recourse but to write a few silly reviews maybe I will try the Better Business Bureau . I offered them to make it right but they thumbed their nose at me. I am sinking more money into an elliptical from the Treadmill Factory hopefully that goes better.
I went to intl. with some friends and was at the bar trying to get a drink and the bar manager Steven the Mexican looking one with a pretty boy face was very dismissive and rude. I was trying to buy a round of drinks for multiple people and finally got his attention then he turned away and started flirting with girls. Very unprofessional for a bar manager to act like that! He wo not go far with treating people like that. Would not be surprised if he gets fired soon.
I ve been to lounges around the world. For being a lounge at a major hub for an airline I am shocked at how bad this place was. I arrived around 11am and literally EVERYTHING was picked over. A few half bagels left some lemon cake one yogurt no fruit empty serving dishes etc. The staff clearly were over worked...albeit still friendly.
Service was good. However the food was just okay. We went here on late Saturday afternoon and they only have lunch brunch menu. I ordered Veal Steak Frites it was just okay. Sauce was okay no flavor and under seasoned. They do have good ambiance and decor. I would only go here if there is no other place to go or when you are in a pinch and extremely hungry.
I have been to this place to see live bands a few times now and have left annoyed every time. It s 2017 and this place is still cash only. It s crowded smelly dirty and not at all charming like people would lead you to believe. The bartenders are abrasive which is cool for about 15 seconds. The beer is cheap but it s not at all worth it. Nothing about this place makes me want to go back.
I stayed at the resort for 5 days for a business meeting. I got food poisoning and contacted the head of catering. He told me he had several other people contact them about getting food poisoning from my group. After playing phone tag over 7 weeks he finally offered to comp a meal at the resort for me. That s what he thinks will make up for 2 weeks of sickness? I have a bill for urgent care I lost 11 lbs. and he thinks I want to eat there again??? I m very disappointed with the way this has been handled and cannot recommend this resort.
Worst food in the strip! Got a calazone and it was burnt on the bottom it had exploded and split completely open losing the contents inside! Also got a bowl of spaghetti and you can open a jar of generic sauce and a box of store bought pasta and you have the same meal. Service was well missing. Not visible and barely came to our table. Would not recommend ever go back not for anything! One star because it would not let me do 0 stars.
Yesterday was my first time at HT. The beer list was great lots if options. Being a vegetarian it is usually hard to find things to eat at a place like HT. Me and my boyfriend both ordered the veggie burger with additional toppings for lack of a better word it was mediocre. I do need to point out the staff though. It just so happens that the host we should of had was an ex of my bf I m not putting names . Anyway she made a big deal about us being there. Hid in the back and made us feel like we were not welcome. It took at least 7 minutes to get greeted then seated. After 5 years you would think she would be over it. Needless to say we probably wo not be back.
I used to go here once a month or so for drinks and a quick dinner. One day I noticed they had a Lobster Zone game . I m not sure who thinks it s OK to have lobsters suffering in filthy water while a bunch of hillbillies try to snag them with a metal claw so they can eat them for dinner. It s like something you d see at a carnival. I get it...this game totally caters to their clientele. I personally find it completely unacceptable. What kind of owner would allow this in their building? I wo not go back.
At TI and wanted to eat at a restaurant that was closed so we came here. We were sat by the door of their show so we could barely hear each other. Boyfriend ordered a steak for 35 that had a lot of fat and no flavor. French fries cold nachos blah with no real cheese or full coverage but the crab cakes and other side items were good. They offered us coupons for 2 for 1 entrees but the fine print only allowed up to 20 off and most entrees costed more. They also offered a 2 for 1 yard drink but it could not be combined with the other coupon. Our server was great though he was friendly and brought us a new set of warm fries and a complimentary alcoholic beverage for the inconvenience we were experiencing. So although the food was not great and we would not come back or recommend this establishment I gave two stars for the service and crab cakes.
I have never had consistently poor service. This is my third time at this location. The staff had always been rude slow and inattentive. On a positive note the food has always been good.
It was so incredibly loud on Sunday afternoon for NFL that my ears ached! The nachos were ok. I will not be back and if you want to preserve your hearing do not go.
We ve stayed at Planet Hollywood a few times. I find the dealers friendly but I have had issues with play tracking by the bosses. It s hard if not impossible to get proper credit for your casino play if they do not properly track and it s very annoying. The rooms vary. The resort room is much larger than the standard room. It also has a larger bathroom with a separate tub and shower. Ask for upgrades when you check in last time I got one during the middle of the week. Many rooms have a view of the strip including the Bellagio fountains. So check on these as well. The standard room is just that standard. Nothing to write home about. There are good restaurant choices Strip House and Koi are solid. Of course the famous Earl of Sandwich is busy 24 hours a day but they get you in and out quickly. The attached mall has some solid choices as well including Lobster ME. I give the place 2 stars due to gaming issues and the quality of the rooms. But you can certainly do worse on the strip. There are good places to eat and it s in a nice location so it has that going for it. If the price is right I d stay here again but it s not among my first few choices.
Ordered through Foodora food delivery service and the dumplings arrived without any sauces. Without sauces they were bland. Disappointing that Foodora customer service did not even apologize for not picking up the sauces and refused to refund. Without sauces dumplings are almost uneatable as soy sauce is a must. Due to this experience will not be returning.
Stopped in to ask a few questions with the holidays coming up and the person I spoke to was extremely short and rude. Not quite sure about the quality of their work but when you re a new business and do not provide a unique service customer service is everything. I d go elsewhere if I were you.
Good selection at a higher end price. That being said I will never come back here after one of the cashiers very inappropriately hit on my girlfriend after she asked him to stop repeatedly. The owner Ram originally fired the employee in question who claimed to have been drunk on the job when I showed him the 23 in merchandise he gave away to try to get my girlfriend to go out with him. Inexplicably the employee is now back in the store. If you are female I would avoid this business they do not respect you as a customer.
In addition to the bizarre behavior outlined in my previous review the owner eventually found our group s website and began harassing members and the group at large on our forums. She also made direct statements to multiple members indicating she does not wish to have LGBT persons in her store despite the Willy Street location. The extreme level of unprofessionalism is unbelievable. Please look for another place to find your yarn you will be treated better and have better yarn to select from.
Visited this place twice and both times received really poor service once at the bar and once a table. Pizza was okay better than Domino s but nothing special. I like playing Buzztime Trivia and QB1. The third time I went there the Arizona Cardinals were featured as the QB1 game. I go to a sports bar to watch the other NFL games because the Cardinals are on regular television. If I wanted to watch the Cardinals I would do so at home. I did not stay that day and have not been back since. The place might have gotten better might still be the same. I m not willing to take the chance.
I made an online order and had to pick it up from this store. When I arrived at the customer service desk there were people just standing around. A person was in front of me and after waiting for 5 minutes he got fed up and asked around as to who would help him. A couple more minutes and I was served. Took about 20 minutes for the person at the back to get the items. Spent a total of 30 minutes for a pick up. The place is huge and there were people just standing around the customer service area as well not doing anything.
do not even bother requesting a song. even if you give them money they will only play what they want.
This place is a dump. Non secure wifi no balcony hot tub was not working. The bed and pillows were comfortable so I gave one star.
So my wife orders 2 Street tacos the menu says they come with cilantro onion and salsa. So my wife says no cilantro. Well when she got her order the tacos only had onions no cilantro which is correct but no salsa? So I go and ask the lady taking the orders why the tacos do not have salsa and she says to me the salsa is on the counter over to the side you can get it yourself I say what? But the menu says your street tacos come with 3 toppings and we only deducted 1 of them. Are they not supposed to give me the other 2 toppings? Cause otherwise why is it in the menu that it comes with salsa? Then she finally admits the cook was supposed to put the salsa in the kitchen before it was handed to you to what I just said Wow! Did not you just tell me we are supposed to get our own? . Needless to say I am not a big fan or lies and when it s a business providing a service to me it s the worst. Not coming back here or recommending this place to anyone. lies poorservice nerverreturn 5stars
Walked in today for lunch. I literally stood there for 10 mins waiting to be seated and I saw a few employees see me and no one came to seat us.
Was in town visiting. My dil had made an appointment. We did not get services we paid for hot towel and hand massage . Got double charged. Was told the manager would fix it the next day when he came in. Called several days later and was told by Savannah that her boss had fixed it and it would show up by end of week. A few weeks later and still no credit to my account. Called and Savannah said her boss had told her it was fixed. I left my number to have manager call me. Kelly called me the next day saying Savannah had tried to fix it herself and it did not work. She offered store credit. No thanks. My dil was able to pick up cash. I was not going to wait for them to credit my account. Yes this was Glendale location.
Nice furniture. Do not even think of giving them one penny for their utterly useless extended warranty. I ve never had good luck with extended warranties...No matter what goes wrong it s NOT covered...and Macy s warranty sure has proven that true. Complete waste of money and time. 2 hours I ll never get back.
They do not do take out anymore. Chate individuals. Also they close the bar for certain occasions just for the owners. You guys complain about the students. The real problem is with the management and ownership. Customers come last. If I could give a negative rating I WOULD.
This place is a joke. The bartender does not know how to make a Sazerac they were out of Bulleit and Makers?! Um are not we in Vegas? How do you even run out of whiskey? This place reminds me of SF s hipster cocktails bars but without the cocktails. The decor will fool you with the cute little garden patio and the mason jars but that s all this place could offer. We sampled a variety of items on the menu including the mac and cheese balls chicken and waffles sweet potatoes tots and nothing impressed us at all. The ahi tuna was probably the best thing I tried on the menu. Service was slow food was mediocre and most importantly whiskey selection sucks.
It was cold dry not addible. They always for got something in the order. Bad customer service the servers are rude
I have spent a lot of money in this place over the last 5 years. Now their kids are taking over it sucks. Wo not spend another dime there after tonight.
Cold food. Slow service and was not even busy. Not even a comp for two cold meals. I hate to send back food but really hate eating cold. So was put in a Awkward position. Manager gave us a coupon for our next visit. Gave coupon to the table next to us. Very disappointed. Will not be returning.
Brian states on his website that My Goodness Cakes will help you create a one of a kind cake for your memorable event which will bring a lifetime of wonderful memories. He also states a few reasons why to choose My Goodness Cakes one reason is Short Notice? Give us a try!!! I called with 2 weeks notice for a baby shower cake and he does not even try to help me! All he s worried about is wedding cakes. Thanks for not making my event memorable and thanks for shutting down all the lifetime of wonderful memories!!!! I will never think twice of using your company for any event nor will I recommend you! You obviously lack customer service and customer satisfaction!
terrible customer service.. long wait times.. disrespectful and lazy attitude from tellers.. just closed my personal account there and working on getting a commercial account there closed as well... very rude to people doing commercial transactions..
Worst hotel ever! If I could give it 0 stars I would. It looks nothing like in the pictures service is horrible and it s so dirty. Water leak stains all over the roof and walls. So old looking and it looked like a motel. Not worth the price.
This place used to be located on Magnetic Drive around the Dufferin and Steeles area. I had gone there many times for lunch to dine in and take out. They had very knowledgable and friendly staff and amazing food. The best shawarma in a laffa anywhere in the area. Great salads soups meat felafel everything you ordered was delicious. They were even featured on an episode of You Gotta Eat Here . The Promenade location is so far from that it s ridiculous. First of all the food is nothing like it used to be on Magnetic. They ve cheaped out on everything from the salads to the quality of the meat. The staff is made up of completely different people and none of them seem to really care about the customers it seems that they ve hired cheaper work young kids teenagers for minimum wage instead of hiring people that actually care and paying them a normal wage. Secondly I understand it s a kosher restaurant but when you re in a mall food court you cannot be closed for most of the day on Fridays. It s ridiculous. I m so disappointed with this place it makes me sad that I ll never again have the laffa that I fell in love with at the Magnetic Drive location.
We went in to watch a Buckeye game. The food was decent and the prices were good. The beer selection was not that extensive. One thing that was concerning was that there was a bird sitting on a staff member s shoulder while she was working behind the bar. She even put the bird on the edge of a large trash can behind the bar to go potty. I m not sure if this is a health code violation but be warned about the bird in a restaurant establishment prior to going.
The convenience of the drive thru is almost nonexistent at this MCB location. I came here with my husband and pulled up to the order window. We were greeted and asked how we were doing. It was a 2 way conversation that seemed to be perfectly normal. However we were all of the sudden told that the speaker was broken and we needed to pull up to the window to place our order. We drove up and there was another car at the window so we had to wait. And wait. And wait. And wait some more. After waiting about 15 minutes the car in front of us got their food and drove away. We came to the window and placed our order paid even gave a 10 tip although in hindsight that was a ridiculous thing to have done and waited. We d ordered 2 sodas and thought for sure that they would be given to us immediately and even had a hunch albeit an incorrect one that we may get the drinks for free on account of the incredibly long wait due to the broken speaker . After waiting another 20 minutes we re now up to a 35 minute wait we were given our food. I asked if there were rolls in any of the bags and she said No. I asked her if we could have some they come with a meal inside why do I have to ask for them in the drive thru? . She came back with them said thank you and started to close the window. I stopped her and reminded her that she had forgotten our drinks. She politely apologized and got us our drinks. After getting home and unpacking our dinner I was nothing short of pissed to discover that the sour cream tomatoes green onions and jalapeos for my nachos were nowhere to be found. What s the point of nachos without these? I angrily called the restaurant and the manager was apologetic and offered to put my name on a comp list for a free nachos on my next visit. I appreciate them rectifying the situation but am disappointed that the entire experience was such a bust in the first place. The broken speaker made the amount of time we had to wait virtually the same amount had we gone inside to eat. I realize it s not fast food but 35 minutes plus forgotten items is unacceptable. I love Memphis Bar b que for the food but to me good food only goes so far. The food is what brings me there the service is what keeps me coming back. On this night it was a failure all around.
The copy and print center here is just so horrible. They have no care and concern for customer service. This department always handles shipping too. It should be a walk in and walk out kind of thing showing up with prepackaged boxes wrong! Seriously UPS should not allow them to represent their brand. It makes UPS look bad. And the store manager just does not care. Mention it to him and he ll just say their short staffed and not even offer to help.
Horrible took my money they do not accept cards only cash you get a card and then the machine did not work
BUYER BEWARE!!!!!! We saw a 2013 Dodge Journey online...when we went to look at the car it was not even on the lot yet. it was in back...we test drove it and my husband said the alignment seems a little off and told oh yea we can get that check for u...was also told the cars are fully inspected and things are done before being put up for sale...There was also a chip in the windshield and the guy said I can have that done..so we decided to go with the car and they came back with 1 500 more then internet price..we were given a story on how all big dealers do this to get people in the door.. I do not know how we ended up waving that fee after all said and done..but we were told the alignment and chip would be taken care of...so we get a call asking how the car was and we mentioned something about the alignment and the guy on the phone was like o yea I ll have someone contact us for the appointment...so we had to call are selfs for the appointment...so we show up to the appointment ...we were in the car for a good 10mins before my husband found someone..people were walking around and no one ask us if we needed help...so then we waited 3 hours for nothing...are car sat in the line and if it was not for my husband to fine these people we would still be sitting there...turns out they were not going to fix the alignment and crack as promised bc they gave us the Internet price and never told us the alignment was not done or was not going to be fix...they told us yes we can get that done...THESE PEOPLE ARE LIERS!!!!!! I DO NOT RECOMMEND THIS DEALER TO ANYONE...THESE PEOPLE WILL SAY ANYTHING TO GET A CAR OFF THE LOT....
Long wait for one salad. Dining room was not full so was expecting a short wait. Girls behind line kept asking how to make each sandwich. Employee out on the floor cleaning with gloves on would handle food with the same gloves. I was able to talk to one of the managers. The manager corrected the behavior right away. Food is good.
The customer service was good but the food was not good at all. Had a deep dish and a regular pizza and they were both under cooked. The wings had way too much pepper.
I ve been in this shop a handful of times now. The shop itself is awesome the walls are filled with tons of super nice bikes wheels helmets and really anything you would need if you are looking to blow through some serious cash. I stopped in to have a wheel looked at after waiting for a good 5 min before someone even said hello. I was quoted a crazy price to even look at the wheel. I felt as though they were not in the mood to help me so they just threw out a number that was so high I would go away. The worst part was they acted like I was wasting their time.
June 29th one night! For business never again...OLD rooms bad service and horrible clientele. Avoid this place if you can it s not worth it. There IS a reason why the rates are so low. Go Cosmopolitan instead!!
Honestly I use to love Tea Shop 168 and I still do... the ones at any other location then this one. I decided to come here to get a bubble tea because I have not had one in a long time and it was closer to Chatime. Went inside to order a simple Original Milk Bubble Tea with Tapioca was told that there was no tapioca available and it would be a 30mins wait for it. I m sorry but what type of bubble tea shop has no tapioca available at any time. Then he suggested to me to the Original Milk Tea with Herbal Jelly fine I ll get that since I like herbal jelly. There was no one inside and it took him at least almost 10 mins just to make me one drink. When I got the drink the jelly were big pieces not cut up nicely. I was so disappointed and this has made me not want to go back to this location ever again.
Incompetent customer service is a compliment. Every rep says and offers different things and none are true. Thank you for making our choice to dish network a pleasant one with quality. If they had negative stars I d pick that one.
I frequent this store for gas and snacks almost every day! There is a older women I believe to be Cheryl that smokes cigarettes while holding the door open and patrons walking in and out! For a non smoker I am disquieted by this!! I hope that your change your policies to allow employees to smoke while standing buy the front door! Everyone else is AMAZING!!
Well well after reading all those nice reviews i decided to finally give This place a try....First i am a Pizza lover and may have high expectations when it come to pizza making process dough cooking and ingredients ... Putting aside the fact that you build your own and therefore taste and choices vary this review is for the basic pizza dough sauce and cheese . Nothing fancy and rather bad receipe lacks of taste and flavor... coal oven cooking does not add anything to a bad receipe Sadly i will continue going next door and keep using the only place that knows how to make real pizza which i will not mention here as it will false my review Good luck
We took a friend who was visiting from out of town as part of our girls day. It was close to the area we were in and not part of the original plan. I figured it looked good on yelp and it should be ok. My nail tech was good. She did a great job. However the tech my friend got was very rude from the beginning. She started off by yelling at me because I did not want my feet to touch their dirty floor. Then did what appeared to be complaining by the tone of her conversation and the non reaction she received from her comments I could not understand the language She cut my friend during the pedicure and while I was off with my very sweet tech getting my gel mani. She left my friend unattended for 30 minutes in the chair only to come back from her lunch with food in her mouth and rudely ask her why she was still sitting there. The overall customer service was bad and not a nice way to make a good impression on an out of towner. They also refused to honor the 10 off if you check in on Yelp. The only reason they are getting any stars is because my tech was very sweet and did a good job. 1st and last time I ever visit that place.
I m not sure what s going on with this place. I used to love it. Becoming complacent perhaps? 2 attempts at a ribeye to make it rare and it was well done every time. Then I was still charged almost the same when they added the eggs and hash browns a la Then the audacity to charge me 3 for gravy too. Very disappointed here..
Will never come to this location again. Waited 10 min sitting at the BAR for a drink!!! Than the bartender was insulting to me. He decided to tend to ONLY my girl and didnt bother to look at me or ask what I wanted to order. I ended up not ordering anything after him asking me about 15 min after my girl ordered. The service sucked at this location!! I love the food. But please train the employees better.
Happen to be here the other night . It s a generic mall with your average stores Fairview Mall is probably the Dufferin Mall of the North East. They re going through construction so driving here is very confusing it took me a good 20 minutes looking for the movie theater. Anyway I do not have much more to say about this mall. I ve definitely experienced better. Good for shopping movies
I give BJ s ONE star because every time I order something from the bar it s 99 ice and 1 liquor. I asked for a Long Island Ice Tea and I already know that restaurants fill a tall glass with ice and add as little alcohol as possible. But this last time was ridiculous!!! I could not even get my lips to the beverage because the ice was pouring out of the top of the glass. I ordered another one and asked the waiter to have the bartender go easy on the ice ...I got the same thing!!! CONSIDERING BJ S HAS NO HAPPY HOUR 10 FOR A GLASS OF ICE IS OUTRAGEOUS.
Came here when we missed our reservations for Wish down the street. Solid brunch option with eclectic decor. Would recommend if you are in the area and do not want to wait 1 hour for waffles.
bad service even on a slow night 30 mins just to get our drink order. No one knew there was an ongoing drink special that was clearly advertised. The manager finally made it happen then hit us with a random higher price i have no fight left in me for this kind of ordeal. The food was okay. will not return.
I purchased over 2000 worth of furniture that was delivered 9 2016. The salesperson Kent was terrific. He honored the store policy of price matching . This apparently upset his mgr CD who Kent approached in private to get the purchases and their extended warranty approved. CD apparently did not want to approve the purchase contract as he scolded Kent two different times in front of me! It seemed CD did not want to ok the complimentary warranty included in the purchase contract as it would decrease CD s total sales or something of that nature. CD made kent remove the complimentary warranty that seemed to be store policy with large purchases. Now I know why CD did not approve the extended warranty. The furnishings started self destructing in about two weeks. That does not include the hole in the bottom lining of the oversized chair that had been there since delivery. BTW the delivery fellows had such a hard time getting that chair into the correct room that they removed the room s door. Problem came when they re hung the door incorrectly. It had to be professionally re hung to operate correctly. I did not complain about these issues. However by December the new furnishings had self destructed to the point of needing the attention of someone associated with this Ashley Home Store on Sahara in Las Vegas. Will save you the details of the royal run around I got registering my complaint and attempting to get a re select in place of the furniture that was not holding up to expectations. End story I was advised via phone call by G. H. that nothing could be done for my problem as Ashley Corporation did not accept returns refunds or re selects. This decision was based on a decision by the very young tech that finally was sent out to view my issues that nothing need be done . Many calls to different persons in that company s employ either were not answered not returned or resulted in referring to the tech s decision that nothing needed to be done . Not to bore you with all the details of what was wrong with the furniture after very light to no use since the purchase I will provide some photos. Oh I might add that mgr. Terrance would not even let the receptionist at this store send out a tech unless I agreed to the 45 service charge when I made the initial complaint. I would not agree to the charge as the store policy was when things were still under warranty I did have the one year warranty on the cushioned furniture there was no service charge . Am not sure why my entire review with photos is not here but is on another link at this site. Am still figuring out how to travel this site usefully for myself and the public. Please see my complete review on this site. The photo of a dining set seen at the beginning of this review is not from me. I did not purchase or note this item. My presumption is that the photo is associated with any review of this particular Ashley Home Store.
DO NOT USE THIS COMPANY!!! THEY RUINIED MY CARPET! BEWARE...they are operating under three different names Silver State Stainmasters and Carpet Cleaning Service. I m appalled at how incompetent the two cleaners were who tried to fix my 500.00 carpet they ruined. I m even more appalled at the owner Nathan who will not answer my calls or call me back! Does he really care about his company if that s what you want to call it ? By looking at the other reviews I think not. He should be embarrassed by how he runs this so called business and be ready for legal action against him. How can you charge someone 150.00 dollars completely ruin their carpet and not reimburse any of it? Wow this carpet non cleaning company will be out of business very soon. Booooo on you and your work ethic!!!!
Know many workers there say it s dirty do not wash dishes and food stays out and worse of all smoke in the walk in freeZer !Many that eat there are sick like I was ! Do not eat here customer service is horrible too nothing is ever hot and ready long wait ! Waited half a hour for 4 pizzas .. pathetic
So I show up. I sit at the bar. 7 or 8 people are at the bar. I watch the bar tender and even the manager or possibly the Ownet behind the bar. I sit...and sit...and sit...sort of like last time when I sat for 10 minutes never being recognized...I look at myself to make sure I m not made of glass...except this time that good bar tender who rescued this place last time was not here to do the same...and I sit...8 minutes goes by and I m not even acknowledged by the bar tender or manager...I leave. You lost my business forever...you need to perform at least the basics folks!!! Acknowledge a freaking customer!!! Immediately...you re failing at training your employees!!!
I love the North Central Phoenix location and the salon has a pleasant atmosphere. Unfortunately I ca not recommend the stylists. The first haircut I received was acceptable though I could barely tell that I had even gone for a trim. But I recently went back for a shape up and left with choppy extreme layers and an uneven haircut. I had emphasized that I prefer a blunt bob with minimal blended layers but the stylist just did what she wanted to do I guess. I could tell the cut was terrible and tried to express some concern but to no avail. Now it s too short to get fixed and ca not be styled nicely.
Me and my fianc went yesterday Monday Night the race was fun time flies by while your racing on the track we sort of enjoyed it. There was a few things I did not really like lets start with service everyone seemed to hate their job no one was even smiling. Secondly before going to race the two men were not explaining anything mind you this is my first time ever kart racing so I did not know anything. My helmet was so big I could not even really see and my neck brace feel off the first few minutes into the race Not Safe At All I did crash really hard into the side guards and my neck has been hurting since I could not even feel that my neck brace had fallen off. The staff should be more observant and helpful.
Lol. Out of oranges at 9 26pm? Who does the inventory? Smells horrible and service is silly.
That s the last try. I m going back to Akron even if it s not convenient. 7 people working 2 coking 1 up front taking everyone order. 3 standing by cash register not training 1 in back worried about his phone charging. What happened to this location.
I do not know what it is about this particular TCF. Every time I have been here there is always issues. The patio tables and chairs were covered in bird excrement. Price for portion size is not appropriate. The staff needs a lesson in restaurant etiquette. Go to the Chandler location for an overall better experience.
I look forward to the day when Verizon has real competition. Maybe then the staff will become courteous sales representatives rather than smug ordertakers.
This is one of the WORST realty management companies to ever exist. If you are a parent of a student of IUP it would be in your best interest to never rent anything from these people. My son lived in one of their units last semester. He and his roommate were robbed twice nothing was ever done about it. When the property manager Dave was asked to look at the video tapes from the cameras at the door we received no response. Then two days later they are removing the cameras from the building. This is because they were dummy cameras and never worked to begin with. Also when he moved in the place was DISGUSTING!! The carpet was NEVER cleaned the bathroom and kitchen were both vile. This was noted in the lease before he even moved in. However when he moved out this company sends us a bill for 800.00 to replace the already nasty carpet and the proceeded to tell us that they had to clean the bathroom kitchen and fridge and they were charging us for it!! WHAT!! We cleaned everything in this unit and left it better than we found it which was not hard to do since it was vile to begin with. My own mother cleaned the bathroom on her hands and knees! When the second robbery happened I sent a certified letter to the realty company and the president of the college. I did not expect a response from the college I was just making it known to them what happened to one of their student in their town at their school. But the realty company I expected to hear from on such a serious matter. You know what I heard crickets. NOTHING!! The people at this waste of a company did not even have the professional courtesy to contact me in regards to these incidents. This company is terrible!! There units are disgusting the people who work there do not know the first thing about how to do their job and they are a rip off. Best part....I am a property manager for a living in care of over 500 homes and would never treat anyone in any of our properties with the utter disrespect and unprofessional behavior as these people. Karma is a bitch.
This is the only Thai place in the area so thought we d give it a try. And after we did we would not be coming back. The pad Thai tasted like ketchup and there were paper fibers in our food. The chicken was spongy.. The food just does not compare to places like sukhothai.
The service was really bad the hostess was really standoffish sat us at a crappy table even though the place was pretty empty and then the server did not show up to take a drink order for 20 minutes. The drinks took another 20 minutes to arrive. The food itself was pretty good although some of the flavor pairings were weird garlic toasted baguette with a sweet brie in puff pastry was not great . When you re only going there because you re seeing a movie before after it will do and is much better than Quaker Steak and Lube which seems to be the only other option in the area. Meh.
If I could give this place a negative star I would. We just had the most horrible experience at this place. We checked in and took 10 minutes to get to our car get our bags and get in the room. My boyfriend went to the bathroom and had to kill two roaches!!! He checked the corner of the bed to see if they had bed bugs and thankfully did not see any but I cannot deal with roaches for the life of me. Sorry just my thing everyone has their own issues. We went to the office to get a refund and they said they had to check the room to see if it was used ...so apparently they said we used it and were there for 15 minutes so we could not get a refund. That s freaking ridiculous!!!!! They made it seem like we went in there to use the bathroom and have sex! Wtf?!?!?!? We tried to keep our cool but the manager said that if everyone in the world were honest things would be different. I do not care about the rest of the world lying to them...the fact that I was in the room for all of 5 minutes and I m getting treated like I m some type of thug is ridiculous!!! Besides all that the room smelled horrible there were cigaret burns on the bed and blood on the mattress. Smh...
Boo! My father likes this chain but not anymore. I personally believe it was because he can eat for free from 6am 11am and you can even whip up your very own waffle. But let s go over the bad parts shall we? The Handicap rooms. They basically do not exist. Fairfield forwards your telephone reservation to an ADA booking service of some sort and when we arrive at the hotel we get a completely different room than requested. All I can say about this handicap room is that it must have been for someone with hearing issues since all it had was a DOORBELL. NO Bars on the bathroom wall by the toilet a shower for someone that is able to STAND and NOT wheelchair accessible. Again boo. The 2 stars are for the indoor pool and the breakfast. We will never be back. If you love lime green curtains paper thin walls and squishy beds that you almost suffocate in That are also too high for someone in a wheelchair to access this is the place for you!
Use to be an awesome place to come buy a beer and play a board game. Last time I went I felt very unwelcomed. They have a lunch time I ve never heard of where apparently if you are sitting down with friends and not ordering food you are taking up space as the manager told us. By the way their was plenty of space. I understand if it was packed and need more tables inside but he could of at least been nicer about it all. Not sure if they changed management but it s no good lately. Honestly the food is over priced for what it is and the music at times is way too loud for the place.
Welcoming and Nice Service. Food is too Expensive for the Taste.I would not rate this as the best Indian restaurant in Vegas. Its just one among many. so if you live close by there is nothing wrong to try this one. I am some one who give more value to the taste of the food than decoration so i am giving only 2 stars as i have experienced better places than this one.
My first experience here was amazing. The food was so good the staff was very friendly. This time once we got our bowls back from the wok everything from the protein to the vegetables and the noodles were a dark brown to black shade. Everything tasted like pure char. They very obviously have not been cleaning the grill. On top of that most of the protein I had loaded my bowl with seemed to had somehow vanished and I was finding random toppings in my bowl i.e. onions chicken that I had not personally added. Not thrilled to have spent 24 on two bowls which ended up being charred to the point where they were not even edible.
To begin with this is my first review ever. We purchased a dealfind coupon and made it to this place for a weekday dinner. Although the place was pretty much empty and I say that because it was only two of us sitting there the service was VERY slow. All we ordered was sushi maki and sashimi no cooked items. Sashimi tasted ok but sushi maki had the rice slightly undercooked. The rolls were pretty small and the selection for the AYCE dinner was the poorest I ve ever seen maybe they have a special menu for coupon holders not sure here . At the end they added a 10 tip as a compulsory charge to the bill. No other options left but to pay for their laziness became mandatory. Not returning even if in the area.
This hotel is very dirty bugs nasty restroom in room dirty carpet pillows smell so bad wow I pay 240 2 nights for it wow I ca not believe never come back to this piece nAsty hotel 1 2 start
BE AWARE!!! I found him on yelp because of the reviews I hired him. He completed the front landscaping on my rental and I had to wait for HOA approval to pay him. Once HOA approved his work I cut him a check and he cashed it but he is taking me to small claims courts for the full amount plus late fees. This is ridiculous! I paid him...and I have a copy of the cashed check with his signature on it. Now I have to deal with small claims court all the way from San Francisco Bay Area. Do not work with this person or company. You do not want to share the headaches I am experiencing. He is not professional at all!!!!!!
Went to the unknown brewery for crabfest. The beer was excellent. Most likely would not go back to the crabfest. Less than half way through our scheduled time the crabs all you can eat ceased to arrive after waiting about 30 to 45 minutes we left and and went to a fast food restaurant. After paying 80. for two people i was very disappointed and dinner cost me an additional 10. I understand from one of the wait staff who were very friendly and doing the best they could that this was their first such event. Maybe they should have had a trial run with a few less tickets being sold an fine tuned it from there.
DO NOT bother with this place!!! They could care less about customer service! They tell you there going to do one thing and do absolutely nothing! Where do I even begin?! I went to little Baja on June 26th looking for a lions head for my pool and columns for my patio. After being there for over 2 hours deciding on lion heads we we told that they would order a specific lion head in different colors. This specfic lion head is molded and painted by a staff member that works there. So we were told that the following week they would have it in for us to view. Nothing! Called nothing! So we went in and spoke to them again even spoke to the guy who makes them he treated my mom like crap!!!! Watch your videos I literally had to walk away because I wanted to tell him off! Attn owners if you need the date and time I have that as well. Again we were told that in a couple of days he would have them ready. I even text them the colors we wanted to make sure they would do it. Again..... Nothing!!!!! I have called and left messages to talk with the owner... Nothing!!!! I called on Thursday and left a message .... Nothing! Text today.... Nothing!!!! I ll include all of texts as well as call logs for reference. It s a shame that there is literally zero customer service provided by this company! If I could give them a zero or even negative stars I would.
After 6 visits not only have they not been able to fix anything but this time they try to charge me more for the same thing they ve done every time. Umm excuse me? No. They did not tell me it was going to cost more and then said I owed from my last visit as well because they forgot to charge me. Who s in charge? Who s running this place? After going here for almost a year I m done. I can go sit in a waiting room for an hour somewhere else.
I was excited to come here for a dinner with colleagues as it had been a while since I last visited an Oliver and Bonacini restaurant. Sadly it did not live up to my expectations. The service was extremely slow and rude at times. Specifically it was not until the end of our meal that the server checked to see whether we wanted more drinks. The meals were delivered to the table by people who had no clue who ordered what to a group of 6 . One server in specific was particularly dismissive and rude when delivering the romaine salads which he called by a completely different name and acted like we were from Mars when we did not know what he was trying to deliver and he had no clue who he was supposed to bring them to . I tried the Mac and cheese as apparently it is highly recommended. Mi did not really notice any cheese curds or goldfish crumbs which were described on the menu but there were plentiful green peas within. It was not the decadent Mac and cheese I was expecting from a restaurant. I likely would not return there are many better restaurants with more attentive service to try.
My wife went in this salon for a set of gel nails. The experience was awful. The technician would not honor her request to make the nails thinner. Then the technician cut the cuticle causing it to bleed. She never even apologized. There was polish all over her cuticles when she was supposedly finished. My wife had to point out all the areas where the polish was applied sloppily. I would never recommend this salon. The only reason I gave it one star is that you have to assign a rating.
I ordered the 3 salad plate. Cranberry chicken salad had very little taste. grape chicken salad was also tasteless and the darn grapes were left whole so it was not easy to eat. The fruit salad was not fresh. The grapes were mushy.
Ok I am one that has never written a review about food. HI have always given a new place of business a chance to see what they have to offer. The restaurant business is a tricky business. It can make or break your decision on whether or not you will become a repeat patron. My wife and I decided to try a new establishment by our residence in North Phoenix AZ. Headquarters AZ is a Bar and Grill that serves common fare food such as burgers Sandwiches salads some sea food appetizers like Calamari Shrimp and so on. I ordered the Philly Cheese Steak my wife had the Shrimp Salad. Well the Philly was so dry and had no flavor the price was fairly priced but the presentation of the food was bland as the sandwich. My wife s salad was so plain and lacked flavor. The ingredients which it lacked were so blah it was pretty grim. We met one of the family members of the owner and he talked with us for a moment building up our dining expectations. Telling us how great the food would be how fresh everything is and how they knew food. They had moved from Las Vegas and had owned a larger establishment there. What a let down. Headquarters Bar and Grill needs work in the food and service department bad. The place looks good with all the the T.Vs all around and is very spacious but lacks ambience. If you like bland food this is the place for you.
Lovely customer service when all we re doing is feeding them business. Picked up dry cleaning. Asked for the trash can to dispose debit receipt and tissue. The crazed woman barked at me...I got out before she could take a bite out of me. Need I say more?
Web site showed open they took my reservation groupon sold me a coupon for today only. Go to restaurant ... surprise! Closed! Not the best
Well let me tell you. We have stayed here twice before and had a very nice stay. This time was so different! We got here no problem with check in. Got a good deal for staying here before. Paid a low price for one night second night free. When we got to our room...very nice until I smelled smoke. I called the front desk to complain that I specifically asked for a non smoking room and there was an obvious smoke odor. She told me no problem will send someone to spray room to purify smell. That took 1 1 2 hours for someone to do that who was spraying for 5 seconds then leaves. It did help but we could still smell faint odors of smoke. At this point I did not want them to come back to use an air purifier if the sprays did not help. Had a great evening with my husband eating out and having fun...here in town to celebrate our 22nd anniversary. Next morning left the room at 10 am went out for the day come back 4pm so we could get some rest then get ready to go to the top of the world restaurant and celebrate our anniversary. We notice the need service sign we put on the door when we left was still there. We walk in and no one has come to clean our room! Very upset at this point. I call and complain again...seriously we were gone 6 hours and our room was not even cleaned? ???? I feel that is more than enough time for some one to clean up our room. I told them..forget it! Just bring me towels and toiletries...and someone actually came by in 10 minutes. What upsets me the most is that no one showed any care or concern. .they were just so matter of fact. No one said Sorry!!! I ended up canceling our reservation at the top of the world restaurant. I spoke with Will who was the only one who gave me his name without asking offered to give me a later reservation and actually cared! I just said no thanks just need to cancel. I have been to the top of the world restaurant twice before and the staff and food were fabulous! After all is said and done. ...what matters most is that I m here in Las Vegas with my best friend and hubby of 22 years....just have to make the best of it. One thing for sure will never stay at the Stratosphere again!
I m not a stranger to long waits at small restaurants because they re THAT popular. I recently went to Maha s and waited for about an hour which was fine because hopefully the food lives up to the hype . Finally when we were seated tucked away at a corner beside the washroom. It was quite difficult to get any waiter s attention because the restaurant was curved and we happened to not be in the line of sight. We finally put in our order. I got a honey and cardamom latte Maha s mind blowing chicken and lentil soup. The latte came pretty quickly but the food took at least FORTY FIVE minutes. Their excuse? They had a big take out order that they had to take care of before attending to their in restaurant guests. On to the food and drink. The drink was okay. I know what it s supposed to taste like and it did not deliver. The mind blowing chicken was not that mind blowing at all. The portion was nice and I really enjoyed the bread but the chicken seasoning was not that special at all. It tasted like chicken from any Middle Eastern restaurants. The best part was the lentil soup. It was flavourful and had a good texture to it. I would not come back to this restaurant unless if I was paid to.
Gave this place two chances. First chance I was trying to buy a pizza for my employees. I called and made the order and when I showed up they had no pizza. In fact a manager came out and lied to my face and said the pizza got cold so they have to remake it. I did not have time to wait so I left. Second chance my wife and I stopped by for a drink around 1020pm. The waitress did not come back after our first order until 1125pm. One hour and we had one drink and left. TERRIBLE service! Never going back again!
I usually write more in depth reviews but this place does not deserve my words so it will be short. The food was doused in salt and everything was an overpriced bratwurst. The server came around once every 15 minutes horrible service. I could not hear what anyone at the table was saying including the person sitting right next to me. If I wanted to go to play drinking games and spend my night with loud obnoxious drunks I would have stopped by UNLV and hung out at a frat house. At least I would not have to pay 20 for a freaking hotdog. Two stars because the beer was pretty good and the building looks cool.
This review is for the daifuku Daifuku was taken out of the freezer. It was extremely cold and hard to bite into. The fruits in the daifuku were super sour. Would not recommend. Go elsewhere for daifuku !!
I was in for an oil change today. I entered the bay at 1 15pm and exited at 4 00pm. my answer when I asked if I was pleased with my service.
Poor service poor Chicago style food. I ordered a sandwich for my girlfriend and got her an Italian beef sandwich with marinara and mozzarella cheese on it. I explained specifically to put the cheese on top of the marinara. I get home and she opens her sandwich and there is marinara all over the place because the cheese was not melted over the marinara I call the place to let them know and she explains it was a mistake that wo not happen again the next time we go in. Cashier rude btw and interrupting when originally placed the order. I was expecting them to fix it and no fix. Sandwich disgusting and soggy. Literally had to take everything out and remake the sandwich. Luckily I had marinara and mozzarella on hand. Not going back. The place used to be awesome when it was owned by Al and called Al s
horrid. just absolutely horrid. I used their service a few times and in the past it worked out although I did have to keep on top of it you have to make sure they pay the fine after they lose for not showing up because that s what happened in my experience more often than not now heres what happens when they lose you ask for them to pay and they say they will they do not pay the due date comes and goes and you pay the city then you ask them to reimburse you they ignore you then you ask them again they ignore you again then you post a negative review Michael the owner calls you threatening legal action for defamation even though its not really defamation because its true??? duhhhhhh says he doesnt want your business anymore but does agree to pay STILL does not pay you ask them to pay again they tell you to get a life oh and did I forget to mention that Michael says he does not want your business anymore? oops !
If I would have done this review 2 3 weeks ago I would have said that Troy and Roger were the best I have ever worked with! But I can have to say now that have ZERO professionalism!!!!!!! My husband and I purchased 2 twin mattress long story short we had to return one and bought a full mattress. We went in and spoke with Rodger and he handled the return we were supposed to be receiving. 2 weeks later we got the check in the mail. 2 days later Troy call us on a Sunday afternoon and said they had made a mistake and gave us the refund twice. His exact words when can I get that back from you? My husband nicely explained we do not have the money right now we have to wait 2 weeks for pay day. Troy told my husband we would speak after the 18th. TWO DAYS later Rodger calls my husband leaving a message that it is Urgent we call him and set up the payment!! First of all it s not my problem they made the mistake! Then to continue calling us after we said we would give the money back after pay day! That s border line harassment!! I had them reported to corporate! 3 1 2018 In response to your comment Kayla no I do not owe you any money! I do not have a debt with you at all. I came in to your store bought 2 twin mattress from Troy. Then returned 1 and bought a full size bed with box spring and rails for my daughter from Rodger. We were told we would receive a credit for the twin mattress we returned. We paid our balance IN FULL when we picked up the mattress. 1 week later we get a check in the mail then not 2 days later after we cash the check Troy calls and says you guys gave us to much money back now we have to pay you 86. I m sorry I fail to see how this is my problem! So NO Kayla I do not have debt to pay with you! And yes it does make you a bad guy when your company makes a mistake and makes your customers pay for it!!
Could I give negative stars?! This car wash does not even deserve 1 star. It was the worst car wash experience I ve ever had. One side of the car was not even dried and the vacuums do not really work. They also do not have the little air blowers available. We will never go there again and I ll make sure none of my friends do either.
Nope nope nope. Slow service. Shrimp had a distinct frozen taste. Beef was not tender. Dirty plates cups utensils. Will not be returning.
I hate leaving bad reviews but you guys need to fix this and step your game up. This is the worst Mexican food I ve had not just in Vegas but anywhere. Both the al pastor and carne asada taco meat was dry and had a strange iron y gamey taste. The meat definitely was not fresh. The fish taco was really fishy and the milanase tasted like it was cooked in rancid oil. I barely ate any of my food because I was afraid I d get food poisoning. Margaritas were also not good at all. I d bet the kitchen back there is not up to code there s no way they are keeping everything stocked fresh. Incredible location but the food is really bad.
Came here with a group of 5. Parking was easy and the place was pretty empty for lunch on a Saturday so that was good for us...since we were starving. Walked in told the host we had 5 and was pointed to a table for 4. They did not lead us there....just pointed but no problem... we grabbed a chair from the table next to the one we were assigned to sat down and began to order. The food was just OK 3 star quality even for a AYCE sushi place at about 22 a person. The service was slow they had plenty of servers though. About 45 minutes into lunch....a server came to my friend who sat at the end of the table as he was eating...told him to STAND UP because we need your chair . First response from my friend was complying... then he looked around....there were PLENTY of empty tables! So he asked....why my chair? There s a lot of chairs....so the server responded by saying what if other people come? They will need that chair let me repeat.... they had plenty of empty tables!! And the worst part is not that my friend was still eating his food when he was told to stand up....the worst part os that the group who the server planned to give the chair to only had 3 people...so they did not even need the chair! Lol....will not return....
Gross. I was in a class nearby so did not have chance to eat anything else. Food smelled like old grease.
Stayed here for 4 nights with my husband daughter and father. Booked a 2 bedroom suite room 307. While I was happy with the location of the hotel it s close to everything! our room was one of the dirtiest I ve ever seen at a Marriott property. Other hotels in the area were sold out otherwise we would have moved. The red couch sofa bed was horribly stained we refused to sit on it the seat cushions on the kitchenette chairs were stained and the coffee pot was so dirty my husband and father both avid coffee drinkers refused to use it. Additionally there was orange bacterial growth on the shower head and obvious mold all over the shower curtain. The bathroom door in one of the bedrooms looked like it had not been cleaned...ever! There was a great deal of hair not ours! in the bathroom drawers making them unusable. We ran out of toilet paper two times during our visit. The bathroom only had 1 4 roll when we checked in no replacement in the entire suite. It was not replenished until we asked. Then after the replacement roll was used we had to ask for another roll to the front desks credit they were extremely apologetic both times . There was no trashcan in the kitchen area. We placed any daily trash in bags we had and left them in the sink assuming housekeeping remove them when servicing the room. They did not. The only way we were able to get our trash emptied was by setting the bags of trash outside our door then they were promptly removed. Again the front desk staff was pleasant but I would never stay here again due to a serious cleanliness issue. The housekeeping staff or at least those assigned to our room need retrained and this room need a DEEP CLEAN.
Very expensive pizza. The supreme slice was good. The pepperoni pretzel was still frozen cold once I got it all the way to my room to eat do not recommend even trying it
The Rusty Dory is the large green monstrosity where the River Road Inn used to be years ago. The decor is non existent make no mistake that this is a dirty dive which would be fine if the atmosphere or drinks could make up for that. But neither does. The drink prices are average for Pittsburgh but the place is incredibly smoky and dingy. They seem to have a lot of karaoke and the takers are comprised of girls slightly better dressed than the women of the night at the Avalon Motel and gentlemen confused about their glory days. If you must go to a bar in Avalon try the Hide A Way...or better yet skip Avalon and head to Sunny Jim s instead on Camp Horne instead.
Stay as far away from these guys as possible. Never showed for auto glass appointment. Would not return calls. When I did talk with their dispatcher I know it was after lunch but he did not have to belch over the phone. I m amazed they re in business.
If I could give zero stars I would. Management is always rude as can be. There are 50 employees working at all times but their too busy talking with eachother and avoiding customers like the plague. The staff and management needs to go and they really need to revamp the people here. It s sad that the employees are so bad. To top everything off everyone in the tech department has no idea what they are talking about or doing. They feed constant false information and if you look at anything from tvs to computers to refrigerators everyone in their family has one and they bought 6 of each item because they are so good it s one thing to be honest it s another to just completely bullshit about something. Definitely will be taking my business elsewhere.
It was very quiet and it was completely empty from passing dirty tables still not cleaned up to the waitress just sitting down not taking our order with 10 minutes passed not even asking us what we wanted to drink we just got up and walked out.
Really fancied staying at this hotel bcause of the Egyptian them. To be honest it was a bit of a disappointment massive queue to check in I was overcharged and they lost some of my possessions. Food in the hotel also tasted like school dinners. Your experience may be different but I wo not stay there again.
The doctor prescribed me medication that I am allergic to. It was in my chart and I told her about my allergy in person. I ended up in the emergency room. The practice manager does not seem to care about the issue and their whole staff is awful.
I love the Grand Lux Cafe at the Venetian. It s open 24 hours and their service is really great for as crowded and busy as it gets!! This Grand Lux Cafe is fair. Took them a while to take our drinks took them even longer to bring our drinks water and even LONGER to bring us bread. It was also my friend s birthday and I asked the waitress to do something for her she said she would and never did. What a DRAG. The ahi ceviche was pretty good except there was not much tuna in it. And what looked like tuna was actually tomato. My friend said the short ribs were not too good either. This time around just was not the best experience.
Oh my god by far the slowest drive thru ever at night. Hire some more people. Sheesh!
Rude customer service. I am new to photography especially film and I was very put off by how they talked down to me rather than help me. I would go somewhere else if this was not the only camera place in Tempe. Maybe I just had a bad first experience.
Do not get me wrong Sals pizza is one of my favorite pizza joints. I come here often and frequently talk highly of Sals to all of my friends. But tonight I called ahead to see if they had jalapeo slices readily available for me to stop in and grab and the man on the phone replied no thus making me order a whole pizza because he would not make a jalapeo pizza with an hour left before close. I got to Sals to pick up my pizza and to my astonishment found a slice of jalapeo pizza sitting in the glass case ready for the taking of only 7. Now here i am with a 19 pizza when i called ahead making sure i only had to spend 7 and was lied to or perhaps he just did not check. Truly truly disappointed.
Worst wing place ever. Should ve read Eva H s review. Wings were heavily battered and tasted like cardboard.
I used to love this restaurant but after this past experience I m never going back. The wait was long about an hour and a half which was typical. But this time the cook we had. NOPE! The servers were very nice. Everything was pretty quick with our appetizers but watching the main course being made... I almost did not eat it. But it cost so much and we waited so long I figured I should suck it up. The cook EZ was not a clean individual. He wiped his hands on his apron A LOT. Unlike the servers he did not use gloves when handling the food. It was disgusting. Is this the standard? Are people okay with this? Because I m not. I could not finish my meal. This guy would not stop touching stuff with his bare hands! And that apron! While this was going on I was just focused on my food my friend witnessed interactions between him and the other patrons next to us. This cook named EZ very obviously favored and prioritized non colored patrons. He made facial expressions and negative gestures towards the POC at the bar. Served white people first and practically went in order of the shade of people s skin! This guy is a racist and he s a dirty cook to boot. The way he was acting. SO OBVIOUS. Never going back there. Vegas is a very diverse city. How is this guy getting away with it?! My friend and I are very disappointed. EDIT Reading past reviews I have now seen that this is not the first time racist dirty cooks have done this. Wish I would of read these before this happened.
Horrible! Just horrible! I ordered pickup and there is nothing positive I can say about our meal. The spinach artichoke dip was awful. The salad was basically greens with one cherry tomato two croutons and about four shreds of cheese. The steak I ordered medium was extremely rare the shrimp that came with it amounted to three pieces the garlic mashed potatoes were stiff and void of any garlic and the veggies were hard and undercooked. I have never had such a disappointing meal that cost 50 ever. I will never go to Applebee s again. I could have had a better meal at a fast food joint and a lot cheaper.
Could not tell you how the food is. After waiting 45 minutes from the time we placed our order we gave up cancelled and left. Giving 2 stars because our server was nice about it. Get it together guys terrible customer experience
Ok so I think it s fine to cross St. Louis off the list of places to eat all together. Got a take out sandwich today after getting messed around at the Newmarket location only to get back to the office to find the chicken in my chicken dill sandwich burger to be undercooked and slimy.
I just took the style they did on my child down. Sections of her hair are completely broken off because of their incompetent stylists and negligent instructors.
This place is horribly overpriced and just ugly as sin inside. Arrived and got the your in the wrong place looks probably because we re under 30. After 211 plus tip we got a 70 bottle of boujelais prime rib entree tiger shrimp entree and baked apple dessert. The veggies were frozen. The shrimp tasted terrible. The prime rib was mediocre at best and the baked apple dessert was 2 rings of apple not even a whole apple dusted in cinnamon and sugar with a scoop of ice cream. What a rip off! I would have had a better meal from the keg Baton Rouge or literally ANY OTHER STEAKHOUSE for less money. Do not go here!
Terrible experience. Offensive waitress demanding tips explicitly loudly and refusing to take a slightly cut yet 100 complete bill. More importantly the food does not taste fresh.
Everything was over salty and the mayo on the rice bowls was too rich overwhelming the rest of the flavors. Prices are too high for what you get.
The resorts are great but the sunwing flights are terrible on a 7h flight from Cuba SNU to Vancouver YVR they served us water twice the first time at 1.5h into the flight and then once more at 5h. Food? Forget about it there is only enough actual meals for the first 10 people and they re not free either! The rest got a cottonmouth turkey pita or soggy steak sandwiche for 10. I have never before been on a 7h flight where meals were not provided for everyone. No compensation offered for inadequate meals either. Ended up dehydrated and puking after this flight the worst experience I have ever had on a plane. The head flight attendant Naomi was not great at diplomacy either. Wo not be flying sunwing again.
We were in last night for my 40th birthday with a group of 7. My husband and I sat at the bar before everyone came and the two bartenders we met were amazing! Very friendly offered great suggestions and were easy to chat with. Then we moved to our table and it was a totally different vibe. Our server seemed like she did not want to be there and as far as the details went bringing plates for the appetizers getting a drink for the new arrival asking if we wanted another drink etc... she lacked. I asked her a few questions about ingredients and she had no clue. I would recommend knowing the menu you are working with. I ve been to the 7th St location a few times and have always had a great experience so we will stick with that one moving forward. Had a great time with my friends but would have loved a better dinner experience.
Waste of time. Do not go. I went for the jazz symphony thing and I truly regret it. Not fun at all all it is is music. If you love jazz I guess you ll like it but it is a totally boring event if you do not love jazz or symphony. I recommend not going and I will never go again.
This was our second visit to Kneaders. The first one was so busy that I decided to forgo a review till they got their staff trained. Tonight my wife and I went in for dinner and some desserts to take home. We started out by getting over charged and then after getting that straightened out all our food came out in to go packaging. What can ya do right? So we unwrapped our food and dug into what were supposed to be these terrific sandwiches. My wife s was a chicken salad on a croissant which contained virtually no chicken and a large pile of water chestnuts. She took it back and they gave her another sandwich which contained the same water chestnut salad but on the wrong bread. After complaining again the manager really seemed to care less. Sigh... My turkey sandwich was nothing special although the dirt on the lettuce was a special twist on an old classic. I did not even feel like speaking to the manager one more time as by this point I was just ready to get out of there. From reading other reviews it appears Kneaders did a terrible job of hiring any staff that are willing to pay attention to food quality and their customer satisfaction policies are non existent. Ron P s story about being told to bring back a salad so they could replace it was hard to believe but I believe it now. Good luck surviving in in Gilbert Kneaders. Your chain bakery competition is leagues ahead of you. Oh they do get one extra star as the desserts we took home keylime pie and canolli were quite tasty and reasonably priced.
Went there to night ordered milkshakes took 20 minutes to get them after receiving them two of them taste like they there been freezer burned or thawed out in the refrigerator the last time I went they gave me the wrong one I will not be back again poor service their rating ai not even been updated since August the floors look like a dumpster and smells like a dumpster
Hmm. .so I ve been to this restaurant a good amount of times and had good service and good food. Today on the other hand was a disappointing experience. My server was prompt but rude. My food was cold and served wrong. I asked for sunny side up eggs well done. .I got cold eggs with runny whites. I asked my server she said you wanted sunny side up. .I said yes but well done. Meaning cooked! She took my plate back and a few minutes later brought back my plate minus my eggs. They simply wiped off my eggs and brought back the remainder. Really! I was not happy with this place today.
I have never stayed at Diamond Resorts International but after watching a Undercover Boss episode on CBS I have decided I never will. The CEO of the company Stephen Cloobeck was not the most emphatic person which is a polite way to say he treated a lot of his employees like a real jerk . In some instances he was downright mean and abusive in his positional authority. I would not support an organization that does not support and treat its employees with dignity and respect. It would be great if he took he meaning of YES and applied it to his Diamond Resorts International employees and guests alike!
If there were less than one star to leave we would. We are a hung group who loves sushi and this was the worst experience we have had. Not only did our orders come out 45 minutes late they did it feel any remorse for our sushi coming out late and not fresh. Extremely disappointed after this place coming highly recommended to us. There were multiple times we asked about food and the waiter said that the owner was extremely busy and could not help. Will never come come back.
This was a rough stay. At first I was extremely pleased with the friendliness of the staff. You could tell the staff was trying their best with what they were given. I was booked into a king room. I believe the front desk upgraded me to a larger room which was nice however I quickly found that 50 of the lights did not work... there was blood on the sheets and the overall feel was dingy. The refrigerator had many large scratch marks and was missing paint. There were many areas in the room that could use painting or repair. For 140 dollars there are better options for a Monday night stay. I m fairly loyal to crowne plazas however I ca not say I ll come back to this one.
Tried to go last night at 7 and they were closed. I do not know what happened but there were seven of us and we had to scramble to find another place to eat in a hurry.
Fir such a beautiful city this airport is a travesty. It s incredibly difficult to navigate i ve been to 75 100 countries and am not new to finding my way around . It s filthy dirty from the restaurants to the seats in the terminal it s just 1970 s gross.
Inept bait and switch excuses lies and misrepresentations. If that s what you want call this place. They quoted me 50 to reinstall a ceiling fan which had the mounting bracket and wiring installed. The handyman showed up and had clearly never dealt with a ceiling fan. When he found it he had to install it he said that was much more. He called the office and they told him it would be 95. I explained to him that I had told Maria there apparently new that the fan was disassembled and that s what I needed done. I d explained it to her twice prior to her quoting me 50. He came back connected six wires and incorrectly no less as the fan light still does not work and since he wanted the full 95 for the installation I said I d finish and gave him a check for 50. When they called that afternoon to see if I was satisfied and I made it clear I was not I spoke to Cindy who explained that both Maria and Tony the inept installer were new. She said that she would send me a check for 25 to make up for the inconvenience. After not receiving the check I called and she gave me the run around about how her service manager and all involved thought that 50 was fair. 50 to connect some wires? The guy worked for literally 10 minutes. I asked her if she would pay that and after much hesitation she stated that she thought it was fair. I m reporting them to the BBB and telling everyone I know to avoid this place and to tell everyone they know the same! What ripoff artists. And from reading others reviews apparently they do this often.
I ve been to Buca di Beppo before at other locations but this branch made me remember why I am not a regular. They sat us in the rowdy bar area where guys were getting drunk and shouting at the TV prior to noon! even though we came for lunch and it was so cold that you could probably build a snowman. The management might want to save money during the winter but who wants to come into a restaurant that requires a jacket for warmth? Even after requesting more heat two different times it never came. The bartender was the server and she did not hide her ambivalent attitude toward her job. I m not sure that I blame her for that. The pizza was also a complete rip off go to Papa John s if you want pizza ! The crust was as thin as paper and the proportion of cheese to pizza sauce was about 1 to 5. The food echoed a desire of shareholders to up the profit margin. After all for most of their items there is a reason why they offer the big portions that they do it obviously allows them to reduce expenses staff energy itemized purchases and increase profit by serving in bulk under the guise that it is an Italian thing to have large portions to share. If you ve ever been to Italy you know that they all do not eat according to such a model! The Mozzarella Caprese is good though and can almost be a meal for two when coupled with the complimentary bread. The bread is nice and soft but like a child you are restricted to having the server pour the oil and vinegar. Aside from the yummy bread and Caprese I do not find much of a reason to return.
The two men at check in are wonderful and very friendly. The hotel is very nice and the rooms are great. However woke up at night due to the arguing in the room next door. Then we went to breakfast and the waitress never stopped by to give us anything to drink in fact she walked by us various times but did not stop once. Then while checking out the front desk staff looked miserable and did not smile once. That s not the kind of staff I want greeting guests. Disappointed!
The only reason I m giving this location a one star is one of the women who works here Sheila is EXTREMELY RUDE. She messes up our food. She rolls her eyes and scoffs after everything she says. Her manager is wonderful and the whole rest of the staff I ve never had a problem with but she ruins the whole experience. Unfortunately it s happened so often that at this point I would just rather not come back.
The Allison is under new management and has totally gone down the drain. Poor maintenance too many dogs trees that are falling down paint peeling off the exterior of the bldg. a c not working properly. This bldg. is over 25 yrs old and is falling apart. Management is rude and does not address tenant s concerns.
Poor service! The waiter seemed dislike people whom use groupon deal. Waited 20 mins to get water and another 30 mins for food. However a white girl came after us got her water within 30 seconds. I will definitely never go back again!
Absolute disorganization on Saturday night here. We were going to a show and needed to find a quick bite to eat. There was a line but it was small and seeing the amount of people standing around waiting for their food should have been a good indication of the problems but it was our only option for something quick at this point. We figured we d order something quick so we had 3 slices of pizza and split mozzarella sticks. Quick right? Heat the slices in the oven drop the mozzie sticks in the fryer should be done in 10 min? Nope. 40 min wait. Once we had ordered we sat at the table having a beer while waiting. I saw a couple people walk up to order their food and watched them walk out with pizza burgers etc and our number had still not been called! This happened 3 times. My bf went up to inquire about it and he said they grabbed a huge trail of paper from the machine and began fulfilling the orders of those standing around waiting forever for food. It s not a place where you re letting sauces reduce down! It s sandwiches salads pizza hot dogs hamburgers fries...c mon! Get it together! We literally had 10 minutes to scarf down our food and get to the show which ultimately ended in us both getting heartburn during the show. It was miserable and I will never visit this establishment again. We should have eaten at the noodle place beside it. People seemed to be getting their food in 5 min or less. In fact I saw two couples get food from the noodle place after we had placed our order. They were both done and out of there around the same time we received our food.
I usually find myself here once a week and I m always getting cold fry s with my drink jammed full of ice. I m just going to stop trying I thought Wendy s could do better than this. Greatly dissapointed.
If you re coming to Vegas for a bachelor party and you re lookin to ball on a budget the LINQ is all things considered a viable choice. Just know that the pennies you re pinching may be better spent at its manifold neighbors on the Strip. Upside? White Castle is a four minute walk away and there s a liquor store near parking. Essentials covered. To continue with the positives the service is fairly personable. I flew in two hours earlier than the rest of my party and could not immediately check in the attendants were happy to hold my bags while I roamed for drinks and even pointed me in the direction of some spots of interest. Ca not knock the staff. Main gripes the entire first floor is a dead zone for cell service and 4G LTE and the reception in the floors above is only marginally better. The spotty LINQ wi fi was more of a hassle than an amenity. Their parking situation was even more frustrating. The garage itself could use a remodel specifically to make the guiding signage clearer and more intuitive. But beyond that the backup to get out of the parking structure can get to be ridiculous. We found ourselves trapped in a queue for a solid 20 minutes trying to make it to Sunday brunch because a few people were having issues with the payment kiosk at the exit. These issues would ve maybe been bearable if they d stopped there. The room itself was more than presentable visually fresh modern simple two clean queen beds. The bathroom was the real issue. The sliding bathroom door sans lock was initially not a huge issue even with a full room of dumb drunkies to share a single toilet with... that is until we realized that the poor bathroom ventilation would end up making our room humid. Pair that with the fact that the general winding floorplan made it a challenge to even find the room the stay was less than great. Finding transport is not terribly hard even though the main entrance is not immediately accessible from the Strip cabs regularly pass through the valet area to pick up and drop off. If you re looking to use Uber or Lyft good luck. There s a designated ride share area a few yards from the lobby entrance but if your driver is not well acquainted with the labyrinthine passage to the LINQ s front space you re better off walking to Harrah s for your ride.
Made an appointment for ten am got there at 9 30 They did not even bring my car back until 11 45 Then waited ANOTHER 2 hours to change the brakes. Now I am no machanic however I have changed brakes before and it never took 2 hours. I think they make you wait a long time just so when they give you the outrageous quote you figure you ve already spent a half day here. The last thing you want to do is leave and have to go somewhere else and start the process all over again.
We shopped around online to see what options were available for off site parking for our trip and this place seemed like it would be a decent spot. We booked a covered parking spot online and printed our reservation. Driving in we asked the attendant in the front booth about the reservation and she said to park anywhere that was open so we explained that we had paid for covered parking and she said to just go ahead. So we drove over to the covered area and picked a spot. The shuttle bus driver was nice enough to swing by and pick us up as we were walking down with our stuff to the pick up area. He asked us where we parked and we showed him. He then explained that we would need to put a special pass on the dash to show we paid for covered parking which the front attendant should have given us. He helped us to secure that ticket and we were dropped at the airport shortly after. The way back to the car was a disaster. We approached the shuttle in the designated area and it was already full but the driver let us know that another was on its way in 2 minutes. The next driver passes us right on by and goes about ten car lengths up to another area completely obviously they do not communicate where they left people standing when one bus leaves people. One of the gentlemen standing next to us went down to the driver to explain we were all waiting at the other end so the driver made the loop add another 7 10 minutes for that to happen . We make it to the lot and the driver assumed we were all together so he drives the four of us back to the end of the lot and asks my fiancee to start unloading the other people s stuff which we had already told him when he asked us to load it at the airport that it was not our stuff. So we explained again that we were not together so he said Oh well I would have dropped you up front where your car was if I had known. We had already told him at least twice but he had not listened. Finally he drops us at our car 45 minutes after we arrived at that first shuttle bus back at the airport. To add to the wait we drove up to the attendant at the booth to leave and she ignored us for a solid 5 minutes while she texted on her phone. When she did open the window all she said was ticket and then after a second or two your total is without any other words. Not the friendliest person ever. Overall C We have another trip coming up and I doubt we will reuse this service. The first shuttle driver was the only saving grace here.
This place sucks.. I do not understand how a chain this big is so popular and crazy expensive! We had to find a place to eat on our way home. I ordered two biscuits and eggs scrambled No flavor bland and a lil soggy and the biscuits were hard as a freakin rock you could have thrown that shi and knocked someone out with them. Cracker Barrel do everyone a favor either lower your prices down to McDonalds menu prices or get some top notch chefs back there to cook up some damn good home cooked southern meals.. I should t of even paid for those two prehistoric rocks of a muffin...
Eek! Methinks not indeed. Is this place for you? Here s a checklist. If you like plates fresh out of the dishwasher that are still hot with crusted food on them and this was with multiple plates this is your buffet. If you are extremely sodium deficient this is your buffet. If you like carved meats that make you wish for a meat tenderizer to beat them with this is your buffet. If you like semi frozen out of the box desserts this is definitely your buffet. Go slow on your drinks as getting a server to refill it is next to impossible. When you walk in there are Zagat rated signs on the wall with all due respect this place is not worthy of being rated by Zagat. Your best bet is to stay on Boulder Highway and find someplace else to eat. One positive was the stir fry station manned by competent and friendly staff. It s the only thing that warrants a star.
2 stars only for the service. The waiter tried so hard to keep us there. Our food took almost 1 1 2 hrs for us to get Friday night 10 21. I ordered a 12oz chicken breast with cognac sauce and my husband ordered the orange roughy. My chicken was sooooo over cooked I could not even cut it. Beans were dried out and crusted over. Rice was crunchy. So either they had it done and kept it under the light so it over cooked or the chef really does not know when to take food off the grill. The fish was filled with bones. I actually left the bones in the bill holder to show them. I have eaten there before many times and it has never been amazing but it was fine. Last night was terrible it has made it so I will not go back. The owner knew and something was up. He kept coming around apologizing to people. Would have rather gone to Taco Bell.
Do not go when it s close to closing. 2 orders of Ph and two sandwiches. Nothing was hot. One of the Soups was room temperature. Not many veggies given for the to go. Too much money for food that I would consider left overs.
Unlike some other reviewers who have clearly never been to many record shops this place is not at all like High Fidelity. I think people who only shop at Worst Buy think any place that is not Worst Buy is some snooty Jack Black pretentious record shop. It is very overpriced and not at all special in it s selections. I ve always seen the same stuff over the course of a few visits over many years. The stock does not turn over much. The locale in downtown Kent is nice. Worth visiting every five or so years.
The black bean burger is NONVEGAN. The employee stated that the patty is made with egg and the cheese is pre placed on top of it.
My nails lasted about 1 week then started chipping off acrylics charged me 30 for horrible quality I will NOT be back.
I stopped in here for a nice dinner with my husband on our honeymoon. It was a very slow Tuesday early evening and despite the ample open tables and the fact that we were nearly run over by the throngs of shirtless kids coming from the nearby hotel pool the hostess acted very snobby and put out that we did not have reservations. After we were sat no one came by with menus for several awkward minutes. Service overall was incredibly slow especially considering how empty the restaurant was. Our server was very friendly and likable though when we saw him . The food was just ok. My husband loved his crawfish special but the restaurant was not very accommodating to my gluten free diet and several of my shrimp were not deveined yuck! Overall it was meh. I would not return considering the snooty atmosphere and less than stellar service. For the price this was definitely not worth it.
To call this place a restaurant would be very generous. Both times I have taken my family here I have walked out thinking to myself that food would not have been worth it at HALF the price. That s too bad because the selection of beer on tap is pretty broad and interesting despite the fact that the prices are way too high except during happy hour. When it first opened I liked the atmosphere in the place but it seems a bit on the dirty side now kind of beat up looking as if nobody really cares. And every meal that we ve had there has been awful. In the future I might stop in for a beer during happy hour but I would never order anything from the menu again.
Horrible experience. Was quoted one price which changed after I already paid. A waste of my time and money. The hours on here say that they re open until 5pm on Friday that s not true. They close at 4pm on Fridays.
This place needs to be imploded. And if it were not directly connected to the convention center I m certain it would have been imploded or sold and renamed some third rate dump casino . While walking in the bellhop did not even attempt to greet or otherwise assist with baggage. Upon check in you re given the choice to upgrade to a renovated room for 20. Problem 1. So right away they re taking away from your experience by saying well if you re not going to spend more money you re getting a less than stellar room ... Gold diamond level members get the renovated room. They did not have a single bed and the staff was unwilling to offer us a nicer room to get the room we had booked. Staff was lacking in general I think they know they re working for a dump and hear it all day long. After examining our first room we found it to be pretty dirty. I would not have wanted to walk barefoot in that room. Outside of the 1982 pink Formica tile in the bathroom there was a stash of pubic hair on the floor. A carpeted bath mat gross . The lamp shade was ripped in half. Everything about the place felt like a low grade motel. After finding the pubic hair we called at 4am to complain and the next day we got upgraded to a renovated room in the East tower 2575 . It was nicer but still below any other modern hotel s quality in Las Vegas. I would call it partially renovated. DNA on the desk chair. Also the tub leaked so there was a stream of water across the floor all day every day a real waste in the middle of a desert! . The place smelled strongly like sewer gas every time we entered the room. The buffet is DISGUSTING. And for 18 for brunch not worth it. Actually if it were 8 I probably would not go back. Most disgusting low grade food you ve ever seen. Everything is cooked to a shrivel and sits out. Eggs benedict were inedible. Super low quality everything. Patrons that are not smart enough to not leave the tongs sitting on the food gross . The only redeeming thing were the crab legs snow crab though not king . But really how many of those can one eat before you feel sick? Only fake HFCS iced tea. They have no club so gold diamond members get the buffet for free in the morning. I felt so dirty just sitting there eating the food. I d classify the buffet quality to be on the level of Old Country Buffet at best. The casino is so so mayyybe on par with other dive casinos. It s smokier than just about any dive casino I went to. There s not enough of a border between the hotel and casino the second you set foot in the hotel door you re encased in a stench that you wo not not smell until you leave the premises. If you re staying there for a convention and not to gamble this is probably annoying. The crowd in general is older on average nobody young purposely goes here. The only time we spent gambling there the power went out for a brief second and the slots rebooted mid play. The nearby Riviera the closest casino to the Hilton a 10 minute walk or so is just as old but smelled 100 times better and was a much younger crowd. The sports book room is pretty nice it s huge with projection TV s though it needs an HD update . Still a fine place to bet on some horses while getting free drinks. Their roulette minimums were 10 when other comparable casinos would be at 5 or less minimums. No rapid roulette. Pretty sad that the minimums here were the same as the minimums at Wynn. The Wynn Encore are probably a 15 20 minute walk and since you ll be looking for excuses to escape probably a walk you ll do several times. What s sad for the Hilton is their food pricing is about the same as Encore Wynn s yet anyone who has been to Wynn Encore knows everything about those two places STOMPS the Hilton. Hilton actually had the balls to have a page of appetizers on their room service menu where everything was 21 29 for a quantity of 6. 6 jalapeno poppers for 25. 6 chicken wings. etc etc. Are they insane? They nickel and dime you to death more than just about any other hotel chain is doing right now. 14 Internet. No free water. No free if you forgot toiletries. No free business center. They even charge 5 10 to accept a Fedex package for you that s just insane. They charge a room service fee 2.50 per person There s no reason in the world to stay here unless forced to because of a convention where employers require it. Still though there s a newish Renaissance on the opposite end of the Convention Center if you re needing to be close to the convention center. Outside of that there are much nicer hotels with much cheaper rates i.e. MGM . They re promoting that the building is 40 years old with posters and free T shirts.. Guess what guys AGE is not something you should be bragging about. 1 star Eek! Methinks not. True that true that. This place needs a few sticks of dynamite to lighten it up.
For starters when we sat in the waiting area there were two dead cockroaches flipped upside down in the middle of the floor. I wanted so badly to take a picture but realized how awkward that would be. Service was not good at all. Not attentive friendly or nice. I ordered an Arnold Palmer and I was given lemonade. I see things like this as a simple mistake so I kindly asked for tea since I ordered half and half. The server we actually had three people just rotating the whole time told me that there was probably tea in it and I just ca not tell because the tea is very subtle. I continued to tell her it was just lemonade but she said yeah it s just the tea is not really prominent ... Then when another lady came to refill my drink she topped it off with the house tea that I asked for. Seeing as how I barely touched my drink... It was weird to me that the tea instantly made my drink darker and the taste was definitely prominent. But I guess that was too hard for the first lady. Our food came out within fifteen minutes which really surprised me because there were quite a few others there as well. No complaints with my eggs benedict just thought it was a little pricey. The chicken fried steak was cold and soggy. Almost like it had been pre cooked and re heated. I could tell the flavor was there but overall it just was not appetizing because it did not taste or feel fresh at all. We had no one check on our table to see how the food was. But of course they did not hesitate to drop the check at the table and walk away. Overall I m very surprised and disappointed. I saw all the awesome reviews and also recognized it is Zagat rated which inclined me to go here. But after paying so much for lack luster food and terrible customer service... I ll pass on returning.
NO ELEVATOR! This is a two story hotel with no elevator not a big deal for me but wish I would have known prior to reserving the hotel because I have two small children. I will start with the bad. Reserved on hotels.com and they do not let you cancel and get a refund. We stayed in a room with two queen beds in the room the area where the bed are was small and the bathroom is even smaller. You had to walk in to the bathroom and get in the corner to shut the door. No ventilation in the bathroom so when you took a shower it got extremely hot in the bathroom because of it being so small and having no ventilation. The door to the room had cracks on the side and the bottom so light shined in from the hallway during the night. Parking lot was very small and had people hanging out in the back area of the parking lot during the night drinking and smoking. Hallways smelled like dirty laundry. One vending machine but everything in the vending machine was not available. In the morning times when the house keeping came around 7am they were very loud talking and slamming doors we were trying to sleep in because we were on vacation. Not an ideal way to be woken up in the morning. Guest came in and out of the rooms at night slamming the doors and talking pound in the hallway. AC unit work well and kept cool but was very loud at night. The thing that upset me the most about our stay was on our second night of staying I went to the front desk to request more towels. The host at the front desk said they had a limited amount of towels and could not give me but one towel. I told her that I had four people in my party and that we all needed to take showers and did not have any clean towels in the room. She was not helpful at all and said that I should use the towels from the night before. I told her that was not acceptable because those towels were used and dirty and that I need it at least four towels for the night but she could not accommodate it and would only give me one. I spoke to another host on check out and she was very apologetic about the situation and gave me a credit on my bill. That did not help the situation at the time but I appreciate her courtesy. Now for the good which is very minimal. This price was around 100 a night. The hotel seem to be recently remodeled the entrance and sitting area look nice and look remodeled. The rooms had fresh coat of paint and seem to be new beds and furniture. Around 30 inch Flat screen TV cable HBO and HDMI hook up. The nightstand have USB charging station with two USB ports. The water was very hot in the showers. They had continental breakfast but we did not eat it. I m surely not going to stay at this hotel again and I hope this review helps someone make up their mind when reserving for this hotel. This experience was not so pleasant and will make me think twice about staying in another quality Inn. I will most likely choose somewhere else.
Went here with a big group and were seated right away. The service was good. I would give the service 4.5 stars. The sushi was sub par. The nigiri had very thin slices of fish and way too much rice. Every roll I ordered was drenched in sauce perhaps to mask that the fish is not very fresh. Again waaaaaay too much rice! I feel like they want to stuff you with rice so you do not order so much for AYCE. I do not know why there are such fabulous reviews about this place. Perhaps because others have not tried Goyemon or Yama or Sushimon. For those sushi connoisseurs please skip this place unless you have a hankering for a lot of sushi rice.
When checking in I felt like I was standing in line for the Disneyland Indiana Jones ride. Ridiculously long. They only had three employees staffed during fight night weekend. I do not understand. And I m currently waiting as I m writing this review. Sad deal.
Have eaten in the restaurant and had delivery all the time. Basic bar food with basic taste and quality. The pizza use to be very good but the past 2 months they have been so bad I wo not order there any more. I think they changed to a cheaper sauce
We have been to this restaurant several times over the past few years. This was by far and away the worst experience. First of all they were out of several of the items but did not mention that until we begin ordering. The substitutions for the items were not even close. For example the tomato and cheese salad was substituted with grapefruit after they were out of the tomatoes cheese and dressing. Unbelievable. The sliders were very dry and we asked for them to not put on thousand Island dressing which they did anyways. The wings were extremely vinegary and had way too much sauce and less you like wearing your food. Mr. English needs to come in and do a serious check up on this restaurant. We wo not probably come back and would not recommend it to anyone as there are many better places around which is sad considering they have so many good beers
I do not understand why this place is so popular. Such a fad tries way too hard and HAS to be for people who think they are being cool trendy and healthy. No one can possibly come here starving because they will leave hungry as the portions are tiny and the food super bland. I ve been here twice and both times thought YUCK. I m all for healthy eating but the dishes here are just not worth it.
Good ambience and patio decent food. However waitstaff can be snobby patronizing. More importantly every time my friends or I call to make a reservation it is a massive undertaking expect to call at least 10 times before anyone picks up no matter when you call I ve been here enough times to know . I m aware that reservations can be made online but why have a phone line that no one mans? Disappointing service.
Tried to order pizza at 820. I was told They were done for the night . I wo not bother again. A pizza place that does not stay open in Las Vegas. Please!
First time here when pulling up the parking lot was full. We ate breakfast on Sunday morning the portions were large good variety on the menu and the food tasted great. The only thing that did not appeal to me was the cleanliness of the place. Light fixtures and window sills were in bad need of dusting. No matter how good the food prices or service there is no greater turn off then sitting next to a window with dead flies laying there.
I would give five stars because the food was good and the service was good. Reason for one star? My sister ordered pancakes and wanted fruit instead of syrup. Requested bananas and strawberries. What a joke! For .99 she received 4 1 4 slices of banana and for .99 a small sliced strawberry.
0 stars!! I got a manicure on 11 3 with the young lady at Table 6 and was in Urgent Care by 11 10 with a pretty severe nail infection. By 11 11 the pain was so unbearable I checked in the ER! It was a very PAINFUL experience and I am still dealing with the symptoms. I will also require additional care so lesson learned! My first time was my NEVER AGAIN!
Terrible service the manager does not do anything I ve had two messed up orders and all with clean instructions First I order honey bbq wings they get labeled honey bbq but no sauce on them. Another time I orders a pizza for my grandma and they did not deliver until 2 hours later and cold. She sent it back and still took an extra 1 hour. I m done with them never again will I order from them! Domino s all the way!!!!! Pizza Hut on jones and Lakemead can quote me!!!!
I asked for a regular sugar free iced coffee and was essentially given a cup of milk. I am almost certain there is ZERO coffee in this.
My friends and I went here late at night and we just ordered appetizers. We had the Calamari and the Chicken Nachos and I have to say both of them tasted very mediocre. I feel like more flavor could of have been added to both dishes. The atmosphere of the restaurant was very pleasant and the staff were very friendly!
Not as great as we had hoped heard and read. A couple of my girlfriends and I came here for Brunch on a Sunday afternoon. It was noon but still cookin up brunch meals. I was happy bout that since I was excited about tryn their Chilaquiles. They also had a Bloody Mary bar going on but since I d had my fill of drinks the night before at the Chandler Craft Drinks Festival I decided to give my liver a rest and not partake. A friend and I order the chilaquiles with scrambled eggs. My other gal pal ordered the eggs Benedict w chorizo sausage patty. We wait. Not long after our food comes. It does not look very pretty. The filet minon strips were way over cooked. The beans looked dry and the main course chilaquiles looked like a slop of mashed up over cooked enchiladas. Eggs were not mixed in they were on the side. Ok so whatever it does not look good. I can get past that if it tastes good. Well it did not . The chilaquiles tasted like a spicy masa over cooked and mashed up corn tortillas . For those of you that do not know chilaquiles is diced up corn tortillas pan fried to a light crisp w eggs and enchilada sauce meat added optional. What was presented was not at all what I was expecting or used to. My friend was so disappointed that she requested chips to substitute her need for a lil crunchy tortilla. Plus she was even more upset because the menu clearly stated that it came with queso fresco and crema sour cream and it came with neither. I check in to take advantage of the free chips and salsa offer. We ate what we could muster which was not much. However my friend that ordered the Benedict loved it! The waitress was kind enough to take our chilaquiles dishes off our bill. I should ve known better than to eat out at a Mexican food place. I m always disappointed. Nobody cooks like moms. The place it s self is cute. A lil dark inside which is nice during the summer heat days.
I am appalled at how Kennywood has responded to a crime that was committed at the park. My mother was assaulted and injured at the park on August 19. The medics were called and took care of my mother but not one employees attempted to apprehend the woman who ran her over on a scooter that was rented at Kennywood. The criminal was driving a scooter and ran over my elderly mother while she was helping her great granddaughter. She ran her over from behind and my mother fell face first in the ground and she continued to drive over my mother. Then the criminal backed up and ran away! She did not even stay to see if my mom was ok and not one employee attempted to apprehend her. She was on a scooter and there were witnesses who saw the crime. My mother has injuries and has called the park numerous times and no one returns her calls!!! It s unbelievable!!!
Malpropret extrme et odeur trs dsagrable provenant de la cuisine. Le grant est trs abusif envers ses employes qui ont de l air plus d esclaves que d autres choses.
went here for insoles. They tell you they are 300 including visits to fit and adjust... we want to make sure they fit . So why do they bill over bill my insurance company EVERY visit???? The back room staff and doctor are rude short on attention and service. I recommend you go elsewhere if you prefer honesty.
I really wanted to like this place. Unfortunately the costumer service Was so extremely! Horrible we will never! Return. I visited this place with my parents Who are from Ca visiting and wanted them to Have a good experience. I also had my 2 children With me. We was excited because everything on The menu seemed really good. We ordered a lot! Of food. We had not eaten that day saving our appetite for this place. My daughter had a corn beef sandwich and it was just Ok. Nothing great. My parents each had a full sandwich I ca not recall what type. They each had a hotdog as well. We also had bagel chips and each of us had a knish. And I had a grilled pastrami and corn beef combo sandwich And we also had a few desserts.. everything was was just mediocre. Some things were not good at all. Especially the fries yuk! The biggest issue however was not the food. Even though it was not very good we still ate it and did not complain. But my 6 year old son ordered the kids meal chicken strips which was like 4.99 or something and the chicken was hard as a rock! There was no way he could have eaten it. Now mind you at one point our waitress was missing she never came back to check on us after the food came out. And everything came out one meal at a time which was very annoying. Especially when there s five starving people. She was very! Slow and took forever. But still no one said anything. She finally came back and asked how everything was I told her politely that everything was fine except for my son s chicken strips were not edible especially since he has difficulties swallowing. She took them away in a very rude way and said she will tell the manager. The manager I wish I knew his name! Was probably one of the worst! Managers I ever seen in customer service. He approached me in a very rude way and the first thing that came out of his mouth was your son did not even try a bite! How can I take them off your bill! I explained to him that he did try but was scared to eat anymore because he has difficulties swallowing hard food and then the jerk said that s YOUR PROBLEM! as a mother you should have known not to order him chicken strips. I was in Shock and disbelief. I told him my son was totally fine eating chicken strips but those were like trying to eat a rock! It seemed very clear to me that I was getting nowhere with this rude cranky manager. My parents were also in disbelief because of his ugly attitude. He did not take it off the bill and we just paid and left. Over all this place was a nightmare. We paid a lot of money for the mediocre food we just wanted to be treated with kindness and consideration like anyone else but no the jerk MOM shamed me over a 4.99 kids meal. I hope every day he has to endure extremely negative customers just as bad as he is.
The service was pretty good for the most part. Not overly friendly but somewhat attentive. My order was put in the computer wrong but they brought me the right thing without any questions asked. As previously mentioned by others this is way overpriced for what you get. The quality of barbecue is highly disappointing for something that is being served in NC. The BBQ is not smoky and the sauce is bland. The amount of meat we got pork was shabby. The sides are really small and I think the size of a large Jell O shot is accurate. The cobbler was disappointing as were the baked beans. The red beans and rice were yucky. The Mac and cheese was ok. The cornbread was eh. I would not go back. There are way better BBQ places all over the Charlotte metro area.
Poor service. My pint of somersby was 3 4 ice 1 4 somersby so I requested just somersby in the pint glass and the ice in a separate glass then they bring me my pint and it s just over half full
I ca not think of a reason to give anyone an opportunity to insult and abuse when they are supposed to provide professional care for a delicate eye condition. I have noticed that in many cases the attitude and tone adopted by staff comes directly from the top. Dr. Gross has shown himself to us and many others to be self absorbed childish an equal opportunity boor that scared the daylights out of us. We had much at stake when seeking eye care and were glad that this professional practice was not prepared to provide care to my husband who has total disabilities and was nearly blind in one eye due to cataracts. We were rushed and told they were wasting time and Dr. Gross complained twice that Medicare did not pay him enough to do this work. When I described our experience to a scheduler she reported to him and he called and ripped me a brand new one. Then he followed with as certified letter saying he would not care for the patient. We were so glad. We had not planned to go back after being subjected to his behavior and that of his staff. Please save yourselves. We feel lucky for the warning.
Horrible experience. Worked on my loan for 4 months. Back and forth for statements and payoffs up until closing. Received at least 2 email telling me my loan was approved and no more stress . Signed closing docs three days late. Day before I was to receive my keys Homeowners drops bombshell that loan wo not fund. I had utilities turned on and furniture being delivered. Nobody cared. Shameful. Save yourself the heartache.
I was really looking forward to a burger after a a long rough weekend in Vegas. I remember eating at Ruby s when I lived in San Diego so I was excited. Ill say that maybe i ve had alot of good burgers in the mean time I guess but i was not all that impressed with the burger. Maybe its because they have to crank out a ton at the airport so they skimp on quality but I remember them being much better. I will say that the onion rings were gigantic and will most likely kill you but they looked delicious. If you re in a pinch at the airport give Ruby s a try because burger king is about your only other burger option.
Meh not awful but far from my favorite in town. I wanted to love it...loud hot crowded good sign but being 115 outside the only seats were by the line. Kinda uncomfortable having people and kids over your shoulder and touching your back while you scrape the fat a lot way more than half off your 7 rib. Good flavor and texture on the 4 bites I did have though.
Not impressed with this dealership. We walked in with financing ready with our bank test drove the truck I researched on line prior and it still took over 3 hours to get out of there. The sales lady was great but she was doing to much at once. So that left us frustrated and waiting. The next day we brought the car to them to pay for the truck and we still do not have the green slip 1 wk later. They promised floor mats new truck 2016 bc they are on back order. Let s see how many times I have to follow up.
Visited Feb 2015 Sugar Content Extremely High. I felt my blood sugar rise after drinking it. Alcohol Content Extremely Low. I have a high tolerance so maybe I m being biased but all I could taste was sugar. Price You re paying a lot for a bunch of sugar. Go to a 7 11 buy a slurpee and spike it so much cheaper! Overall I ll pass!
Za s used to be better. Other than convenience good location there s not a whole lot going for them. It s overrated by most U of I students crowded at lunchtime and the food is not anything special. The quality of both the garlic bread and the overal cleanliness of the restaurant have steeply dropped in the past couple of years.
Maybe I m spoiled because i started eating Majority of my Korean favorites in Hawaii . Hawaii has awesome Korean food .With that being said i was not impressed . I have wanted to try for a long time . I m glad i got it over with but i will probably not be returning everything was either OK or lacking flavor . We arrived at around 530 and already had plans to go to the gym . So we took it to go . Since we wanted to try the meats we decided on a Bulgogi Burrito and a combo plate with chicken and Spicy pork . This way we get to try all three meats in one visit. I have a weakness for Korean and Mexican food so this place was a no brainer for me . The gentlemen who took our order was prompt to greet us and take our order . During our order I stated i wanted to have the lettuce and pico on the side since we were taking it home and eating it later . I thought the Bulgogi Burrito came with kimchee. More Korean flavor is awesome right ? Nope . In photos it shows it on the side of the burrito but i did not get any . Thats fine . I can do without the kimchee . What i cant do without is flavorless meat . That s what we got . Bulgogi Burrito The wimpy burrito had rice and bulgogi or whats supposed to be bulgogi. People claiming there burritos were humongous . Not mine i could have got a bigger burrito at Roberto s . Maybe it was small because it did not have lettuce or pico in it . Honestly who wants lettuce in a burrito if food is served warm the lettuce would become soggy . Not a good idea IMO . The meat was lacking flavor and the rice well mexcian rice is simple so nothing stand outish or special about this at all. I even put the sweet spicy red sauce on the burrito and frankly that s the only thing that saved it . Not to mention my first bite was gristle . I hate gristle . Uhhhh ! Annoying ! Combo Plate Chicken ans Spicy Pork Combo Plate Sub white Rice for Spanish rice . Chicken well it was just chicken not to much flavor just tasted like cut up sauteed chicken . Could use some salt thats how bland it was . Spicy Pork Not even close ? Bland boring and weak . Sauces Theres a red one that has a weird vinegary taste . Not a fan Sweet Spicy Sauce I actually liked the sweet spicy sauce that has a sesame flavor Actually i loved it . I would eat it on any food that i put hot sauce on . Green Sauce Standard green Sauce its aiiightt Pico De Gallo Needs more cilantro IMO it was ok . Pico doesnt need that much attention not even this was good . Korean Slaw Cabbage and cilantro slaw basically . Also boring . Tasteless and boring . I paid a dollar for this crap . Just get this meal over with is all i can think about . Maybe the marinades need tweaking or marinade for longer . I do not know but they did not win me over Komex fusion needs to fuse some flavor because Flavortown kicked them out upon arrival .
The worst customer service ever!!! This is the second time I had the worst experience and service ever! I m not one to write reviews but this WOWED me in how this Dunkin donuts is operated. This place is a joke! I went through drive through ordered a donut and coffee and what do I get?!? The worst service ever! I m not going to sit here and say names but let me tell you that a nice friendly letter not friendly will be sent to corporate in regards to these two incidents. Better shut down that place before your own employees do!!
This place is only unique for their iPad ordering system which is that unique. The food is not anything special if anything i do not really like how it tastes. The sushi has this sort of citrusy taste that makes me feel ill. Been here twice once last year and once this year assuming thief changed something but they did not so i still do not like it. I will not be returning unfortunately. There are places that cost less that taste so much better.
Been here a few times Early Saturday morning The staff are super nice But it always takes up to 10 to 15 minutes wait And there is always confusion with to go or eat in Seems like all the locations have issues Why ca not the management team support here
Really terrible Japanese restaurant. Ordered 11 sashimi bento for lunch sashimi size is terribly small over all food quality is below average no recommend.
Do not order delivery from this place. The drivers try and pull the oldest trick in the book. I have no change. You are my first delivery . When I went to look for more money since he could not provide more change he started ringing my doorbell over and over. I was gone less then 10 seconds. He started yelling at me. I am not the F and ing boss! I have no change I told you . He scared my family. It was crazy. I called the Restaraunt and was told the owner would call me back. I never received a call from the owner. My family was scared that this nut would come back. Stay away from this place
This place was PACKED at lunch so they must be doing something right. But it s definitely not the Pad Thai. They sat me immediately and took my order fairly quickly but then it was over a half hour before I got my entree. The Pad Thai was edible but seriously lacking in flavor. I asked for it medium spicy but there was no heat whatsoever. Just a bland almost maple syrup flavor. I would have asked for some hot sauce but between delivery of the food and the bill nobody checked on me. Guess I ca not complain too much however as it was relatively cheap. But is not most Thai food? .
This place stinks! If you have ever had real Persian this is not it. It is Mediterranean fast food with high prices and slow service for what it is. Definitely a disappointment.
If you look at my reviews I usually use Yelp to promote places in a positive light. This place is terrible and so bad I have to share. The place has cheap decor I ordered just some fries because nothing else was within my diet. It seemed like a half order with terrible presentation. We ordered four drinks and three of them Mojitos. The bartender has no freaking idea how to make one and it was so overly sweet we asked for something else. When she delivered them she was sloppy and short then when we returned them even worse. We apologized and even said we are good tippers but just want a good drink. She was snappy and rude about her mistake. You do not put sour mix in a Mojito specially half way up the glass. We moved outside because inside was so bad. The weather was nice so that helped but overall the experience was so bad I would never ever go back. Even the hookah we got did not work and they had to grab another. Bad drinks bad food bad decor then terrible service. Do not go.
My friends and I arrived at 5 Guys at 9 42pm on a Thursday evening. They are open until 10pm. I was the first one through the door and approached the counter where the young man offered to take my order. Other members of my party began to trickle in behind me and I apologized for coming in with a group of 7 so near closing. It was at this time that a young man wiping tables piped up and stated that they could not serve us because it was too close to 10 00. It was now 9 44. One of my friends asked him if it was the policy of the store to stop serving before 10 00 and he insisted that they could not take our order My GM said to stop serving . My friend asked again if they could serve us as it seemed unlikely this was store policy. This young man who s name I am withholding said without making eye contact with any of us Fine then! If you want to order go ahead and order and returned to wiping tables. Hmmmmm... Should we have our food prepared by someone who is being somewhat hostile towards us and does not want to serve us? No thanks. I like most of the members of our party have worked in food service and or retail at some point and we know how it works. You take orders or seat guests until close. Does it suck when someone comes in near close? YES but that is just the way it works . It was not imperative that we have 5 Guys but it was the only nearby place one member of our party gluten free could eat. We chose to not eat at 5 Guys in light of the unwelcoming attitude we received. We went to Steak N Shake where our gluten free friend enjoyed a glass of water. You guys blow. Seriously.
I ordered my food online and this is what happened when i went to go pick it up..I must mention it was also a very slow night i saw 2 customers and about 7 staff members. When i arrived to this restaurant I was not greeted with a friendly hello or how are you i was greeted with are you the online order? . I said yes and was pointed to my order which was sitting on the counter. I looked inside and saw my hamburger and fries but only one order of fried pickles. I told the women dianna at the register I had 2 orders of fried pickles and was quickly snapped back with no you did not . I said then can you explain to me how my order comes to 25 with a 6 order of fried pickles and a 8 burger. she dianna pulled out the invoice waved it in my face and put it back behind the counter before i could even touch it or look at it. when i said 8 and 6 only make 14 and that a paid for another order she rolled her eyes and told the cooks to make me another order. then i checked my burger i put very specific instructions that i only wanted bacon lettuce and pickles. no condiments or cheese. i open it up to find not only was it slathered in cheese but also mayo! I told her this is not what i ordered and had to ask her to remake it 3 times before she stopped staring at me and had it remade. she then walked away no apology or anything i did not see her again while i waited and extra 20 mins for my order. Another waitress came over and was extremely sweet and double checked my food before letting me check it again she sat and talked to me while i waited and was very apologetic and i was impressed with how she handled me being a very upset customer her name was annie. I also came to find out that dianna the women who was extremely rude to me was the assistant manager! I am appalled at the customer service i received by this women dianna. I have been in customer service for 7 years and i have never seen someone so unprofessional!!! my suggestion to this location is to fire dianna and make annie a manager at least then you would not get such awful reviews!!!
If i could rate them zero i would. Old Republic sent this company out to my house on a service call due to the garage door squealing. They barely touched the chain and said my door needed a tune up and it would not be covered under warranty and it would cost me 100 out of pocket. I told them i had a service provider from OR back in Sept of 2017 out repairing the garage door opener gear spocket. They instantly blamed thr squealing on the chain and said the chain was too tight. I called Old Repubic and they said they would send back out the original service provider who came out in sept of 2017. Well they came out today and said my door doesnt need a tune up and they chain is perfect. They did alittle more looking at the chain area and found the trolley needed to be replaced and would be covered under warranty. Funny part is when i brought up the trolley last week to Dependable to service tech said trolleys dont go bad. Shame on Dependable for trying to make a quick buck for a service i didnt need. If they would of looked at the trolley they would of found the problem last week. Stay away from Dependable Garage door Service at all cost.
Okay so it seriously pains me to write this as I REALLY wanted to have the best time ever at this shop since it s really close to me and i love small businesses. I hope that what I experienced was a bit of a one off but whatever thought I d share my experience and y all can judge for yourselves what you want to do. So it was the end of the winter finally and my bike needed a tune up super badly. I had called around and most places were giving it two weeks Ride Away told me they could have it in a few days. This was great b c I had plans to head out of town for a week about 4 days after I brought it in they said they should have it done before I left. Sweet. I needed a flat fixed a tune up and new grips for my handlebars. Writing all this is going to mean ppl can identify which customer I am and potentially give me stink eye around the neighbourhood but whatever. There were 2 dudes who I encountered one I will refer to as just Dude and the other as Super Nice Dude SND . Dude was the original person who took in my bike and who I also mentioned my trip specifics and asked about if it took longer if I could keep it there while I was away. No problem no problem I was assured and that it d be done before then anyway. A few days later I get a call from someone SND I think? about needing to bring something in so they could take off my tire I hustled and got it in that night. I take responsibility for totally forgetting about my wheel being locked but at the same time I ve been to tons of bike stores in the city and it s never something the mechanic or person helping me has not noticed immediately and asked me for on the spot I always have the key on my person so can provide instantly . Anyway I go in and give it to SND who is super super nice and says that the bike prob wo not be ready before I leave but that storage ai not no thang and not to worry about it at all. I am super stoked at this point! Then I m out of town and in that week get two angry sounding voicemails from someone who is presumably not SND about how I am apparently racking up a storage fee per day and how I had better come in ASAP if I did not want to get charged even more money. This was pretty stressful and annoying because I was under the impression that shit was on lockdown and that I did not need to worry about it. Anyway I go back to the shop when I m back from my trip and thank god SND is the person there to help me. Phew! He says do not worry about the voice mails and that whoever that guy is just does that sometimes gets mad at people? I have no idea . I wish there was some communication between staff because those phone calls stressed me out! So I pay and get my bike back and the new grips are not on the handlebars. SND notices and apologizes and puts them on for me. Still decently in a good mood at this place though very confused at how something so basic can be overlooked by the mechanic who was apparently not SND . So I go around for a bit of a ride and my bike rides like shit. I ca not believe it but it seems like they did not even oil my chain. Are you kidding? Everything was also incredibly loose and wobbly feeling technical term I know which I have never encountered after a tune up in all the years that I have been alive and riding bikes which is long enough that i should know how to service my own bike at this point but whatever. I take it back in and thank god SND is there again and takes it into the back for the chain to be oiled up. I still ca not believe how basic of a thing this was that it was completely overlooked and it makes me wonder what else was overlooked. My bike feels like it still needs a tune up and I ll probably end up taking it in somewhere else for just that before the summer is over. I feel kind of bad writing this but I do not feel like there is any excuse for my experience. I wanted to like a bike shop that seems down to earth and not pretentious but I m sorry no matter how nice some of your staff are if your mechanic forgets to oil a chain and put on new grips then I really wo not be coming back.
Diamond use to be a favorite of mine in this area especially with the Penguin no longer around. I fortunately am able to remember the days where Diamond provided amazing service and some tasty southern food. Unfortunately this is no longer the case the past few times we have been have been disastrous and each time I say next time will be better. This last time however made us realize we will no longer be wasting any more money at the Diamond. The server was less than friendly and seemed to be more concerned about flirting with a table of drunk guys than giving attention to her other tables. I ordered a hamburger and when our food came out a hot dog was placed in front of me and I politely told the server that this is not what I had ordered and she proceeded to challenge me because that is not what she had written down. After going back and forth and her acting as if it would be a huge ordeal to get me the food I had actually ordered I said what I had would be fine. I know that probably comes down on me for not insisting on getting what I had ordered in the first place but I was starving and we wanted to leave the restaurant as soon as possible. Most restaurants when they make this mistake of giving you something you completely did not order do not charge you for the meal that s not the case at the Diamond. The meal was on our ticket and no apology. I want the Diamond to be better because I know what it use to be. There are just too many other places within walking distance that are ten times better so if you are looking for a restaurant that cares I would suggest Dish Pint Central Workman s Friend Pizza Peel Midwood Smokehouse.
Hate to write this since I really really REALLY wanted to get my hair done here. I ve been searching for someone to do my summer hair that was not at the Habit salon. After countless time spent stalking instagram pages I came across Erika and just HAD to have her do mine. I contacted Erika on Sunday to try and have her work her magic on my hair. Figuring she would not get to me til the next business day she only texted me twice an hour or so after she posted something on Instagram. Then after those 2 responses I have not heard from her since it s Thursday . I understand if you re a busy stylist but if you have the time to post on social media then you have the time to respond to a text from potential client! Super bummed guess I gotta keep searching
We used Sin City Smokers for our company bar b que picnic. It was delicious. They brought so much food we got to eat sumptously twice. Highly recommended.
Had to give them the benefit of the doubt after a first bad experience but my second was just as bad. Overall poor customer service with phone calls being transferred from department to department only to end at a voicemail to service providers who try to arrange service and pickups over the phone only to be provided inaccurate information. I dealt with Jose in the service department and while being new to the company I was overall disappointed in the attitude and customer service he offered. Given that my Jeep is 10 years old I will be looking for a new Jeep in the next few years but will certainly not be shopping here. addition A big thank you to the manager Roger for taking time to speak with me to clarify issues and do major service recovery.
I regretfully post a 1 star review for what used to be one of my favorite breakfast places. Called to order protein pancakes for a pick up. I was given a choice of 3 different sides hash cottage cheese or fruit . None of those sounded appealing so I requested 2 eggs as a replacement. I was told that they would not do a substitution and I had to choose between the 3 options because eggs were more expensive. Eggs are not more expensive according to their menu which I immediately pointed out but there was no budging the person who was taking my order. I had to take 1 of the 3 options and make a separate side order for what I wanted eggs or bacon even though they had a lower menu price. I said thanks but no thanks and hung up the phone. Never again.
I always have a nice experience but today was awful the ladies were rude and not helpful I will never go back
Do not Drink here! It tastes like they use dirty dishwater to water the drinks down The service was great! The food was subpar I ordered the veggie enchiladas and the best part was the rice and beans on the side. Chips and salsa was good
Dang! It s McDonalds! Ca not they do better then this? Go through the drive thru..easy order..they make me pull ahead. I wait at least 15 20 minutes..wait?? This is McDonalds! I call the store from my phone. The girl is pretty tired of her co workers she says. Gave me my order plus money back! Thanks
The sales team and pricing were great they always showed up on time and were very thorough and responsive with my questions. The lead time from when I ordered the windows to installation was minimal and just as they estimated. Unfortunately we just did not have a great experience with the installation. They cut the hardwires of our alarm system in the process of removing the windows as opposed to just taking the extra 30 seconds to remove the pads attached to the window frames. As a result we had to have the entire house rewired at the cost of 600. True View s response was to tell me that we were responsible for dealing with the alarm beforehand and that it was noted on the second page of the contract which for whatever reason I never received a copy of after I signed so never had a good chance to sit and read it thoroughly . I see their point and understand that it s probably something I should have thought to prepare for beforehand but I just find it inexcusable that the installers never questioned it and hastily cut through wires to what was clearly a functioning system without asking me first when I was there in the house. I also would have appreciated someone mentioning it to me during one of the earlier sales or measuring visits to my home when I would have had weeks to prepare. On top of that I was told during the measurement visit that the installers would be bringing insulating spray foam to fill in a nearly 4 gap that would be left around a patio door replacement. When I asked the installation crew they said they did not have it with them and in fact never carried it on their truck as standard practice. So I had to drop everything and quickly run out to buy some myself before they left. I just expected a higher level of service and care from True View and unfortunately I do not think I ll go back to them for the rest of my window replacement project.
I have used Oveenight Prints for several years with no issues but recently that has changed. The last two orders have arrived several days after the date they were supposed to arrive even though I paid extra for the faster shipping. I m not sure I will order from them again.
I wish I could give less then 1 star. Service was slow food was the worst!!! 4 out of 5 of our meals were not palatable. My sons kids meal dessert never came after 2 requests. Drinks were great would have ordered another but waitress was missing for most of our dinner. After the meal 3 out of 5 left feeling ill. After paying 60 tab for 2 adults 1 child I went home and cooked. I could have complained at restaurant but it appears all Staff are magic and can disappear. Salsa gross cheese dip was chunk of hard cold cheese with greasy butter on top
I was really craving guac and I really wanted to try this popular American chain. I have that coriander intolerance where the stuff tastes gross to me. It s apparently pretty common. EVERY SINGLE TOPPING HAS CORIANDER ON IT. Rice? Coriander. Tomatoes? Coriander. GUAC?!?!?!?! CORIANDER. What kind of monster puts coriander in guacamole? Honestly. Okay whatever. That s their style of food. Lots of people like coriander. They ca not cater to my tastes and that s fine. The only things I could get on my tacos were hot sauce sour cream and lettuce. Lettuce......... The teenager working there gave me THREE SHREDS OF LETTUCE PER TACO. How expensive is lettuce?! IS THERE A LETTUCE CRISIS THAT I DON T KNOW ABOUT?! I basically came out with 3 plain tacos that I paid over ten dollars for. I m a fool. Holy caps lock Batman! I apologize for the style of this review I got pretty heated while writing it.
Food is ok. Price is fair. Choices are decent. But the only down side is they do not support veterans. Everywhere else in Vegas does support vets but this place... I would give more stars if they would.
If I could give no stars I would but I have to in order to leave a review. Do NOT let your tow truck driver convince you to take you here. I was in Las Vegas visiting from California and the tow truck driver took advantage of the fact that I was not familiar with the area. Tow truck driver assured me this was a safe place and they would not take advantage of me and that they would not charge me for a diagnostic fee unless I asked them to. Sure enough that was a lie! Do not sign any paper because it s in small print that they charge that fee even if the tow truck driver says they do not charge. When I was picked up I told him exactly what was wrong with the car and tow truck driver insisted it was something more than what I said. The place and area is also very sketchy. You have to be buzzed to get in and you have to be let out by someone. You ca not get out yourself. I also sat there for a hour and a half before they even looked at my car. So I was charged 100 diagnostic fee even though they never asked if they could do that. Supposedly they said the diagnostic said I needed to replace a part that was going to cost another 60 not including labor. All the car needed was brake fluid which that s what I originally told truck driver. So basically I was charged 100 for brake fluid. As soon as I made it back to California the part they told me I need to replace was all false my mechanic said that part did not need to be replaced. If it were not for the fact that I told the repair shop in Vegas to go ahead and just put the fluid and I ll get the part fixed at home because I need to leave back to California they would have charged me more just to replace a part that did not need to be fixed in the first place. This place is supposedly a AAA certified place. I called AAA to report them and I also called the Nevada business bureau. They should be put out of business. I was in Vegas visiting my father who is in retirement home for his bday I went out there with 250 in my pocket. I m a single mom and it just burns a hole in my stomach that there are such horrible scammers out there like this place. Something good always comes out of something bad so I just hope this review will help someone else.
I went for lunch yesterday without a reservation. We were early most of the tables inside were empty. Nonetheless we were given a horrible small table in the middle of the room. I requested a table against the wall but were told they were all reserved. No one sat in them for at least 45 minutes. We ordered the salad with the anchovy dressing. It was ok but you could not taste any anchovy. I could make a better salad at home in two minutes. And our table was too small to have a breadbasket. We also split a pizza. We were informed for at least three minutes by our server that the restaurant no longer cuts pizzas because they get soggy in the middle but they bring us these wonderful pizza knives so that we can cut our own. When the pizza came we cut it in half and split it then out the big plate under our individual plates because again there was not enough room on the table for all the plates. The pizza was fine actually delicious and not soggy. The tomato sauce is incredible. I do not know if I will go back though. This restaurant definitely cannot handle a crowd and they are a little rude. I am not sure that the pizza is worth the substandard treatment by the hostesses and the servers.
Upon entering the restaurant the initial thought was that it was nicely decorated and had a cool concept...went downhill from there. There were no definitive system for customers to line up in and the employees were far from being friendly...they were unfriendly and rude no greetings or even a how can I help you? . Yes the signs do say line 1 al pastor line 2 carnitas... and so forth but customers around us did not have a clue hat the process was line formation interferes with the salsa bar and if you re up you proceed to the line that is open even if you do not want the meat that is in that line and ca not proceed to said line to order a different meat from a different line. I specifically ordered al pastor tacos with onion and cilantro ONLY I got everything on it and the employee proceeded to tell me it is what I wanted pushing the plate towards me and rudely told me if I do not want it he can probably make it again... I just told him no as it felt like I was already inconveniencing him he proceeded to wrap my plate up while talking about me to another employee in Spanish. One I understand Spanish and two even if I did not it s obvious when someone is talking badly about someone else. Paying for our food was not a different story either. 2.25 for a taco about half the size of an appetizer paper plate is still expensive. Two stars for concept decor bar option food item varieties and flavor of food.
I really wish we would have known ahead of time that most of the tour was going to be outside with no shade. We were all dripping in sweat and begging for mercy. Our tour guide was oblivious to this as he did most of his talking outdoors literally a few feet from the 85 degree comfort of the house. My favorite part of the tour was the gift shop because it had a bathroom and air conditioning. We also got to visit a small portion of the house which was anything but exciting. I think the architecture was maybe beyond what my small brain could appreciate Why no windows with views?? ... BUT I did learn a few facts about Frank that lead me to believe he was an egotistical jerk who treated everyone around him like dirt.
I went to Kim for my first cut with a Groupon deal and she was an amazing stylist. Gave me a very stylish hi lo bob which I got compliments all the time. The hair colour on the other hand was nothing close to the purple I asked for and they tried to convince me that red was a better colour on me... I gave her a second chance a year later to cut my hair back to the style she had originally given and boy was that a mistake! With her being focused on chatting and totally not having any food all day I ended up with a choppy haircut that was way shorter than I had asked and nothing close to what I wanted after being there for almost 2hrs! I never went back.
Mediocre food and poor service. You ask for more water and they forget. They only see you twice and thats it.
Terrible!!! there is cockroaches everywhere i tried to get rid of them but I could not i think they re between walls they said they tried too but nothing happens! I have to move to my sister house because it was terrible when my contract ends they sent me a letter that i owe almost 300.00 dlls because of paint and carpet I was not even there in the apartment!! I would not recommend this apartments to anyone!
Hands down the worst Taco Bell I have ever been to. Consistently under staffed to the point of the person behind the counter telling customers it s going to be a 30 minute wait for 2 tacos. Give me a break. They should be shit down to save the reputation of taco bells everywhere.
Wow! This location has really gone downhill. We have been coming here since I was a teenager and never had an experience like the one we had last night. First off our poor waitress. Only 4 days on the job and having to take the brunt of her co workers and manager s bad choices. My mother daughter and I came last night after I got home from work and not really feeling up to cooking. We live to come here as we generally know what to expect. Apparently not last night.. First we stood waiting for someone anyone to seat us. Eventually I sent my daughter to look for a table and then sent them to sit while I continued to wait. When the greeter finally got around to noticing the backup at the door she tried to seat the group behind me. At which point one of the ladies in the group told her to help me first. Thank gawd. I probably would have just gone off. I grabbed some menus and followed my family. The waitress was at our table a few minutes later taking our drink orders. Now I will admit my family my mother especially are picky eaters. As any new waitress will tell you write down picky orders. Ours was smart enough to do this and saved her tip!! Everything was kewl till our food was delivered. The greeter brought our food over as the waitress was quite busy otherwise it might not have reached our table wrong. My mother ordered the chicken fried steak with gravy. The only unusual thing about her order was she wanted brown gravy instead of the country gravy. When it arrived with the wrong gravy she sent it back. Both my daughter and I finished our food and I went to the restroom and out for a cigarette before they brought out my mother s food.. So a good 45 minutes.. for something that would take less than 10 minutes to make. And what they brought.. my daughter sent me a text with a pic that had me rushing back from my cigarette. They had brought her the exact same plate of food minus the gravy.. which they literally just scraped off and flipped the chicken fried steak over and reserved. Now remember it s been 45 minutes!! So this plate of food sat in the kitchen for 45 minutes and was then served to a customer. Can you guess who was in the kitchen this entire time? That s right the manager!! I felt awful for the waitress none of this was her fault. She took the order correctly. We had my mother s order removed from the bill but I have to yelp this. It was just so ridiculous and for a restaurant manager to send it out himself was just appalling.
Went in at 1230 for the 5 2 Slice special and saw only 3 old pieces sitting out. Asked kids at counter if they d be making more as I needed 4 slices and they said no that s it. Idk how they can advertise the special and have none available right at lunch time. Special is supposed to be from 11 3. Left without ordering.
Awful. They know they are awful and they do not care. They were supposed to split our check and instead they charged us double. Instead of fixing it and apologizing they made it seem like a huge issue. Then we waited for nearly a half hour for a small pizza watching multiple folks go ahead of us who ordered similar or the same things get theirs. When we asked what was going on we were met with resistance. When the pizza came out it was terrible no cheese and TONS of sauce. I would not recommend this place to anyone. Awful awful awful.
We went there on a Saturday night and it was swamped. We waited a little while but did get seated in a reasonable amount of time. Talk about overpriced and not very good. We both got the spaghetti and there was hardly any sauce on it so we asked for a side dish and the size of the side dish of sauce for both of us was laughable. It had a decent taste that s why there s two stars instead of one. I had to ask again for more sauce and they brought us another little tiny dish of sauce. And we also sat there for a good long time with empty soda glasses. I would never go back to this place.
SLOW AS HELL! I ve been waiting over a month to get my trigger fixed if it not done Monday I m going to take it somewhere else. Also good luck getting someone on the phone and do not bother leaving a message you will never hear back from them. I look at all the positive reviews and ca not help but think there totally NOT genuine. Do not go here for repairs or upgrades if you ca not give up your weapon for a few months.
The good was decent but the staff did not seem very friendly here. They really like to nickel and dime you here for everything it seems like. It was clean at least. They do not really offer anything that would make me want to come back. Go down the street a block to Los Taquitos instead.
Where do I begin.. I stayed here 8 28 8 30.. What a mistake that was. 1. I requested smoking room with two queens in the casino tower and was guaranteed them by two different people since I called twice to verify. Upon arrival i was told that there were no smoking rooms in circus circus anymore. They stopped smoking rooms the week I booked. I believe that they should have notified all those people who requested smoking rooms if not what s the point? May as well have stayed elsewhere. 2. Once we got to the room the tub looked old and yellow the sheets were stained and the curtains smelled very badly. 3. The alarms went off at 5 30AM for about ten minutes non stop to notify everyone of an emergency. So of course everyone was peeking their heads in the hallway and saw nothing. Finally it stopped five minutes of quiet when BOOM!! AGAAAAAIN the alarms went off to notify the emergency had been taken care of and that went on for ten minutes. TERRIBLE. I do not see why every single person should know of an emergency unless it is risking our lives as well which I m sure it was no big.. Probably just some drunk fight by the slots. The only up side was getting on the rides in adventure dome. Other than that I will never be staying in circus circus again. I d definitely recommend elsewhere.
One star for their driver that was speeding down on 215N 95 on Sunday 5 21 17 around 11 am.... that almost killed us when he slammed on his brakes and switched lanes carelessly when he was to slow down to merge to 95S.... It was a 45mph zone by 215N Durango area and he the truck driver was at least going at 70 80 miles! What s the hurry? Jesus your apologies will never enough if God forbid you got into an accident. We talked to someone in your office. Please be careful....
I was so excited to come to this salon I have read many positive reviews. However long story short...I walked out of the salon due to the lack of respect. I was excited to make my appointment with a well yelp reviewed hair stylist Kim. About 15 minutes before my scheduled appointment I called to confirm my hair appointment it was confirmed. I arrived and checked in 10 minutes before my appointment. Then 20 minutes passed YES 10 minutes after my appointment I asked the front desk why the wait was so long. And Kim booked over me thinking I was not there I was clearly in the room waiting many employees passed me. Kim working on a woman s nails had the nerve to tell me oh about 20 more minutes. She did not even apologize. I was NOT going to waste 40 minutes waiting on stylist who ignored my appointment. The front desk asked if I would like to reschedule and I refused. I will not be taking my business to places with lack of respect.
Their pediatricians were great but their staff who does Insurance verification failed my son appointment was January 9th two weeks later they called and told me that my son did not have insurance that I owed 1 019 and that they check their insurances every 48 hours or 72 hours before their appointment I guess I did not have insurance the beginning of the year which is January 1st they had time to verify my insurance but chose not to now I have a bill for 1 019 spoke to the billing services and made payment arrangements I spoke to another lady at their billing department and told me to just hold off on the payment still they figured everything out for the rest of my billing so I waited off like she told me to spoke to a person about a week ago who is very rude and not understanding what I was saying I had already spoke to somebody to make payment arrangements on the 15th of October she wanted full amount of payment which I did not have at the moment my son could not be seen at this office anymore due to my payment issues so one of his appointments was cancelled. I was going back and forth with my insurance and this office I guess some of the ladies at work at the billing department know what they re doing and some do not all I m saying is just make sure that when you guys go in that you guys have insurance that way you re not in debt.
Horrible HORRIBLE horrible. If I could write 10 000 ZERO star reviews on this dealership I would. Why did I go here despite the two bad reviews? Because they were the only dealership in the valley that had the cars I wanted or so I thought. I had been in correspondence with a salesman Daniel Maria for about two weeks. We set up an appointment for tonight to look at the two cars we were interested in. I d been watching the website and talking to Daniel every day for the past two weeks and the cars were listed. When I arrived tonight at 7pm for my meeting with Daniel for which he said he would have the cars waiting out front he could not be found. Another employee tried to find him but could not . We finally stumbled upon him and his greeting? Oh so sorry. The car you were looking for sold yesterday. Yesterday? YESTERDAY?! I spoke to him yesterday evening. According to him yesterday the cars still were on the lot. The other car? Oh it did not exist. They could not find it. Was not on the lot. Their excuse? Daniel is an internet sales guy. They only go off of the webpage. Why would you have somebody working for you that does not keep up with your inventory? And why do not you keep the website current with the inventory? And then they tried to sell me a sedan. I want a hatchback. I know why I want a hatchback. I ve looked heavily and know what I want. And then they try to sell me a car that was of a different and discontinued make. STAY AWAY.
Most impersonal renting experience I ve ever had! My wife and I have only lived at our new place for 2 months and I already cannot wait to wash my hands of this company.. Not only do you have to bounce around from place to place on the phone to get answers about bills but you have to email them just as much to make sure your needs are met. Even then to set up any kind of service it is a pain. It took over a week to get our leaking disposal fixed. its been two months and they still have not fixed our broken fan. Also they tell you to fix your own things around their property if you think its less than 100 .. This is what they told me when I moved in. Otherwise they may pass the maintenance fee on to you! If only I would have read the reviews before I signed the lease...
20 for a cold chunk of quiche??? I think not. my wife had the juevos rancheros and she liked it. still 17 for that. save your money go somewhere else.
So apparently this is their Carmel moolatte to me it s more pure sugar than anything else no coffee or caramel flavoring. As for their service it sucked the guy could not remember what donut I ordered and it was not like there was a lot of people there!! Ok it s official I wo not be back I ll go to paradise across the parking lot.
I come here for lunch almost every morning. The sign says they open at 10. I wait in the drive thru knowing someone s there at 10am I see them walking back and forth and they do not even come on the speaker to say I m sorry but we are not ready yet nothing. I wait for Someone to come on so o can order and nothing. We drove to the window and waited some more. This has happened multiple times with today being the one why I write this. I just think if you open at 10 than open at 10. Do not just watch your customers sit there in the drive they
Came over tonight to have dinner with my family ordered our food food was Bland fries were cold air conditioner not working ice machine did not even have ice
Service was slow and the food expensive. The portions were big but the quality was not worth the price.
WORST EXPERIENCE EVER. So I had to do a quick order via phone since I was short on time and had to come up with something for a work potluck. I spoke to this chick who took my order and then transferred my call to the delivery guy to figure out delivery time. They took my order got my credit card information but NEVER told me how much my order costed me. Initially when I asked they said they had to call me back in 15mins because they are not at the register or something. They called me back still did not tell me how much it costed me in their voicemail saying that I had to confirm the order so they could deliver it. So I called back to confirm the order and then when I asked how much the total was the dude just kept on saying that he does not remember it on top of his head because he had already left the store. Come to find out on upon delivery that 2 pizzas costed me over 50!!!! Ridiculous! The dude just showed up with the 2 pizza boxes and the receipt of what they had charged on my card for me to sign. I still went ahead and paid for it but could not get over the fact that I feel so ripped off and scammed. My coworkers told me how crazy I was for still paying for it but I told them NEVER AGAIN . People who work at this place need to be trained more for real. I will make a formal complaint about this to the business bureau because this just is not right.
Terrible. They never return phone calls or their website submissions. They do not provide adequate security to the development either.
Not for delivery! We waited nearly 2 hours for the pizza and when it came it was so over done even the grease filled box could not penetrate through the over cooked crust.
Unfortunately the worst service we have ever received. Salads never came we had to get up and order our own drinks at the bar because our server was M. I.A. Spoke to the manager to provide feedback and he would not take ownership as the manager and said ultimately it was the server s fault not his . No apology from the manager. Wo not be returning.
Literally the worst hell hole ever created. Everything is over priced dusty and dirty. The owner is insane and puts up ridiculous signs that are unenforceable. There s no choice of convenience stores in the area only way it stays in business.
I went on a Wednesday afternoon in May and it was crazy crowded. Most of the crowd was in the back buying t shirts and store memrobilia I was there to get a shirt for my son who loves the show . They were sold out of a lot of sizes in most of the shirts. I settled for 2 that were my last choices just because they had the size in those 2. The bad part is I got a parking ticket for parking in the lot!! I had a rental car and did not know it until 2 months later when I got a notice from Hertz that I had been given a ticket no notification on the car. I say stay away! It looks much better on the show and you do not have to park your car or fight the crowds. It was a lose lose situation for me.
Cute place but kinda overpriced. Got the dogs groomed and dental package. The grooming was not bad but it was not great either. Before paying for the service I mentioned to the cashier that I have checked in and showed her the coupon. She said ok then proceded with the charge. She did not take off the 5 bucks for mentioning yelp. The manager offered to use it towards our next visit and we said no thanks we would like it now. They processed a refund then charged us the correct amount but made it kind of an imposition to do so. Do not be mad the customer train your chaser to provide the discount when it is presented. It was funny bc first she said you need to tell her before the transaction! I corrected her and told her that I did at that s where it ended. I definitely wo not be back for grooming but I m sure my wife will continue to buy the overpriced treats sadly.
This is the worst to go experience I have ever had. I came in and ordered beef pad Thai. Pretty simple. I then proceeded to wait 40 minutes for my order. I watched 3 tables come in get menus order and get their food before I finally had enough and went up and asked what was taking so long. And why did these other people who came in after I did for their food before me. They then tried to tell me that those people had called in their orders before coming to dine in. I HAD WATCHED THEM GET MENUS. So then they asked me what I had ordered which confirmed that they had lost or forgot my order. Then to top it all off I finally get my food and it is one of the smallest portions I have ever seen. Plus their salad is a small handful of lettuce with some shredded carrot. Pitiful. I will never eat at this place again.
I ve been coming to this location for years now and this was the worst experience at this location the waitress Marza or Marcia was a horrible waitress 100 check and I wish I had stayed home. She was rude and and extremely unprofessional I hope her manager reads this and they change how they treat their customers. If I ever come back it s because the location is convenient but it was so bad I do not see myself returning. I payed for the waitress to spill 1 4 of a pitcher of sangria on the table and on the floor by my shoes she did not apologize just stated that she had not poured from a pitcher into glasses before. She did not bother cleaning up after her mess and decided to sit down in the booth beside me while she coated the table and floor beneath my feet with sangria. She did not check in to see if we needed anything else I I had to take my meal to go cause I had no water. She was rude and had a dismissing attitude towards my sister and myself. She most certainly ruined my dinner. If she ca not handle her job she simply should not have it.
Been here 1 hour 45 mins and they have taken 13 customers. Only ONE worker right now. UNACCEPTABLE. I fully get that it is busy but staffing is 100 not adequate. No other options locally. Called the post office to make an appt. They are booked for 6 weeks. Really???
No prices on th menu. We had two beers and dinner and it came to 107. Dinner consists of a salad bar where nothing is labeled a small plate of mashed potatoes to share and a small plate of fried bananas. Then when you re ready you flip over a card and waiters start bringing over and cutting pieces of various meats off which you grab with a pair of tongs. Turn the card over again and they stop. Some of the meat was hot and good but some was lukewarm and tough. Hosestly it s just an extremely overpriced buffet. If you re going to stay for three hours it might be worth it. But for two people with normal appetites it s a resounding no. Also people stare at you while you re eating waiting for you to flip your card over. Annoying. Would not go back.
Took my shihtzu there years ago and they cut her about 1.5 inches on her belly. Instead of calling me when it happened they used glue to close sliced area! I can only imagine how scated my little girl must have been. This happened when they allowed someone with no experience groom her! Took her to my vet who could not believe they did that. Gave her antibiotics. The owner refunded my money and said he would groom her again for free. ARE YOU KIDDING ME would never go back.
The owner of this business runs a scam where he quotes one price and then bills you for a higher amount with undisclosed fees for labor and whatever he thinks of at the time. If you refuse to pay the added charges he threatens to sue. To sweeten the pot he refuses to talk on the phone and will only send an occasional text message. Professional right? Whatever you do stay away from this company. This may be the worst company I ve encountered in ten years of home ownership.
Came here with my family as they were in town and we wanted to explore Westgate a bit more. We chose to come to McFaddens because we believed we had a gift card and figured we d give it a shot. It was a Saturday at 7pm and as empty as could be. We sat down and ordered our drinks which came out my step mom ordered a vodka tonic and it came out without carbonation. She politely asked the server for another as this was just a vodka water and she ordered a tonic and they did brought her out something that tasted the exact same no carbonation! We finally got to ordering and the food was ok at best. I enjoyed the flavor of my pulled Pork sliders but nobody else at the table 4 others even finished their plate and before we had even gotten to our car my boyfriend and I had already begun to feel sick. The service was ok at best. We had a waitress who was new and that was totally ok! She did well but throughout our time there we were served by 3 different people and all very bland. The only positive is that they have tvs and we were able to at least catch the end of the Warriors thunder game.
I had been a member for over a year. It changed ownership and now the gym is terrible. I had this membership because it was near my place and I traveled a lot. The original owner was a nice guy and he would return calls. I get in accident while I am abroad and plan to have all my stuff moved to where I am now located. Tried to cancel through contacting them in the website. Called them. Turns out you can only do this in person or through certified mail. Again the business felt like a schumy rip off artists that kept bringing up things which were on my contract but since I did not have my contract because I was in accident abroad... how am I supposed to know and why did not you say something to me while we were talking! The worse is that after 3 months of paying my membership while wanting to cancel the owners could not return one call. Worse experience with a gym ever. Old owner was awesome and the gym was great neighborhood gym. Now schumy sketchy dirty con artists.
Never ever order from the Tropical location they are closed! Although they have no problem taking your money. We sat and waited for our order for over an hour then someone called and said We did not know if this was for delivery or pickup. Then we told them delivery. Okay. About 10 minutes later they call and say so sorry the location you order from is closed. If you do not come to our new location and pick it up you will not be getting your food. Oh and also we ca not refund your 60. No food no money. We have followed Mark Rich from all his restaurants and the food is awesome but this crummy service without an apology is unforgivable. Happy birthday to me. Thanks a lot for nothing.
First time playing at Excalibur poker room. I just ca not believe how unprofessional poker dealers are here. Thus dealer name brain looks like he is burned out of job. He made comments about all the hands in progress. Wtf. Especially in tournaments. He keeps on saying any ace is pocket kk killer. Oh he sucked out on you. Oh you need this and that to beat him. Unreal. How do they allow this dealer to make remarks on hand. First time here and last time. Horrible place and horrible dealers
On a whim we tried this place a few visits ago when we came to china town. It had four stars at the time and I never thought to check the reviews on yelp which are mixed reviews anyway. I am always wanting to try milk tea but am afraid i wo not like it. I absoulutely am obsessed with taro so I ordered a taro milk tea and a taro boba. Both were lacking in taro flavor. Very disappointing. We should have Gone elsewhere. Boo you Volcano Tea house. Nothing volcanic or exciting about your drinks at all.
I was tempted by an online deal on a new bicycle but thought better of it until I received a 10 off e coupon. This was enough to encourage hitting the pay now button. I was disappointed with the 45 delivery fee but since it was apparently SUCH good value and only available online I went ahead anyway. I paid by Paypal for my convenience. The bike arrived quickly in 2 days but it was only coming from Mississauga 20km away no complaints there. The trouble was that it was in a box and needed assembly and setup. This is included in the price just arrange an appointment and deliver it to the closest Sportchek with a bike department. By the time the bike was assembled and ready for pickup a week had passed which is still not bad however by then my online only special was available in store at the online special price! Disappointment 1 I took my new bike for a test ride in the car park and was horribly disappointed I had clearly bought a cheap bike why was I surprised? I immediately decided to return the bike for even more disappointment. Disappointment 2 I had paid by Paypal so they could not refund my money only a store credit was available. Disappointment 3 I had received the convenience of having the bike shipped to my house they would not refund the delivery cost even though I had to take the bike to the store for assembly. There is a happy ending though I checked Kijiji that night and the next day bought a proper quality bike just 2 years old worth 4 times as much with a service from people who know what they are talking about at MEC Burlington for less money than the original Sportchek bike. So the moral of this sorry tale If you really really have to buy cheap sporting goods from Sportchek check Kijiji first ........to see if my store credit is still available at 85 cents on the dollar!
There s a big change! Food is horrible Pancit Bihon is all noodles no veggies and scant meat. The bakery section big change Baliwag pan de sal taste just like the ordinary pan de sal the Pan de leche lost it s bulk now taste like blah... too airy and small. What s going on ? No wonder we were there last weekend and the place was almost empty... Sad..
Bought a certificate to try out this spa under new ownership with renovated digs. Had to wait several weeks to get in for service with Carole which seemed a good sign. Actually it seems her promotional price is quite effective in getting customers through the spa door. Although she is personable and friendly I am not certain she can see any better than me. My gel manicure was uneven in color and did not last even a week which is unusual. The pedicure was also so so not in the experience but in the longevity of it it also did not last very long. Clearly I was upgraded in cost from the certificate mani pedi ended costing twice the certificate amount. Another reviewer suggested bait and switch and I am inclined to agree.
My dealing with Gentry Pool Repair specifically Flip and my recent pool warranty repair was very frustrating to say the least. Not only did the work not get completed in a satisfactory manner the lack of professionalism and customer service was appalling. I would not recommend the business to anyone as I ve never come across a business man that is so unprofessional in my life! This was a warranty repair through my pool builder and the builder sent the independent contractor to do the repair. Skip refused to give his name or company name repeatedly after the service call went horribly bad. He hung up on us after we requested his company info. In addition he actually lied and insinuated that we were out to get something for nothing and that we simply complain all the time! Come on this was a warranty repair. NO FEES WERE BEING CHARGED TO THE CUSTOMER! BEWARE OF GENTRY!
I came here recently with a group of people for breakfast at the Yonge and King location. I ordered a simple 2 egg and fries dish. I ordered scrambled and I got a weird fried omelet style fried egg. Definitely not how scrambled eggs are made. There s nothing special to write about this place. I feel le sad reviewing breakfast places that ca not do breakfast right.
I paid ahead of time through groupon but when I arrived that was not the price i agreed on. I would have no problem paying the extra ahead of time if they were up front and the Management was not deceptive and tricked you into staying there. You will have to pay a 23 hotel use fee and 50 deposit per night. They get you there by tricking with a number that is just a little smaller than those on the strip but spring this trickery on you when you arrive so you have to pay it. I have no problems paying the money so much so that I paid 50 plus taxes for an upgrade. When I did check in the hotel room there was all sorts of problems with broken stuff and the room was not cleaned. Keeping in mind the 50 per night deposit and the deception they used to get me here I called the front desk to tell them. So they moved me to another hotel room and said they were going to waive the hotel use fees. So they moved me to another room that did not have that much that needed repairs and was clean. It still needed repairs some minor ones but I did not even mention it now. The room had a great view of the strip and the balconies that they said they had. The balconies are locked and they told me that only the owner has the key. More tricks? The hot tub they said they had is also there but the air pump did not work when I went to use it but did finally kick on at 3 am in the morning which woke me and my wife up. I told the front desk and they did not do a thing about it and just blew me off. The TV system only has a few channels and the audio level is not the same on all the channels so that when you are changing channels on all 3 TV s in the room it is either too low on some or so high that it will scare the crap out of you when you go to other channels. The prices for in room dining are high but also there are more hidden fees if you read the fine print it is the price of the meal plus 5 delivery fee plus 18 percent gratuity added on. So the in room pizza of 17 dollars was actually 25. On a positive note the room that I ended up in was very roomy great view washer and dryer two bathrooms a awesome walk in shower with 3 shower heads a kitchen a sofa and couch and a number of chairs When I checked out the food court there were a number of good choices for a quick bite to eat. It also has a theatre on the location. The security there is on the ball and have a security patrol that I watch pass my car 3 times in 15 minutes and continued like that all night! Also they were very nice and professional to me. Majority of the maids do a great job cleaning up the room. The bellman I dealt with were very nice and professional too. After staying a couple of nights I went to check out and the hotel use fees that the manager said she was going to waive was back on my bill. I called the front desk and got no where with them so i had them transfer me to the manager who ignored 3 calls and wasted an hour and a half of my time trying to handle it so I called back and left a message that I am just going to put this on travel advisor and yelp no problem. The manager now decided to return my call and said that even If the night manager did not say that I am going to take the hotel use fees off of my bill I hate being called a liar! I come on vacation to relax not to get stressed out and upset I can go back to work for that. Everyone seems to be doing their jobs except the management and being dishonest gets them a 1 star from me. They would have had 4 stars if I would not had so many tricks pulled on me and negative 1st impressions. When they say complimentary at this hotel it means there is another hidden price but websters says that complimentary means Given Free as a gift or courtesy There is not a need for the lying and deception with a good product. I think you in management are wearing your ties too tight cutting off the blood supply to your heads.
If you would have asked me about this buffet 2 years ago ..I would give it a million stars. I had been solidly in love with this place for about 4 years straight. I would plan the whole vegas trip around their sunday champagne brunch. I was able to over look their ultra crappy service.. yes its a buffet but SOMEONE has to bring you champagne and they do it when they feel like it. I went on Easter Sunday I waited in line for a 100 yrs. No Champagne. I guess they were too religious to serve champagne. Whatever its vegas. They were unapologetic rude and ridiculous. We had done many a birthday meal here 20 people for years and years. The food is great the pastry area alone is worth it. But I ca not stand crappy service and their ambivalence to having their short comings pointed out. I am currently buffetless in vegas and considering I think most buffets are a hepatitis bar anyway.... oh well.
Ordered tangerine chicken with mixed vegetables. Looks like I got yesterday s leftover food. 5 pieces of old broccoli and 5 pea pods. The chicken was hideous. The chicken was in clumps held together by gristle and was not white meat. It had no flavor. A terrible meal and a terrible waste of money.
If I could leave a 0 for this review I would. Absolutely terrible service that came recommended to me not sure why it would be recommended . Ordered flowers and chocolates for Valentine s Day and made sure to ask several times can you guarantee these will be delivered on Valentine s Day. If not I will go elsewhere. Nevertheless I was assured. No flowers were delivered and around 9pm I had to break the surprise and ask my girlfriend. Eventually I called and they said they are back ordered. At 11pm the flowers arrived MISSING the chocolates. Three days later they delivered the chocolates. Three days AFTER Valentine s Day. Do not waste your time here ... Go elsewhere. This place is awful.
OVERRATED! This may be ok for the locals but.... First visit restaurant can highly recommended. Ordered a cold bottle beer had to ask for a cold glass. Ordered the pot roast dinner approximately 3 pounds of luke warm greasy meat came out to my table with hot Mac and cheese. Good service bad food this trip.
Fuck this. I ordered the tacos dorados. Let me just save you the time and tell you do not . The enchiladas were not enchiladas at all but rather fried pieces of corn tortilla and mush w a disgusting child sauce that tasted similar to armpit. The nachos were soggy and drowning in rubber steak. I already feel my stomach churning. Never again
In search of a small bite to eat and a quick but relaxing glass of wine a friend and I stopped in at The Living Room a few months ago and had what is quite possibly one of the worst dining experiences we ve had in a while if I could rate negative stars I would. To start with the only good part of our evening the food was delicious. We ordered the fondue to start the prosciutto and brie sandwich for me and the house roasted turkey sandwich for my friend. The fondue was comparable to that of the finer The Melting Pot with a flavorful gooey melty cheese and the perfect assortment of dippers ranging from fresh apple slices and veggies to soft warm pretzel pieces. My pressed sandwich had the right amount of crispiness to the bread the prosciutto salty but flavorful and the brie creamy and spreadable just the way it s supposed to. My friends turkey sandwich must have been good because I do not think she spoke one word until her sandwich was gone it was that delicious. The amazing food was the only positive part of our trip to the Living Room. Now on to the downsides it began when we walked in the front door. First thing one sees in the doorway is a sign asking guests to wait to be seated to which we did. For almost 10 minutes. Finally a man dressed in a casual flannel shirt and jeans was bothered enough to look up and tell us to pick a seat anywhere all the while trying to quickly shove his phone back in his pocket. After we picked a table and waited about five more minutes a waitress brought us some waters and menus and gave us some time look things over and make some selections. My friend and I perused the wine list and waited for our server to come back and take our orders but after hearing he table next to us ask for water refills and seeing how long they had waited we decided to skip straight to the food and save the wine for another time. More time passed we had to flag the waitress down to take our order but not before reminding her the other table still had not gotten water and had waited longer to which she took our orders. She never wrote anything down as she listened to our orders but remembered to ask if wanted the fondue out first or all the food together to which we asked for our appetizer out first. Quite some time went by and we saw what looked like an order of fondue come in the kitchen window which is left in full view of the customers in the middle of the restaurant but alas no one noticed and took it to our table. Shortly after noticing the fondue in the kitchen window a different server brought us our sandwiches and when she asked if we needed anything else we asked if she could take the fondue off of our ticket as we never got it. A dramatic sigh was all we received in response and then she disappeared to speak with the man in the flannel shirt who could only be found texting at the bar top and giggling with a group of young ladies sharing a bottle of wine. He soon came over and delivered the fondue himself said he would take it off the bill and turned around to return to the bar top. My friend and I finished our meal and began looking for the server to ask for the check to no avail. We had to eventually flag down yet a different server to ask for our bill which also never came. After becoming fed up with the lack of service long wait times and blatant disregard for our satisfaction as customers my friend and I left what we hope was enough cash to cover the bill and left. I really wanted to like this place the catchy music trendy dcor sophisticated air of a wine bar and the food selections sound like the perfect mix for a new get together spot for my friend and I but the lack of service far outweighs the few selling points this restaurant had to offer.
Environment is good but service is almost non existence. Had dinner there with friends and waiter did not care about us at all. Raw meat was served and no tongs. Thought they were gonna cook for us but nobody ever came until we told them we did not have the tool to grill. And then no other service. Not gonna go back. Terrible!
This location of Filiberto s was once my FAVORITE local Mexican food joint. My fiance and I go out for Mexican every Friday night we ve even named this tradition Fili Friday . However we no longer go to this location and for good reason. Nothing is even close to as good as it once was. I would even day it s borderline bad. Every recipe has changed from wonderful to pathetic. We have taken our Fili Friday tradition elsewhere and will not return. So sad...
Used to quite good when it first opened but the quality and the service have deteriorated. One of the few reasons even went downtown.
Check your dressers before you unpack! Furious that a family resort does not use safety brackets on their dressers. Way to start our vacation with the dresser and TV falling on my child! Building 11 resort manager Malinda
The front staff is unfriendly and unorganized. Doctors are so use to get them in get them out type of service. Left after a year.
Take my 50 000 Acura in just to be told I m a bad driver my 1 year warranty is up surprising such a short warranty may say something about their cars and that I need to pay 400 for new rotors . My boyfriends Subaru had all his brakes and pads replaced for free under 36k miles because they consider that premature wear . They did nothing to make me feel like a valued customer so I ll gladly be trading my car In back to either Subaru or maybe Tesla for the customer service alone . I figured I would be buying a reliable product but instead am told I m just too hard on it . Ladies bring your spouse because they may bully you into services . The waiting room did not really portray a luxury dealership i really regret not getting a Honda Pilot or a brand that stands behind their products .
Do NOT use clicklist unless you enjoy wasting your time. This is now the second holiday I have tried to use this service for with the point being to NOT go into the store. And for the second time I get there and they tell me they re out of stock on MAJOR ingredients I need. Now I have to go to another store completely defeating the point. I understand being out of stock but have the decency to call the customer because no one wants to go to two places especially after paying 5 dollars for convenience. This is beyond inconvenient. I will never use this service again you re better off just going into the store and saving the extra time and money.
Underwhelming at best. Was stoked to try this place out as it came highly recommended. We showed up early and were seated right away yay! . Our server was nice and explained the menu and made some recommendations. The cucumber mule which they have on tap was entirely too sweet and I ended up trading it in for a glass of prosecco. The brussel sprouts were tasty but not anything special. The BBQ pork stuffed macaroni shells were a flavor combination that did not work the pork was too sweet and the white cheddar cheese sauce had an odd texture bordering on slimy. The Caesar salad was ok but due to their anything goes coursing style was the last dish we received. Again nothing special. I would have tried more things but was too disappointed to spend any more money for such mediocre small plates. Great concept lovely space although there is zero street signage and it s up a flight of stairs but I was not impressed at all. Will not return.
If you re considering bidding online at J. Levine auction....just do not . Spare yourself the frustration. Maybe if you re lucky you can register to phone bid. That s what I tried to do but 2 phone calls one left voicemail 2 contact us emails on my part inspired zero follow through on theirs. Unable to connect with them for the phone bid I set up electronic bidding via their website. I set up a pre auction bid. It acknowledged that. I added to the bid amount also pre auction. It did not acknowledge that one. During the auction I increased my bid. A pop up informed me that I was the highest bidder. The sale ended showing the item sold for 20 less than my highest bid. So naturally I assumed I had the winning bid. Nope. The item went to someone who bid less than I did. When confused I telephoned I heard from 3 different people that yes that happens all the time. Whoops! Why 3 different people? Because I called 3 different times each time being told someone would get back to me. It was not even until the 3rd call that anyone apologized and even then it was Sorry you had to overhear our employees talking in quite colorful language about another customer when they thought you were on hold not Sorry we sold the item you wanted to someone else who bid less than you. And that several day s late Sorry was no effort to resolve the situation. Did I miss something? Isnt the generally accepted foundation of auctions that the highest bidder gets to buy the item? That NOT happening was from what the company employees told me commonplace at J. Levine. Heaven forbid they should try to rectify that. I know for a fact that Christie s and Sotheby s would have called the winning bidder telling them what happened and giving them the opportunity to either relinquish the item or sell it to me at the higher price I had bid during the sale. J. Levines? Nah they just said it happens all the time with their online bidding as though there is not anything wrong with that. I felt disappointed about not getting the item. I felt shocked by the organization s lack of concern. I deal in antiques and bid several times a week in auctions around the world. So believe me when I tell you that this is the least professional auction house I have ever encountered and if I ever needed to buy something they offered I would pay someone in Arizona to wear a day glow colored suit and sit in the front row in full view of the podium with a flare gun and a whistle so that the auctioneer ca not say he did not see my representative. But hopefully I will never need anything they are offering and hopefully you never will either.
I come to this drive thru fairly often and today was super disappointing. I get the same latte every time and some days it comes with the cinnamon sprinkles and some days it does not . No big deal. Today when I ordered I specifically asked that they add the sprinkle and the snarky girl taking the order sounded super irritated as she quipped It already comes with it. Well if that were the case lil Miss Sunshine I would not feel the need to mention it. In any case customer service dictates that you just say sure no problem and keep it going. Then she said what else do you want? That was overtly aggressive and a damn shame that she s so miserable. Maybe she needed her cup of coffee. Then the cup they have me had coffee stains and fingerprints on it. If you re gonna be snarky at least make sure you re providing a good service. That girl sucks!
Was not thrilled with the service at all. They tried to upscale me and I m glad I did not buy into any of this. Guy called me to tell me my car is finished and he s done a half a job on the vehicle. The windows were not even cleaned properly. Tried to tell me my glass window was fractured when I hit it with my nail the little spots went away. These people are clueless! Trying tons their way through what is clean and why it looks the way it does. Would I return to this car wash hell no! Sloppy sloppy sloppy!
Yes Cara Cunningham C. Impossible to get paid as a vendor. Going on 6 months now and excuse after excuse but no check yet! My first non payment in 2 years. Thanks Ciao Baby. Closed...not surprised. Karma
It started when the hostess walked away to do something else after asking us our name party size and if we had a reservation. Not even an excuse me . In hind sight it was foreshadowing of what was to come. We split an over priced under sized Caesar salad. No offer of fresh pepper was made. Then we waited. We had ordered a prosciutto pizza and the seared tuna. We continued to wait. In all it took over an hour for the two mains to arrive. Our waiter did apologize a couple of times and offered us a couple of pieces of bread while we waited. Eventually the meal arrived. The pizza was OK. The tuna was a surprise as I had expected that by being seared it would be warm. But no. It had been seared a long time ago and put into the fridge and intentionally served cold. Another surprise another disappointment. The only saving grace as that there was a special on the wine. No compensation was made to the bill just an offer of a free coffee which we declined since we were running late already. I wo not be going back there again.
I noticed this Starbucks has 2.5 stars. No wonder. I stood in line Wednesday Sept 20 for 20 minutes. There were 9 people ahead of me and 4 people working in the booth. I wanted to grab a muffin and coffee before a bus tour to the Hoover dam. This was 8am. I had to leave because I ran out of time. 4 people could not take care of 10 people in 20 minutes? Something is really wrong with this picture. None of the workers had a smile. I would love to know if this is par for the course. I see absolutely no sense in this.
Came for lunch half empty and service was attentive. Ca not complain like some of the other reviews. BUT food is really mediocre. Ordered their signature and expensive Gojira roll. Thought with a name like that the roll must be huge and stuffed with fish. WRONG! Roll was tiny and literally had a smear of spicy tuna. Really stinky small roll totally not worth the price. The maguro sashimi seemed fresh but all the rest of our lunch was really mediocre. Disappointed overall and would not suggest it unless you absolutely have no other choice.
Not surprised it sucked I really did not want to come here but unfortunately it was in the area and open. Came here for drinks and nachos. Nachos were salty... Salty... And nothing fresh. It was CHEESE WHIZ. Like come on... We asked for guac which was 3 extra... To begin with our server did not bring it we had to ask her twice she kept forgetting she brought it at the end of our stay when the nachos were OBVIOUSLY DONE .... And she still had the nerve to charge us. Not too mention the guac was maybe two tablespoons of smashed avocado. Our serve never checked on us. Awful experience over all. I gave it two stars because 1 the girls at the front who were greeting us were super friendly and nice 2 I like the lollypops
If you do not feel like cooking this is a good place to go right on 16th in the Bowness area. I went because I saw the 4 and 5 star reviews and was intrigued by Italian Japanese inspired cuisine. Overall this place is just too simple for my taste and entertainment dollars so I wo not be going back. To be fair though I will give it a full review for others who may be interested...The decor is basic. It seats about 25 30 ppl there is no table service and canned or bottled beverages. There is no liquor licence one gender neutral bathroom and paper napkins. The menu includes minestrone soup green salad garlic toast 3 slices order and the option to have a lot of extra add ons. The 10 or more pasta dishes look good and all have pictures up on the wall. I tried the Japanese Spaghetti pasta soy sauce green onions and chicken because all the reviews had given it 5 Stars. I d give it 2 4 but my son s Meatball Spaghetti was much better! The meatballs were homemade the sauce was a bit oily on the plate but good flavour. The pasta on all three dishes was very good and cooked a perfect al dente. The salad was crisp and did not have too much dressing. The garlic bread was really good and I ordered a second side which I probably should not have but I just loved the flavour! The service was polite welcoming and fast. She never really asked us how things were or cleared our table. This is a true cafeteria type place where you refill your own water and coffee. She was also filling a few Skip the Dishes take out orders and seemed to keep quite busy.
Great experiences up until today. Found hair in my food and told it would be compensated and they kept it on the bill but did not communicate this until we asked . Bad attitude from the staff who did not even try to explain anything. Definitely wo not be back and no I ve never nor would I ever put my own hair in my food to save 9.00. It s about doing the right thing the right way with your customers. We ve recommended a few of our friends here and will be sharing our experience of how your staff handled this today. Really disappointed. That said really nice chef who s very proud of his food. Poor staff managing with bad attitude and poor communication you should be ashamed. All over a bowl of pho not even half finished!
My wife and I were out for the afternoon looking for lunch and wondered if Don Pablo s was still here. We pulled in to see it was a new place and decided to give it a try. Immediately saw that Industry has a nice atmosphere and a unique theme circa prohibition . Service was immediate and they had a great selection of beers and whiskey. My wife was not sure which was which and it s a great option that they offer up to three beer samples! The menus were unique and offered a decent variety although perhaps a little too clever for someone just looking a standard burger. We ordered a nachos appetizer which arrived a little burnt but oh well just pick around the burnt chips right? But then our main courses arrived within 5 minutes of receiving the appetizer which is a bad timing issue they ll need to work out. Having both arrive that soon apart means you have to decide which to eat before something goes cold. My wife barely touched her chicken salad later opting to box it to avoid wasting the appetizer. That should never happen. My burger was okay but some of the toppings were burnt as were the fries which appeared to be just the crispy remnants at the bottom of the bin. I had to borrow ketchup from another table as the service was a bit lax which I suppose is to be expected with a new place. Besides these things I had hoped that maybe just digging into a good burger with barbecue sauce would save lunch for me. Unfortunately even the barbecue sauce was weirdly sour as opposed to tangy or sweet. The manager swung by with the standard inquiry and we only mentioned the meals coming right after the appetizer. She offered us a friends and family discount which was honestly appropriate. Unfortunately we were not pleased enough to recommend Industry Public House to our friends and family...or to Yelp.
Well I will start off by saying I m from NY.. We have a real Chinatown and a mini one Flushing and our mini one still trumps this Chinatown. But I might be bias here... I will say this Chinatown has a few photo ops at the sun yet Sen Area and the gates otherwise you will find stores that sell random stuff that you do not need and Chinese bakeries a chained bubble tea place chain hot pot place and a few dimsum restaurants. I would not make it a day event or even an hour event for this place maybe just route your destinations through it so you can see it... But really imo there is nothing special to be found here except the sun yet Sen place. Sorry!
Typical non California burrito...bland supermarket flavors wrong textures lack of fresh ingredients funky yellow cheese etc. i.e. Mexican like my Pennsylvania mother used to make . Only decent hot sauce and fairly pleasant fast food atmosphere saved it from one star though the surly service did not help. It s probably a fine burrito for most Torontonians but not for those who have known better...and if you do not you should know better.
Maybe my hopes were too high but I was seriously disappointed. It is definitely a pricier place. We were a group of 4. Decided to take 4 appetizers to share plus a main dish and a drink each. We were able to get a bite of each appetizer which was fine. We wanted to try a small piece of each but the main meal is where it gets weird. I took the raw tuna. VERY small plate. And nothing comes with it. My boyfriend took the burger and it was drenched in cinnamon. Everything is an extra meaning that if you want fries with your burger you need to pay extra. So you pay your burger 14 plus the fries which is 8 if I m not mistaken .. it starts to add up fast.. Our waiter was cool. I liked him a lot. Very nice guy.
I would have eaten there but I was told there was no public restroom. I wanted to wash my hands first. It seemed like a nice place. ...too nice not to have a bathroom. Odd.
Every child who grew up in Richmond Hill knows about Hillcrest Mall located just at Yonge and 16th and we know it s not the best mall out there as there is Markville Promenade or Vaughan Mills which is a lot bigger and has more stores. I really only come only if I need to grab something quickly and it s on the way but I would not say it s best to shop for leisure if you really want to go shopping. It s the place I go to for errands such as if I need to obtain a police check from the department there only valid if you live in York Region or need to go to the collision centre let s hope that does not happen often! Across Hillcrest Mall there is Mastermind and Swiss Chalet which i go to at times to meet up with friends. Of course I could write a whole other review about those places. There s a lot of older people who walk around the mall which is great for them as they are getting exercise and the mall is probably close by as there are apartments nearby. There is construction and renovations going on so hopefully it ll be better when they re done. Maybe I can write a review update then.
They screwed up. Had seen the show before the accident happened but now I came to see it again and they totally ruined it. They ve changed almost the entire show with very little acrobatics and nearly no battles. Not to mention the final epic battle which is now a poor quality video projection. They should have removed the show instead of making it awful. Shame on you Cirque seen many others amazing productions and this one just does not deserve anymore to be under the Cirque brand.
Groupon night at a new place. The OK The food average. Artichoke dip was tasty I had the Maui Ribye I really liked My wife had the Filet whch was just ok. The brocolli that was included with both meals was dreadful. The side of mushrooms was pretty good. The Bad It s too dark. Our eyes took several minutes to adjust after entering the building. The service was the same I get at my Nieghborhood bar and grill maybe worse. For example Usually I would be delighted to be asked if I wanted something to drink three times but when my server takes my drink order and then comes back and asks me again if I would something to drink five minutes later I just feel awkward. Then after finishing said drink my server made three trips to my table before realizing my glass was empty and offering me another. Granted I could have told him I needed another one but he seemed like he was in a rush to do something else and I could not get the words out before he was gone again. This lack of consideration continued throughout the meal.. I made reservations and feel like I was givin the worst seat in the place We were seated right next to the kitchen door and bar ordering station. So much staff action here it s strange they were not more attentive to us. And since i mentioned this was our very fist time visiting this establishment when making the reservation I expected something better I guess. Also as the host was seating us both my wife and I took a step toward our seats when we where suddenly cut off by one of the staff members rushing by in front of us. Not even an excuse me or sorry as he passed. As if we were in his way! Overall It was the service that killed the experience for us. The atmosphere and prices suggest demand a trained professional and informed staff. Once this gets fixed I might come back and try again. But with so many other options available I do not feel like Chop Chandler made a good first impression and it will be a long time before I give them another chance.
We used to go every week. Took a long break because we were not happy with food. Went back this Wednesday and it s even worse. Menu is boring and food is bad. Service slow at the bar. We wo not go back. Much better food out there
Well what a letdown. It gets one star for the price it s pretty cheap. That said I would not pay ten dollars to stay here again. It was such a disappointment that we did not stay the second night and I can only hope that corporate gives me a refund. Pancake Breakfast a runny pitcher full of runny watery Bisquick sitting on a filthy countertop next to some dirty warped pans. All you can eat! Sigh. The bunk beds were so cheap and loud I slept a total of an hour. Constant squeaky and wobbling I finally went into the dirty bar a dusty counter with a broken sink and took a nap on a small sofa. The beds are not numbered so there was constant confusion loud arguing and moving and sleeplessness about whose bed was whose. The floor of our room was soaking wet. Why? This place sucks spend twenty more dollars and have a place that does not smell. Bummer.
This place quality went from average to mediocre. The price went from average to higher than average for sub par food. Whoever is working the kitchen is not inspired and standards were low. Cold soggy fries and not inspired croque monsieur were served A tasteless watery bland calamari salad with mabe 6 rings of calamari that was not worth half the price charged was served. Service was good but that was probably due to the lack of customers present at lunch time. I will avoid this place now There are cheaper better options around.
The place is okay the staff is alright. The subs are pretty good but the reason I m giving it only two stars is not just the fact that it looks like the inside of an old man s garage but the political stickers. Any business that has any sense knows not to take political sides lest they alienate customers. The fact that Bill does not care and puts them up anyway says a lot about what he thinks of his customers.
Let me start this with DONT GO PLEASE DONT DO THIS TO YOURSELF. I have been coming here for a couple of years now. Today the wait was over 30 min for my appointment. The ladies were great about it and got me in. The women who work in the office are amazing. Last time I saw a tall slimmer dr and he was great. He handled everything with precision and care I did not even feel him numb me. Today and older heavier dr with a full white beard worked on me. He had me choking on the water and I had to beg with hand gestures for him to stop so I did not choke. And when he was working on me after that he was hurting me and had me kicking my feet frantically in pain to get him to stop and as I cried he would not . I have NEVER had a problem with a dentist until today. I have never cried at a dental appointment ever . He was HORRIBLE to me. I have had my periodontist do the exact things the man was doing today with zero numbing or pain and he had me running out of there in tears. I could not even finish what we started in fear of what he would do to me. I cannot go back there and I cannot with a sound mind encourage anyone else to go through the torture he put me through today.
What a scam of a place!!! First look at their website they have what they call Final Price and Conditional Final Price . First the Conditional price you can kiss that goodbye...this is what is a loss leader to make people feel they can get a deal and make the dealer have much lower numbers to put on their website than they will actually sell a car for. OK so you maybe think your Final Price number on the website is accurate...NOPE think again. This is the Final number BEFORE the fine print. Now in the fine print on the last page of the ad there is a little tiny note that says... All prices online exclude tax tag title and 497 doc fee. Also excludes dealer installed options. Dealer retains all rebates. Not all buyers will qualify for pricing or all rebates. Some residency restrictions may apply. Now this is the Helps us to sleep at night disclaimer . OK so most places tax tags title and doc fee are fairly standard. But the Also excludes dealer installed options is where they get you. They install a bunch of crap that you do not need nor probably want... and then charge you 2280 for them over and above the price you agreed on. Some of those charges... 195 for Nitrogen in your tires. Your kidding right? 1195 for a sad excuse for a tint job on the windows. Who has ever paid 1195 for a basic tint job?? 295 for GPS tracking which you then have to pay a monthly fee for 595 for Red Alert which I was told was a system that makes your brake lights flash when you brake to make them more noticeable.??? The sad part is I am sure 80 of people never even catch this on the invoice. Me I did and I was pretty upset because I intentionally called to get the number agreed upon before I drove almost an hour to sign the papers. To show up and find this Bait and Switch . So Sleazy! Read the fine print people. They are going to do this to you too. Out of principle alone I will never be able to buy a car from sleazy salespeople like this. And to top it off I went back in before I left to ask for the manager hoping someone has a bone of ethics in their body to find that the gentleman who pulled all this over on me WAS the Desk Manager . Then he proceeded to walk up to me and get in my face in a threatening manner when I said he was a sleazy salesman and should be ashamed. So it runs deep this activity is engrained and not changing anytime soon. Trust me do NOT do business with them. I never will ever again.
Could not wait to try our Craft Kitchen!! Arrived at 930 am and there were copious amounts of people waiting for 7 tables to 8 empty tables. They did not want to sit anyone because they did not want to seat anyone with a backed up kitchen. How about seat everyone and offer coffee water and juice??? I ve never seen so many servers and the manager owner standing around doing nothing. Disappointed. Trendy looking restaurant. Missed the mark.
It has been about 4 weeks since our move and I have found more and more damage each day. The crew went out of their way to up end tip over and turn sideways every price of furniture containing anything inside a drawer. In most cases this was totally unnecessary. The move cost over twice what we were told. Very unhappy with this company.
Went in to look around the shop and while browsing found a tie that I really liked. When I tried to ask if the tie was available in black the sales lady said you need to make an appointment to ask me about anything . This low cost suit store acting like they re on Rodeo Drive telling me I needed to make an appointment to ask about a tie. Worst customer service attitude. Will not come to this place again.
Let me start this review by saying that I am a dedicated and long time believer of the Buffalo Wild Wings brand. I enjoy the atmosphere the people and the food. It s truly a great environment and one of a kind. I have spent quite a bit of time and money at this particular bdubs if you will. Lately my experiences have not been the best and I feel that it needs to be put onto paper. Fairly recently I have noticed that the employees seem to be of a much lower morale. They do not seem to be the typical upbeat bartenders and servers that they usually are. One visit in particular showed me why this is it s the management. I saw a manager openly yell at an employee and embarrass them in front of customers. This is so wrong and unprofessional on so many levels. These waiters waitresses and bartenders are the SOLE reason I continue to come here. I can get a blue moon and some crappy wings anywhere... But the people are what make this place such a great environment! To see the managerial staff treat these folks this way is unacceptable. I will continue to come here but I will not support the managers of this establishment. It s unprofessional and deeply bothers me that they treat such wonderful upbeat and energetic employees the way they do. Please keep your eyes out for this I do not want to have a reason to stop coming to this restaurant but if that s what it takes I will.
I have a six year old 3 ton and 5 ton outdoor unit for my house. The 3 ton stopped working last Sunday. I called George Brazil on Monday and they came right out. The Tech opened up the unit power tested the compressor looked at me and said you re not going to be happy . I asked why and he told me the compressor needed to be replaced. I asked him what that would cost and he said 3800. I told him no thank you and he left. I had another company come out today confirmed that I needed a new compressor. I asked him how much. He said he could get the exact compressor it is a very common brand for a little under 1000 and it would take him about 4 to 5 hours to complete. Doing the math George Brazil was charging me 2800 for 5 hours labor!!!!! This equals to each Tech working 40 hours a week with two weeks vacation brings in over a million dollars in labor alone. Hope they get paid well. This seems to be a common complaint on Yelp. Guess I should have looked first. I guess good marketing gets them in the door then it s game on. I will bad mouth George Brazil to everyone I come in contact with. I golf 6 mornings a week with different people so word will spread very quickly in Verrado. Do Not Call George!!!!!!!
I ll start with the experience with the hostess she seemed very confused and unclear of why we were there. The waiter was nice enough but the service was not up to what I would expect at a steakhouse. The filet was subpar very salty but edible. The sides were nothing exceptional. At the end of our meal we were having some cocktails but the wait staff seemed frustrated that we were not rushing to leave even though they were open for another 45 50 minutes. I would not make a trip back.
WALK AWAY WHILE YOU CAN STILL TAKE YOUR BELOVED PET. 3 months of illness. 2 surgeries. No diagnosis. In the end we had to put her down because she was SEPTIC. The place is filthy. The ER is the SAME ROOM as the human equivalent of the ICU. The staff is inexperienced dealing with difficult cat personalities. The icing on the cake 11 000 .
Come for the ambiance but leave before your wallet starts leaking TFSA tears. Oh King Street the place where your money goes to deliciously die. Or not so deliciously ahem Bier Markt . You know you re going to spend at least 30 and get a heel blister from your Finally Got To Wear These pointy shoes but you hope that it will be money well spent. ATMOSPHERE Pretentious but not cloyingly so Crush s high ceilings and warm wood tones make you feel distinctly classy. A far cry from being a place where everybody knows your name a scuzzy dirt hole it nevertheless sets a business casual tone where you can order a glass of wine and talk with friends without having to a elbow people out of the way on the way to the bar b yell over the music or c worry about being judged because you re not wearing a cocktail dress. Good for impressing a good friend or date a group of friends from college with jobs a wine snack with your parents shut up FOOD WINE I wanted to enjoy some wine and cheese while toasting with my friends from college so I ordered an exciting flight of red wine. I love ordering beer flights from my favourite bars so I was very excited to do the same here. There was a white rose and red choice of flights. I drink red so I went there since it was supposed to be robust. The offerings were Californian vintage 2009 going from a fruitier shiraz to a drier cab sauv. Price tag is prohibitively 28 bucks for the flight so it better be good right? With beer you get three little cups equivalent to about 1 pint and for the price of one pint. I do not know about you but I do not make a habit of ordering 28 glasses of red. The wine came and I confess to being a tad disappointed. The three glasses were teensy and I am sceptical if they would have added up to an excessively full glass if I d poured them together. Aaaand the wine itself was very approachable but unspectacular. In addition of the two cabs one was subbed out for a zinfandel. The cheese platter. The selection was exciting and the menu does a great job of explaining the taste of the cheeses. I ordered three and right away I could tell they were good cheeses not some brie or cheddar from Longos. But and this is a big but the cheese on that cheese platter was very small. A few grapes and a slice of prepared pear were there too sure but really people I do not care if you give me oodles of crackers I know that crackers cheap. This platter is 20.00. Are you seriously going to tell me that those nubs of cheese are just under 7 each? Come on now. On another good note my friend next to me ordered a halibut main course and it was very delicious but this is a wine bar so I expected a little more from the wine and cheese part. At least the table bread they brought us was very good. They are not cheaping on that at all four types of bread and even given my post Paris bread snobbery I enjoyed all of them. SERVICE Our server was pleasant and knowledgeable about the wine and the cheeses. Our service was not particularly fast but not slow either nothing to complain about here. LOCATION Easily accessible with a brief street car ride away from King Station to Spadina. You could walk from King in comfy flats hidden under your nice business casual pants. If it was summer it is conceivable to walk from Union as well. Keep your eyes peeled for the sign outside it s not loud but it s not as pretentiously non existent as Spice Route unsignage just a bit further down the road. OVERVIEW Come to impress and make sure your wallet is full. Enjoy a clean classy but not too pretentious environment. Order a glass of wine share a snack and make that bread basket last. I enjoyed my evening but I wo not be a recurring customer. Excuse me I have to go comfort my wallet now.
They ca not give you free tap water. Instead have to charge you 12 dollars for a mini bottle of water. I get it s Vegas. But you re just asking for trouble with that.
Walmart has 28 registers and only 6 are operational. This is not only the first of the month and it also july 3rd!!! You have the largest barbeques and cook outs going on in this great country of ours and you are not prepared. I ve been in line for 20 min and have not moved!!this is really sad for a large corporation. Sooooo Sad!!!
Only giving one star because I have to chose one. We were interested to try this place out to see how it compared to Flip Side but we were disappointed as soon as we walked in. The gentleman at the hostess stand seemed annoyed with something and was very rude most likely because we had a stroller with us. He asked if we were going to need a sling for the infant seat but asked with an attitude. After standing there for a minutes and being looked at like we had three heads we decided to leave the place without even trying it out. I guess we will continue to patronize Flip Side as they provide good service along with good food. This is not a good place for kids and especially if you have a stroller. Who would have thought that a stroller at the mall restaurant is not a good idea.
I was really disappointed by my first experience with Stoke. We had reservations on Friday with another couple and were seated in the bar area at a high top table. The seats were wide but shallow and incredibly uncomfortable. Our table mates had to stand and constantly readjust and it became a joke throughout the night as we watched other guests squirm in their chairs for relief. Our server rushed us to get drink orders in but I asked for time since we were sharing the one cocktail wine menu among the table. I had to remind the server about my drink order and waited an additional 15 minutes for my glass of wine to arrive. We ordered the meat cheese and pickle tray as well as pretzel brioche for appetizers. The pretzel brioche and whipped butters were good but no one ever told us what the butters were. We figured out one was mustard one honey and the one in the middle was a mystery butter. There were very few pickles on our plate one slice of jalapeno for example and we had to ask for more bread. In addition I did not like two of the three cheeses that were served and I ca not say that has ever happened to me before. Our friends ordered two entrees to share scallops and lamb and the server left before taking the order for the other half of the table. We had to call our server back to order. My boyfriend and I shared the sticky pork shank and sides of brussel sprouts and crispy fingerling potatoes. I enjoyed the pork shank more than my boyfriend did and the brussel sprouts were not crispy like I would have preferred. All in all we could have prepared a better version of this meal at home. If the food was amazing and the service lackluster I may have been able to overlook the deficits of this restaurant. However when a shared meal costs over a hundred dollars in Charlotte no less I expect the food to wow me and the service to be up to standard. As a former server in a Michelin star restaurant I know what level of service to expect and what is unacceptable. For example when spending 150 on dinner for two I expect the silverware to not be placed in a pile with the napkins at the end of the table. Unfortunately we will not be back to Stoke.
I want to love this place but they make it so hard to do. Orders are always wrong and even when ordering ahead at lunchtime there s still a long wait to get your food. Great concept good food crappy service.
We arrived at 7pm and asked to be seated in the bar to watch the All Star event. We were put on the waiting list and given a buzzer. After 30 mins a couple walked in and seated themselves at a table that was just cleared in the bar. When we complained we were told the couple was not supposed to seat themselves and we needed to keep waiting. Then a manager came out we assumed it was to ask the couple to get in line. Instead he left the couple and then seated another group that came in several people after we received our buzzer. We then went to the front to return our buzzer and go somewhere else. When we tried to explain why we were leaving to the manager none of the staff including the manager were apologetic. We could have chosen to go to any other number of restaurants but chose to go to this Jask Astor s. By the time we left because there was no way we were going to give this restaurant our money it was 7 45 and we could not get in anywhere on time for dinner to watch the event... so thanks for ruining our evening. Next we ll take our chances somewhere else and remind everyone else to do the same.
Bathroom is disgusting. Water all over floor. Dirt everywhere. No toilet paper just a bottle of glade on the sink. Restaurant space is too cramped and the booths are lumpy and sitting on the pillows is awkward. Hard to get attention of waitstaff empty water glass the whole night. Also the strip mall location does not do it any favors. Food is good overall but nothing to fawn over. Overall ambiance is okay but decor and visual taste is terrible.
Mediocre at best. This experience here... Is no experience really. NYC is 1. Service is slow. We sat at the bar. Bartender was fast but not friendly.
I visited here once and there was not much on the menu but fried food. Nothing. I guess it s OK for what it is trying to be but not for the health conscious.
I do not see what the deal is with this place. The salsa is horrible...no spice no flavor...just mush. The shrimp tacos are bland and flavorless. House margarita tasted like water. The one star goes to our server who was really nice.
Had a pretty awesome pedicure the ladies here are sweet and the massage chairs are pretty sweet as well. But I ve worked in many nails spas and never heard of charging men 5 more on top of the pedicure for a nail buff. Just think that s fucked up so I gave this place a one star for over charging me. She still got a very nice tip just watch out because they might over charge you.
Pretty amazed with the terrible customer service experience we just had by 2 ladies working at the register. I ve never had such snarky rude remarks said to me while we were spending money at the establishment nonetheless. Safe to say we re never going there again!
Not the breakfast I was looking for. For an overpriced breakfast our food came out of the kitchen piecemeal and that several different temperatures none of which were hot. The coffee was good but we had to keep waiting for a cup to be refilled. I had the pancakes and they were quite lackluster and flavorless. My eggs were good but the toast was cold and unbuttered. If you are looking for a good breakfast before you head out of the hotel the better choice is to go to the deli. Much better food much quicker service.
Nasty! I ca not believe people consider this a great authentic local spot. Every time I got a burrito it literally dripped with grease. Ca not even get a bean and cheese burrito done properly. I heard they were great back in the day but unfortunately seems like they replaced quantity over quality.
This location is more mellow than most which is not such a bad thing especially when you wanna be quick. However the staff is not that helpful. They seem as if they really hate their job and most times it feels like a drag shopping here. And yes the prices are ridiculous! Not to mention their poor inventory they never really have what you need looking for. I prefer the location on Flamingo they re 24hrs too!
I should have believed all the bad reviews. Came at 5 15pm and asked if they were open and if I could look around. They said yes and that they did not close until 6. They seemed welcoming. However every camper was locked. Nobody was willing to help. There were 6 people lounging around doing nothing. Guess they do not want to sell anything. I m leaving and going back to another dealer to buy tonight. Ironically they have a sign posted that says to let them know if a salesperson was friendly and did a good job and they will give them a 5 bonus. Based on my experience I suppose it never has to be paid out.
Not only did me and my group have to find the waitress to even bring us menus and just some simple water...but it took 15 30 mins EACH between receiving any other drinks and food. All because our waitress was far too busy flirting with the same guy the entire time we were there. The kitchen staff even had to bring our food to us because she was M.I.A. exchanging her phone number for tips at the other table. When we paid her she took another 20 mins with our credit cards when we found her she was standing our with our money in her hands talking to the same dude she was busy with before! Days later I checked my bank account and the waitress had changed the tip amount that I wrote in on my slip! She literally STOLE money from me! I called to speak to a manager who was far too busy to care and she even confirmed that the waitress wrote in a different tip amount. However she did NOTHING about it. Told me I could dispute it with my bank or receive a credit at their bar. WHY in the WORLD would I take a CREDIT to your establishment for the money STOLEN from me???!!! Needless to say I disputed the ENTIRE charge with my bank and thankfully received my money back. WITH ZERO help from Derby Public House. Who knows how many people this waitress or others have done this to thinking they would not notice?? The manager was FULLY aware and shrugged it off! Never again will I go the Derby Public House. FAR too expensive as it is and their waitresses moonlight as THIEVES!!!
Do not go here unless you want to be waiting for more than an hour each time you have an appointment.
Called before I came and no one answered the phone. When I did arrive after driving in circles I stood in the front while the girl working in front flirted with a crackhead. Then told me to sign in and sit down. The place is dirty. Lady in front looks like she hates her life. Only came here so I can get a drug test for work and it took forever.
Eff this place....It was the last resort for presidents day weekend for one night. It was either this or the Tropicana. Every hotel on the strip had no vacancies BS but whatever. The Luxor smells like dead corpse. We checked in wanted a king all they had was 2 queen in the pyramid..ok.....Got into the room it looked like house keeping didnt even vacuum or change the sheets. Was charged double on my card and didnt know until I got back home. WTF!!!788 to stay in that dump i might as well went to the WYNN! So I had to call accounting a tthe luxor and they kept telling me it was a pending transaction WHY WOULDNT THE FRONT DESK TELL YOU THAT THEYRE GOING TO CHARGE AN EXTRA 388 ON YOUR CARD?! After screaming at the dumbazz on the phone she told me I d be refunded one of the amounts by the end of the day. Tacos and Tequila was good spot to eat at . The staff seemed miserable maybe because it was early? 3 30pm My advice is to avoid the Luxor..big disappointment. AND NEVER WILL STAY THERE AGAIN.
My husband took me here for a special birthday dinner on 5 15 and I really wanted to like this place but it just did not work out that way . Maybe it s because we are not gourmet foodies? I dunno. We found it strange that this upscale restaurant is situated in a strip mall but it IS a nice strip mall lol with a pretty water fountain and cute furniture home goods shops nearby. The interior of Cork is small yet really cool and modern with a chain mesh curtain running down the middle and suede seats in the booths. When we were seated we were given menus that read Happy Birthday Rebecca! at the top which I thought was very sweet. All items are tapas style essentially lots of small meals which I enjoy because I love to sample several dishes. We started with salads. The Baby Arugula had fried goat cheese pieces of watermelon and strawberries cashews and a blood orange poppy seed vinaigrette. The Organic Green Salad had blue cheese spiced caramel popcorn slices of pear and a balsamic vinaigrette. Both were tasty but I liked the Arugula the best. Next we decided on Cork s Mac and Cheese which consisted of BBQ pork belly smoked bacon and cheddar normally comes with mushrooms too but my husband hates them . It was good but nothing special. Especially in comparison to Fleming s drop dead delicious mac n cheese. Finally we ordered the Honey Glazed Duck Breast mango sopapilla duck confit and cantaloupe gazpacho relish and the Surf and Turf tempura shrimp honey lavender glazed ostrich coconut milk chorizo fried rice and spicy mustard These dishes were hugely disappointing to us. Let me mention that I ve never had duck or ostrich so that could have been part of the problem. The ostrich tasted like cheap stew meat and the duck was just nasty. Our super nice server forget his name sorry! was very thoughtful and did say he could bring us something else but we were pretty much done by then. We shared the banana creme pie for dessert and that was incredibly creamy and luscious. The 2 major reasons we will most likely never come back to Cork is Number 1 The food made my husband really crabby......he was seriously grumpy afterwards. and WARNING the following will be TMI for some of you Number 2 Literally!!! About 15 minutes after eating here I had the WORST squirts of my life. It was sooooo bad UGH!
This hotel has the potential to be so much better than the experience I had. Its location is prime sitting in the heart of downtown Toronto. It s right next to the Eaton Centre and is in the vicinity of restaurants that range from diner status Fran s to fancy schmancy Canoe . Moreover it may not look like much on the outside but it s lovely on the inside. It s definitely one of the nicer hotels with pretty chandeliers lighting and decor. The rooms were designed elegantly but some of the furniture like the table looked scraped. The check in process was not welcoming at all. We approached the desk and were not even greeted. The receptionist treated us with indifference throughout it all. It was an awkward interaction to say the least. We had booked a room with a kitchenette so that we could cook some of our meals. It was perfect and exactly what we wanted. However the kitchenette was not even equipped with the basic necessities. I had called up the front desk for a pot to boil some water but they informed me they could not find any in the other rooms of the hotel. When I tried to insist that there must be at least one he told me that room service was closed for the night. I think it just goes to show that the hotel may have looked the part but it did not measure up in hospitality for a magical experience. Be wary of all the items laid about. Almost all of them have a price tag attached to them even the bottles of water.
It is not often I give one star. In the case of Ciro s I genuinely wish I could give less. Half a star is probably too generous. Zero for Eep! Just close already! is closer to the mark. We felt insulted and kind of violated actually. Anyway... ... went to Ciro s last night with a group of 8 around 10pm place was not busy one guy working the ol dual purpose bar server role. We order the following with parentheses providing a brief summary of the outcome 3 bison burgers Fine 3 star burger maybe homemade BUT came fully dressed with mustard ketchup relish... each of us had to scrape condiments off. Who does that? Let us dress our own freakin burger. we ll call em 2.5 then. 3 pulled pork poutine Nasty frozen fries ice cold un squeeky curd mediocre gravy mediocre pork... BAD so much so that two orders went mostly uneaten. 1.0 1 nachos Competitor for worst nachos ever that were not intending irony or insult covered in crappy cheap black olive slices and scuz cheese with very very stale no name brand nachos. Sent back after a few people at the table sampled and rebuffed. The big zero. 1 fried mozza sticks Fine probably from frozen server tipped plate upon delivery and dumped two on the floor... they were replaced but yeesh talk about heaping bad upon terrible! 2.0 2 cokes Completely flat notified server who took his sweet time in replacing them with... 2 more completely flat cokes. Good job! Went unfinished. Another zero. 3 Fin du Monde 1 Mill St Coffee 1 Cider 1... Stella I want to say? All were from bottles none skunked so that s good but the price was a bit on the high side... nothing outrageous but 50 cents to 1 higher than I would expect at most bars. 3.0 cuz they had Fin du Monde... we ll be generous! Nothing interesting on draft. So 3 burgers mozza sticks and 1 poutine were eaten the latter grudgingly . 2 poutine 2 cokes and 1 nachos went unfinished the latter so bad we sent it back . The cook made angry faces at us and rolled his eyes from the kitchen it s open to view . To exacerbate his suckitude at one point he was smoking in the alley that joins the main bar and the patio just outside the door the smoke was blowing into the bar and we asked him if he could move away a bit. He nodded yes but then did not move an inch. We asked him politely for something simple and he was a prick about it. Swell. To top it all off as someone else mentioned Ciro s has the NASTIEST MEN S ROOM IN THE CITY. It stinks so bad you have to hold your breath. It is filled with fruit flies and some kind of weird moth things. The urinal literally sprays water out at you when you flush. And the toilet... the toilet is covered in some kind of disgusting slimy substance upon which the fruit flies and moths appear to be subsisting. When you re scared to wash your hands after taking a piss that says a hell of a lot. Oh as for that great beer list that supposedly recommends this place it s fine but nothing great and the prices are higher than they should be considering they re just readily available bottles. The Rhino has a much better more thoughtful more unusual list that s just as large maybe larger . So forget Ciro s and just go somewhere else please! In closing if Ciro s were a body part it d be a badly infected rectum. Pure scunge horrible through and through. None of us will ever return.
Average bakery. We had some of the croissants tarts and other treats from here. Some of the items here did not taste fresh and the croissants were nothing to write home about. there are better French bakeries with similar prices in this area. One plus side is that there are lots of seats here.
Imagine a Hooters where the girls cut their outfits in half. That is about the only reason to go to this place. It s a decent sports bar for guys to hang out in but not for familys or with your wife. Lots of beers on tap unfortunately they serve them at ice cold 29 degrees temperature which is ok for your bud light coors light drinker but for craft beer it should be served at around 40 degrees. Hello McFly!!! Food was typical bar food for the most part with a few modern choices. The meatloaf is more like just a hamburger patty than real meatloaf IMHO. The place specializes in breasts and not chicken breasts.
Too Expensive For Quality Of Food Drink Slowwww Service I do like Fridays but this is the worst TGI Fridays I ve ever been to. Stopped in for lunch I ordered a berry limeade cocktail that was so watered down it angered me 12.50!! . The 2 appetizers we had were potstickers and bbq chicken flatbread pizza 11.50 each LOL!! both overcooked which obviously made them dried out. I ordered the crusted parmesan cheese chicken 14.25 and this too was overcooked. Food splatter all over the wall in our booth. Though our waitress was nice and the place was almost empty the service was slowwwww I mean one of the worst service I ve ever had. For lunch we were in there for 2 hours. I do not know but I think the kitchen is to blame and obviously management but then again when I paid the waitress I had to wait well over 10 minutes to get my change. How does this place survive. SKIP THIS FRIDAYS!!
More like Gyro Plus I m beginning to think I m unlucky because unlike most reviewers I know what real Shawarma is and this ai not it. Whenever I m in a new city I try to look for real Shawarma. Outside of CA and MI I always fail because reviewers insist they had great Shawarma that was actually mediocre Gyro. The similarities are that both are cooked on a vertical rotisserie and both are typically served as wraps. Here are the key differences Gyro A Greek wrap made with processed meat deli luncheon meat . Typical toppings are COLD tomatoes cucumbers Tzatziki sauce and possibly onions. The sandwich is generally cold and shaped like a cone. Shawarma A middle eastern wrap made with actual meat beef and or lamb with special seasoning and nice blob of fat on top that melts as the meat is slow cooked. When ordered the Shawarma is sliced down onto the griddle where it s mixed with HOT veggies tomatoes onions parsley tahini sauce and possibly garlic sauce. The sandwich is cylindrical and is served hot. Abomination Some hybrid of the two made by taking a gyro and making a small substitution such as tahini instead of Tzatziki. It s typically cylindrical like a Shawarma. Sadly Gyro is more well known than Shawarma and much cheaper easier to make processed meat cold ingredients . As a result when a place advertises Shawarma even in its name it is typically serving either Gyro or Abomination. Some places start out serving both Shawarma and Gyro but end up downgrading to Abomination to save time money. The only places that serve real Shawarma are in communities where a lot of middle eastern or Armenian people live because they know the difference. Yelp reviewers I have nothing against those of you who fall for the fake Shawarma. I hope you read this and start to recognize the real thing. I d love to be able to rely on Yelp to find real Shawarma one day.
No dance floor people are mean long lines music is not good.
If I could give zero stars I would. We had a reservation for 6 at 8pm and when we got there they did not have a table for us. Then we got seated under a dripping ceiling which our waiter did nothing about when we brought to his attention. Speaking of our waiter he was rude from the moment we sat down. Two people in our party ordered fettuccine Alfredo and they were out of course. When he told us he says we re out get something else. We did not get our food until 9 30. When we got it it was cold and soggy as if it had been sitting out for awhile and no one brought it out. Our martinis took 30 minutes to make. Oh and of course we could not split the check which we were not told ahead of time. Waste of time and money. Will not be returning.
Very greasy for a place with a drive thru it s kind of pricey. I felt sick after l ate there so I wo not return.
Went here last night and it s unfortunate that this place stumbles all over itself. Food was OK at best. Not sure who manages the place but the overall experience was horrible just because of the way it s managed. Waited 45 minutes when there were open tables both inside and outside. Had to ask them 3 times when we would be seated and they seemed confused. Many of the main menu items were unavailable. We had to make 3 selections before we found something they had. No chicken parmesan but could make chicken marsala? Are not they both made with chicken? No prosciutto. The list goes on. When I said something about them being out of a lot of basic items I was told they were really busy this weekend. Hmmmm EpiCentre was hosting Sip and Stroll and advertised well in advance. Maybe the management team was the only people in Charlotte who did not see the advertisements and Groupons for it. Just crazy. When we did get the food it was OK nothing great. Had a tower of chilled egg plant mozzarella and tomatoes that was difficult to eat and the eggplant did not taste great. Bruschetta that looked hastily put together on semi toasted bread that was falling apart. Chicken marsala that did not have much taste. Overall they are in a great position to do well but do not execute well.
A wildly incompetent store to match an equally outrageous company. Throughout my year of CenturyLink services I was confronted with a heaping load of issues. From poor internet service to billing issues to the repair guys never showing up to our 3 hour windowed service appointments to getting a collections bill from Central Credit Services because this store failed to properly turn in the rental modem I had returned to them when I moved from Arizona. My suggestion Avoid CenturyLink and dealing with location at all costs my experience has been nothing but a hellish nightmare.
Just dispointed shawarma. I went in craving a really good shawarma but this place was just a let down. Been to way better places around Calgary
WORST!!! We had a sales rep come to our house and talked to us about using them. At the time we were looking for a company and decided to go with them. We signed the year contract with them. At first the service was great. The phone guy would schedule the appointment and when we had issues they would schedule to come out right away but as the year went on the customer service because horrible. They did not want to come out right away but would push it off for a week or so they would tell us we need to give the product more time to work although it had been 3 weeks. and they product they had sprayed never did anything. Honestly the product never 100 worked but we tried to be understanding. Of course during winter months the bugs are not as bad but as spring came along the activity became more noticeable so we called and they did the normal serve couple weeks later we were having red any issues outside and explained that the home next door was foreclosed and the ants were coming over the wall. Reluctantly the appointment was scheduled and the guy came out saw the problem and sprayed. Then we stared having spiders in our home. I have 4 kids and I called because they had not sprayed inside our home in a year. I explained to the guy who was the Manager the issue and he was beyond unprofessional and rude. told me that they ca not keep spraying and if we do not like the service we can go elsewhere so do not worry I DID!! POOR CUSTOMER SERVICE. I had the regular 3 month spray an ant problem from the foreclosed home next door and a spider issue in a home you did not spray in a year sorry I m asking you to do your job. They charge you 90 every 3 months and only come out at that time of payment.. Broken down your paying 30 a month and only receive service every 3 months. I went with a company that charges 30 a month and sprays every month. CONTRACT BEWARE!!! Do not sign with contract companies it gives them the opportunity not be held accountable for the services they do not provide. They can be lazy and you ca not do anything about it. No contract companies are way better because you can hold them accountable for the work they provide. PLUS why have a contract if you proclaim to guarantee your services hard lesson learned.The manager is the worst and is the one who handles the appointments and lies. Told me he has 3000 clients in the city of Surprise really Surprise probably only has 3000 residents..wow I do not want to discredit the guys who do come out and spray they are amazing guys that do a great job. They just work for a horrible company and manager. Be aware that if you use this company and have for then your every 3 month spray the manager will flip out. Unfortunately the lesson I learned was when you sign with a company that has you in a contract they do great at first and slowly slip to giving you poor service because they know you ca not leave.
worst place to get your eyebrows. I went there just because I was in the neighborhood and I am so sorry I did not go to the same place in the mall I always go to. the lady did a horrible job. she did not clean up all of my hairs. one of my eyebrows is super uneven and crooked. I want to cry. I will never return and will not recommend the place.
This is a beautiful historic property and it is sad to see it being so poorly run. Any hotelier who knows what he she is doing knows that local business is important for resort hotels especially in the off season. Recent management changes have resulted in this hotel being considerably less welcoming to local visitors. Although we have spent thousands here over the years on restaurants and other services our enthusiasm for this wonderful property has waned as it has become more focused on profits than on people.
Did not have good experiences here at all. He seemed really rude and did not numb me properly so I was almost always in pain when having work done. He even asked me why I still was not numb uhh because it was not done right? I eventually moved to another city and am seeing a different dentist. The new dentist found a LOT of problems that were missed by this office. They also did not x ray all of my teeth like they should have. One thing that really shocked me was when the lady who was going to clean my teeth asked me if I did drugs! I could not believe she said that. Unbelievable.
These guy are famous just because they serve halal food but this does not means they can do whatever they want they are not people of words worst customer service worst commitment accomplishers. I bought voucher from Buytopia which said it can be used after 72 hours but hen I reached there they did not accepted and told me it s the mistake of Buytopia it s valid from 1st January 2016. Secondly 2 of my vouchers did not had dates printed which is not my mistake they told it s a scam . Now why will any one scam for 20 They really gave me hard time
Avoid this place at all cost. The man working there Flynt has the worst customer service and attitude ever. I had been to this establishment many time before but never experienced this man nor this harassment before. Watch your bills because this man is out to nickel and dime you. The food was sub par at best not like it used to be. I wo not be back ever. Over price chicken rice spend your money else where....
Came in for a take out order. I was pretty much ignored for a while while the bartender chatted with two girls who were sitting at the bar. Someone else eventually took my order and it was brought in a timely manner. When I was handed my to go bag I asked if there was a fork in the bag. She said yes. Imagine my anger when I got all the way across the casino and up a billion floors to my room and discovered I was given no fork or napkins. I had to go all the way back to the casino to grab a fork from another restaurant. Definitely regretting leaving a tip! UPDATE 8 8 13 I was contacted by management who more than made amends for my inconvenience. Super impressed with how much they care about their guests!
Called to see if they had a product and they told me they did. 20 min drive later walked in the store and employees were arguing on who should help me because of whose clocked in. After explaining and physically showing what I wanted they told me they do not carry that. Huge waste of my time. Recommend the smoke shop across the street.
The food is pretty good but.... Please please please STOP asking me 20 different times by six different people what I ordered!!! Especially frustrating if you have a group of more than three. Nuff said
Just bought a NEW modem. Called Cox to set it up and quickly found out that the NEW modem I just bought was active on another account......... So moral of the story this location is taking returns and re packaging them as new and selling them to customers. Really Staples ? You just lost my future business and anyone I can tell my tale to.
I would not give any star rating but in order to give a review I have to give at least one 1 star but note it s only because I have to give one. I am currently still awaiting plants for my new build front landscaping that I closed on back at the end of April 2017. As of today Poco was supposed to fix my irrigation valves leak on the main line and replace five 5 dead plants. They have been a no show three 3 times for warranty work. I have since fixed the valves and the leak myself and requested from the builder to have Poco leave five 5 living plants on my porch which I will plant myself due to I do not want them touching my landscaping they are a no show for leaving plants as well. I thank the Lord that I did not pay for a upgraded front landscape nor back landscaping. They should not have a contracting license!!!!!!!!
Awful. Tried to give a second chance. Its a shame the salon is beautiful but the service is shitty. The guy at the front desk was nice and he was nice last time no problem there. The woman who did my pedicure was so NASTY. The salon was empty and she took her sweet time getting everything together. When I sat down she disappeared to the bathroom for about 10 min making me wait again very inconsiderate. She also was so rough with the cuticle clippers when I asked her to take it easy she got mad like I was wrong because she was rough. Then I went to pay and she was quick to put the card machine in front of me even before I sat down to dry my feet. You cant tip on the card so I told her I would get her cash. She sucked her teeth and said something under her breath to the guy at the front desk. I went and gave her a tip anyway she seemed thankful. She really deserved nothing at all in hindsight. Her job has to be hard and its not one that I would want. She literally had the shittiest attitude! If she is going to be hateful and rude she needs to quit. That place was empty for a reason and empty it shall remain of the service does not improve. I will take my dollar elsewhere where I wont be treated like I m bothering staff.
What a horrible experience what a rip off company. We purchased a coupon from Amazon Local for 3 rooms plus a hallway. When the carpet guy walked in the door 45 minutes late we were the first appointment of the morning he immediately began upselling a 150 cleaning so that we would deep clean the carpets. He claimed with a regular cleaning the dirt would just seep up and make the carpet look dirtier. Sure enough he cleaned the carpet I think without soap and it looked awful. He said he would do a deep cleaning for 100. My husband said 75 and we would take it. My carpet still looks filthy and it cost an additional 75. This company claims that because they use all natural products their carpets dry faster usually in 2 hours. Well it is 6 hours later and my carpets are soaking wet as if someone took a hose and hosed down my house. These thieves need to be run out of town.
This place sucks big time. We had proof from our bank that a check had been paid twice so we could not make the pmt we had to wait 24 to 48 hours until the bank could fix the problem. Well these people would not wait until after work for the pmt so they put the check thru anyway. These people have no feelings and are not willing to work with their customers when extremely difficult situations arise. I would not recommend this place to anyone!!
My girlfriends and I dined here as a last resort before our night out. Since we were very short on time we told the server that we would not be doing the all you can eat meat seafood. When we asked him how big their appetizers were he said that they were very small so some people in our group ordered several appetizers thinking they would not be full with just one order. When the food arrived we were a little upset because the appetizers were not small at all... they were the size of a regular entree!!! And trust me we eat a lot so it s not like the serving was small and it overwhelmed us. The food was mediocre at best.... Lots of better dining options in Vegas.
Nice room good service but for the hefty price the food was mediocre at best. Capital Grille Red XO Pepper Pike are a better choice.
This was the nastiest so called resort I have ever stayed in the rooms are nasty house keeping do not clean shit every thing was filthy . The management do not care about customer service. We complained to them they did not do anything about the house keeping. I would not recommended this place to anyone ever.
Beware of the eyewear and service . I had an unfortunate experience here where I found both frames i had put aside for much much cheaper online one example 175 USD instead of their 310 CAD pricetag . The employee agreed to reimburse my deposit 200 without even getting prescriptions put it or anything simply had the frames put aside in a tray for under 24h in light of my discovery. I was told to go in the next day. I found this remarkable but fair that she would reimburse it. The following day when I returned she barely looked at me and started writing me up a credit note. Naturally I brought up our previous conversation and she started to change the story quite a bit . I suspect when talking to her boss she was told that she could not reimburse me. I even told her that I would understand if that was the case but I did not appreciate being told I heard wrong or was making things up. I got very upset and neither staff was able to talk to me in a polite manner or empathise at all. I ended up taking some sunglasses so I would never have to set foot again in that hell hole. Funny thing is once I spoke of this to some coworkers they had nothing good to say about this place either. Definitely avoid this place. They jack up their prices it seems and they ca not offer customer service any better than a McDonalds. Was I foolish to leave a deposit in the first place? Yes. However I expect some form of customer service which Henri Cohen s staff were unable to provide.
Paradise Valley Eye Care scheduled appointments for my son and I and took all of my insurance information before scheduling the appointments. I then cancelled our appointment with another eyecare business that had taken almost 2 months to get. PV Eyecare later left a voicemail telling me they did not accept United Healthcare and the appointments were cancelled. Now I have no appointments and my son leaves for college next week.
We had hired Crawford Movers however we are not sure if that is their company name as they also call themselves AAA Movers and Frontline Movers. They had damaged some of our goods while moving and our walls at our home and they are not willing to take responsibility for it or even discuss it. When approached about the damages they got very defensive right from the get go and are not very customer oriented to come to an agreeement or consensus. Their story changes everytime you talk to them. We had asked numerous times to speak with Owner Operator but have never been given the chance to. Their office manager will send emails but thats it. We will not recommend their services to friends or family and will definetly never use them again. Its pretty sad when a company advertises that customer satisfaction is their priority and they are not willing to work with their customer to come to some sort of understanding. Their customer service is very very poor. Just like the other reviews on there we were told last minute that we have to pay with cash and the office manager called and asked if we had the cash ready before they were done unloading our contents because she was closing the office. We are not impressed with how they move and or how they deal with issues that arise during the move and after.
I was very excited to view the unique process of designing your own donut. Donuts are the gifts of the gods . Well upon purchasing my favorite donut they invited us to their frying window. To my shock there was our donuts sliding down into a vat of black tar looking oil. Ooohhhhh. I asked my husband if he noticed the cooking oil and he just shivered. We d already paid for the donuts so we left. The donuts were very dark in color. Well one bite said it all the oil had penetrated the inside of the donut and had the taste was of over used oil. I contacted the franchise manager and he said it was a different oil and the oil darkens quickly. He said he monitors the oil during the day. He was sorry for my disappointment in their product. He offered if I drive back there 30 minutes away to give me my money back. I wo not be doing that. Do not stop.
Mediocre at best. Took a long time between ordering and receiving food. Food was warm not hot. Meal came out before appetizer. Menu does not include papaya salad Thai beef jerky or sticky rice. Chicken dish lacked flavor. Price reasonable.
The WORST. We had set a plan for my daughter to complete her senior year. They changed principals and now on Aug 16 have decide to back out of the plan we had set and agreed to. They have HORRIBLE communication!! Claim the called about important information but both her father and I received NOTHING. The new principal then said Oh we called the student . 1 NOT true 2 really you Valles the child and not the parents?!?!?! They should close these people down!!!!!
My roommate and I went to 131 Main last night and were very disappointed in both the food and service. I ordered a caesar salad for an appetizer which was less than average. I ordered the 8 oz. prime rib for dinner which was cooked well but not a good cut of meat. It did not have a lot of flavor and the texture was off. My side of horseradish had a hair in it when it arrived at the table. The waitress did not come over for nearly 10 minutes after our entrees came out to check on us. When she finally did I told her about the sauce and she sent a different waiter back to give me a new one. She should have at the very least brought it out herself and apologized. She probably should have offered my glass of wine on the house.. In general the waitress was not very quick in attending to us and there were not many other diners in the restaurant yet as we had a 6pm dinner on a Monday night. Needless to say I will not be visiting 131 main any time soon.
We definitely will try not to come back to this place. We went during lunch where they only had one single customer else than us. There was no reason why the service would be so slow but it was. They had one server and a manager looking lady and two chefs at the bar. We ordered miso soup and pumpkin soups and some appetizers to start off. Despite their empty restaurant the foods came out cold and very late. When the nigiris came out there was so much rice that we could not dare to start eating. We definitely did not eat all the rice and did not care if they charged us or not. The server said oh really? When we said the foods were cold did not take any action about it or apologize. The nigiris were definitely tasteless since the fish was cut so thin and small. When this place first opened it was top notch being rated the number 1 sushi bar in town. Couple years later this place definitely cannot catch up the trend of new sushi restaurants like Neko or Sakana. If I am paying the same price I would just drive a little further from house and enjoy good service and food from sushi neko.
The ONLY reason I m giving Chop and Wok one star is because I have to. Which is truly a shame because the food is wonderful but the customer service GARBAGE. First when we called to place the order we were put on hold more than once. While we did have someone on the phone the lady was laughing at us and chatting with a friend coworker at the same time. After requesting no mushrooms or onions on the entire order it was delivered with mushrooms and onions on everything. When we called to make a complaint your mom argued that we were wrong stating we need to be more specific next time . That s right when we asked for her name her response was your mom . After listening to her tell us how WE placed the order incorrectly we asked for her name again and she hung up on us. Calling back she would answer and hang up even if from a different number. The help here is going to ruin this restaurant. I will not be ordering from them again unless this gets resolved.
If you call and get Cindy watch out. She can be as rude as anyone. She hung up on me twice. My wife and I have put an offer on a home that has been accepted by an absentee owner. However there are problems with the pool heater. On the previous day another person at Swimming Pool Service and Repair told me if I had a letter from the owner they would send a person out to assess the situation. However when the Realtor called SPS and R Cindy answered and was rude to her and told her that the owner had to call a letter was unacceptable. When I called and asked if a Docusign letter would be acceptable she rudely told me I ve told you only a phone call from the owner was acceptable and she hung up. I immediately called back and told her she had been rude and I was only trying to find a way to get the problem addressed. Again she told me I ve told you only a phone call from the owner and hung up. At this point only a written apology from Cindy will get me to do any further business with Swimming Pool Service and Repair. They have my name number and address.
I have to say I was pretty disappointed in this hotel. First we had to pay 60 to have 2 extra people in the room four of us girls decided to share for a total of 219 per night plus taxes. A woman in Reservations that I spoke to was very nice however the hotel messed up our reservation. I selected the check in via text and two of the four of us went straight to the bellhop who took our luggage up and gave us four room key cards. A few hours later roommate 3 who had not gotten my text about checking in with the bellhop showed up and said that the front desk gave her another 4 key cards which invalidated the 4 that they gave me informed her that we had not checked in and had her on a separate reservation with all charges on HER card. Peeved I called the front desk and told the story not once but TWICE to a young lady who obviously did not understand so I demanded that she put her supervisor on the phone who at least had a half a brain in his head. So that finally got straightened out. The good 1. The bathroom was huge and had both a tub and a separate shower. You could have put a queen sized air mattress in there and slept 2 more people. 2. The seminar I was attending was in the hotel so I did not have to go outside in the 100 degree heat very often. The bad 1. Our chartered bus was not allowed to drop us off anywhere near the hotel entrance. The driver had to park somewhere else and we had to schlep our bags and ourselves for quite a distance in the heat. 2. I requested feather free pillows when I checked in at 3 p.m. at 10 p.m. there was no sign of them. 3. Despite there being four of us on the reservation AND the extra fee paid I might add there were not enough sets of towels until we called twice. 4. There was no electrical plug anywhere near the desk for a laptop except behind the entertainment center where the TV was plugged in . 5. No mirrors anywhere except in the bathroom. 6. No hooks for toiletry bags in the bathroom except one on the back of the door. 7. No shelves for extra sets of towels. 8. No shelf in the shower for shampoo and other toiletries. 9. The air vents were filthy like they had not been cleaned in a year. The ugly 1. Two acquaintances told me they booked a room at the Westin with one of their Heavenly beds for a mere 81 per night.
I know I ve given them multiple chances since it is conveniently located near work for me and I keep thinking that this is going to get better. The times I have gone here or have gotten take out it has only been for lunch. I think that the food is always good so that s the reason that I go back but the service is not all that spectacular. I ve had many bad experiences hoping that it ll just get better and am still waiting for it to happen. Once experience I had I had gone out to lunch with my coworkers and ordered a Build Your Own Salad and had requested for some fried chicken. Our food came out but the friend chicken came 15 minutes after my salad had come out. The server asked me with a sort of attitude if I still wanted the chicken or not. I said sure. The manager asked if everything was okay I told him of the situation and he did not seem that concerned but he did take 50 off my bill. Other experiences I ve had I have learned to now check if my food is correct for take out before getting back to work. Examples No extra ranch when I asked for it another time I had ordered sweet tea to go only to find out once I got back to the office they gave me unsweet tea having to ask them for ketchup when I already told them in my order that I wanted some ketchup on the side. It s those things that have happened to me. I just hope that they can step up their game because I do enjoy their food but their service just really needs a lot of work.
I m going to be honest. Most of the boxers in this gym are practicing bad habits and in time will become terrible boxers. He does one combo the upper upper Lower lower and he lets his members throw punches wrong. If you do not believe me follow his Facebook page he posts videos of his members boxing and it frustrates me knowing the punches are wrong. First mistake is a heavyweight should not be training people 150lbs lighter than him. He owes me a months membership. And is not true to his word and very unprofessional but since the gym is so bad idc much about a months membership cause I m never going back. He spends more time uploading videos than focusing on boxing. If the current members truly believe he s a good coach then good luck I hope you never actually fight in a ring and since I love this sport I advice people who have a passion for boxing to look elsewhere.
Worest frederick s of Hollywood I have ever been in. No selection and unhappy and unhelpful sales people. The one sales girl was just sitting on the floor behind the register like she did not even want to be there the other could not help me find what I was looking for. Do not go to this one use the fashion show or boulavard location!!
We arrived in Cleveland at about 10p and needed to ear. The woman at the front desk suggested the Winking Lizard because it was s short walk Dom the hotel. We ordered margaritas. They were a total disappointment very weak and garnished with limes that were old with brown patches. Really????
When we arrived there was a line of about 6 people waiting to be seated with another 6 8 lining up behind us and we were a party of 5. We probably stood there at least 5 minutes before we saw a hostess. The hostess came back and took a foursome to be seated and we waited another 5 minutes. She then told the couple in front of us that did not have a reservation that they were full and could not be seated. Luckily ? we had a reservation. She left and said she would be back. A man in a blue shirt who never smiled and assume was some sort of manager asked us if we had been helped. We said we had a reservation he looked put a mark by our name and said he would tell the hostess and walked away. Seriously? You see a line of 10 people in your restaurant and you walk away without acknowledging anyone else? The hostess came back again and did not know we even spoke to that man. She was frazzled and clearly not having a great day. She at least smiled and told us it would be just a minute while she got our table ready. As she was leaving to set our table the foursome that were seated previously said they were leaving as the restaurant was out of prime rib. What? It s 11 20 during a 9 1 00 brunch how are they out of prime rib? We discussed leaving but figured every other place would be busy and did not want to hassle trying to find a new place. Once we were seated we could tell right a way that a server would not be with us soon. We decided just to go ahead and start the buffet. The salad bar was unpresentable. Seriously who cut the lettuce? Wedge salad is not typically served on a salad bar folks. There were big chunks of iceberg that we had to cut first in order to eat it. There were remnants of carrots and cheese etc all over. No bread crackers or soup. It s probably limited salad bar for brunch but their online menu does not state that. The side that usually holds the cottage cheese cold salads and such held two trays with two pastries and a handful of muffins. Someone came later with a new tray but that was 40 minutes into our meal. Each time any of us went up to get hot food they were out of something. Syrup and butter. How do you not have someone monitoring that? TWO syrup containers completely empty and butter pretty much gone. Why bother with the pancakes then? I noticed those were refilled on my third trip. You had to make multiple trips as you could only get a few items at a time because the trays were empty. There was supposed to be chef carved ham as well but the carving station was un manned with the end of a ham that nobody wanted. About 45 minutes after we got there we saw three people in chef s coats working on the buffet. Where were those employees when we arrived? No bartender. As I was waiting in line to get food a customer was standing at the bar. The man in the blue shirt manager? asked what he needed. The guy needed SERVICE. I m sure he got tired of waiting at the table for some. Blue shirt guy then got behind the bar to make the drinks and asked the customer who his server was so he could bill the correct table again....NO SERVER MADE IT TO TABLE YET. Ridiculous. At one point the hostess walked through the dining room saying I m done I AM DONE. Well that sounds like a great place to work! This place clearly has management issues. They were understaffed for the customers THEY KNEW were coming in. Everybody that came in had reservations. Did staff call in? Okay. Let your customers know that you are sorry that service may not be top notch but your glad they came in today and please be patient. Out of prime rib? Let your customers know that you are working on an alternative and then make sure all the other food on your brunch menu is available at the same time. Although advertising a brunch with prime rib and then running out when you still have reservations coming in is pretty bad. Out of all of this I am most irritated with the guy I can only assume was the manager. SMILE for crying out loud! You had a restaurant full of people and you did not speak to any of them. Hi thanks for coming in how is everything? I apologize this is not our best brunch service but we had a few people call in Communication goes a long way in customer service. I want so much for this place to be better. It could be a fantastic place but it seems to be just getting by. I did not see any teamwork today. Management needs lessons in management . The guy was doing things but was all over the place. The hostess was gone for unacceptable amounts of time setting tables and finally refiling the salad bar. Could not a server have helped with that? It s not like many drinks were being ordered and for sure no coffee was being made as the coffee we ordered was cold AND there was no decaf coffee.
My favorite boutique to shop for all my needs! So exciting every time I go there! It changes and I m transformed into the cutest best dressed lady in our park!!! I love going in and being helped by the sales women who help you find all your needs and accessories. Wish they had a store closer but I would travel anywhere for these cute clothes
Came here for breakfast one of the few Mexican places that s open pretty early. They have chips and salsa to eat when your waiting and they had the World Cup playing on all the Tvs which was awesome. We had the chilaquiles and Asada and then an Asada wet burrito. They both were delicious. The Jamaica we had was also really yummy as well. Fresh and flavorful. The service here is great very friendly and fast. Definitely recommend this place for breakfast lunch or dinner.
This facility is great! The staff is friendly and thorough and Dr Hardin gave me all the options for eye wear as well as explained each solution in depth. I would definitely recommend Family Eyecare!
Came here on a recommendation from an Italian friend he told me it was the most authentic Italian pizza in the United States. It did not disappoint. I was in town for business and ended up going to both the Scottsdale and Phoenix locations during my stay The food was outstanding at both. I felt the ambiance was far better at Scottsdale but was blown away by how good the service was in Phoenix. Both great experiences it will be a staple every time I am back in Phoenix.
Ok I ll be honest... this was my first time doing bikram and after my first day I did not like it. I was more into the liberal for lack of better word hot yoga. I was akin to listening music while doing poses and having different routines for each class. However the poses in bikram feel more like its working for my body. There are poses that require more patience and skill something I respect with bikram yoga. The locker room is spa like and always clean. The artwork they have all around the studio is awesome I love motivational art. Sometimes they provide fruits raw granola bar samples and cucumber infused water after class!
This is one of my favorite super pawns.. and i have been to many.. First of all they always have had a nice staff.. Their selection is nice and reasonably priced..
Food is definitely good although a few times I have seen people get food under over cooked. Chicken fingers are phenomenal along with the bread rolls they give you. Service definitely could be better but they get you a seat and your food so at least they re going what they re supposed to. Awesome place always want to go there.
If you have been to Roscoe s Chicken and Waffles in LA. Well welcome to Lo Lo s Chicken and Waffles in Phoenix. The chicken is off the chain waffles are yummy. The family ate small bowls of Mac and cheese and rice over red beans and cheese grits. It was all good. Ca not wait to come back for some more chicken and I want get my hands on some shrimp and grits
I went in thinking I needed to replace the brakes. It turns out I did not . Wes is very honest knowledgeable and FRIENDLY!! I ended up getting my car inspected and had them do the oil change. I ca not imagine getting it done anywhere else. If you ever have any car questions or repairs this is the place. I know this will be my new go to place! Thanks Wes
Overall Wells Fargo is a solid bank. This review is meant to illustrate this specific bank location s accountability which I found to be excellent. Today 10 Dec I came in ready to give some aggressive feedback to this bank after being 5 negative in my bank account earlier this week. The banker through bank teller Nadia told me that if I make a 10 deposit to cover the 5 I would not be charged overdraft. I did not believe it. Far too many experiences have shown me I would have to cover the 12.5 overdraft protection fee so it does not turn into an additional 35 overdraft fee. I asked for it in writing and he said to just come back if I m charged and he will reverse it. The next day when I was charged the overdraft fee a banker closer to my area of town told me there was 0 possibility management would reverse the fee. At this point I m thinking the man who gave me his word had cost me 35. Today I stopped by the branch and talked to Nadia again and the manager learned the situation. She immediately reversed the fee because the banker had given me his word. This is great news and I m happier to be with this bank because this branch honored their word.
I ate a penne dish with sauteed rapine but I could not pronounce the name so I do not remember it. It was good and was a little spicy. I also had the calamari which was very good.
We rented an awesome RZR 1000 from Sand highway RV! We had so much fun! The machine performed perfect no issues The staff is kind friendly and courteous and wants you to enjoy your trip!! We highly recommend what a great trip thanks again Sand Highway RV!!
Go! its a great place! fun cool and yummy food
I ve been to many of the antique shops in the LV area and this one is by far one of the best. Their displays are great feels like an actual store rather than a hoarders hangout spot. Great pieces with a wide range of prices to cover any budget. Best part Their staff was actually kind when I entered the door. I received a smile before I even came through the door. Compared to some of the other shops this was a very welcome change. Construction on the roads makes it difficult to get in there but it was worth it. I hope they get the road finished quickly because this place is a sure stop on your next antique adventure. Ca not knock them any stars for something they ca not control though.
Stayed here with my family for a week in April...wow what a truly great experience...my room was fabulous housekeeping did a pretty good job keeping things clean though had an issue with a backed up shower drain but one visit to the front desk and it was fixed very quickly...Roomwise the only other quibble was apparently a prior guest had stashed empty vodka bottles in the toilet tank...so that was a suprise to see when I went to check why the water kept running...The cafe in the casino was so awesome...great service excellent food and prices that were far more reasonable than I was expecting...I would happily stay here again and would very much recommend to others...
Everything we d tried so far has been tasty. Pizza is thin yet crispy. The Italian beefs are the best we ve had in Arizona. Service is fast and friendly. Owner remembers your name once you ve been in a couple times. Wish we lived closer so they could deliver.
Amongst the ridiculous prices of restaurants in Vegas this place is truly a gem. As a poor college student cramming a bajillion people in one hotel room trying to save money during a Vegas trip this place is ppperrrrfect! Sandwiches are roughly 6 each here and they have a ridiculous diverse menu. They have two vegetarian options Caprese and Veggie sandwich. I had both and ended up liking the Caprese more. It was my first time eating Caprese but boy was it AMAZING. Everything was made to perfection from the balsamic vinegar to the bread. And let me point out that this is probably one of the best aspects about this place the bread. It s crunch and soft and fresh all at once no complaint heres! The line is kind of long to order but moves really fast. Because this place is so cheap it s continuously crowded with 20 something year old kids like me trying to find a decent meal for cheap in Vegas. They also have a plethora of baked goods fruits yogurt cups frozen lemonade you name it! Definitely definitely come here if you re in town. It wo not disappoint!
This place is fabulous. The original decor from the 1920s is preserved with beautiful art deco lamps on the ceiling and vintage equipment behind the counter. Lovely woodwork booths and display cases and an old fashioned candy section add to the vintage charm. They also serve espresso drinks which makes for a good complement to a dessert and probably helps support the business in winter . But the ice cream more importantly is made in house and is delicious. A variety of sundaes are offered but you can order anything you want even if it s not on the menu. If they have it they will build it for you.
Super surprised to see these mixed reviews for my favourite burrito chain in Toronto. Having tried Chipotle Burrito Boyz Chino Locos etc. I ve found that z teca delivers on freshness and taste every single time. I usually go for the grilled chicken burrito on a white tortilla though steak is a close second. I think the winning formula is to opt for corn and rice you can skip the beans. Z teca also has the most awesome tortillas of the above burrito chains. They re so soft and have this kind of chewy gluten y texture that make me reluctant to ever do a burrito bowl instead I m looking at you Chipotle . For those intimately acquainted with the brutalist architecture and never ending construction that is the York University campus you ll have heard that the business kids never leave their building. This is actually a common misconception I ve ventured out numerous times for z teca burritos. If you re questioning giving this place a shot just turn away from the reviews and check out the lunchtime lines that ll tell you all you need to know!
A little divey? This place is a lot divey. But that s its charm. Decent sized room to see bands who nobody s ever heard of... yet. Cool bartenders. Video poker. I think they have food too. I ll definitely be back.
Came here for a baseball tournament. The park is clean well maintained and well lit. There is a concession stand with fair prices and a friendly staff. Good choice for baseball tournaments.
Was referred here by a very good friend with high standards. I have not had my a pedicure there yet but the brow wax was the best I ve had....and it was only 10 which is unheard of in our neighborhood. Its not fancy or luxurious and the facility is a little worn but the prices and the quality of service supersede those issues. Ask for Janette.
the food and service was awesome! I never had an empty cup and i got the lemon herb roasted chicken and it was so flavorful and juicy! it came with mashed potatoes and mixed vegetables and it was awesome! dinner is definitely pricey but you can actually go during lunch for lunch portions and they are cheaper and just as good!
Good service clean facility and very consistent.. Highly recommended establishment..
Subs were yummy. I love the freshly sliced roast beef!! First time there and they were so friendly and helpful. Definitely want to go back again...
I like Bosa but I definitely prefer the drive through locations just my personal preference. I m not a huge donut person but I do really like their glazed donut holes. I came to this location craving a Thai tea. When I asked for bobas they were still being made and then when I pointed at the picture and asked if I could have whipped cream on mine as well I was informed that that s only with the Thai tea slush which I did not even known they offered. The item description was covered up with the picture of another item but had I know I would have tried the slush definitely. My Thai tea was on point though so no complaints there.
First time here and Honestly one of the BEST Barber shops I ve ever been to! Luis was so attentive to everything I asked for! The shop is super clean and friendly! I highly recommend this shop! The price is great! The haircuts are even better and I am very very pleased!! I will for sure be back!
We ve tried multiple pool services which all turned out to be dishonest unreliable or a scam. I regretted ever buying a house with a pool but then we found R and M Pool Services and we could not be happier! R and M is honest reliable knowledgable and affordable. Furthermore the communication is amazing! I could not be happier! R and M has eliminated the stressors of having a pool and actually made it enjoyable. I d highly recommend you give R and M a call. You wo not regret it!
Bill is the best. Friendly accommodating and reasonable. Does not get much better.
Ah one of the best breakfast brunch places I ve ever ate at. Hearty and fulfilling both the stomach and the spirit. Come early and get a seat or come late wait for a table. It is worth the wait. I always went alone and got a seat at the counter almost immediately. Love it! I think one of the servers even called me hun at one time. I will always go to the place where I get to be called hun . I recommend you get the eggs and pancakes mash up! Fantastic! The servers are fantastic!
The BEST Indian Food and Buffet in Pittsburgh area still Udipi is my favorite . They have so much variety with very expensive Vegetables like cheese cubes okra Malai Kofta Korma Egg Plant Green beans and Goat Lamb curry . The Buffet price is reasonable as well. The best part is that if you do not like the Naan Bread which they keep in Buffet You can request for Garlic Naan and they DO NOT charge for it and you get Fresh and Hot Naan Bread of course I add the price in Tip . I have visted this place many times and see the place is busy every time. The owner lady is very friendly and takes care of customers . I love Palak Paneer and Veg samosas . The mango Drink not in Buffet is the Best other Restaurants offer very thin watery Lassi . Gulab Jamun Dessert are Huge and very fresh . They have daily Lunch Buffet and Dinner Buffet on Monday Thursday and Saturday. I used to like Tamarind in Cranberry which is near to my House but I wont mind driving 10 Miles to Taj Mahal for wide variety and fresh curries and desserts for 15 Buffet . Keep it Up..... Mark
Great Service!!! They showed up on time and were in constant contact prior to the appointment confirming and letting me know they were on the way. I had them clean our dining room chairs which have been put through the wringer by a 4 year old and also clean the carpets in the bedrooms which have been tortured by 2 dogs. The quote they gave me on the phone was what they charged me at the end of the service no surprises! Every thing looks brand new! We will be using them again for sure!!! Thanks Kamil!
The food is good and so are the cocktails. I had their Mahi Mahi Tacos and loved the cilantro rice. They have cool interior and lighting...very modern and fun cute. On Fri Sat nights they turn their space into a dance floor and play latin music. Do not expect salsa tho...more top 40 type songs. And the crowd is a lil ghetto...we did not stay long.
The best places to visit are the ones where locals go. If you see locals going to a restaurant then you know it s amazing. I was guessing we were the only travelers because no one else was taking pictures of their food. It is a rather small place. They said the wait was 20 minutes but we were seated much quicker. All the workers are very friendly and will assist you even if they are not your waiter waitress. The menu resembles a newspaper and my parents were happy at the large clear print. I ordered the classic plate. The eggs were cooked to perfection the bacon was not too crispy and not too flimsy and the potatoes were just heavenly.
Amazing food! Service can be really slow when they re busy and I m not sure if they re well staffed enough to keep up with the demand but otherwise the servers food ambiance... everything is great!
Summary They give you the option of a regular frozen yogurt or a Flizzard frozen yogurt that they turn into a blizzard with a blender . Less flavors than the larger chains but equal toppings. They carry 8 flavors a day including a no sugar added option. Price 34 cents per oz. I paid 3.20 for half a cup flizzard. Ordered No Sugar Added Cheesecake Yogurt Flizzard with a ton of toppings. Recommendations I d recommend this place. Its flizzard option is a refreshing escape from the ordinary froyo joints. However since everything is blended together be wary of mixing odd combinations. In a regular froyo you can simply eat them in different bites but that s not the case when they re all blended together.
I ve been to this place... 2 or 3 times and I ca not get enough of their CRAB.. and SHRIMP....Great stuff... I love getting my hands all messy and licking my fingers with all the saucy liquid in the bags. My server Spencer was there... GREAT guy!! I brought my friend Emelio and he was blown Away .... LOVED it... we cracked ate and devoured the delicious Dugeness crab and had 2 orders of white rice with it. YUM!! Fantastic Meal...Wonderful Service.. Clean Place.....
If I could give them 10 stars I would! Roger and Scott came out early and fixed our patio slider that was in such horrible condition we thought we d need to buy a whole new set of doors. They were really nice and friendly with excellent customer service and workmanship. Our slider track was so messed up the slider used to get stuck to where it would not move and the lock was broken. They fixed everything in a very timely matter and I can now open and close the slider with my pinky! The price was very good as well. I will definitely call them again. Thank you Door King!!
Brian is the man. He came in and did the inspection and quote me Right away the next day. He even offered me if I was in a hurry. I could even texted him the photos for the lawn. When Brian came in he even took a look on my HOA notice letter. He explained further as well.That s really outstanding customer service. The best thing was I work night shift so I woke up in the day my lawn problem was already taken care of by Brian s team. Very impressive.
I went to Luna Spa for my friends birthday and us girls had such a great time. The staff was so polite and helpful. The therapists were out of this world wonderful! The property was beautiful as well.
Great Experience! I brought in 4 customers to get a little pampering for the holidays. They were very accommodating! I brought in wine and munchies and Mary set up a little table and let us relax on some chairs and talk for a while even after our manicures were finished. Very friendly!
Awesome bar happy hour with decent food offerings and drinks. Very cool interior and atmosphere. Restaurant is amazing too.
I would have given this place 5 stars but my rice came out cold.. My server immediately heated it up apologized and explained that there was a problem with the electrical input the rice pot was hooked up to.. No biggie P. Besides that everything was AWESOME. I loved the big roomie chairs in the dining room. Por was an excellent server she asked me if I had any questions and explained the dishes to me very well. I felt like she cared about my dining experience there and was very friendly and personable. The passion fruit tea was good and the Thai fresh rolls were amazing! Especially the sauce that came with it. I ordered the chef s special Chinese broccoli with crispy pork at level 4 spicy. The pork skin was perfectly crispy and the broccoli had a nice crunchiness. I loved how the dish got spicier with every bite I took like a surprise in every bite! I will definitely be coming back for some awesome Thai food. Great service great food and very reasonable prices. I m even going to eat the leftovers I brought back today for dinner tonight! Yummy!
This place is amazeballs if you love craft beer! You have to check it OUT!
Crown Point Realty did an outstanding job selling my property. Matt is very knowledgeable and very professional. He told me exactly what to expect without unnecessarily raising or lowering expectations. The entire office at Crown Point was really helpful. I never had to wait long for a response to any of my questions. If you want to sell you property I recommend Matt Farnham most enthusiastically. He is a professional with a deep understanding of the real estate business.
Food was excellent. But most impressed with the customer service manager Lou. Lou went above and beyond. Very nice to have somebody care that much about his job and customers.
I love their salads with rotisserie chicken. Usually busy so try to get a reservation.
I loved the cake I ordered for my sons birthday. I had to order it last minute 1 week ahead and she was able to do it. Not only that but I had a design change in the middle of that week and she accommodated me really well. I will be ordering more cakes in the future from here!!! Thank youuuuuu sooo much
This was pretty much the best breakfast I ve ever had. Everything about my Belgian waffle and bacon was perfect. My date had a pancake combo with an omelette. Again perfect. The omelette was like an egg calzone I have no idea how they do it. We shared an OJ which was the best tasting orange juice either one of us had ever tried. Service was very adequate and the price was right. My only bitches are the wait and the amount of crap on the small table. I can see why other reviewers complain about the servers and bussers pulling stuff off the table too quickly as there are too many bottles of stuff including a pitcher of water . I do not think they they can do much about the wait.
Cane s Sauce chicken strips texas toast fries and sweet tea..That s basically all you really need right there! Every thing is so delicious and satisfying that it ll make you want to crave for more!! I usually like to get the Caniac box so that i have left over s for later and it s just like having two 3 finger combo s in one. I really ca not express how good their food is all through words so I suggest you take my word for it and try it! It will definitely not disappoint! Gosh I wish I had some right now... LOL
I had to do this review because today my expectations were overly exceeded . I always shop at the 8555 W Sahara Ave location because it s conveniently located in my neighborhood . The customer service is excellent. I ca not think of a time when I have had a bad experience . Just recently the day before the 4th of July I went to the bakery to get something for the holiday but unfortunately the selection was poor and what was available did not look fresh . I did a survey and gave feedback and to my surprise the manager at this location Reggie called me right away and gave his sincerest apologies for what happened . He also offered a complimentary product from the bakery . So today I went in with my husband to meet with Reggie and he was so attentive and made sure we picked out something to make up for what happened . He took his time with us which was rare . We were not initially looking for something for free we just wanted to give feedback but this was truly the most wonderful experience . When managers take time to listen and to really put the customer first and their needs it s an indescribable feeling because it does not happen often . Big thumbs up to Reggie and the entire staff at this location . I will always consider shopping here first amongst other locations in Summerlin !
Service 5 5 the service was great starting with the hostess that seated us and even mentioned where the washrooms were. The server was very attentive and even sent our desserts back when she noticed it did not come the way we had requested it no chocolate sauce . Food 4 5 I only come here for lunch and get the prix fixe. It s always consistent in taste however my pizza was a bit more burnt than I usually like. The beet caprese salad is wonderful.
Had them install two TVs. Excellent service very reasonable prices would highly recommend
Food Good quality food. A little on the spicy side. But very authentic flavours and the ingredients seemed to be fresh. The meat vegetables bread rice and desserts all seemed to taste good. Service Prompt. We had a little wait but when they started everything was quick. Decor The place is focused on food and not the decor or environment. Be prepared to eat a a simple no frills place. It looked clean. Price Very affordable. Misc Loved the samosas. Reminded me of the genuine North Indian samosas with potatoes that I had eaten years ago in North India. Very tasty and great flavors. Also loved their mango kulfi served on a stick and a little hard but good flavor and taste.
I have been going to Sunrise since they first opened. They still have that quality in their products and their service! I love that they added multiple favors of the Boba so not just limited to Thai tea they have from Coconut Honeydew Mango and of course coffee and Chai. Not to mention they have many flavor of Boba Not just the vanilla they have strawberry mango tropical and many more including hot coffee and Chilled vendor that you grab a drink. And last but not least if you ever on this side you have to take the time to stop in and let them know it s ur first time going there they ll give u a few extra treats
This is a brand new sushi restaurant that just opened a few days ago. The service was excellent the place looks great and inviting as well. My brother and I tried the volcano roll which tasted amazing! The AYCE weekend lunch costed about 16.95 it was definitely worth it.
Soda is bad for you. This store is bad for my wallet. I ca not help it. I come here every time I m in Vegas. I like the retro stuff and the weird little knick knacks the huge bottles of Mexican Coke and even the bear. Okay I do not bother with the bear or the soda sampler. But it s still a fun place to look around in.
Always a little wait but it s always worth it. Always tastes so fresh Grilled onions is the way to go
The best hotel I have ever stayed at.This is what i expected the Beverly Hills SLS to be but was not . I booked a few nights here for me and my man to have a little downtime together. The rates were reasonable so i figured why not? I flew down on Virgin which is my favorite airline by the way and we drove on over.First note do yourselves a favor and park in the Aria self park and save yourself 30 dollars. There is a split opinion on this since you are paying for an expensive room why not pay 30 dollars more to park? We did valet it the first night because we did not know any better but self parked the next night.It took us a total of 10 minutes from the garage to the lobby. AND we were walking slow and drunkenly. When we checked in at 11pm it turned out there was a problem with one of the lights in the room so they offered us a free drink which turned into two drinks and several appetizers all comped by Henry the manager of the Mandarin Oriental thanks Henry! The view from the bar onto the strip is pretty spectacular. Floor to ceiling glass overlooking the strip while having cocktails is pretty much the idea one has when thinking about Vegas. Our room was spectacular as well. And they give you everything including a sewing kit you could possibly need on a trip to anywhere. The cleaning staff went above and beyond putting rose petals on our bathtub the second night leaving little accents all over the room and even straightening up the toiletries we brought ourselves. The staff without exception was amazing. I wish i could have service like this everywhere we go and i would never want to go home. The freestanding bathtub and the rain shower were also amazing and the coupe de grace the view while sitting on the toilet is one giant window from floor to ceiling.The bed is super comfortable and they use frette linens which i love. My whole thing is the bed has to be comfortable and it was. It reminded me alot of the Standard NYC without all the doucheries that went along with it. Because there is no smoking and no casino in this hotel the vibe is very relaxed and peaceful. The food was good but again it was bar food. The coffee that they serve complimentary from 6 to 8 was okay but to be honest i didnt have one good cup of coffee the whole time i was in Vegas. At the end of our stay i just had to turn on the tv and click on the menu and check out without having to talk to anyone. How convenient is that? NO waiting in lines or watching other people dicker over their bill. For the first time in my life I might actually want to go back to Vegas provided that we stay at the Mandarin Oriental. One last side note. You can hear people cavorting on the strip till all fucking hours of the night even from the 21st floor. But if you are in Vegas than i expect you know this already.
Best coffee in Toronto. They have a small selection of desserts cookies scones etc. all of which are very good. Lots of regulars.
thoroughly enjoyed my experience here last week! i love the atmosphere of the restaurant and service is good too. the food is to die for i am confident anything on the menu would be amazing. this is a higher end restaurant so a nice place to go to get dressed up or for special occasions. the patio is also gorgeous
A bit pricey but it was good service warm and friendly! We took our chairs outsise since we had a dog with us! Very accomodating owners!
I ordered the expresso mocha and it s really good the coffee is strong but it does not over power the flavor of the other ingredients. The place is clean. The owners are very nice I will definitely come be coming back!
Had driven by this place a few times while visiting back in Madtown looked pretty real and was on the right side of town so had to try. Yay! Real mexican made and served by the same and the place full of local hispanic families. Yes it was hot and humid Madison in August right? and my togo sat for 5mins before I got my ticket. The world did not end with a 5min wait and the food was FANTASTIC! Lingua tacos melt in your mouth good. Carne asada burrito best since San Diego street food. Realize your a gabacho gringo and get some darn fine mexi here!
The hospitality and service was excellent. Everyone there went above and beyond to ensure that we had a great dining experience. The quality of food especially the hot cold buffets and grilled meats was excellent. We ll definitely return when we re in the neighborhood!!
I was originally sold by the reviews on here and decided it was worth the drive from Surprise. Scottsdale has a ton of choices and this one place caught my eye. I have come to the Carlotti center 5 times or so now and have enjoyed each experience as well as look forward to it. The office is nice the people are friendly and services are effective. They answer any questions and are very personable. I ve been enjoying my results from the ipl treatments I have received and my skin is much more even toned. I ve had many of the freckles I had removed.I think freckles are cute but the change sure has been nice and has boosted my confidence.I will be back for more in the future .Many thanks to the Carlotti s!
Huge slices of pizza at around 3.25 3.95 per slice. They are seriously large slices! They have very nice choices here. I got the Goodman and the Plaza. Located inside the Plaza hotel.
Got all u can eat crab legs and they were fresh large not salty and not over cooked like some local restaurants.
The AC went out in my in laws house and let s face it it went from 77 to 98 degrees in 20 mins. We called Autumn Air and we got an AMAZING repair man named Josh. He was friendly and knowledgable and was just down right amazing. He was at my in laws house at 830 AM and had it fixed in an hour! Just a wonderful experience! I recommend this company to everyone!
Love shopping here. They a great variety of stores and restaurants. The atmosphere is great along with everyone who is shopping there. Every store and restaurant I ve visited so far has really a friendly staff. Check it out for yourself and enjoy the relaxing atmosphere!
This is a great place to grab a quick meal or pick up dinner or your way home. It s fast not too expensive and the good tastes good.
Very good pizza! The place is small and hidden in the corner of a plaza. It s family run sparse inside. Their menu is decent size and has a nice mix. The pizza is not quite thin crust and a little bread like. If you like a bunch of sauce on your pizza you ll be disappointed. The toppings deluxe has pepperoni sausage green pepper onion and mushrooms were really fresh and sausage has way too much flavor for frozen. The cheese was a little lean I would prefer extra cheese next time. The sauce is light and a touch sweet. I tried the Stromboli. It s done as a bread filled with cheese pepperoni ham hard salami and peppers. It was great covered in chunks of garlic and Parmesan cheese. Better than the pizza.
I HIGHLY recommend this place! My MacBook Air stopped working all of a sudden and I had not backed it up! We had years of photos on their. I took it to the Apple Store and they said that I had to send it out to get all my information from my laptop which would cost me 2500!!! My husband found Macmedia on yelp and boy am I glad I took it to these guys! With 150 they were able to fix my MacBook. All it needed was a new battery! Thank you Macmedia I ll be back again!
First visit this evening and I must say Dustin can make a cocktail! First off if u go on a Tuesday it s 30 off mescal my fave spirit as well as tequila. All I can say is the talent behind the new Mabel s is a keeper! All around a comforting environment and in loved sitting at the bar. I have a sweet spot for a bartender to give recommendations based on my palate and this is what you will receive here. Happy Hour is 4 7 with half priced specialty cocktails. Please make it your next cocktail destination and see Dustin on Tue Thu and Saturday. I ca not wait to go back again.
Wonderful little old school diner very nostalgic vibe to it and a great menu plus all day breakfast. The waitresses waiters are great as well. Only actual downside is that they are cash only however there is an ATM inside. At a 2.50 cover fee.
Great coffee bar for Saturday mornings. Excellent lunch spot. Always top notch service in an inviting atmosphere. Love the tacos plus flank steak. Offers a wonderful patio as well. Always buzzing!
Love Core Body! Not just for the lady s they also do men s classes. This classes are the real deal. They will kick ur butt! The owners and all the instructors are top notch. Everyone is so kind and not stuck up!
Breath of fresh air! Bringing the San Diego class to north Scottsdale! Rubicon opened in AZ with subtle differences but in a very positive way! Some of the best bread you can get your hands on. Quality ingredients and customer service was above and beyond! I ll be coming back regularly!
Fantastic restaurant! With great staff! We had some appetizers which could totally be a full meal!!! Lobster Mac and Cheese is a winner!!! So is the Jimbalaya!!! 1812 Grillhouse will definitely see us again!!!
I made it back from my trip that Andy booked for me see my other review for Wilderness River Adventures . All I can say is THANK YOU Andy for talking me into this trip. I was worried that it would be too cold dark at the end of the season but it was perfect. Andy and his team were also great checking in with me before and after the trip to see if I had any questions and answering them amazingly quickly and to ensure I enjoyed the trip. I will definitely recommend Advantage Grand Canyon to any of my friends looking to raft the Grand Canyon.
While getting my nails done next door my stomach was growling uncontrollably. The minute the nail tech was finish I paid headed out the door without thinking about going to my car I walked into Stumpy s. Stumpy s most definitely is neighborhood spot and possibly make the best Italian Cold Cut sub I ve had in Phoenix. What I loved abut it was nothing about I the sub taste classic . It was certainly an Italian sub ... Thick cut salami provolone smoked but it did not taste like a Classic Italian sub from back east. I loved it!!! Absolutely loved it!! Will definitely go back in a few weeks. Oh... I ordered by Italian sub cold ... Yelpers love it hot!! I m trying it hot next time!
Was in town for business and needed a mani pedi. So happy I discovered this amazing salon!! The service was top notch and the staff so friendly and skilled that I also had a lip and brow wax. I highly recommend Ethereal.
Just had a wonderful lunch a Giada. Big thanks to Stefanie and the wonderful service. Good timing between the appetizers and the entrees. Looking forward to coming back.
Had the Kalua Pig bowl and it was sooooo amazing. As well as the coconut bark!! Absolutely delicious. This will become a regular spot for me.
This place is amazing! They make the best cocktails in Pittsburgh hands down! I do not think there is a close second. Check out Time Machine Treasure Map Tuesdays for a unique menu of classic Tiki cocktails that normally are not on the menu.
What can I say? Famous Dave s is my favorite BBQ place in Az! My wife son and I where there the other day and we got the All American BBQ Feast half size only like 33.00. It feed all 3 of us and we took home leftovers for the next day! Freaking sause... Their sause is so good! I was putting a bottle of the Sweet and Zesty in my wifes purse and got cought. The nice Waitress Alicia then reminded me that I could purchase a bottle for only 3.50 more! Cha ching and I dont have to go to jail for stealing BBQ sause. Although it would have been worth it! St. Louis style spareribs Chicken Georgia chopped pork or Texas beef brisket which you can add for a few more Corn Bread Corn on the cob Beans coleslaw and Sause! What a day.... what a day!!!!
I went for the grande opening and enjoyed a nice pizza for 3.14 and also had a brew to pair with it. Since they had the amazing deal there was of course a wait but that was expected. They do allow you to make your own pizza including choosing your bread but I decided to order one of their preset pizzas to get a good ida of the restaurant. I got the southern heat that had buffalo sauce as the base and included red onions chicken onion and green pepper. I like to have a kick to my food so this was the perfect match for me. They also have a few flavors of gelato which is closer to the cashier and I had a sample and I must admit it was rather satisfying. They might not offer this deal again but I would have been content paying the regular price since it was so good.
Until recently Sanctuary Spa was my fav spa in Phoenix. Regardless this spa is a first class facility with immaculate customer service. If you want to feel pampered and special this is the place to come. And block out the whole day to enjoy this place it is gorgeous and very relaxing!
Great food and service here like the crawfish so much! Never miss the delicious food here!
I was visiting Phoenix and got in to small accident I did not know the area so started to look for a auto place true yelp and believe me this guys deserve all the stars they have!!!! Professional costumer service!!!! Reasonable prices!!!!!! They did not take advantage on fact that I am a visitor hear they gave me a quote and fixed my car like nothing happened!!!! Thank you guys!!!
If you re looking for a classy restaurant to take a date this is the place! There is ample seating available and the hosts are pleasant. They even assign numbers to the menu in case you ca not pronounce the exotic food names. I had this dish called a Big Mac thank god for the numbering system because I could not pronounce that. My Big Mac was served in some sort of box almost like a broke down Japanese Bento Box. There were two beef patties and a bunch of accoutrements. It was amazing! The beef patties had the texture of a bunch of crumpled newspapers yummy! The sauce? Do not get me started on the sauce! There are no adjectives to accurately describe the deliciousness. The best thing about McDonalds? The fact that I was hungry again three hours later! It s like you can eat a mountain of food and your body just digests it instantaneously almost like there s 0 nutritional value. I would totally recommend this place to a friend!
Great food an reasonable prices... even tho the line is ALWAYS out the door they are fast to get you in and out... always get the burrito bowl with chicken or steak cause I I do not think I d ever be able to get my mouth over the regular burrito lol... . Do not think the chips are anything special and even tho I ve never had their salsa I ve heard it s awful.
Best pizza in Pittsburgh. The crust is fluffy. The sauce is sweet. There prices are reasonable. There should be one of every corner of America.
great place for poutine. Not the best fries not double fried as crispy as I wish but they had a lot of poutine options and prices were good. the pesto rose and frite alors sauces were really good and the beeeerger was delicious
By far the YUMMIEST Filipino restaurant EVER! Mom and dad approved! Dad even admitted that their cooking is better than his that s a first! We ordered the bone marrow two pieces the size of my arm kare kare pinakbet and crispy pata literally feeds 6 people .
Tasty food and friendly staff. They keep the intrinsic spice level pretty low and supply chili oil on the side so everyone can enjoy all the dishes. We had Panang Chicken Spicy Eggplant Walnut Chicken and enjoyed them all.
If you know me you know why I m reviewing this place... So I visited this place not too long ago with a guy friend and I must say it was a lot better than our first stop for the day Kiss Cabaret which I will have reviewed after I finish this one! . One thing I will say the bartender at the time that I went on a weekday afternoon was very flippin awesome at making a dirty vodka martini and he kept them coming just the way I like it! So enough about my alcoholism lets talk about something besides the bar missing some of my favorite beverages but making up for it with the martinis big flat screens with the game playing and the near by pool tables... like the girls and the rest of the place. The first thing that came to mind about the decor was 80 s video arcade game room! The glowing carpet was a constant attention grabber for me and also how extremely well lit the place was this was probably the first time I ve gone in a club and not broke my neck from falling over a table or chair hidden in the darkness! They played good music and the girls were pretty nice they do not give you the stink eye as you watch them dance without ever tipping them. And definitely more approachable than some of the other up scale clubs that I have heard of and seen from personal experience. From what I was told and saw the ladies here make bank they work hard and are in all shapes colors and sizes for whatever your liking. Variety great booze and excitement! Ai not nothing wrong with being a straight girl and loving titty bars.
This pizza is great! And I m really happy we have a place like this in south side now! But I like dipping my pizza in ranch and I was really disappointed in theirs. Its definitely just hidden valley squeezed into a container and sold for .50 other than that the pizza is really good especially for the price I just wish they had their own bar style ranch
In town visiting and stopped here for lunch. My kale salad with grilled chicken was a knockout. Friendly staff and cute ambiance.
My favorite model train store in Vegas. Just about every Friday after work I stop by to see John and Dee.
Love this hospital especially 4th floor mother and baby ward. The staff are always very friendly and very welcoming!!!
Best Starbucks experience I ve ever had! The staff was engaging funny and kind. Aside from the tasty cold brew the staff made all the difference starting my day on a positive note.
So my friend and I happened to wander around the 99 Ranch plaza and we noticed this boba place in this mysterious Chinatown Plaza Mall. Hey it s No 1 Boba Tea so it gotta be the best boba right? Of course not what was I thinking? However at least this place uses the real fruit. Papaya slush 3.5 tax and boba included Just a regular boba pretty average. With that being said I do enjoy this drink. It was the right balance of sweetness and iciness. Not only that the price INCLUDES tax and boba now that s something California boba places can learn from No 1 Boba. Good slushy drink average boba and decent price. A solid 3.5 star. P.S. No1 Boba Tea also sells various Asian snacks e.g. Japanese mochi Taiwanese beef jerky etc
Delicious food and fantastic service. We came here on Christmas Eve. They had some screw up with our table so we had to wait at the bar for a drink. For this I did not give a 5 star. . Rich who is the bartender was beyond accommodating and can make a delicious drink. My husband ordered a cable car and I had the Kir Royal to start. Both delicious. And he was just a delight. We were then seated downstairs near the water with the most romantic view. It is just beautiful. Our Italian waiter Luciano knew everything there was to know about food especially fish. He was able to describe all the little differences between each fish that had jumped from the ocean and flown here just a day or so ago. We had the artichoke salad with porcini mushrooms which was just mouth watering. Arugula was warm and porcini were delectable. Next we split a small portion of the seafood risotto. Outrageous. The little langoustine that was there was the sweetest fish I have ever tried. Lastly we had the Bronzino. He brought us 3 different sauces. Tomatoes with garlic salmoroglio and one with lots of anchovies. One was better than the next. One of the best meals we have ever had at a restaurant.
I like this specific location for several reasons 1 Easy accessible parking. This Starbucks shares its location with other grocery stores. There s plenty of spots. 2 Lots of space to sit and or study. I have been here on multiple Saturdays Sundays and have been able to find a little table and or seat for myself. Free wifi. 3 Friendly fast service in my experience. The negatives 1 The music is way too loud. I know it s supposed to be fun to have the loud music but whoa a bit much! 2 One restroom but that s typical.
I have gone to Magen Nail for 7 years. Even tho they have changed hands they are still superior in their work. They staff is very pleasant quick to get you in clean and calm. I give them an A !!!!!!
A friend and I tried Bobby Q for the first time a few days ago. Reception could use some additional training in customer service. I had the two meat combo plate with brisket and baby back ribs recommended by our server ALEXANDRA WHO WAS AWESOME!! Meat was delicious tender and juicy. My sides were Mac N Cheese and grilled veggies both which were also great. My friend had the prime rib and shrimp which were also cooked perfectly and he enjoyed them a lot. Dessert was apple cobbler which was also well done. Overall a good experience. Portions are ample but so are the prices. Dinner for two with drinks and tip was 85.
Went to Dyad there was one guy working there he said his counterpart was not there so he was not renting bikes. Went to Fitz apparently now they re Velo Quebec nobody rents bikes there. And they told me to use a phone to call someone and that someone forwarded me to their colleague who is apparently a voicemail machine. The only better part about the second group is that they told me bixi does not exist anymore. Those were the highest rated places around. Well there was one more place nearby so figured to give it a shot. Finally came here and guess what? They .. rent bikes. 15 for 4 hrs. Very reasonable. Great bike it was a Norco. Rode all around Mount Royal and it was a breeze. Brought it back no hassle. Do not bother with the other guys who may or may not have bikes and do not even know where to refer you. These guys will take care of you. They have lots of bikes and the guys seem to know what they re doing. Highly recommended.
I love this place. Staff is super friendly and attentive food is great and comes out in a timely manner. Their chopped salad is the best salad I have ever had at any restaurant as well as their margherita pizza so flavorful. I ca not wait to try more pizzas and food! The inside is very cozy with a cute little bar there s also a tv with sports. The happy hour seems pretty good too will be back to try it
Best BBQ in the city!!!! Portions give ample enough to share between 2 3 people. With all great bbq comes great sides! My go to are the baked beans fried okra and Mac and cheese!!!! The cornbread muffins will get you every time! You Have Been Warned!!
This review is for the Eatons centre location. This was my first time in this store and apparently it is a lingerie line by American Eagle. Aerie is a very classy and sophisticated lingerie store at an affordable price a void which is surprising but obvious if you consider that Lasenza Victoria s Secret et al all play up the raunchy or sexy factors relating to lingerie. Aerie offers lingerie and markets it as items that women wear not for showing off but high quality bras that offer great support and look great. They are not designer bras but can definitely compete with them. I absolutely love the bras that I got here. Bras are essentials and I do not understand why some women splurge on clothing but skimp on bras! Ladies! Get the right bra and you will be much much happier. I received great service here by the sales associate named Alexa. She was very patient and educated me on Aerie s collection in detail. She helped me pick the right bras and also helped with the fitting. The bras here are pricier than the ones at other mall chains. The ones I got were 40 each. But they are excellent bras and I will definitely be returning here.
I am a big FAN of ramen and Kinka Izakaya is always my go to place. They have 2 locations which i go to the most and the food is as excellent as always. 10 10 Recommend!
I went into this store to order the new iPhone 5. It did not take long to get served and they were more than happy to take care of my purchase even though the primary account holder was not with me. The iPhone was scheduled for two day delivery but with the Veteran s Day holiday it took over a week to get it in their store. There was a bit of a wait to pick up the phone as all their retail sales professionals RSP were tied up helping other customers. When we finally got help my RSP was very knowledgeable and friendly. It did not take him long to switch my phone numbers around to the new phone. The manager actually came over to shake my hands and to make sure I was satisfied with their service. Now that s what I call good customer service. No complaints here and happily left with the new iPhone 5.
I love this place it s very friendly and cozy. It s a bit small but I personally feel when places get too big they lose some of their charm. I could spend hours here studying or catching up with friends. The coffee is great much more consistent than other places in the city. I also wish other coffee places would take a hint and maybe be a bit less snobby.
I like going to this location because it s generally really clean and service is super fast and friendly. I take my kids here almost once a week and they love it. I ve never had any complaints and the service is always excellent. I think the best thing they have on the menu right now is the XXL burrito and if I could eat more than one I would!
Classy. Sushi. Need more be written? Sundays and Mondays are the days to be here for 1 sushi night! Beautiful ambience and food is fresh and well platted. They have lovely outdoor seating and can accommodate large parties. host stand is not the most attentive and watch out for the heavy beads on the way to the loo
I was super excited to find a small locally owned Cafe near where I lived. Calgary has so few truly personal cafe s. Marica was super friendly and the cappuccino I got was awesome. I m definitely going to be going there on a regular basis.
What a great restaurant! considering that I live in chicago it is rare that I find restaurants in Madison that I absolutely love and cannot wait to return to! This is such a neat little place and ALL of the food that our group ordered was AMAZING. This restaurant should not be missed if you searching for a great meal.
We ve always enjoyed the food here and so we decided it would be awesome to have Booker s cater our at Home wedding. We are so thrilled that we did. The food was a HUGE hit especially the jalapeo Mac and cheese they even left out the onions for me! Our guests really enjoyed the food! We are especially grateful to Falyn and the catering staff at Booker s who went out of their way to get the food to us. It made our day even that more amazing. THANK YOU!!!
Great service awesome coffee! I love the atmosphere and the awesome baked goods this place is perfect if you love coffee and want some extra love in your cup!
I m giving teakwoods a four based on other sports bars. I have always been happy with the food here. Though yesturdays sandwich toped everything I have tried there. I ate the pretzle philly cheese steak. It was a philly sandwich on a pretzle bun. Awesome! If you want good food good prices and sports. It is a good place to go. Oh yeah dont forget free peanuts...
Place was clean and they had numerous items to choose from. Staff was friendly. I usually order online and when I noticed the prices of the items at the outlet store they were higher priced than the ones in the catalog. I thought being at the outlet store would save me S and H but I guess they make up for it by raising the prices. Overall they have exactly what I am looking for my pets.
I ve only ever been to Chase Field to watch the Diamondbacks. I really enjoy the stadium. I like that there are many vendors around the field and fun activities for kids to do on the upper deck. The field is beautiful and I love the architecture! Event staff are very friendly too!
Cette ptisserie polonaise fait partie d une petite chane montralaise de ptisseries du mme nom. Celle de Verdun est sans contredit la plus petite cette dernire ayant peu prs la taille d un garde robe. L employe qui y tient presque toujours boutique visiblement une polonaise est toujours souriante et trs serviable. Outre les diffrentes ptisserie et autres produits sucrs polonais l tablissement prpare sur place des sandwich sur place pour un peu plus de deux dollars. Une vraie aubaine !
I recently joined Chandler s EOS fitness center. It s conveniently located close to work. I was there with a friend who was interested in training so we met with Denny after getting a tour of the facility. He was personable and the training was much more affordable than I thought. He spends plenty of time with us and patiently answered ALL of our questions and introduced us to a couple of his trainers. Although I m unable to sign up at this time I am going to do training in the next few months. I appreciate that even though I could not do it at this time he did not dismiss my questions and encouraged me to ask any questions and say hello when I m there. Love having such a friendly place to workout with amazing employees. Everyone from the front desk to the manager seem happy to be there and interact with current and prospective members. Thank you!!!
Great place for good food. The food is on a carousel so you can start eating right away...good when you want something good and quick!
Sweet little neighborhood restaurant. Waiters there for years. Food excellent reasonably priced and menu is varied and very good. My last meal will be their halibut! It s a bit of an older crowd but love this little place. You get soup and salad with your meal and sides are included. Best deal in town for a very nice Italian meal.
The staff was friendly the rooms were clean and we did not have breakfast but the selections appeared very appetizing with much variety. We enjoyed the pool which was nice but the sides above water line were grooossss. It felt like a very safe environment area. I d stay here again anytime I m in the area. Thanks.
First time here. Excellent food. Fish is tender. Fast service very attentive. Will definitely come back again!
Stopped in just out of curiosity and since I was conveniently in this shopping mall already. I was actually planning to head to Office Depot already for Thank You cards when I conveniently found them here an instant win for thrift and zero wasters! Generally speaking it s hard to get a low rating from me if you re any kind of store that deals in selling used items. That includes all of the many other chains and places that I wo not bother to enumerate. Salvation Army is a LITTLE over the top for me because they re strongly religious. But I do not care much. They re making jobs and moving the economy the way I see it. Plus they re turning what would otherwise be trash into treasure for some folks. This location is no exception and follows the SA standards of every other one I ve been to. A good half of the store sells furniture arranged neatly in full room sets. Living room bedroom dining room etc. They even sell several used TVs and appliances as long as they can keep a supply of them on hand. Lots of housewares all neatly organized by color in the usual SA way. It s an unusual way to do it and makes finding things a bit harder but all the more rewarding. Most of the rest of the store is dedicated to clothes. Men s women s and children s. Shoes hats bags sports equipment and even bikes sometimes. Prices are typically not too bad for used things especially if you find something that s practically still new. I might have to check back in here from time to time!
Delicious. Such a chill place to hang out. My boyfriend and I love coming here. Their prices are super reasonable too
Great food and they re so friendly! Never disappointed here. Bread bowls are delicious!
Their partnering with Jose Macias and I called up right before New Years Eve to ask him to see if he can send me another copy of his receipt should I need to contact the main office in the future if Jose does not answer his cell. I called Jose again as he said he ll call me right back not sure if he was on the road or not but he said he will send me a copy before he gets to Breman wherever out of town. I never seen the receipt since. Luckily I went back to my emails again to make sure how I was missing the copy of receipt because I did not get the copy printed at the time and somewhere as electronics you ca not always rely on saw it finally appeared. Yet to this day I never heard nor got email from Jose Macias since.
Everyone is so friendly here! I have never had to wait very long at all for my food and they always get it right! I love that the employees seem to like their job which in fast food is rare.
My bf decided to take me here since I wanted to go in the area for a few things and was not sure what to expect but actually ended up enjoying the range of empanadas! I decided on the chicken and the seafood empanada. The seafood and chicken empanadas were packed with flavour and filling! For our sweet tooth the chocolate banana empanada which was very filling and oozing out with melted chocolate! You really ca not go wrong with this place since there s none quite like it. If you re in the area I d definitely recommend!
Do not like dogs? Well this is not your event. I believe I saw every kind of dog in existence. Everything from little Yorkies like Marley to giant Great Danes that looked more ponies. Seriously these things could kill you by stepping on you. A ton of vendors. Our tent was set up across from the microchip station. They even checked every pooch that walked by for a chip. Pretty cool to watch. A couple little guys yelped see what I did there so loudly when they got their chip injected. I think I screamed with them. Broke my heart. So many fun activities for kids adults and dogs. It was fun to watch the agility test area for dogs. Between the walk and that... I bet a lot of dogs in Charlotte slept well Saturday night. Pools and water bowls were set up throughout the festival for the four legged friends. Almost every tent had dog treats. Great event. The only downfall of the whole thing is that my 6 pound furrball has to stay at home. He s not a big fan of festivals like this... Or dog parks. Basically anything that involves pooches bigger than him.
Well I travel a lot with this company and everything is paid for in advance for us. The front desk help has good service and are friendly and will accommodate all the needs you have that they can. The location is right by there major freeways and there are places to eat around. The rooms are big and have Queen size beds with a decent sized bathroom and most importantly hot water! I was also able to do my laundry here with their on site washer and dryer. It was buck to dry and only a quarter more to wash. Breakfast here is good. Eggs sasuage cereal or toast. Bisquits and gravey. O.j. a.j. yogurt. That s just some of the things they serve. Not bad in my opinion.
I was in town for 2 days and was able to get a great workout. Fantastic facilities and staff. I highly recommend.
Great place for gear and training equipment. If they dont have it they will order it and they dont hassel u. I like that alot. No pressure or attitude here. Very helpful group and a good selection of different types of gear. Will definetly be back to reup on gear soon. Need a new gi soon so ill see u guys in a few weeks
First time I tried them they had some amazing hot apple cider! I believe it s a seasonal menu item but it was like the most amazing apple pie you ve ever had converted in to a warming soothing drink. I always get a different type of chicken flatbread. Super tasty and cooked to perfection. Yum!
This place has been described as the best Thai food restaurant in the US. After four trips to Thailand I have to agree. This place is a must if you love Thai food. Not only is it a Thai food lovers destination it s reasonably priced. On a recent visit to Vegas we ate there twice. It was that good. One of the fun things about Lotus is the waiters are very knowledgeable. Our waiter was able to recommend four things and even threw in something we had never tried. I love that. We had a rice appetizer that I had never heard of. It was spicy rice roasted in mix of exotic spices. Totally unique and delicious. Then we had crispy ribs with a nice garlicky sauce on the side. Falling off the bone yummy. After that we had Khoa Soi with chicken. It s a coconut curry soup with rice noodles and crunchy noodles in a curry soup with many layers of flavor. It was better than the many bowls I had on my recent trip to Chaing Mai. After that we had Duck curry and spicy beef salad. The spicy beef salad was so perfectly satisfyingly. The beef tasted like it had marinated in spices and it was fork tender. There was basil and it was the best I have ever had. We also loved the beef larb. Really authentic spice . I ca not say enough about this place it just is absolutely authentic Thai food but better.
Very friendly staff good about being flexible on setting appointment times comfortable atmosphere although I do wish they had normal blankets to cover up with instead of paper covers and after several treatments I did see a difference in my body. Did not lose any weight but did lose some inches would definitely recommend dieting scrupulously while having treatments.
The West Side Market reminds me of my childhood! Going to the market with my dad and picking out fresh wholesome food from friendly welcoming vendors is a treat! The place is full of options for fresh produce meats cheeses and sweets... and for fair prices! I recommend getting a crepe before you shop and heading upstairs to eat it while you pick out what shops you want to stop at to buy groceries for the week. Now that I live downtown I plan on shopping there frequently and supporting the local vendors!
We were visiting from New Orleans and looking for a place to watch the Saints game. We started by going to Champs and they looked like they went out of business. We came here instead and had an awesome time well as awesome as could be had with our hang overs. The bartender was very sweet and gave us take out menus so we could get some relief. The drinks were reasonable and the regulars was a hoot to hang out with. I highly recommend this spot!
As a 23 year old female with no knowledge of cars I have been scammed so many times and have spent thousands on unnecessary things on my car!! So when I called Sears auto shop for the first time and expressed my past issues and my present issues with my car Richard was more than understanding and extremely helpful! I picked up my car the next day and it feels brand new! Thank you to Richard and the team at Sears Auto Shop! I finally have a solid place I can take my car every time!
Omggggg!!!! This place is amazing!!! The wait was about 30 min but whatever! It s Vegas everyone s out here trying to eat! The selection of food is just.... WOW! You definitely need a big appetite if you come here you are gonna want to try everything! Totally worth the price you pay! I will be back on my next Las Vegas trip!
As a small business owner I love these guys! There is always a friendly voice on the other side of the phone offering superb customer service. Travis Jack is the best accountant I have ever worked with and I will be relying on his services for years to come
Fantastic authentic Taco Shop....you will love this place. The pickled jalapeo are freakin awesome! 3 Taco combo with rice and beans and a drink!
I ve brought my car in several times and am always 100 satisfied with the quality of the work done and the owner is very honest and knowledgeable.
Had a good time at Onda with my relatives who were staying at the Mirage. Reservations made a comp ed dinner and trays of seafood yummy pasta Italian wines steaks fish and poultry. The service was awesome I m sure they were working for the big tip since the meal was comp ed but the tip would have been out of pocket. The Italian food was good. Onda is a nice place to take a date. The place was really busy...so do not forget that reservation. Lots of wines available. Make sure you dress up a bit too. The restaurant is on the high end.
Best Laminate is a great company with helpful and knowledgeable employees! I eventually chose the Kronoswiss Noblesse Elegance Light Oak. They have many options that are beautiful affordable and great quality.
I have been to a million different dentists every time I go I have horrible experiences. The last place I went to left me in the waiting room for 45 minutes just to tell me they could not see me because the hygienist was not going to be in the office that day! I understand not being able to see me but it should not take you 45 minutes to tell me. The time before that they burned my skin and tried to tell me it was because I m allergic to latex.... I have never been allergic to latex nor am I at this moment. My last dentist told me cavities were forming and I need to get fillings and many other things. So after that last appointment I swore to never use them again western dental DON T go there I looked online at my dental insurance to see which office I could go to and reel dentist was down the street from my house so I decided to go with them plus I read reviews on their facebook yelp google and they were all positive so I decided to try them. IT WAS SO WORTH IT!!! I did not have to wait long at all they had a cute movie playing when I was waiting and the staff is super nice! I highly recommend everybody use them. They keep you well informed about what is going on with your teeth and they do a great job cleaning! I do not remember the last time I was able to trust a dentist and I finally found a dentist that does not lie to me or try to do things to my teeth that does not need to be done. I m really glad I found this office I wo not be going anywhere else! Five Stars!!!
Fabulous food and service. The environment is very fun and lots of cool memorabilia from the Forrest Gump movie. The servers also come up and do movie trivia and quizzes while waiting makes it fun and interesting. I have the Alabama steam pot Cajun style and it was DELICIOUS. Lots of shrimp and other delicious seafood. Very reasonable prices and lots of food.
This place stands out. Consistently great food service well selected craft beers and wines. The frites are quite amazing even if you re only there for a drink order a side of frites to share. I ve not had anything here that was not delicious. Strongly recommend!
I love this place. The food is always excellent and of good quality. The ambience is nice and the location is fantastic. Highly recommended.
We used to frequent the old Zorba s ... Thought tonight s meal was excellent .. 2 appetizers a Gyros plat and lamb kabob ... all was very fresh and flavorful ... service was great ... much better than we expected .. we will be back soon ... Keep up the great job ... Zorba s
The sangria is excellent the appetizers I had during a tour event stop were also freshly made and delicious. The appetizers and drinks were complimentary to the tour event that I was on. Many kinds of food types for all tastes were available. I would go back with no more than four people. The restaurant seems to have a smaller overall space and it gets very busy starting on Friday lasting through the weekend. I would also only do a late lunch or a super early dinner because the restaurant quickly fills up starting at dinner time. If this location is super busy you may also visit their second location in the Downtown Las Vegas Fremont Street Experience.
Could not be happier. Very professional and efficient. No creepy back room feel. Left feeling happy with my decision to go the medical marijuana route vs taking higher and higher doses of medication.
New kid messed up my order. When I told him he poured it out and made me a new one. Great kids. Great service.
Excellent hand rolls and customer service. The fish was very fresh. I ordered the 3 hand roll combo salmon yellow tail toro and sake to drink. They served one at a time. I cannot decide which of the three I liked more. I definitively will stop by again before I leave Las Vegas.
Quality food! Extremely friendly staff! Little pricey but fabulous taste! Work on short notice! Extremely clean and well taken care of!
The UBER of Dog Walking! The online scheduling system makes it extremely convenient for setting up visits to walk the pups paying the bill. Kevin is a true dog whisperer and his walker Casey is also well experienced at being a dog s best friend. They truly care about what they re doing and can be relied upon when you need them we always feel comfortable knowing our little guy is safely in their hands. Keep up the good work!
My local bar a thousand miles from home. I discovered it on my first trip to Toronto taking respite from an oppressively hot day to shower in a few pints. Downstairs has more on tap but upstairs is like an entirely different bar. As much as I enjoy downstairs it s a bit ...unsocial? That s not quite right. A bit darker more the place you d come to drink alone if it were not so close to Dundas Sq. Upstairs at least on the last night when we finally ventured up there was full of people bright and social. Or something like that.
Great Job. The tech Marvin showed up on time even called a half hour early to give an ETA and cleaned all the carpets. He was helpful had great advice for maintaining the carpets and most importantly the carpets are SO CLEAN now! Marvin got rid of some pesky stains and the hallway looks amazing.
I work very close to Caffe Italia and i must admit the food is great. Yes the owner employs young people who do not really know how to serve propely. But you re not at a 5 star restaruant. It s a neighborhood place w GREAT food. I ve got friends from NY who raved about the sause.
Came to try out what Johnjay has been raving about on his Instagram with a friend of mine. Got a bowl with spicy tuna and salmon and all the toppings delicious! Far exceeded my expectations for a fast casual sushi place but the fish looked and tasted fresh! We came back a week later for a second time because we were craving it and I m sure will be back again soon! The personnel were all friendly and helpful especially when we came the first time and asked for some help ordering. Definitely would recommend anyone to try it out for less than 10 it s a satisfying filling delicious and fast lunch or dinner!
After taking my dog to Petsmart a couple times I realized there was no reason for it to take 4 hours to groom him. He s only 6 pounds! I started bringing him here about a year and a half ago and am so glad I did. This place is amazing. The staff is so friendly and the groomers are great at what they do. They do not crate the dog. Instead they have playpens set up. It only takes about 1 hour and 15 minutes to groom him and I know he s in such good hands while there. They have an amazing assortment of treats to choose from which always makes my little man happy. I ve never had a bad experience here and I m sure you wo not either!
This places is 6 blocks from my office so it is not somewhere I would normally stop for lunch. It I happened to be in the area of town and boy am I glad I did. Half of my lunch break will be taken walking to and from but I will be back. I ordered the chicken shawarma with rice and tabbouli. The chicken had a garlic sauce which was heavenly. But beware it has a very strong garlic flavor so might want to stay away if you are worried about garlic breath. The tabbouli.... wow. I wish I could get that at a side everywhere. I have never had that anywhere before and I just want more. You definitely ca not go wrong with stopping here!
Ive been a patient of Leo since he opened his business actually before that as he was employed at another chiropractic firm. Suffice it to say that wordsare not enough to describe this man and his ability. Experience it for yourself.
Absolutely fantastic food. I ve lived in the valley for 3 years and have eaten at multiple thai restaurants. This place takes the gold so far. We ordered chicken satay spicy fried noodles sa bai fried rice and the thai eggplant. All were perfect with some sweet heat and really solid portions. The staff was friendly and so was the price 33 what?! . I ll be back!!!
Restaurant fancy stuff come for special occasions or just skip it. Happy hour very good deals for simple bites. Bartender was the rudest jack hole that s ever served me. Would come back for the cheap bites. Butcher shop quality meats at good prices. The guy who runs it is sometimes rude but then really friendly. Throws me off. Either way this is the place to go for meats and I ll be coming back a lot.
Hopdoddy is the best burger place in Arizona !If your in the mood for delish food come here .The shakes are thick and delicious .I recommend this to everyone !!!
Friday I m in Vegas Bitch! Saturday Seriously FML. I want to go home Sunday at Rehab I FREAKING LOVE VEGAS!!!! I DON T WANT TO GO HOME That is usually my mentality when I go to Vegas... REHAB literally SAVED me from hating Vegas... It s my go to drug for actual rehabilitation from two days of straight alcohol and sun damage. Music HOUSE and I love it! I can fist pump all freaking day and my mama would be proud! Having ovaries and boobs is probably the most awesome things that could happen to you in Vegas. Does not matter if it s home grown or bought you literally rule Vegas if you possess such things. These are the following things that can occur 1. No need for cabana service because SWARMS of guys will offer for you to hang out at theirs for free 2. Free food comes with cabana service along with free strawberry daiquiri s and water.. HOLLA FOR A DOLLA! 3. No need to pay no 50 admission fee So Lesson learned is 1. Go to Rehab for rehabilitation from the 2 days of straight drinking your body will endure. 2. Be a chick
It was a last minute reservation...to accommodate 6 people as we needed a spacious and comfortable SUV for our road trip to California...and not a minivan! Because of our schedule the only choice that would work for us was the Hertz Rent A Car location at McCarran airport. We selected our car and made our reservation over the internet. When we arrived there were 11 service desks and only one staff was on duty...yes I counted. And yes I was a little disappointed...but before we knew it one Hertz staff approached us and told us that if we were a Gold Member who can directly go upstairs to check out your car without further process but since this is our first time signed in as Gold Members we had to stay here...once we got to the desk it was very quick process. We quickly proceeded to our vehicle but the color of the SUV was not our favorite and we thought why not. It s worth a try to change the color of the car. After all we were about to pay a lot of money for this beautiful car...The clerk checked the availability and we were instantly able to switch...call me a snob and I will gladly own that but we were much happier in our new vehicle. I loved the fact that they were able to assist us without any hesitation. Picking up and dropping off the car was an easy process we were in and out no longer than 10 minutes. Price could vary in renting a car but I am positive that I will check the Hertz Rent A Car before any other competitors because of their service. 2017 Review 6
Wow some of these reviews are all over the place! I agree that there is alot going on here Great food in a sports bar type atmosphere with TV s everywhere perfect for hanging out watching a game or a bite to eat during the day happy hour great patio for Scottsdale people watching always amusing btw and then like most places in this area somewhere between 10pm or 11pm on Friday and Saturday nights the tables get moved to allow room for the party to get started. The DJ is on the average side but good to appeal to a wide range of patrons. I have reserved a table for bottle service a few times and other times have just hung out and bought refills from the bar and both of which have had great service Tida at the bar is super friendly and makes the best drinks and I am pretty sure our servers name is Amanda and she is friendly and fast! In response to the people that get upset about the whole reserved thing If you sit down at 6 30 to get some wings and drinks it does not make much sense to tell you that sometime between 10 11pm that night someone is probably going to reserve that table. Just realize that it is probably going to happen and that if you want to stay there after the DJ gets going that you will need to start bottle service at that time and arrange it with the server. Lets all be realistic here the drinks are way cheap the food is great and they have a fantastic Happy Hour that lasts til 8pm! if that means they need to make a little extra money between 10pm and 2am on Friday and Saturday nights and there are people willing to pay them to have a table so that the prices can be great the rest of the time then I guess I am okay with that.
When I was preparing to purchase my house I called several HVAC companies with good BBB ratings but was told each time that they could not make it out to inspect the HVAC within my 10 day inspection window until I called Cool Blew. The technician they sent is a licensed electrician and licensed HVAC tech. He did the electrical and HVAC inspections. They were thorough and gave me a list of electrical repairs that were needed. I negotiated a lower price to cover those repairs. I have used Cool Blew for HVAC Electrical and plumbing. All were A positive experiences. For those poor folks that had 1 star experiences I have a recommendation Sign up for their Preventative Maintenance program. You get priority scheduling and a discount on any needed parts.
I came to Madison for a work trip and staying at the Hilton I wanted something that was close by and also delicious. I had a craving for Mexican food and since Canteen was close by I thought why not? To be honest I had very little expectations coming from California and growing up on amazing Mexican food in LA and now in SF. I ordered the Carne Asada and it was incredibly flavorful complemented with a Mole sauce and minced meat and potatoes that I have never seen anywhere. The salsas red green and sweet ? were absolutely phenomenal. I d come back to Madison again just for Canteen s carne Asada dish. Glad I came here
Lee s seems to be upping their billboard game with funny statements recently and this Lee s location generally has tastings on Friday evenings. There is the typical selection of beverages available and they pretty much have everything that is popular and moves easily. If you re looking for something that is a little more specialized they may not carry it. I have always experienced great service here and was even happily upsold one time due to that service. Awesome.
Expensive but good quality food. A bit salty but overall I felt good after my lunch. A nice alternative to the greasy stuff in the cafeteria.
My wife prefers her haircut only from this specific place and prefers that her hair done by Hannah. It s a nice place with good customer service. If you are looking for perm hair straightening they do not have it. They have smoothing treatments but does not make much of a difference after the first wash. But for haircut this place is highly recommended. Only by appointment I do not think walk ins are allowed. All staff are friendly. Expensive for a men s haircut got my haircut once and was pretty satisfied given that they use scissors and very less machine.
Um good .com .org .net! The meat is really flaky that s a good thing so get a double of whatever you get! The shoe lace fries are really good and you get a lot. Customer service is top notch too!
Megan is amazing! I ve been going to her for over two years now including taking my full bridal party to her. Shes great at suggesting colors and styles and always listens to what her clients want. My hair always turns out great! I d recommend her to anyone
The best onion rings I have ever tasted!!!! Hubby and I went here for my birthday. We had to wait about 10 15 minutes in a queue but it was well worth the wait. Hubby had the Hells Kitchen burger and I had the Chantrelle burger. Hubby was very impressed with his burger. I was over the moon for mine. My burger had the most amazing flavor combination. Both burgers accompanied by Parmesan encrusted fries with a truffle dipping sauce. So yummy. I highly recommend this place to anyone who has an hour to kill for food. Very much worth the wait and the expense. Great service and everything was consistently amazingly good.
Nice and quiet restaurant on E Sahara 5 minutes to the Strip. Salad and soup bar is really cool and fresh ! The server was very friendly with us. Pies are awesome with ice cream
I dunno how they do it Combine competent nice people with great hot dogs and Weiners. Have not begun to eat everything on the menu what I ve had is very good Chicago dog love it
Cafe 100 is a quaint and secluded restaurant art gallery nestled in the heart of downtown Huntersville. What a great home like atmosphere with a family owned and operated system. The food is well prepared and properly served with attention to detail. 5 stars all around!! Keep it up!
It s become tradition for me to take my assistant out to dinner on the last day of the POOL tradeshow in Las Vegas. Well I feed and house him the entire time but dammit the last day is the day for a GOOD STEAK DINNER. In February we had gone to Morton s and while it was good the service and martini were better than the steak. He had mentioned in February that Circus Circus is alleged to have the best steakhouse in Vegas which I dismissed at least 5 separate times as total hooey. How could that be? We did not make it during that trip. So this time being in the mood for something a little more mellow and perhaps a bit silly I suggested Circus Circus for our end of show dinner. i did not change out of my grungy breaking down the booth packing the fixtures clothing at all and off we went. The Steak House is a class act. My helper friend took a look at the dark wood entrance and stepped to the side to tuck in his shirt and spit shine his hair. We did not have reservations as recommended but they were able to seat us right away. As soon as you walk in you re face to face with their curing room an awe inspiring enclosure with entire sides of meat just dry aging away. Gorrrgeous! The decor in general is pretty great dark lots of wood and taxidermy and just what you might expect of a steakhouse in a murder mystery. Service was attentive and not smothering but a little on the clueless side. He did not know where the oysters came from and since my friend the microbiologist recommended that I never eat oysters from the Gulf apparently they re more likely to carry a particular strain of flesh eating bacteria than our good old West Coast oysters we passed. Also when I asked him to please explain the differences between the cuts I know what a Porterhouse and filet mignon are but the difference between a New York strip and a regular ole strip? he instead launched into a spiel that went like this Well for the ladies he looked pointedly at me I recommend the filet mignon. It s a tender cut that s low in fat. We also have a petit filet if you do not want too much. And for the gentlemen eyes over to my companion we recommend the New York strip. It s a flavorful cut that s very popular with the gentlemen. Thanks sir. Thank you for being SO TOTALLY WRONG about how to explain cuts of steak. Annnnnyway the New York strip sounded great to me so that s what I ordered. And apparently the filet mignon sounded great to my companion so that s what he ordered. Well at first he ordered the petit filet but I reminded him that he has a wooden leg and would not be satisfied with the lighter lady s meal. My steak was EXCELLENT. Rare flavorful perfect. The martini was pretty stellar as well. My companion s steak was initially a disappointment to him because it was not as flavorful as mine and this is at the heart of why I only like filet mignon at home when you get to marinate it to your exact specifications. It s a tender bitch but not as flavorful since it does not have the same fat content. FAT IS FLAVOR. but he grew to kind of love it. And I have to say it was miles ahead of the Morton s filet mignon because it was delicously dry aged. Companion thought it was a little gamey but I thought it was kind of excellent. All the other little details about the dinner were excellent as well right down to their bread and butter. How great is that? After dinner we went to the big top and watched 15 minutes of harrowing aerial acrobatics. Helps with digestion.
Stopped here on a suggestion by my mom. Got the shipwreck and it was amazing! Good portion sizes flavors were great and the service was quick. The Rest of my family loved their meals too.
love the yummy ice cream. Nice and pleasant atmosphere. Sometimes the owner seems in a bad mood which makes it hard to talk to her. The young girls who work there are great though. Always smiling. This is yet another jem for East york
After a bad experience at Service King in Mesa I was so happy to bring my vehicle to this location for follow up repair. What a difference! Everyone was so nice and professional. Great people to deal with and my car looks fantastic! Thank you Noel...great way to run a business!
Forget Roberto s and Pepe s Tacos! This place has great portions at affordable prices I love it I ve lived here for 2 years now and it s the only Mexican joint I go to now just an amazing and open 24 hours. Not to mention 99 cent chicken Tacos on Wednesday that are fully loaded with chicken they do not skimp that s what I find awesome they give great portion of lettuce cheese and chicken ratio I find myself not wanting to stop eating them I ve been to every Mexican taco place from Southern California all the way to Northern California. And now I found the best in Vegas I recommend it to all my friends highly recommend it to you my favorite thing is carne asada fries only if the french fries are extra crispy only downside about this place the bathroom is outside but it s pretty cool I got this Crazy Little Thing by the front door so you can wash your hands and the self serve salsa bar is always rocking just an amazing job I only gave four stars and because of the bathroom location everything else was awesome keep up the good work and Beware of the red sauce it s harder than it looks green sauce on Chicken on the chicken tacos is Perfect combo
Polar Play is a super fun concept that is well executed!!! The price for admission is 15 per person but they often run a groupon for 20 for 2 people and 40 for 4 people and 2 slushies . It s a little bit hard to find especially late at night as it is attached to the new aquarium and it is located inside its little plaza. That said you will see arrow signs pointing to the aquarium attractions but no signs for polar play. For a moment I wondered if we were in the wrong place. Also note that the aquarium parking lot turns off its lights around the same time they close at midnight so definitelty do not come here alone and of course drink responsibly The ambiance in their lodge like area in the lobby is really nice with an awesome fireplace and lots of cool games including arcade games giant dominoes giant connect 4 giant jenga and more! Right before you go inside you will get all bundled up for the cold. Thin black gloves and parkas are included but for 5 more per person you can upgrade to fur which is really comfy and useful in the sub zero climate! I ll also suggest dressing a little bit warm or bring a layer you can throw on as it really is cold. I definitely wouldnt recommend open toed shoes! Once inside there are even more really cool games all of which have elements made of ice including shuffleboard checkers cornhole and more! They also have horseshoes and giant pong. I thought this was a really nice touch because most of the ice bars I ve been to do not have activities inside you just sit there and freeze. They also allow cell phones inside which puts them above the rest. With all of that said the one area where I must confess disappointment was with the lack of ice bar ice glasses in addition to the quality of the drinks for the price. The ice bar pictured in many of the old photos on Yelp looks really cool and we were excited to see it. Unfortunately they removed the spirits and while the bar itself is still there it no longer has the cool backlighting and there are no longer spirits served there. Instead drinks are made inside and served at a drive thru like window. The drinks are around 9 10 each and are just okay. My hot beverage was good but I tried my date s boozed up slushie and it was the sweetest drink I d ever tried by far. The service was fantastic and really set this place apart. Carla and Yessenia were incredibly inviting went out of their way to help us and to make us feel at home. They are a HUGE part of the reason I will likely return and will recommend this place to friends. Overall it s a great concept and I totally feel like we got what we paid for and had a lot of fun. That said I really wish they d find a way to reimplement the ice bar and serve shots out of ice shot glasses the lightup ice glasses are even cooler! I would come all the time if they did! 5 stars for service 4 for overall execution.
This Jimmy John s location has always been freaky fast . They have a drive thru window and very nice indoor outdoor seating. Nothing to do with this location but Jimmy John s subs have always been sub par in my option. You can likely find a better sub for a similar price in the area. Tip Jimmy John s sells their bread from the previous day for 0.50!
Love this little spot! Greeted immediately upon entering with good morning! and smiles from the 2 young employees at the counter. I wanted something sweet and they cheerfully helped me select something from their menu. I got the Caramel Macchiato as recommended by another Yelper and it did not disappoint. Hot sweet and hit the spot! The decor is cozy with smooth jazz playing several tables to sit at and a comfy leather sofa up front. I stuck around to drink my coffee and lounge on that comfy sofa. I just wish this place was a destination I pass more often but I might reconfigure my route to make sure I drive by!
We had a very pleasant experience working with falcon on our backyard landscaping. Joseph the owner is a great guy with a lot of great ideas. His crew was very professional showed up on time and finished everything that they promised and a little more that that . He was with the crew the whole time and made sure everything was done to perfection. He helped transform our crude ideas into a great backyard ! I would definitely recommend using Joseph and Falcon for your landscaping. I noticed that Yelp filtered my review unfairly Hope they fix it !
I love this place. The Matzoh Ball soup is great as well as the corned beef sandwiches. The bakery is fantastic. Prices are reasonable.
Having moved from east side to Bratenahl I was in need of a new vet for my two labs. The desk is very friendly and helpful and the vet was so kind. Pricing was extremely fair as another estimate from prior vet was much more. My dog had the surgery and showed no signs of any issues. I am very satisfied with this choice.
The only bad thing I can say about this place is that it is not in Visalia. I live in Visalia and I d love this place to be here!!
Today was my first time at Sephora and I had the most amazing experience! Walking in with a troubled heart due to my recent breakouts I was quickly introduced to Vanessa one of the skin experts. After sharing my story she comforted me by telling me she too has struggled with the same issues but that she found products that have allowed her skin to look beautiful and stay beautiful during times of stress. I was so grateful to hear I was not alone! She showed me her favorite products and gave me samples to take home. Not only was she lovely beautiful and super helpful but she brought hope back into my life! It s been only hours since our paths crossed but I already feel like my skin is improving! It must be the combination of the lovely products I purchased and the wonderful grace she gave to me this afternoon. Thanks again Vanessa! You re the best! You have put this troubled heart at ease.
The Wrigley is a great place to grab brunch!! The views are incredible and it is always fun to walk around the mansion and take in a bit of Arizona and Wrigley gum history!
Last minute idea to stop here prior to an IKEA trip. Gastro Pub style spot with a very nice draft selection if you love craft beer . My wife and I split the garbage nachos and the hot fried chicken sandwich. Both Very good. Nachos has fresh guac belly brisket and chicken. Hot chicken is NOT for the weak. It s seriously spicy and seriously delicious! We will be back!
We are in town for just one night and found this on Yelp. Portions were large and each entree was delicious. The Papardelle had the best Bolognese sauce I have ever tasted. My husband loved the crusty top on the meatloaf and my son thought the Three Little Pigs sandwich was spectacular. We would go back again for sure and recommend everyone try it.
Burger was absolutely amazing. Ate the truffle and friend had Pork Burger both equally as delectable. Not a moral left on the plate as we both ate in silence over our unbelievable dish. The fries however....save your money. Subpar to say the least. They were simply doughy and unevenly caked with whatever topping they came with tried both gooey and truffle . The manager Scott was super awesome though and made sure that everything was taken care of to expectation! Thanks! Would recommend this to others visiting the area minus the fries of course .
The only Pakistani restaurant in Canada that I can recommend to those looking for high end Pakistani Not Indian or North Indian cuisine. There is literally none other like this. It is managed by the owners of the Shireen Mahal sweets and bakery shop which now has 3 GTA location. They have a limited menu including several Karahi dishes. Both the Mutton and Jheenga Shrimp Karahis are exquisite and as close to the original Pakistani taste as can be. Another great feature is their Lahori Fried Fish. A major Pakistani celebrity and his family visiting from Peshawar were surprised to find food that could be compared to Haute cuisine of Pakistan. Kababs and grilled chops are superb. The grilled list includes several good choices. Breads are always fresh and one should try their regular as well as Garlic naans. The Thothe a rice pudding dessert is a surprise that only Pakistanis may know about. It is served in twin dishes and two people can easily enjoy it. The restaurant also serves a High Tea style snacks menu and the Chicken Club Sandwich is to be tried which can be very similar to the sandwiches served in any 5 star hotels in Pakistan. It is a pricey restaurant and can easily be in the 30 per person range for a full meal including appetizers mains dessert and soft drinks. Alcohol is not served. Service can some times be spotty that is why I held back a star. Their managers are always there however may appear indifferent to even their repeat customers. Some may find their berth style seating to be uncomfortable since these seats are quite narrow. One should ask to be seated on the tables with chairs. There are several in their cavernous dining area. Despite some shortcomings Eat More is a restaurant worth trying Muslims should note that it is Halal cuisine place.
Our trip to Vegas I knew i had to try Hash House A Go Go of course going inside The Quad you would expect a line for Hash House A Go Go they told us the wait was about 20 minutes but it was a lot faster than expected. Sitting down our server gave us amazing customer service. The food was amazing I had the sage chicken with the bacon mash potatoes. No need for extra sauce the food was perfect on its own. Will be coming back on our next visit in March. Hoping for the same great food and service. If you are in Vegas this is a place you must stop by at. The portions are enormous. GO FOR THE FOOD AND SERVICE IT IS WORTH IT!
1.50 fish tacos on Tuesday that taste like good quality fish. A couple cold Coronas and it do not get much better for the price. I m definitely a fan.
Cameron is Amazing!!! My friends took me to The Porch to get a sneak peak at the CN tower and chill at a Toronto vibe bar. However it was so much more. Cameron went above and beyond. I truly ca not imagine The Porch with out him. Best night out in Toronto ever!!!! Thank you Cam!!!!
Great night with my lady a bit crowded but worth it overall. Lady Jai was putting it down. Outside of the crowd worthy of conning back over and over
The best thing since sliced sushi! Amazingly friendly staff clean and delicious sushi burritos. This is my new spot. I will definitely be back! Thank you for an amazing first time experience Soho!
The owner Jerry is from Poland and he brought his sausages and pierogi recipes with him! There s a trio of flavors for the pierogi and they re all good but the cabbage and mushroom is my favorite. Whichever you decide on they re served in the traditional style topped with sour cream and fried onions and they are comfort food to the max! The bratwurst sausage dressed with cabbage and mustard is the perfect compliment to a pint inside at Banger Brewing. Quality is solid prices are a bit inflated due to the location 5 pierogi for 8! but not outrageously so the sausages and sandwiches are generous portions. I ll be back to try the meatloaf!
I stopped here yesterday to say hello to an old friend who transferred from the Albertsons where I normally shop to this location. It was great seeing him again. The store is laid out pretty much the same as every Albertsons. I picked up a few items and was on my way after a quick self check out.
I strongly dislike stopping and waiting to get my oil changed. Well these folks made it a great fast and friendly experience. Upfront about the oil canisters my car would require and the cost. I highly recommend this place. I will definitely be back for all my car repair needs.
This was my first time at this place and it was everything people bragged about. The food was DELICIOUS and the oysters was nothing less than the entree! We had a waiter name NATE and HE was PROFESSIONAL KNOWLEDGEABLE and PLEASANT. His customer service was top notch and we made sure his tip reflected it!! If u love oysters come during happy hour 4 7 and the sea levels are 1. They also I recommend this place!
Been eating here for last 15 years. Best catfish in city and would highly recommend. It s so good I ve followed them from 7th st to central ave and now to 10th st and Buckeye...
Back home in the Bay Area we had Bevmo Beverages and More . They had almost any alcohol you could want for a decent price. Total Wine is very similar but only better. Their selection was HUGE in comparison from what I had back home. They had isle after isle after isle with Wines hard liquor beer you thought would be impossible to get stateside. They had all that and more. I went in on a beer run. I wanted to try the local craft and maybe pick up some of my favorite imports. I can say I was shocked at all the beer. They had it all arranged by country region alongside a little description on how eacg place makes their beer. It was interesting to say the least. I think I just found my local spot. And with all that international beer Im excited to be a regular here
we love gateway. Doctor Brian is the best dr my fur babies have ever had. So sad the front desk said I ca not even make apts with him anymore since he s basically almost retired. so I did a first come first serve Thankfully I found doctor Liz and Dr Ben they are both awesome!
For a local coffee shop OSP does everything right for me. Blazing fast internet perfect coffee and a local scene that supports community. The walls are covered in art from local artists the coffee is bought at fair market value meaning they buy coffee from companies that pay their workers minimum wage Starbucks does not! and on the weekends they are pumping music by local bands. If you re looking to get work done which is often the case for me they ve got plenty of comfy spaces to curl up in and get things done. The atmosphere is laid back and the people are super friendly. Go try it out! They re next door to Tempe Yarn they re kind of hard to see from the street but park when you see Tempe Yarn .
First time customer and I would come back. The Bobbie sandwich was a good thanksgiving style sandwich but I did ask for more cranberry sauce because it was kinda dry. Clean shop and servers were really helpful
Best Jersey Mikes around. Very friendly and attentive staff. This place gets slammed and the employees work very well under pressure.
Everyone at Summit Family Dentistry is amazing. I have gone to the same dentist for my entire life until I moved to the Charlotte area. My insurance recommended Summit Family Dentistry and I am so glad they did! They all put you at ease and seem to genuinely care about your dental health. Dr. Pernell was extremely thorough and repaired a tooth I was not aware even had an issue. They all put my mind at ease about going to a different dentist.
I have no words! Best nail place in the world! I ve been coming here for almost 3 years! V is my girl she does the best manicure and pedicure. She s so nice and pacient!!! She is the best you have to come see her !! And really any of the girls are amazing !!!!!!!!!
I am very impressed with the new and improved Minder Binders! The original knick nacks and charm are intact and the property improvements are exceptional. The modern looking kitchen kicks out food quickly and the bar is much much nicer. The 2 patio areas are a nice touch. I ve brought several guests on 5 6 visits. Each experience has been a great time. The owner Chritine Christy? goes out of her way to remember your name and greet us every time and often serves your drinks or meal herself when the help is busy. She is obviously a hard worker and strong on customer appreciation. I believe she will be very successful. The burgers are great. I understand they are adding more menu items like salmon so I look forward some healthy choices however the pizza looks so good I will try that next! If you remember the old place you wont be disappointed. I live about 12 miles away but it is worth the drive.
Hole in the wall on the edge of town best tacos ever!!! Chicken pork and beef prepared in 10 ways in 4 or 5 levels of spicy. Beef in green salsa! With pickled red onion!! To lick your fingers!!!
Have to give this place 4.5 stars because there s always room for a little improvement. I use to go here when it was called Niche Cafe. The new name peaked my interest because nna is now in Icelandic and My husband is imported from Iceland. The owners knew the word was Icelandic but that s about the only reference to Iceland besides maybe the skr with granola fruit and honey. See photo I ordered the greens sandwich vegan grilled vegetables and It was really good. What I loved most was how hot it was. Too often vegetable sandwiches are either undercooked cooked but luke warm or the bun is cold. This sandwich was delicious and hot. My husband and mother in law both had omelettes and they were quite satisfied. They really liked the herbs on the potatoes. Our son had the skr with granola and I asked if they would make a smaller bowl for him he s 2.5 yo which they happily obliged. My only critique was way too much honey. But that could probably be adjusted if you know to ask ahead. Which I definitely will next time. Lovely owners kind and attentive young lady behind the counter. I look forward to trying it a few more times to see if the food and service stay consistent.
This is probably some of the best service I have ever received. The only thing bad I can say is the installer was about a half hour late but in this business things happen. And he called to let me know he was running a little behind schedule. We are in the process of selling our home and had 2 repairs requested. A new window in the double pane slider since one was broken and the shower door fixed because it did not close properly. Jeff came out to give a quote. I feel he was honest and fair. We decided to have both replaced. After paying the deposit I received a email from him for actually less than he quoted. Heather called several times to confirm and to let me know they wanted to send out the manufacturer of the shower door to measure just to make sure no mistakes were made. Corey came and installed. He was respectful of my property and was quick and efficient. I highly recommend the Glass Guru of Peoria. Could I have gotten it cheaper? Maybe. But good customer service is priceless! I will definitely be using them for all of my glass needs.
It s in Vegas Chinatown. Outside the sign says L V Superstore and Sieu Thi Thuan Phat Supermercado then inside it says SF Supermarket. Jeez so many names. It s a huge store like 99 Ranch with lots of room to move around and lots of stuff. We went here like 4 times in 5 days to get food. We bought Fuji apples huge and delicious Baked shrimp chips love them Baked shrimp chips hot garlic love them lots Seaweed to eat like snacks We got Vietnamese sandwiches almost everyday for our lunches when we went hiking. They have a deal right now buy 4 get 1 FREE. Regular price for one is 2.99. Sandwiches had to pay with CASH ONLY. Grocery items can use credit cards. Recommend this place.
Quiet Sunday thought I would check TR out for lunch. I keep reading great things about the food. Introduced myself to the bartender and Owner s girlfriend. Followed lunch recommendation of Shrimp poorboy and sweet potato tots. Delicious. Plan to go back for the food live music and drinks. New neighborhood hangout. Thanks ladies for being so friendly.
My first breakfast at D lish was so good I had to come back a couple days later. This is one of the best drive through restaurants ever. They use flavorful quality natural ingredients yet still manage to crank out tasty food very quickly. Hopefully you do not need to eat in your car but if you do D lish is the ticket. Traditional breakfast burrito 4.75 6.25 w meat Score! I have had a lot of breakfast burritos and this ranks up there as one of the best if not the best ever. The chicken sausage was a total winner and the cheese was out of this world. You might think 6.25 is a little pricey for a breakfast burrito but the ingredients are sooo good that it is totally worth it. House blend smoothie 4 5 This smoothie ranks up there with anyone else s. A must get if you want to kick start your day with some blended fruit rather than caffeine.
You never know what you expect when traveling for a living. I have never book a room at a Homewood Suites hotel before this visit. I was pleasantly surprised. I ve stayed in suite hotels before but this was different. The rooms were huge comfortable and nicely decorated. The hotel was much better than expected considering the on line rating. I ll be looking for Homewood Suites in the future.
AWESOME place!! I wanted a new hair style something fun but not too wild. CARLA was my stylist and she made my vision come true! I showed her a simple picture I found on Pinterest of black and blue hair. She informed me of SO much and the different ways she could accomplish getting my hair to turn out that way. She let me know the safest ways to color change and what would be best for what I was going for since I did not want to go to full black hair from my brownish blonde hair I currently had. Once we figured out what we were doing she poured me some champagne and I just sat back in the chair and waited for her to do her magic! A few hours later she did an awesome blow out took some photos and then FINALLY let me see the final product! I LOVE IT!! My hair is freakin awesome! It s not loud looks natural in normal light but the blue POPS in the sunlight just right! She did a fabulous job! Seriously anything you re looking at getting done even if you re not sure exactly how you want it she can guide you in the right direction and I guarantee you ll love the end product!! CARLA WAS FANTASTIC!!!
The best place in Madison to get quality custom jewelry. I would not go anywhere else. Knowledgeable and honest.
Went there before seeing Alt J at the Playhouse. FYI this is across the street from the playhouse and technically on 14th street not Euclid. The atmosphere is cool decent decor but nothing mindblowing. The Service is Excellent! ALL the people i interacted with were in the new restaurant phase still where they acted like I d be reviewing them immediately after Drinks were good but a bit pricey... But its downtown so that cancels out the cost. Food was GOOD but not Amazing for the price. I had the seafood risotto which had shrimp scallops and mussels. The mussels were so small i would advise them to skip them in lieu of more shrimp or scallops instead. The gooey risotto was nice but like 80 of the plate....could have used more seafood IMO. My wife had the Salmon dish which they HAPPILY accommodated her menu change requests for free. Huge Win. The Fish was delicious and the complimentary bread and dipping stuff they give you is also amazing. My friends had their Lamb Gnocchi which I enjoyed more than my own dish. Overall a nice place with some good potential but not out of the park.
Call me crazy but I do not come to the B Spot for the burgers even though they are really good. I come for the Stadium Brats the pickle bar and the Lola fries. The Stadium Brats are brats smothered in mustard and grilled onions and they are absolutely fantastic. The pickle bar is great especially the Tony Packo s sweet and spicy ones seriously... try them. The Lola fries are awesome they are thinly sliced fries sprinkled with rosemary and sea salt. If you do not have them when you go you have completely missed out on the B Spot experience. This place is really good for kids however the fact that they do not take reservations or let parts of the group come in at different times I can see would be really frustrating. I only come with my family of 5 so it s never a problem for us. It has delicious food and to me that s all that matters in a restaurant.
i really enjoyed the homemade strawberry italian soda they offered. i ordered the soda along with an artichoke dip garlic beard and calamari. we all shared it cuz we were going to eat dinner later on so we didnt wanna spoil our appetite. i love how our waiter came over to us with a tray full of desserts to show us what they have. we had the tiramisu and it was a pretty big slice.
Appetizer style food but very filling. The atmosphere is great and laid back. The servers wear old band tees as their uniform and it s awesome! A cute place to grab a bite with friends. The Turducken Pot Pie is sooo good the crust on top is delicious af!!!
Free self parking central to the strip and right off of Tropicana and I 15. What s not to love? Just do not tell we were in it for the parking... did not stay at the hotel.
Saw this place online and really wanted to check it out because of the old school look and the insanely cheap prices. I went in with pretty low expectations. I was amazed with overall how great this place is. Food was very very good with generous portions service was quick and the waitress was very friendly. Got a sandwich fries and a drink for 4.80! That s unheard of in 2018. I ll definitely be back. My only complaint is in regards to cleanliness. Place was quite dusty rusty equipment cracked floor tiles and ripped seats. With all that being said given the price and quality of the food you really ca not complain.
We went here for a round last night. The ambiance is great our bartender Bobby was awesome and very informative. We will definitely return. Gave 4 stars because I did not love the drink I ordered Pisco sour .
This is one of the best Greek restaurants I have been to in Arizona. The food was wonderful. I had the Gyro and Fries and everything was fantastic.
Everytime I visit Las Vegas I make a stop at the Dragon Noodle Co this last trip was no exception. The food is always good and the sushi is made fresh to order. They also serve Pho! My favorite dish is everything! The price is average and the service is very good.
Got a massage Here for the first time recommended by my mother and it did not disappoint! I got The Ayurvedic massage with olena she is amazing! The staff was friendly and made me feel comfortable. I will definitely come back and recommend to all my Mesa friends! Everything about this massage was SO great.
I have two dogs. This is our back up vet for when our usual vet who has taken care of my grandparents parents and my pets is not available or we need a vet quickly i.e. getting a shot before a groomer appointment . I have been there 3 times and they have seen each of my dogs. Reception is great very responsive and I like that I can get an estimate of cost before I bring my pets in. The vet techs that I have met are wonderful with animals very caring and gentle and knowledgeable. Dr. Linfante is great about spending time with animals and making sure all questions and concerns are addressed. The only issue I have is that sometimes I feel like they try to up sell some things extra blood work or testing procedures when not really needed or called for but they do not have an issue when these are declined. I m glad to have a kind reliable and available vet in the west Ballantyne area.
This location of Buffalo Exchange is amazing. I usually start by satisfying my denim addiction and peruse through the jeans. They have all the top designer brands True Religion Rock and Republic William Rast Seven found for over two hundred dollars at Nordstom. After I finish it s straight to the fitting rooms because there s no way I could carry around 40 pounds of jeans very long. Sometimes the staff will ask if you d like to start a little collection back there while you look.. tricky little buggers. The prices are great and the condition of the clothing is always pretty good to excellent. I ca not think of any times I did not get a friendly hello on my way in the door. I ve had quite the good luck in selling items to this location also which is great considering I go in expecting them to not take anything.
Champs automotive is definately the place to go if you have any problems with your car. After about 10 years it s about that time when everything in your car starts having issues but I know I can count on Champs to fix everything. Within the year we came in for a radiator leak a faulty AC unit brake change oil change you name it and they ll fix it fast. They are very honest mechanics who also do not over charge you like the dealers do. We had a few issues with our BMW and the dealer estimated about 10 000 in repairs and when we brought our car to Champs they charged us about 3000 for parts and labor never going back to the dealer now. I would highly recommend Champs to anyone with any car. They re mechanics that we can trust and always rely on when we need the job done correctly.
This place is awesome for kids. They ll learn every step in Math. My kids just started this week and they love it. All the staff and teacher are awesome. You can pick you schedule that s works for you and the kids. We re planning to have our kids to do Kumon for a long time. Barbara is a Director that will tell the history and purpose of their program.
These sheets are so amazing! I love how soft they are and that they do not wrinkle. I have had several sets over the years and even though I do not live in Vegas anymore i will continue to buy them because they are that good!
I highly recommend Mike for pool cleaning he has been cleaning my pool for quite some time now and has been very reliable and professional. I have gotten many compliments from friends that have come to visit about how good our pool looks. I have also recommended him to many of my clients that have just bought homes with pools and they have all been very happy with his services and his prices. A valuable asset to have!!!!
The staff was extremely friendly and the environment was completely inviting. Every question I had was answered in a very informative way. Both my wife and I had a very pleasant experience here. Ashley was our artist and she was absolutely amazing. Very talented and was the first person to cut my wife s bangs EXACTLY how she liked them. She also did my pompadour and my fade which was done exactly the way I wanted it. Everything about this place is amazing and we will be returning in the future for more haircuts. Thank you ladies for the most amazing experience.
I loved the wildberry bliss pancakes. The denver omelet was fine but the pancakes were awesome.
Just wanna stop by and say how AMAZING our service everytime we come into the store. Karla Maurice and Odet always go above and beyond to make us happy! Props to them!
So when I went to Vegas last month my friends wanted to take me down to Fremont so I decided what the hell I ll see what it s all about. This place was amazing from everything that was there such as Golden Nugget 4 Queens etc. Since this is old Vegas all the casinos are old fashioned with coins coming out left and right and the atmosphere was good. Me and my friend had mudslides at one of the bars with Everclear and that hit us hard big time. We still had fun even with the crazy people zip lining. I will come back again next time I m in Vegas.
Surprisingly decent food served fast and furious in a noisy street stall dining room atmosphere. The menu is perhaps too large as it offers practically everything under the sun. Specials galore from breakfast to afternoon tea time to dinner. I was impressed with the freshness tastiness and wok heat of the dishes we had one evening. There s a madness to the dining experience when the place is full but the staff delivers the goods with efficiency and little attitude. Given all the options available in the area this restaurant deserves recognition for exceeding its competition on many levels. One note I found the fast food items noodles and congee far less exciting than the entree dishes on the dinner menu. Still a quality stop for nosh in this sea of humanity.
Great establishment for party of 1. Great value with service to make you feel at home. Will return here before any hotel bar. Groups looked like they had fun also.
We stayed at The Linq and this restaurant was very convenient. We had both brunch and dinner at the Hash House both meals were delicious. Our waiter was very friendly and attentive. Highly recommend this restaurant during your stay in Vegas!
Super fast lunchtime service! The sandwiches were unexceptional but well sized and priced. I think it s emptier right now than it usually would be because the front is covered in scaffolding for the renovations. It s open though! You may end up walking into the kitchen because you ca not actually find the main entrance um sorry guys but once you find your way to the dining room everything s gold.
I came here last night around 10 30pm to grab something to eat. The restaurant was pretty empty and the host was nice enough to let us choose where we d like to sit. Although the seats outside have a nice view of the water we decided to sit at a booth inside since there was AC. We ordered a Berry Sangria for the table to start 26 . It was so good the perfect beverage to order on a hot summer night. For an appetizer we ordered the Fish Tacos 14 . These fish tacos were really yummy and flavourful but I feel like 14 is a little pricey for the size and for only two of them. I ordered the Berries N Kale Superfood salad quinoa kale berries pomegranate seeds goat cheese 27 . This salad was huge it had the right amount of veggies and fruits however there could ve been a bit more dressing so the kale would not have tasted so plain but overall it was still a good salad. My boyfriend ordered the Classic Buffalo Wings 15 . The wings also came with a few carrot sticks and ranch dip he said they tasted good. Overall I really enjoyed this place the seating outside has a beautiful view of the water and the seating inside is spacious and cozy. The service was fast and the staff are also really friendly our server checked up on us regularly and gave a good recommendation for the berry sangria. I would ve gave this place 5 stars but on our way out I stopped to use the restroom and it was very dirty and messy. It looked like it had not been cleaned in days. Hopefully next time I m in the area and decide to eat here the washrooms are clean!
When the Carolina Panthers first began and an enormous stadium was opening within walking distance people asked them will they open on Sundays. They said no. When the whole world started using debit cards people asked them will they start using them? They said no. When drive throughs took over would they...? No. How about speeding up your cook time? No. You could cook faster at a higher temperature. No. How about delivery? No. How about expanding? No. What about a new swanky building near the fancy condos? No. How about new uniforms that are not from Mayberry RFD? No. And on and on and on. This may be the very last truly authentic place left on earth. The fact that their chicken is Price less is poetic. I truly applaud them on all counts. They deserve every accolade they get.
Absolutely gorgeous! Need I say more? Such a beautiful display of desert plants. Definitely go early before it gets too hot.
Came here on a Sunday around 2 30pm or so. There was a 15minute line up which was not too bad. We ended up having to wait an additional 35minutes for the icecream since a new batch had to be made so a total of 1 hour. Servers workers really nice. The shop accepts cash only. Ordered regular egg waffle matcha soft serve and the cookies n creme with twist soft serve together for 15. The icecream was REALLYYYY good creamy velvety and just the right amt of matcha flavour I ve had uncle tetsu s matcha soft serve and well... that was paying for melted matcha ice 5 for 3 low swirls.. not worth . I would come back here just for the soft serve. The waffles were good though I found the cookies n creme one to be too sweet for my taste.
Took my friends here while they were visiting great location and incredible food. Service was great and the atmosphere was laid back and cozy. For sure headed back soon!
The variety on this menu is endless. The patio is where u wanna sit. It is so nice and cozy at night its the perfect spot for u and ur friends or a nice romatic spot that a couple can chill. Food where to begin.lol the japanese style fried chicken is a must try. Its a little dry but it really makes up for in flavour. The crab cakes wow! It just melts in ur mouth and it actually has real crab meat pieces. This is what I look for in a crab cake oh man there poutine selection is big and I just went with lamb cause come on.lol its lamb! Nothing here over powered the lamb and it was a very good blend of meat cheese and Potatoe. As my main meal I got a lamb burrito. The rice and peas was a little dry and not so much in flavour. The coleslaw was more of a summer blend which is not particularly my favorite since I like mayo.lol but the burrito dam... It was good and and big portion too. This place is near UofT and if I went to school there easily one of my lunch spots. Service was at par.lol no complaints there.lol
Great food and friendly service If you are looking for a good breakfast place that wo not break the bank check this place out. It s not far from the strip and was recommended to me by a LV locals. French toast was done right not too soggy and not too dry. Waffle was delicious and corn beef hash was done just right. They have a huge menu so there is a lot to choose from for everyone. We ll be back again next time we are in Vegas.
We went here for dinner tonight before going to Wicked and I have to say it was probably one of the best dining experiences I ve ever had. There were five of us 4 adults and one kid with food allergies. Usually when going to a restaurant no one including the servers seem to have any idea what on the menu would be good for someone with food allergies. They hem and haw and guess at things. This does not work so well for someone with severe allergies. We explained our issue to our server Lauren who said she would get the manager who would print out a special menu for us. That s right a special menu. So over comes the manager Jeff Jensen. We tell him that our kid has peanut and egg allergies and he leaves and comes back with a specially printed out menu that has basically a list of everything on their menu that is safe for someone with those specific allergies. I have NEVER had a restaurant do that before. Absolutely amazing customer service. Both our server and the manager came back a couple times to make sure everything worked out ok with the special menu not just to make sure the rest of the food was good. Major kudos to both Lauren and Jeff! Now about the food The oolong marinated Chilean Sea Bass is one of my favourite dishes there. The sauce is fantastic the fish is tender and flavourful and the fresh wilted spinach is the perfect veggie for it. Salt and pepper prawns are great too. Appetisers get the calamari fried green beans or crab wontons and you wo not be disappointed. For dessert the tres leches lemon dream either the mini or full size is just the right balance of sweet and tart. Our service was outstanding and fast even with the restaurant being packed right before the show. Our food was great. All in all it was simply a great night!
Voted Vegas best pizza multiple years in a row. I can see why ! Amazing pizza...fantastic service... Will DEFINITELY be back ! Wow!!
Best soul food in Vegas by far!!! Great service!! Thanks Alyson and Q! I enjoyed the Ox tails and baby back ribs. Boom!!
This is such a cute little place and the sushi Chef is very detail oriented. The food takes a bit longer to come out after ordering but it s so worth it
Okay....my review for this one is the same as the other one on Bell...they are pretty much identical except there is more parking at this location....and occassionally you get a distracted server....but for the most part the service is good. I only ding it a star for the singing. As with all of this style restaurant they do the obnoxiously loud birthday singing that makes you have to pause your conversation and wait and wait...and...they seem to average 3 5 birthdays per meal that I have there. How about a little cake and candle and a nice simple Happy birthday! The food is great and there is a variety of dishes...something to please everyone...vegetarians experimental eaters the burger guy and me the picky one. Dan mentioned that he did not like the fancy stuff they actually have a big thing on their menu that asks you to just tell them how you want it you can pick out what type of bun what goes on it etc. So...if you do not want a fancy bun ask for a plain one no one bats an eye. They have a dangerous thing unlimited french fries. For a whopping 49 cents you can make them unlimited garlic fries. Also...if you ask they will bring you a side of onion straws or fries while you wait for your meal...so far they ve always been free.
So...I read all the reviews and went in hoping to have one of the good experiences and I m so glad I did. Bought my membership about a year ago and have used the range probably 30 or so times maybe more. Just about everyone I ve come into contact with was very customer focused and helpful. That includes the RO s and instructors. I ve taken a few classes. I ll renew for sure.
This is a great go to spot for all things Mediterranean great food just go! Apparently someone thinks one sentence is not enough for a full review....so...
This place was great! I have a 15 month old and he absolutely loved it! He played non stop with all the awesome stuff they have available and he did not want to leave. They have stuff for little babies to play with all the way up to age 6 and he loves it all! I definitely recommend this place for the smaller kiddos. He passed out instantly in the car on the way home that s how I know he really had a blast!
My local watering hole with a grungy vibe. Easy atmosphere good service approachable laid back staff.
DR. Hoffman is a great orthodontist he is knowledgable personable and he is very good with children and adults. Both my nine year old son and I have been treated by him and his staff and we would not go anywhere else. They offer great financial plans to help you make affordable payments on treatment if need be and a fun incentive plan that keeps kids and adults on track with treatment and follow ups.
Came here after reading the great reviews went with the triple combo with the salmon salad Italian wedding soup and sliders. Filling lunch for only 10! Would love to come back to try out the other options. This place was packed on a Wednesday at lunch obviously others have caught on too!
Unique joint. Great food. Big portions. I hate writing reviews. Stop reading this and just eat here for crap s sake.
Wow this place is really adorable clean and all around great atmosphere for a little breakfast lunch place. The food is AMAZING and the prices are insanely reasonable. They have lots of choices for bread bagels. The man that handled our order was the nicest guy ever. He offered to give my husband an extra choice of cheese since he chose not to get meat on his breakfast sandwich vegetarian . They honored the free coffee when you check in with yelp coupon. My one and only complaint is that they do not make decaf coffee I ca not have caffeine but there is a coffee bean right next door so my husband got the free coffee and got me a decaf from next door. He got the make your own breakfast sandwich for 6 choosing jalapeno cheese bagel for bread and added fries for 2. I got the turkey avocado grilled cheese with Mom s fries. I am so coming back here!
I was in the area and saw the good rating on Yelp so I stopped by for a bite. Apparently they do not do tacos anymore but they do a damn good burger and fries! Man Montreal fries just ca not miss can they? Did not even need the cheese or bacon on the burger it was so tasty on its own!
Our family really enjoyed Fran s on our recent trip to Toronto from the US. We would not consider it a funky or eclectic diner but a really good basic diner. For breakfast it was fantastic...super yummy pancakes and the other egg dishes looked great. They have a pretty large lunch dinner menu too. Service was pretty quick even when it was packed.
I came here for Mother s Day with my family today and loved it! Have not been since it switched over from bluestone but I m glad I finally got the chance to check it out. Our waiter was super nice and attentive throughout and I noticed when I got there there was a 10 off the meal when you check in on Yelp. Not a crazy amount but hey it s something! We were there for brunch and I ended up ordering the crab cake eggs Benedict. It was delicious I also noticed they had fried chicken and waffles on the menu which I was quite intrigued by. A few people at my table ordered the burger which they said was quite good as well. Overall a good dining experience and I would love to return to check out the dinner menu!
This is an amazing sushi restaurant! Fast service quality food and friendly staff! Thank you for one hell of a Sunday lunch. I recommend the hurricane roll sexy girl roll and the super white tuna!
I ca not stop recommending this place to my friends! District 704 came recommended to me from a friend so I decided to visit the store when I was in the market for a new sectional. I was so incredibly picky and knew exactly what I wanted in my head. I found what I was looking for at another store and decided to see if District 704 carried the sectional. Not only were they able to order it they customized the sectional exactly the way I wanted and for 500 less!! They were not pushy at all and made me feel so comfortable when I was deciding on what it was that I wanted. Everything they do carry in the store is absolutely beautiful and their style is impeccable. I will definitely be returning to purchase from them again!
We used LD Tours for a shuttle service and from start to finish my experience with them was exceptional. Responsive courteous no hidden fees clean and comfortable bus friendly and timely driver. I highly recommend them!
Wow! My husband and I had a great time at this hotel and were extremely impressed with the niceness of the staff and the excellent room quality. Splurge and get the strip view. You wo not regret it. Also the rooms are huge and tastefully decorated. The beds and linens are amazing. There area also 3 flat screens in the room. Plenty of great restaurants to choose from however we ended up eating most of our meals at the Grand Lux Cafe on the Venetian side. We also suggest going very early to get a great spot at the Venetian pool Palazzo guests are allowed go to the Venetian Pool . The reason being is the Venetian pool gets sun earlier than the Palazzo. Palazzo pool would not get sun til about 2 pm. The Venetian pool is also very big and deeper than the Palazzo options. Got an excellent deal online for 800 for 4 nights. Trust me it s worth the splurge.
If Yelp had more stars Home Goods would get them all from me. I love this store but have to be very careful when I go there. It s like shopping at Costco for one thing you ca not !! The store has become addictive to me and the best thing about the addiction is that I can savor it. Every time I go into that store which is often there is a whole new array of merchandise. The store is owned by T.J. Max so they get merchandise from so many other stores that have overstocks unsold items or discontinued merchandise. THIS IS NOT TUESDAY MORNING MERCHANDISE!! If you re looking for seasonal items they have huge displays of dishware serving pieces and more for every season. Everything of course is new but the prices are much lower than the items originally sold for. I love that I can buy 1 cup or one dish without having to buy the whole place setting. Furniture is one of a kind so if you like something buy it on the spot or you re out of luck. This store carries everyything from cookware kitchen gadgets dishware and glassware to lamps furniture linens and decorator items. The list goes on. If you ve never been here I suggest you do it and do it often as I said the merchandise changes every few days. Okay see what I ve done? Now I have to go there today.
First time to try In N Out after hearing it hyped for years. We got there just a few minutes after they opened and it was already packed. The Lines s continued to increase as we are and by the time we left there were people standing out the door to order. I got the double double 1 combo. I got their pink lemonade to drink and liked it. The burger was good but it s not different than any other fast foods. The fries needed to be cooked longer and could have used more salt on them. Glad I tried it after hearing about them for years but probably wo not go out of my way to have one again.
Drove past this place and turned around to give it a try as there are not very many bbq joints in the falls. Right away I noticed the picture in the front window of a guy saying Gimmy a soda so I figured I d ask what that was about. Long story short the picture is of the owner s father and the owner Eugene uses the recipes handed down to him from the man pictured. I like a place with a story like that. I got a full slab of ribs which are only served on the weekends. The flavor was right on and the bbq sauce was delicious. The sauce has a sweet almost mustardy flavor to it which I dig. The ribs were 21 for a full slab which is about par for the course when you re getting a quality slow smoked product. Like most places they finish the ribs on the grill right before they serve them. Overall I definitely liked the food and the staff were all very friendly. Stop in and check the place out and be sure to talk to Eugene!
I ve eaten here a few times and every time service has been pretty good. Sometimes it feels like you are at someone s home BC I m sure the staff is family which can get awkward but food has been amazing! Have not really enjoyed any of their specialty cocktails so I hope they fine tune their offerings on that end. If you are looking for a good pizza I would definitely come here as long as you are not looking to drink.
Gazelle and her staff at Gazelle Medical Spa are great! I met Gazelle through a business networking group McDowell Mountain Ranch Vendors and decided to do the gentleman s facial. It was amazing and I felt great after. She did an excellent job. I then decided to try laser hair removal on the back of my neck and back. I have never had laser hair removal and Gazelle made me feel comfortable. I am very happy with the results and would definitely recommend Gazelle Medical Spa and Aesthetics.
Coolest bar in Charlotte! Cheap drinks awesome entertainment and good company... check it out! By the way their pirate theme is way cool and the location is top notch!
This is my third time at the restaurant. I should not have to wait 25 minutes for a 8.00 latte. I understand there is a line but people are capable of waiting in line while the cashier assists the barista with backed up orders instead of allowing her to fall behind. I will return because this is a vegan spot near my home. The food is amazing and I have yet to find something I do not like. Good quality produce with great flavor. I am more than willing to edit this review after coming back a few times. Best regards!
When I think of Trader Vic s I think Mojito. They shake up the best Mojito I ve ever tasted. I crave their Mojitos almost daily... especially when it s 110 outside. Refreshing bubbly minty sweet and cool I let out an ahhhhhhhh with every sip. Since Trader Vic s is so close to my casa I m a happy hour regular. You ll find me waiting at their door on a weekend at 3 50 p.m. saying open open open . Happy hour at Trader Vic s is held daily whoo hoo! from 4 6pm and then again from 9 11pm. Their 1950 s style pricing fits my budget ever so nicely. I m absolutely addicted to their 3 calamari the wasabi ajoli sauce that comes with it is delish! My bf loves to make a meal out of the Oven Roasted Maui Burger also only 3 during happy hour and this burger is HUGE! I also recommend the roasted garlic hummus 2 and crispy chicken skewers 3... scrum diddily umptious! As far as regular sit down dinner goes I m a huge fan of sea creatures and Trader Vic s knows how to serve em up right. The wood fired Hawaiian butterfish literally melts like butter in my mouth. The Rock Shrimp Calcutta Curry and Macadamia Crusted Mahi are pricey menu choices.... but so worth the extra for a splurge. The 50s vibe outdoor patio and friendly waiters make Trader Vic s even better. Once I walk in the doors it feels like I m on vacation... add in a Mojito fresh fish and I m one happy Islander!
They are awesome. I was on vacation and the air conditioning in my mini van stopped working. It was close to 120 degrees at the time. My wife son and I were miserable. A few weeks before our trip I had the air conditioning compressor replaced the system flushed and pretty much rebuilt so my wife and I were pretty upset. I called Don s and he assured me that he and his crew would get my van fixed. The next day I got the call that it was minor. The system was leaking and some seals were bad. It was fixed before the end of the day. I could not get to the shop before closing due to Vegas road construction and traffic. He stayed an extra hour just so I could pick up my van. When I got there he said no charge! I was in shock. I still gave him a gift card to get pizza for every one. They are very professional and wonderful people. They really saved my vacation. We will always remember what they did for us and will be back if we ever need a vehicle worked on in Vegas.
Great place nice people they sell out quick so come early. They have coffee self serve. Come for the donuts not the coffee really cute place.
Love this place! Great service and food. Although I get the same thing every time Basket of chicken with potato salad the other foods I have tried have been wonderful. I would definitely recommend to my friends and family.
It is a beautiful hotel situated on Mill Avenue and accessible to many restaurants and bars. I had always wanted to stay here and the service is great.
10.14.2017. Bachelorette party. Overall my favorite club in Vegas but I ve only been to 3 others. Promoters All girls party gets free bottle and table before 11PM. Music Throwback R and B Pitbull Justin Bieber s Despacito. It s every song I always wanted expected to hear in a club but never did and now I finally got that. Service Bouncers were the friendliest I ve met in Vegas. They knew it was my bachelorette and frequently checked in on me to make sure I had a great time. How sweet! Layout Spacious open easy to navigate. Bathroom is very pretty. Probably because it was only 11PM.
Kings Fish House is great however with servers like Tasha at the Henderson location makes it incredible. We ca not wait to come in for GREAT food and EXCELLENT service.
Very personable staff. Great coffee blends and awesome flavor. Restaurant was a little hot for my liking. Turn on the A C for the love of Mike we live in Arizona! Coffee was a little overpriced. Otherwise really good local coffee.
Had the red chili noodles with chicken today. Very tasty. Just enough heat. Plenty of vegetables and just enough to feel full but not stuffed. Definitely worth a try.
Finally got a chance to try this place on Sunday night! Like everyone says parking is difficult but it was not too bad the night we went despite the 20 minute wait we had for a table. First off we were seated and Maya took our drink orders....big plus for the boyfriend was the Red Rocket seasonal beer on tap....but then we waited and waited and waited to order. Not a big deal we are patient people. We finally order the Caesar salad Margarita pizza the one with pepporoni see how much of a vegetarian I am? Ca not even spell pepporoni and sausage. We got the Ceasar salad with the dressing on the side and were not impressed. It was basically an 8 plate of lettuce with a tiny bit of cheese and maybe 8 croutons. Boooooo. I guess that s what I get for trying to be healthy. The pizza s on the other hand were amazing! I get the margarita where ever we go and this one tops them all......so yummy and a good amount of basil cheese and sliced tomatoes. Big enough for 2 for sure! After the pizza we went to the grocery and got a big cookie made at Tammie Coe? next door and it was chewy chocolately deliciousness. We ll definitely be back!
My entire family exclusively uses Frank s Honest Auto for all of our Auto Repair and Maintenance issues. The name says it all I have never stumbled upon a shop that had as much Integrity and treated their clients like royalty like I ve had with Frank s shop. Auto repairs used to be an intimidating process until I started bringing my Vehicles into this shop. It felt like I was family from day one. A bit tricky to find at first but once you ve had work done through Frank you ll wonder why you did not go to him sooner.
I absolutely LOVED what Tracy and Lynn did for me the night of my big event the 4th Annual Mom Entrepreneur Celebration in Scottsdale. Was such a huge relief to not have to figure out what to do with my hair and make up as I usually am just a get up and go type of gal. These ladies really knew my style without having to ask so that I could shine on stage. Every time I go to ROLFs I know I will always come out looking absolutely stunning. My husband concurred. Thank you for everything!
Decently healthy food at pretty affordable prices considering the trendiness of some of the dishes! I came here twice in a day once for breakfast after hot yoga and once for dinner after another hot yoga session ok the yoga here is really good! I got an acai bowl in the morning which was pretty big for the price. I opted out of agave nectar on top and it was already plenty sweet. It was okay but I could taste a lot of apple juice in there so it was definitely more watered down with more added sugar than I would have liked. For dinner I got the chili lime shrimp bowl with forbidden rice. Really great portion of veggies and shrimp! The rice was a bit hard. I also got some of the banana bread which is definitively not one of the healthy options but SO moist and delicious. Next time I ll try out one of their protein shakes or juices which also looked yummy!
I love Latin America. Visited nearly every country respectively except of course Venezuela. Now I must go. I had no idea what an Arepa was but now I am hooked. This is such a lovely little place inspired by their heritage with just enough Americanization to make it work in little old Rock Hill. Get out of your comfort zone and try Ava s! Also they have THE best coffee in town. It s from Venezuela! They have a real coffee machine and grind and brew it right there. They also have a drive thru to get your coffee from their in the morning!
I have not stayed or gambled here. I have gone to two shows and it was great. Nice clean and even though it s busy it s very nice and easy to get around. The parking sucks though.
My family loves this place. It s a great family restaurant with exceptionally fresh seafood. We look forward to always eating here. The reason I did not give it a 5 star which for the service and the food it deserves a 5 star. Is that we wait a long time to get in. We always wait 40 minutes or so for dinner. Other than that we love coming here. Their oysters are so darn good and their grilled fish are so delicious and fresh and everything you order is great.
Great job! Very polite and courteous! They got all the needed information for X rays etc from my insurance before I got there. Answered all questions I had and put me at ease. They even have massaging chairs and tv s to watch while you re having your teeth cleaned. Made the appointment on a Monday and was able to get in by Tuesday. Will be back again!
Great atmosphere great sushi great prices and friendly staff. Ca not wait to go again!! Sushi conveyor belt with several options. If they do not have it on the sushi conveyor belt they will make it for you!!
Music World is one of the largest music stores and I believe THE largest piano retailer in the city. Their pianos are lovely they do not mind if you test them out which I do gladly and their staff is friendly and helpful. They offer in store or at home piano and vocal lessons and have a large selection of sheet music including a digital music on demand service. They ve been operating here since 1962 so they obviously know what they re doing. If you re a pianist or vocalist this place is awesome.
Big shout to Cory and his crew.... THANK YOU.... I have solor screens and they have not been cleaned since they were installed.. Which means either had the outside windows. Lets just say more than a few years ago.... As soon as i got out of my car today. I could see the difference. As i walked around the house I did not see one out of item screw or marking on the walls. A spectacular job.... who even knew a service existed... I must spread the word..
I am so grateful for home pride inspections I bought my home and they were there to inspect the property and give me a termite inspection in 1 day. Not only that as I was checking out I left my wallet in the hotel room so got stuck waiting on security and was 40 minutes late... the inspector began inspections outside and waiting for me... it was my last chance to get the inspections before heading to the airport to get my current home packed and ready to go make LV my new home... thank you thank you!
This is my go to place when I m downtown and craving for some late night dim sum. My most recent trip here was after a Raptors game rather than spending 10 on 2 chicken fingers at the ACC my friends and I came here right after the game and ordered the standard ha gow beef tripe curry squid congee etc. The quality of the food is decent definitely not as good as the nicer places uptown or Markham but good enough to leave you satisfied. The service here is very efficient and the food comes out fast.
I took my wife there for her birthday. The service was great and the food we ordered was delicious. We also loved the wide variety of wine selection. She absolutely loved it and we will be coming back for sure.
Worth every penny! The best hair removal treatments ! Still ca not believe the results ! Incredible! Highly recommend!
This place was awesome! Stopped in for breakfast while on vacation in Las Vegas. It was walking distance from our hotel which was even better. The service was great and our waitress was exceptional. I started off with the MTO juice which I highly recommend. It was refreshing and not too sweet definitely a good start to my day. I ordered the Yoga Pant omelet with avocado. It was perfect. Very filling but also light. My husband ordered the Kentucky breakfast which was fried chicken over a biscuit with gravy and hash browns. I snuck a taste and it was delicious! Lastly we shared the lemon poppyseed pancake. Omg! You just get this! I was worried that it would be super sweet but it was not . It was awesome. Two thumbs up!
Definitely coming to this place again. Fast clean and delicious what more can you ask for. Tofu scramble was top notch and coffee was really fresh and bold. Perfect breakfast or brunch spot.
This place though easily accessible because of its proximity to the Tempe Marketplace can be easy to miss because it s tucked within a commercial complex in an industrial area. Inside the setting is simple and very informal and lighting is at a comfortably low relaxing level. Service is efficient and friendly and of course the pizza is quite good. A big plus for me is that people with gluten restrictions can opt for a gluten free crust which means I can come here with a group and enjoy pizza like everyone else. I guess the only grouse I have about the place is that parking can be tricky during peak hours.
Came to this place this past Saturday 4 18 09 for some takeout at the suggestion of the boyfriend. We had the spicy eggplant with fried tofu shrimp pad thai chicken satay and 2 orders of sticky rice. I left to run an arrand and came back 15 minutes later with the food just coming out of the kitchen steaming hot. First impressions of the restaurant inside is beautiful very calm with faint traditional music playing and quality furnishing and decor. I d definitely come back for a nice relaxing meal out. As for the food delicious! The pad thai was plentiful with a good amount of shrimp and it was not greasy like it can be at other Thai joints. The chicken satay was very tender flavorful and came with a coconut milk peanut sauce and the requisite pickled cucumber and onions which were good too. Spicy eggplant was tasty and it was not overcooked. Even the servings of sticky rice were good and it was not overcooked. All in all it was good food prepared well and quickly. Only gripe was that the serving of chicken satay was a tad smaller than other restaurants and they only gave one box of plain rice to accompany the meal most places issue one box per dish even if you do order sticky rice we had 2 3 dishes technically . Still a delicious meal that was definitely enjoyed.
Went here for a business lunch on friday. Was exceptional and very value priced for my experience. Considering it was the lunch rush it was busy but the waitress still gave us time and assistance. Short review but I ll just say I will be returning.
Over the top fantastic. Had the pleasure of hosting family and friends recently. Each person said their meal was a 10! Servers where excellent. Food was perfecto. We will return to hopefully repeat our experience. Been going to the other household name steakhouses for years. Red could move into the top slot in my decision process.
One word Amazing! I called in the morning after realizing my windshield had a huge crack the day before. They immediately checked the stock and confirmed availability and called my insurance and worked out all the details and I got an appointment set the same day between 12 and 4 PM. The guy who came also was fast and efficient and finished the whole work in an hour. They even gave me an extra rebate which I did not ask or expect what can i say they were simply amazing! Overall highly satisfied with the whole experience! Will definitely recommend.
Superb customer service is the biggest thing to be said about the awesome people at team Valiente. We started as a couple of young adults with very little to no knowledge of the home buying process. Jackies team took the time to educate us in every step of the way. From the day we met to the day she gave me the keys to our first home. If you re in the market to buy or sell these are the people you want to be in contact with. Jackies awesome team will take the time and work around your schedule to show you homes that not only fit your budget but your needs as a family. I m so grateful to the guys and girls at team Valiente for showing us homes on the weekend accommodating our hectic schedule to show us homes and working tirelessly to make sure we ended up in a great place we now call home. Edgar and Krizzia.
Good value for the money. We have had the same server the last 2 times. Taylor. She is very good and very polite and nice. She talks to the kids and checks in on us plenty. We go for Harrisburg Elementary Spirit Night. The food was great. Had the Cobb Salad tonight. Good portion.
a WONDERFUL BRUNCH DOWNTOWN!!! I love the staff here! The food is wonder. Courtney behind the bar and Marlon in the kitchen! I love this place! Thank you for a great time!
Love having this theater so close by!!!! Only downfall is it s best to buy seats online or go get them in advance for later showing as seating is limited if you wait for last minute assigned seating . The recliners are super comfy and nice.
This is my go to shawarma place. It s delicious. The chicken is juicy and full flavored. I have never left here disappointed. Come eat. You wo not regret it. I drool as they make it.
Best dog hands down in AZ popping deliciousness in to every bite! The dog literally snaps with the same freshness the hand cut fries have. Highly recommend the Detroit Coney combo with some fries either spiral or regular cut even recommend the red hot fries Service was as authentic as the food which is bonus points with how funny the owner is and we were served with Detroit written in mustard on our coney! Word to the wise to those who wisely chose to eat here you never ask for ketchup on a coney!
This place is great during normal business hours. Open 24 hours walked in waited 15 minutes did not get even a hello even tho guy looked straight at me. Walked out sat in my car another guy walks in with a Togo order and he helps him immediately. Love the new chia banana smoothie.
We started with the fried pickles...delicious!!! Highly recommend them. We ended with the brownie ala mode. Again highly recommend. Oh and the food in between was good as well.
Gotta love this pizza. Great crust good flavors. Been here a few times and it stays consistent.
From a Long Island guy who ate pizza almost everyday this is my fav spot for Las Vegas! Plain Pie and Garlic knots! Always good and always consistent!
I shop here at least once a month. Lots of great values in housewares food simple electronics toiletries pet supplies and even furniture. They even have some pretty good international gourmet food. Sometimes items come and go so the lack of consistency is the only minor complaint I have.
I ve been using these guys for about 15 years they have always helped me out in anything I need replaced or repaired. I own an automotive shop and a lot of times manufacturers either do not have replacement parts in stock or they are discontinued. House of hose can literally take the original part and remake anything from brake lines to AC lines from scratch. Honest and upfront and super reasonable prices!
My favorite show in Vegas. Do not try to understand the story just enjoy the visuals. Mesmerizing. I ca not say enough how much my family and I enjoyed the show. Worth EVERY penny.
I have been a frequent guest to Chicago for a few years now and never seem to have even one complaint when popping in. The beer selection is great food is always on point and the customer service is always top notch. I found one of my now favorite Hefeweizens here through Mia. She recommended the Bavarian wheat Weizenheimer and I ve been hooked ever since. I ve returned numerous times specifically because of the experience Mia is responsible for. Always so polite attentive and informative.. Definitely a great place to stop in if you re in the area.
Love it! Got delivery from this place and it has since become my favorite indian takeout in mississauga. We got chicken tikka masala chicken vindaloo a potatos peas dish forgot the name . The tikka masala was okay it wasnt as flavorful as i am used to put the portion was huge. The chicken vindaloo was incresible it had a real kick to it and was extremely tasty and again the portion is so big it was overflowing the container. The potato dish was also a real treat the potatos were stewed vert soft and the sauce is savory and a bit sweet. We also got garlic naan on the side but they did lack the garlicy taste so thats a pass for me meh. Overall the food was very very delicous the price is reasonable ans the portions are just ridiculously large compared to pretty much any indian resturant. If you order a meal here you are guaranteed leftovers. 100 would come again!
It does not look like much from the street it is in a strip mall across from Eton but once you step into the dining room it feels boutiquey. The walls are covered by colorful original interesting paintings. The dining room is sunny and airy. The orange juice is freshly squeezed and just like I remember from Greece. I indulged in the meat lovers. I asked my dining partner not to judge me. They make gluten free pancakes if you ask.
I absolutely love this place! It s brand new and just opened last week. Everyone was really friendly and the crepes are a Japanese style. They use gelato instead of ice cream so it was really light. The place is also really clean and small i would really recommend this place
I love their chow fun its my favorite dish. I have tried many dishes here and always satisfied. The passionfruit boba is highly recommended.
I ago here more often than not for authentic Mexican food. It is very filling as the portions are humongous! Make sure you are hungry.
Who does not love authentic BBQ? I have never left this place as anything less than satisfied. The sauce has gotten it s praises sung by many many people before so I m not going to cover that because they are all correct. The real stars in my eyes or should that be stomach are the brisket and the fried chicken. Neither of which in my opinion require a drop of sauce. There s just something about that fried chicken that makes my mouth water even while writing this review. Moist and juicy but with a nice crunchy breading. When it first showed up on the menu Al Bubba Baker himself explained to me that it is in fact his momma s own recipe. He added that it was one of the reasons he got so big. Sold. Let me just put it this way. The first bite I took I had all of these wonderful flavors swimming around my mouth and dripping down my chin. The beef brisket was tender juicy and had a wonderful smokey flavor that did not over power the meat taste. It was also perfectly complimented by the collard greens I had ordered as my side. And then there s the corn bread. WOW! You can tell that this corn bread has been perfected through years and years of practice. Not dry great flavor and just enough corn kernels mixed in. You can tell it s all made from scratch. If you re going for your first time I suggest you order The Lineman which is a HUGE sampler platter with ribs pulled pork beef brisket and a few sides. There s enough food for 3 or 4 people to eat and it s a great primer to the flavors offered at Bubba Q s. All in all it s the type of BBQ that you wish you could make yourself at home.
Je manque peut tre un peu d objectivit en faisant un review sur le restaurant Frida. J ai eu le bonheur de ctoyer des mexicains dans ma vie qui m ont fait dcouvrir la culture et la nourriture mexicaine. Mon caf de olla est dlicieux ma sopa de tortillas aussi. J ai dgust 2 tacos de cochinita mon prfr... tout a au son de musique salsa mexicaine traditionnelle. Je suis venu vivre une exprience et a m a plu. Les tarifs sont absolument plus que raisonnable. Je vais revenir!
The food was delicious and fresh and the staff were very friendly. Price is comparable to chipotle but they have fish here which is my go to at Rubio s even though it costs a little more than Chipotle. LOVE the mahi mahi bowl and well worth 8.50
My Vegas have to . For whatever reason going back I do not know how many years my friends and I decided this was the place where we have to come to in Vegas whenever we are here. I think it was the attraction of the 7.77 steak and shrimp that brought us here and kept bringing us back. When we turned 21 this was the place to come and people watch from morning until the wee hours of the night. The food is actually good. Had the usual steak shrimp combo and was not disappointed. Steak was a little overcooked but not overdone. We also had the chicken nachos which I think are fantastic. 90 of the time we walk out and say how we are not going to order the nachos and what happens...we order them again. But it s worth it. Not to pricey even by Hard Rock standards and you can get a seat by the walking area and people watch as you down your lunch.
This review is for 4.5 stars. We went for lunch 11a 3p recently last last saturday crowded many people were using a promotional mailed coupon and I was pretty impressed I do NOT use this word a lot with many area casino buffets mind you with the overall quality of the seafood not dry rubbery or bad tasting and the asian food I avoid these dishes at most buffets because they usually fail as well as having a large variety of offerings salads green ceasar fruit and pasta mexican make your own tacos enchiladas and bbq ribs fried chicken etc. there were more ethnic choices i just did not get everything I m a little picky at buffets. I usually find the quality at most casino buffets as average or nothing special there are a handful that I would go back to rio seafood sam s town the M resort bally s . But this one really stood out I d even come here without a coupon 12.99 for lunch get the Palms club card . Especially since we went to The Orleans recently a very sharp contrast. Let me tell you which casino buffets I ve visited over the years of my residency here in Las Vegas Rio s Carnival and Rio s Seafood The Orleans Sunset Station Boulder Station Palace Station Texas Station the M Resort Terrible s Fremont Main Street Station Imperial Palace Sahara Circus Circus Bellagio Fiesta Henderson Treasure Island Sam s Town Bally s Tropicana Harrah s Stratosphere and the Stardust. I may be missing some other ones in this list. But I just wanted to show you how many I ve been to in town. Yes that is a lot. I m not saying I am expert or anything I just wanted to let you know that I do have a lot of comparison background. This said there were several standouts here for me the beer battered cod perfectly browned white fish not greasy either tri tip freshly carved juicy not fatty and just a little pink usually there is a big layer of fat at other buffets seafood paella not over salty with a good amount of seafood and the steamed clams which were not overdone while my husband really enjoyed the mac and cheese had just been prepared and was uber cheesy the fried rice and the cod. There were many asian dishes and I sampled the shrimp pancit signature Filipino noodle dish which was pretty good considering I hardly ever touch asian dishes at casino buffets I am really really picky about having Filipino food because my family cooked it really well and was not very greasy. There was a Mongolian station you select your raw goodies and the chef prepares it in front of you and a dessert station mini iced cupcakes red velvet chocolate and shot glasses samples because they are only filled halfway of tiramisu mmm! along with creme brulee and an ice cream station at the very end to the right . So we were full but not over the top but we always do some walking after a meal. The atmosphere ambiance is surprisingly elegant for a casino buffet rich browns and silver metal. Not many casinos work on the decor aspect of seating. I also appreciate the fact that the dining area is somewhat private in that people walking through the lobby ca not fishbowl into you stuffing your face unless they peer over the wall . Food areas are pretty clean and maintained pretty well. Plates are easy to find middle front of the floor. The staff is attentive. The beverage server was nice and did stop by a few times. The only thing I did not like was there was so much ice in my iced tea. I scooped out the excess and placed them in the dirty bowls or plates. Someone came by often to get the dirty plates. Because it was crowded it was pretty loud. And our baby slept through it all! My strategy with buffets in general is I take a small sampling of unknowns 1st time tries this way I do not waste much food so then if I really like something I return for more. I also limit my plates to a couple. If I still have some room in my belly I take a small selection of desserts. I learned a long time ago if I eat too much I get bloated and feel icky. This is a Yummy thumbs up. I m pretty picky with casino buffets. I was impressed. with this one. We do plan on coming back and soon too.
This is a really cool scene for Las Vegas locals. The ambiance is cool and there s always a lot of people. Mixed crowd. Drinks run about 12 14 each but half price during Happy Hour 4pm to 8pm daily. At 6 each it s a great deal because they fill up your martini glass and then give you the shaker so it s like two drinks for one. The martini menu is expansive. I ve tried a lot of the drinks and they re all good. The only only I ever did not like was the chocolate bar one. It tasted like straight vodka. But the caramel swirl yummy! The place is huge and has I think three different bar areas. There s music inside. I highly suggest checking it out.
Came for lunch on a Friday. The service was amazing had two servers and both were incredible assertive and friendly. Ordered the special which started white bean soup with kale DELICIOUS. Our main was fettuccine with mushrooms rippini and beef. Very fairly priced and delicious. I do not have any complaints about this restaurant. It was very clean and had a beautiful atmosphere. I would come back anytime !
I have to say that I had the best gel mani pedi today from Kim. This is a first class nail spa. It s clean modern and you get to pick from a number of different scented lotions. The sugar scrub was sensational. Too bad I m from out of town otherwise I d be here regularly!
Want cheap pizza fast .. Pepperoni hot and ready never disappoints .. Never a wait.. You run in they hand you a hot pizza .. It s 5.00 well spent. They also stock cold Pepsi products .. you get what you pay for..
I love this place. Free tasting free tour at 2pm and outstanding raspberry dessert wine. Even my mom was impressed and she s the cheapest date you ll ever find. Note to tourists like myself this is strictly a store and not where the vineyard is. The actual vineyard would be on your way towards the USA Canada border. Yes I fooled myself. Also keep in mind each person is only allowed a certain amount for the tasting. Unlike the US the winery is actually responsible for the welfare of the individual even after the patron has left the store. Be prepared for a strict adherence to the tasting limit.
This hotel is all about luxury. Like the other hotel and residence in Toronto it smells like posh and luxury the moment you step into this hotel. There is a bar on the main floor next to the lobby and a rooftop patio. For the bar there s no cover and you can opt to sit down in the comfy chairs or stay by the bar where most people are and jive to the music next to the DJ. The rooftop patio is reservation only. So you better make a reservation if you want to see what it s all about up there. There s someone at the elevators who checks so you ca not just sneak up there. Better yet no cover!! Is not that a bonus? The bathrooms are even nice too. Each bathroom is housed one cleaner on standby to make sure all the bathrooms are clean and crisp for the guests. Ca not complain. Overall love the layout of the hotel and the bars. I managed to only lounge in the hotel lobby but for next time I ll check out the patio too. Oh. One last thing expect cocktails to be around 15 20 each!!
I live in LA and am SO EXCITED that Carlos has opened a new location that I can stop off in on my way to visit family in Phoenix. Their food is one of the things I look forward to most when I get back to Arizona even if it s only a few times a year I ca not visit without getting a 13 combination to go.
Beer and donuts what a great pairing! I stopped here in December on a freezing cold Wednesday during their encore hours. They offer coffees and hot cocoa to warm you up which you can also make a little boozy. As well as a selection of on draft beers. I opted for the hot cocoa with a little boozy peppermint. It was rich and chocolaty like a homemade cocoa should be. The addition of the peppermint was a great balance of flavor. And donuts even though I came during encore hours they had a great selection of donuts. I opted for the Maple Bacon and it was amazing. A beautiful large yeasty donut not too light just a little heavy. It was topped with a maple frosting and bacon. The maple frosting also had a bit of cinnamon which was a nice bit of balance. And the bacon was just right little bits sprinkled on top and not over powering. I d definitely like to visit again on a warmer trip to Cleveland and pair one of their donuts with a beer!
We go here often after playing at the park. Really good food! Sometimes the service is a tad slow especially when it s busy never seems to be staffed enough. But they are very accommodating to the kids. Love the ambiance of sitting outside on a nice day!
This place is so fun! I probably spent 3 hours at the Fotobar shopping and taking pictures against the green screen and two huge Polaroids. The Fotobar is a perfect place to get gifts for sentimental recipients. The prints are ready within 15 minutes and there are cute frames to surround the pics. Glad there are stored in Cali!
I was craving some Chinese food and did not want to go to Chinatown or the usual spots. My sis recommended this place for some quality Chinese food that was not exactly a Food Express It s a decent sit down restaurant that serves some pretty good Chinese food. My sis and I ordered garlic stir fried veges beef stew and moo shu pork. I felt this authentic Cantonese flavor with all the dishes. Of them all though I say I would recommend the moo shu pork. Not sure if that s really Chinese food but it was pretty good with all of the mixture of fungus eggs and bamboo shoots. It comes with complimentary soup and dessert as well. I ca not complain with that. I must say though that the food was extremely salty. I did not notice it at the time of eating but afterwards I was searching for water and lip balm to revive my lips from the searing salt. Service was decent. They came by and were very proficient in English. A bit farther away than other restaurants but I say it s worth the extra 5 10 minute drive.
HUGE beer selection. Everything cooked with beer. Nice variety of high end bar food. Infusion of ethnic flavors Caribbean and Indian especially. Laid back I enjoyed it.
We love. There is a reason that Pamela s is a Pittsburgh institution Items we love. 1. California French Toast 2. Short Stack their crepe like pancakes help make them famous you must try some!!! 3. Lyonnaise Potatoes 4. Morning After Breakfast Special 5. Buffalo Chicken Wrap lunch N A on Sundays 6. Waffles Other things we love. 1. Cassy Adam and the whole staff in Squirrel Hill super friendly staff! 2. The front room and the outdoor area 3. The food comes out FAST even when they re busy Things we could do without. 1. CASH ONLY 2. Long waits expect one weekends from 9 30 12ish 3. There s butter everywhere you can them to hold it from pancakes waffles...
Stop in at the Chevron and Sami s is right there. Sami makes the best subs in the Valley ! I love the hot pastrami with double meat jalapeos olive oil and tomatoes. He has several toppings to choose from. He also has fresh bread made daily. I like my sub on Parmesan or jalapeo bread. Cash only. There is an ATM in the gas station.
Amazing bar. One of the best patios in Toronto. They have Ceasar brunch special on Sundays when you can fix your own perfect Ceasar for 5. Beer is nice food is good too.
Here on vacay and celebrating bdays..wanting some real good authentic Mexican food and found this place on ...yes yelp!! Got to say ..was the best food customer service is fantastic!! Love that Paco the chef came to pur table..his dessert is delicious!!! We def will be back!! Thank you!! Marco was our server and is awesome and cute!!
Brought our 2002 Dodge Diesel there for a huge gasket leak. They took their time to make sure it was fixed right! Highly recommend this place!!
Excellent service! I am so happy I supported these kind and generous business owners today. They went above and beyond during my pedicure and manicure today. A chair massage was such a nice bonus. I highly recommend Shona Nails and Spa!
Diamond Nails amazing! The owners are always there working hard and do a great job of running the place smoothly. The staff is very professional kind etc and the best part for me and my hubby is that we feel comfortable! We ve been to many many salons and the way the staff dynamic atmosphere just made us uncomfortable in many ways... But not here! We just moved from Florida and have been looking for a nail salon to regularly go to and we are very happy to have found our spot! My girly is Christy! She s a great girl with a bubbly edgy personality and does great work. She s a lot of fun and I ll be going to her every time. Thanks Christy!
Great Hotel with GREAT staff! Cyn was a pleasure and greeted me by name every time I came into the lobby. Would return if I am in Charlotte again.
Had a great time! Super fun activity off the Strip for a group. We finished the Sherlock room just before the deadline and it was a true team effort! Everybody contributed toward figuring out the code and there are fun surprises throughout.
I just got my haircut today by Dina at the lakes location and I just have to say what an amazing job she did I absolutely love it!!!!!!!! I will definitely be back next time I need a haircut. I recommend everyone to come in and ask for Dina you wint be disappointed.
Chocolate is the name eating it is the game. Love this place the supervisor even checked on us and the food was marvelous! Me and my other counter part enjoyed the brunch breakfast and we really enjoyed it. Everything is a chocolate theme. The coco is lovely and just a classic type of chocolate. The candy shop tied to the restaurant is just as awesome with the pecan encrusted nuts treats. We even bought some to fly home with us because we could not get enough. Great food great treats and snacks a spot I would not pass up on your visit.
This is one of the better Korean restaurants in greater Phoenix area. I m from LA so it does not reach par but not bad at all! Sometimes the service is slow but overall the food is pretty good!! Their traditional Bulgogi the one that comes with soup in it and glass noodles is my go to! Their army soup and bossam are also in point!
Which Rachel s shall i choose? Henderson welcomes a 2nd location of a wonderful restaurant. Located off of Warm Springs it s attached to the Hilton Garden Inn. Strange? Yes. But as I was sitting inside I wished more hotels I stayed at had a Rachel s connected. Lucky guests! The dining area is much much larger than the other locations of Rachel s. Many tables booths and patio seating. If you re staying at the hotel they will also bring your food to the pool area. Nice! Friendly service and very accommodating. I ordered the turkey club. The overly stuffed and stacked sandwich is delicious! Triple layers of turkey bacon swiss avocado lettuce tomato and mayo. Yikes! I really had to compress it to take a bite. But it s worth the hard work keeping the fresh ingredients together. It also helps when you have tasty sweet potato fries on the side. A great meal all around. For locals and visiting hotel guests Rachel s definitely has a great kitchen!
Just love the outstanding service and value given to me for my jewelry by Justin. He s professional knowledgeable and very courteous. After meeting with his dad Larry I felt like part of the family! This is a down to earth non intimidating trust worthy type of business that is missing in our world today. If you re looking for a company you can trust to give you the best value for your jewelry you do not need to look any further than Cash for Gold . I went to the Tempe location Geri
Went here last night with some friends and it really hit the spot! I love that there s no line up and that the seating is spacious unlike most of the ramen hotspots in Toronto . The Good We were in the middle of ordering when a little something caught me eye...a STUDENT SPECIAL! Could it be? With a little gasp nochill I asked the server and she was kind enough to tell us that we qualified for it as long as we showed her our student cards. The deal was a bowl of ramen and a glass of pop a glass! a glass! it was adorable everything tastes better from a class for 10.95. Totally worth it? I think so. The ramen was pretty affordable and I love how you can customize it with the kind of meat cut noodle thickness and broth that you d like chicken or pork with pork costing a few cents extra. It also arrived in good time. The Bad I ordered the ramen with spicy chilli oil and pork broth but was disappointed at how not very spicy it was. Was the ramen still delicious? Absolutely but after the first few bites it begins to taste a little lackluster. I could not help but compare it to Sansotei s Spicy Tan Tan which I think is much more flavourful and which has more depth than Touhenboku s does. However my dear friend Lisa ordered the ramen with garlic and that was bursting with flavour! The Ugly Although this was not a deal breaker I asked if I could substitute my pork belly with corn because I do not eat pork belly and I knew it would go to waste if I did not eat it. The server said no I could not and that it would be an extra charge. This did not make much sense to me because from a cost perspective corn is a lot cheaper than pork belly and technically I was not asking for something more expensive? I do not think it would have been too troublesome to make that simple swap but it was and I ended up just giving the pork belly in my ramen to a friend who enjoyed it more than I did. Just a heads up that they re not very flexible with substitutions here but I do it at other ramen places like Sansotei all the time no problem! Bottom line Go here for a reliable ramen fix that s affordable and with great service. Although it s not the best in the city it s still pretty great. I ll definitely be Touhen..BACKu!
My favorite spot!! The bruschetta boards are incredible. I would eat here daily if I could.
Place is GOOD! Was recommended by a co worker to go here and it was a good suggestion. The tacos are really inexpensive and they load it up with meat! Which is really tasty and melts in your mouth. It gets busy here so do not chance it if you re in a time crunch because this place is not huge so you have to give them time to prepare your food.
Best bartenders in town and amazing food! I could not ask for more. They take care of every time and treat us like family.
The girls and I were in town for my bachelorette party so we needed some food before a big night out. We were seated rather quickly and ordered some wine to go with our tapas. We all shared them family style. Between 8 girls we had more than enough food. Here s some of what we ordered Pan de cristal con tomate fresco turned out a little soggier than I hoped Piquillos Julian de Tolosa Jamn ibrico Fermn this was one of the tastiest! Pulpo asada con crema cebolla absolutely heaven Puntillitas de Cdiz salteadas con pochas even the white beans were good Chorizo casero con pur de patatas al aceite de oliva the oil was a bit much on this but tasty Dtiles con tocino como hace todo el mundo seriously yummy And those are just the ones I remember off the top of my head. I m pretty sure we went through so many dishes they all became a blur of ham and octopus I really like it and cheese. But I do believe we had a salad in there too. I just ca not recall which one. Overall I was impressed that service handled a busy Friday night with ease. The food came out quickly it was tasty and we did not have to wait to get in. All in all I d go again.
Excellent place for lunch. I have been lucky enough to have Cuban food before so I know what to expect. And to be honest I ve passed this place many times without giving it a second thought. Then the other day wifey and I went there for lunch. The place was mostly empty but it was an unusual hour. We grabbed a table and got started with some espresso and water. The espresso was very well done I do not like sugar in mine and this was strong and flavorful. We decided on what we were going to have. Wifey had a sampler platter and I got the Cuban sandwich. Both were really good. The pork was both tender and flavorful. My sandwich was very good and the bread was top notch. She had plantain chip with her sample platter which was really good. Overall this is a great place if you are craving something Cuban. Good job folks will I be back? You bet.
Rob from I Clean Carpets is great. We called on him to help clean our couches after one of our cats decided to use the sofa cushions as her litter box while were out of town. The only way to really clean the cushions was soak them in the tub with the super concentrated enzyme Rob uses. Unbeknownst to all of us ourselves and Rob our sofa cushions are made out of some heavy duty double layer foam which after soaking in the tub the cushions weighed about 75 pounds each. Poor Rob had his hands full and his muscles pushed to the limit with carrying these cushions out of the tub and to our back yard so they could dry. We scheduled a time for Rob to return to steam clean the rest of the couch and the cushions once they were dry but had to reschedule two additional times because the cushions were taking so long to dry and this was even with Rob s industrial blower fan trying to assist the process. Rob was always very good about keeping in touch. Sometimes I would hear back later than expected but it was because Rob spends individualized one on one time with each of his clients. Since he had to take such extra time as our cushions required more work than planned I knew he was not flaking on me ... he was simply busy also giving this same customer service and attention to others. In the end the cushions dried and we were able to have Rob back to steam clean the rest of the project. He even left us a squirt bottle filled with the enzyme he uses for tackling animal urine in case we had any future accidents. I m forever grateful to him for leaving us with some of that enzyme ... because the same thing happened again. Now that we know how to get the cushions soaked and cleaned we did the job ourselves. But in this second attempt this second job ran us out of the enzyme. When I called Rob to purchase some more he said to just leave our bottle at our front door and he would stop by to fill it up ... no charge no worries. Next morning there was our bottle filled up like he said. I honestly did not expect to get anything for free I was perfectly happy buying more of this enzyme magic. But Rob was happy to help out. We were very happy with the work that Rob does his time he takes with each client rather than just trying to rush through to the next job. You wo not be disappointed.
To say I m in love with this place is an understatement. I went for the first time last Wednesday. I went back Thursday and took my co workers today Monday . The soup and sandwich combo is my go to. You can get half a sandwich and a bowl of soup or a full sandwich and a cup of soup. Soups I ve had she crab crab and corn bisque special of the day and loaded potato. Sandwiches I ve had egg salad ladles grilled cheese cheese bacon and onions...yum! and Barron Von ladles ham and Swiss on a pretzel roll with a special mustard . My favorite by far Barron Von Ladles and she crab soup. Remember you can ask to sample any soup. The staff is very nice and the restaurant is clean. Enjoy!
I do not have enough wonderful things to say about Reflecting Walls Photography! I booked an appointment and was able to have them come out the very next day. Robert arrived ten minutes early and had already photographed the front of the home and the community features. He was incredibly pleasant and friendly and had the entire job done in under twenty minutes. On top of that I had all of the edited photos in my inbox in ONE HOUR. The photos were absolutely gorgeous and I will recommend Reflecting Walls Photography to everyone I know!
I had my first experience with Pita Pit in Valencia CA and I was so excited to see that we had one in Vegas. The staff at the Silverado Ranch shop are very friendly and the pitas are just so fresh and delicious! The set up is similar to Subway but the main difference is that you get a hot pita with so much more meat. In addition to Subway s selection of veggies they also have artichoke hearts corn a bigger selection of cheese and 2 different types of lettuce to choose from I love romaine and much much more. Great selection of sauces too. Yummy!
First time coming here and LOVED it! It is very clean and authentic. We were quickly served and our waitress was really nice. We started off with the fritters came variety of dipping sauces mango chutney sweet tamarind and two others that were also really good. Also had the garlic naan yum!!! For main course I had the medium spiced chicken vindaloo. The only downside is that you have to purchase rice separately thought the dish comes with automatically but other than that it was delicious! Definitely will be back.
Went out with the ladies on a Monday night. Bottle prices were fair 180 for a 40 oz of Beefeater . Staff were very friendly manager Amro put a lot of effort into ensuring that all groups were accommodated appropriately. Washrooms and club were kept very clean throughout the night I only wish the outdoor terrace was furnished.
Needed a quick reasonably priced place to eat on the strip and was not disappointed! Amazing sandwiches great soup and coffee for your hangover. It s in the front entrance of Planet Hollywood unlike where the map says. Definitely recommend as a hangover cure!
This place was amazing the food was so good! Sunday gravy was the best Italian dish I ve ever had and I m from Chicago we are known for the best food! I recommend coming here . Grazie
So many great things to say about this group. From the first meeting to handing over the keys to my new home their entire team supported me through the daunting process of buying a new home. John Gluch was awesome launching me into the market and my buyer agent Justin Benson was a super star in helping me find the perfect home. He went out of his way to make sure I saw the right number of homes I needed in order to make a sound judgement. I loved using their website to locate and flag favorite properties this was a handy way to alert Justin of properties I wanted to view. Finally their relationships in the industry were key in writing and securing the winning offer and I do not believe I would have been as successful with any other RE group. I would recommend anyone from this team especially if you have the opportunity to work with John and Justin..thank you so much! I love my new place...truly feels like home! Love you guys!
I like how the hotel imitates venice in a way where it appears to be the real thing like water escalators going through the building. The gondolas were amazing and the arrangement of the place had skies above us and fake Italian buildings. I want to stay here!!
Went here twice because we had living social deals. The first time I was not at all impressed. I got the pulled pork with hush puppies and onion rings. The pork had a good smoky taste but was pretty fatty. The hush puppies were overcooked but the onion rings were good. They give you corn bread but its very sweet and more like cake which my wife loved. The second time I went I got the pulled pork again and it had no noticeable fat. It had the same smoky flavor and was pretty moist. Much better this time. This time my sides were potato wedges and onion rings. The potato wedges were not done but the onion rings were good again. My wife got the slaw which was very good and complimented the pulled pork perfectly. She also got the hash brown casserole but the potatoes were not cooked fully either. All in all it was a decent meal but nothing to write home about. 8 15 After my first review management responded and ask that I give it another chance so I did yesterday. I must say both my wife and I really enjoyed our meals as we both cleaned our plates. All of our sides were better this time although we stayed away from the potato wedges.
Literally the best Thai food in Toronto. It is not easy to get a table here but the ambience is great the food is amazing and the servers here are great! Prices are a little higher than you would expect for Thai food but definately worth it.
Having been suggested Figo through a colleague I was impressed with its mix of an authentic Italian dish restaurant and laid back atmosphere. The menu was simple which makes it a great quick bite after work restaurant but was very satisfying as though you ate at a notable establishment. Service was great and everyone was open to serving you better in a easy going way. Had the gnocchi and palenta which were very delicious. Indulged in some desserts and was very impressed with the variety. The prices were a little on the high end so o would frequent this place for special occasions or with company you enjoy. Some good craft beers as well. Will definitely return to try the pizza.
Awesome customer service! The manager on duty an older gentlemen was super nice and friendly!! We came in a little late close to closing but he did not rush us or anything. We felt very welcomed! definitely coming back regularly!!
I try to make it out to Vegas a couple times a year and whenever I do my splurge meal is at N9NE. This time around we came for a bachelor party and had Robert serving us. Easy ordering help with the menu when my friends needed it I literally have dreams about eating here so I was set. My only disappointment was that the 3lb lobster thermidor had been taken off menu a sad fact mitigated by Robert offering to have the twin lobster tails cooked thermidor style instead. Seeing as everyone else was going with steaks I figured I d follow suit and got my 22 Oz ribeye rare warm red center and got it oscar style. First bite almost made me cry. This is how steak should be prepared. Pure perfection. The crab was excellent as well although this time around was a touch skimpy on the bernaise sauce. This was easily overlooked by the sheer quality of the rest of the meal. As always the lobster mashed potatoes are a MUST. Giant chunks of lobster amid fluffy buttery potatoes. Delicious. Friends around the room also loved the gnocchi and lobster Mac and cheese. I ve said it before and I ll say it again I ll eat at N9NE every time I come to Las Vegas. It s the best meal you ll have for a long long time.
This was my first trip to Vegas and the MGM Grand was everything I thought it would be. Unfortunately our room was right outside the garbage area but the staff worked hard to upgrade our room at no extra charge. We went during the week of the big fight they were hosting ca not for the life of me remember the names of the boxers but even with all of the chaos our stay was enjoyable. The pool was amazing and the restaurant was great. After touring the strip it s definitely not the grandest hotel out there but fit our needs and our budget. I did not win any big bucks at the MGM but it was a wonderful introduction to Vegas. I would definitely stay with them again.
Okay we went here a few weeks ago and some of the dishes we ordered were divine others not so much. With all the 5 stars reviews I expected more. I would actually give them 3 1 2 stars.... The ceviche tostada was heavenly and generously portioned with ceviche cascading onto the plate. I could have eaten 5 of them lol. They had a ceviche appetizer plate but it was almost 20 and I m kind of a cheapskate. I ordered the seafood molcajate and I guess I did not realize that it was nothing like the pollo carne shrimp version because mine was served like a seafood stew. It was decent but certainly not what I thought I was ordering. My hubs got a shrimp dish that was good but a little small in my opinion. Now the shrimp cocktail that everyone has raved about was a huge disappointed. There were plenty of shrimp but the cocktail was nothing more than tomato juice with no seasoning and no flavor. I emptied almost half the bottle of Tapatio into it just to give it some flavor. Oh well.... The salsa was amazing and the perfect amount of spice for me. I think most people would think it was too spicy.
Rhino s Maid was nothing short of spectacular! They were running a spring cleaning special for 189 which is exceptional considering this cleaning included windows baseboards and appliances! The maids arrives 20 minutes early which was wonderful considering I had nothing else planned for the day. They were nice extremely thorough and even finished early! My family and I were over the moon! The next day they called back to see if we were satisfied with their service. From start to finish Rhino s Maid was absolutely fantastic!
My favourite stop on the way back to Mesquite. Good to excellent service with a small and no mistakes on my order.
Decent guy. Did not damage my bags when putting them in the car. I appreciated that as the last guy to hold my bags broke my computer. Thanks!
Wow I d have to say this dining experience was such a roller coaster! I ll preface this review with the fact that we did not do the full tasting menu but went with simple 2 course along with the requisite courses of amuse bouche. When I walked in I was immediately impressed with a beautiful wine rack leading into an impressively tall dining space. As I sat down though the place did not feel like a comfortable space to eat. It could have been a great art gallery as the walls and center divider impose a very understated but imposing feel. The bread and dessert carts looked almost too industrial. I know they went for minimalist but wow... OK set that stuff aside and think about the food... Amuse Bouche... the first spear of toast with foie gras torchon was tasty... it lead on to a potato soup with a dollop of minced maguro a light choice. Everything pleasant nothing controversial. For starters we went for a lobster salad... it came beautifully presented in layers of lobster and delicately julienned greens and a crisp lobster cracker and more lobster... topped with a sauce of lobster reduction. MMMMMM... Great bread filled in the spaces. Then came our main which we went with roasted veal chop for two. First bite of the meat was just a touch disappointing. The meat was tender the chop perfectly pink... it just did not have anything remarkable to it. The veal reduction sauce was very classic but again not remarkable. At that point we were running the numbers on our bill and asking if the 4 signs were worth it? Well then the potato puree that accompanied the dish brought the impression roaring back to a strong rating. Black truffle infused potato pure garnished with a thin slice of truffle on top and rich truffle foam... I had 2 plates and they just kept offering us more... What a delight! For dessert I chose the apple... a confluence of apple flavors and textures... very... apple y. and interesting from a taste standpoint. But the coconut dessert amuse bouche stole the show for me. WOW. Then the finale... dessert cart. the industrial minimalist cart... bearing bite after bite of dessert wonderfulness... Chocolate mousse was rich and satisfying. brown butter tart memorable many of the other mini desserts.. just were all deserving of praise. Last comment is on service. Our waitress was very personable and thoughtful.
Had a crew come in and landscape my back yard and reseed my front yard and clean up flower beds. They were quick efficient and professional. Will call them back for any future landscaping deals I have recommended them to others and we were all happy with the work. Thanks guys!
Absolutely great service the best pool cleaning company I ve used since moving to Vegas. Brad and Robert are professional honest and quick to answer any questions and my pool has never looked better. Ca not recommend Poseidon enough I am very pleased.
Just got done with the birthday party for my two nieces there were about 30 of us there later was completely amazing I forget his name but he was a very young clean cut African American male who was amazing he took care of the entire parties needs and we had an amazing time would highly recommend this place
So I ve been meaning to try Snakes and Lattes for a while now. I finally did with a friend of mine it was her first time a board game cafe too. We played Rhino Hero it was amazing! and that took us 2 hours at least which by the time we had to leave because the cafe was closing. Amazing experience and super friendly staff would recommend again to anyone!
We brought my summer teen campers here this last week. They loved it so much they kept asking if we can go back again next year. The staff was so friendly and very engaging with the kids. They we very patient and kept them going with so many different activities. I felt bad we had to rush out because of the bus needing to be back in time but I want to thank them so much for everything they did for my summer camp.
The pizza is awesome and the staff was friendly. Got a hand tossed Hot Margherita Pepperoni and boy oh boy it the crust is awesome tomatoes juicy and fresh basil flavorful and when I reheated left overs in the oven on a cast iron skillet I swear it was just good if not better than fresh! It could be mistaken for New York Styled but in actuality it is Tremont Crust!
More like a 4.5. Great place to eat if you re in the area. Not too great though if you re with a large group. I came here on a Saturday afternoon with my family after a trip to the aquarium and was seated immediately . Service was fantastic and fast. Our waitress poured our tea consistently throughout our lunch meal and took time to explain each dish we ordered to us. I had the unagi don which was absolutely fantastic and had plenty of eel. The rolls we ordered were very large and filling. The love boat I believe it was called was amazingly presented and had a large variety of sashimi and nigiri. Nothing was outrageously priced either. No complaints from me. Definitely would come here again if I were in area.
This place was a great find just north of the Fremont Street Experience. The pizza is well crafted with fresh products and and is sure to please. Our server was attentive and knew the the ins and outs of all the menu items. Great beer selection with a great vibe. Try it you will like it.
I love this place. I go there for brunch on Sunday s. It s a little quirky being in a food court but the food is great and they are very quick and friendly. Lots of healthy vegetarian options as well as meat for those who want it.
Walked past this beautiful place line out the door well worth the wait. Kay was our server and she was an absolute gem. We ordered the Ruby Tuesday and Pink Lemonade for drinks sweet but delicious . And food Mac n cheese Quinoa and green apple and Beet and goat cheese salad. Everything was amazing and 5.95. The coolest concept and the dopest place around to hang out listen to great music and extremely beautiful kind staff.
Nice staff Polar pop deal ca not be beat!
Still have not found a Vietnamese restaurant that serves pho with good broth in Vegas but when I do crave pho I usually get it from here. Service was ok. Food is good.
Refreshing shaved ice! Tropic creme is an essential addition to any shave ice. Birthday cake flavor as well as the cherry and Jamaican punch flavors are tasty. Do not forget a punch card! After 10 purchases you get a free drink shave ice. Also happy hour is 2 5pm and sodas are half off. Excellent treat for hot Arizona weather.
Good selection really knowledgable people. My wife has to travel with a fair amount of supplements due to health issues and the lady here said she can order them ahead of time and we can pick up! No more carrying them from the states how cool is that. And prices are reasonable. This is a great shop to have in Montreal...
My review is a one star which is my opinion. Here are the facts about my business with them. 1. Came out timely to do estimate 2. Quote comparable to other companies. 3. Signed contract with items of importance bolded. 4. Was called to schedule repair was told only 2 jobs that day and mine was first. However could not give an exact time. 5. Workers showed up at 11am we ran out quick at 10 30 and we were on our way home they left a message because the dog ran out in the yard they left. We immediately called back less than 2 minutes later and said we would be there in 5 minutes and the refused to return. 6. rescheduled ....for Wednesday...4 days later. One day before they called and said it would be the Wednesday of the following week. I told Almeida that I was desperate to get it repaired as it had multiple severe leaks and we had those big storms coming in early June . They could not help although they left on Saturday. They were suppose to be there by 7 am you d think they would find a way to squeeze me in . Anyway a family friend repaired the roof the next day. 7. Almeida requested the 35 cancel fee which was not bolded in the 2 page contract. 35 was to be charged for materials. I asked once the fee was paid could I have the materials they said no. They did lower it to 25 of the contract. 250.
I had just had a mini cone from Eva s and decided to check Squish out. The associates were very helpful and explained what Squish Candy was all about. I tried a couple of free samples. The Prosecco sample was very good. Squish Candy is basically gourmet gummies a couple of steps above gummy bears. They come in a wide variety of flavours under the following categories of calm cocktail decadent fruity intense . Whats really good is that they sell vegan gummies so for those vegans looking for a snack this is a place to add to your list . The gummies are nice. I purchased a small bag just to try it out . So far so good. I will be back to try the flavours that I cannot get elsewhere and avoid the generic flavours that the public usually drift toward .
Dr. A has been our Vet for the past 15 years for our family of 3 4 dogs. He s been with us when they were puppies healthy and happy... and he s answered our calls for those heart wrenching moments when there is nothing else that can be done for an elderly dog. He s warm engaging and genuinely loves animals. His front desk and staff are equally as wonderful and caring as Dr. A ... I highly recommend Sahara Animal Clinic!
Very good buffet. Just about everything I tried I liked a lot!! Love the BBQ Italian Chinese and dessert stations. Pulled pork chili and creme brle are my favorites.
I previously called another local company but they had bad reviews. After reviewing Master Lock and Security reviews I decided to cancel the other company and go with this one!! They were honest came within an hour and a half after calling and made my house secure!!!! I m VERY happy with their service!
I met Kelly Garcia Sunday at the Craftsman Court farmer s market in Old Town She is my cupcake hero. I figured I would wait for some sort of occasion to get myself to another bakery for cupcake testing but Sunday morning the cupcake came to me! I used to make fun of Argentinean hotels that offered breakfast cupcakes and then here I was at 10AM buying a chocolate cupcake with vanilla buttercream frosting and tiny lavendar sugar pearls. The cupcake You can tell immediately when someone loves their work and while I did not speak to Kelly for any length of time she told me everything I needed to know as soon as I bit into the cupcake. This woman knows cupcakes. My cupcake was light as air it was that magic blend of moist cake fluffed with air not to sweet but distinctly chocolate y oh it was soooo good. Even the buttercream was light it was silky too like maybe it had been made with confectioners sugar because it was so smooth. The frosting was on the high end of the sweet spectrum for me but the textures mixing around in that cupcake made it spectacular. A single cupcake ran me 3 and I did not ask about pricing on dozens but she did tell me that she offers free delivery in Scottsdale. I just now went to her website where she says she will make you any and every kind of cupcake you could want. Vanilla cupcake with lemon curd filling and lemon buttercream? yes please. Chocolate with peppermint buttercream? oh mama. I also noticed a sign on her stand that said she could make gluten free and I bet she could keep me in vegan cupcakes too. oh lord this is very very bad...
The food was great! This was our first time here on our yearly trips. It wo not be our last. We were there for breakfast and for some reason the line moved extremely slow. We were there at 9am. However after we ordered the food came out in a timely fashion. Loved the blueberry scones.
The best place in Vegas for sandwiches next to Capriotti s. It s especially great after a long night of partying. I use to work at PH and did not discover Earl until now. It s a shame.
Great new nail salon right by my house. Ken is an owner that cares about his clients. Dao gave me the best pedicure. Amy is also may this location. Love her! The salon is Beautiful!
I have been taking my cars to Medina Automotive for almost 1 years now I definitely recommend this shop the people that works there are very nice and friendly. I have never had any issues taking my cars and Ernesto is really good at what he does... Im happy that i found a great Mechanic shop so whenever one of my cars breaks down I ll go to Medina Automotive....Thank you Ernesto here s 5 start
Holdengrace is an absolutely gorgeous addition to the High Park neighbourhood! I was lucky enough to score a last minute appointment on Christmas Eve to get my holiday nails done and they turned out beautifully. Everything about this salon is impeccable from the service to the attention to detail to making you feel at home by offering you a drink. I highly recommend this salon if you want a great experience! I ll definitely be returning!
Yeah. This was pretty much AWESOME. 1. Do take out and eat outside in the park. 2. Get the meat medium. It has a little bit of fat on it still but it s flavor is UNBEATABLE.
This is a great moving company! They are not the cheapest moving company out there but they are very efficient and good hard workers. You wo not have to worry about them wasting your time or money. I will definitely recommend them to all my friends!
Great new boba joint! Friendly service and good selection of drinks. I got the Jasmine Milk tea and it was just the right amount of sweet. Highly recommend!
dont let the small and modest front. Delicious Gyros one of my favorites places very autentic. ok the fry s option is not. But we have one with fries and other w o. we like them both. I may have it with fry s again next time. great seasoning. fresh veggies.Very friendly and customer service drived staff. will keep coming back.
So we have started coming to the Hub in a regular basis. The service is awesome the food is fantastic and the beer is always cold! We showed up late on a Saturday night and they had no tables available. After waiting for an hour or so on the patio the fabulous manager went into the store room got an empty keg and made our own table! Where else can you go and the staff goes to that much trouble to make you happy? The menu is always evolving and I have never had anything less than spectacular. I recommend this place to everyone!
Great staff great food. Nice little vegan gem away from the strip. Will definitely come back on our next vegas trip!
Oh LORDY. First things first I come from San Diego king capital of delicious Mexican food so I am super ultra picky and self proclaimed snob about legit Mexican and all the other Mexican t food. The first time I came here the carne asada taco transported me back to El Patron or Lolita s in San Diego and I KNEW I had found my favorite place to get my Mexican food fix. Tacos are crazy cheap carne asada taco is 1.85 and they have a really hefty selection of things from Lengua to DIE for so freaking tender all kinds of pork beef cheek and my go to the TACO HAZZ. Let me describe to you the Taco Hazz It is steak melted cheese and green chiles compiled together for the sole purpose of bringing you to heaven. Only for 2.10. WHAT. I ate 3 of those in 15 minutes and left feeling like I could die happy. Let s also talk about the sides bar they have a variety of sauces veggies limes and even whole char grilled green chile peppers. Their hottest red sauce is legit hot which is a rare find in my opinion for a taco place. All the other taco places I ve been in in Arizona had sauces that do not really have a spicy kick to them. The star of the show though is this incredible smooth and creamy guacamole that tastes really cool and refreshing when paired with the hottest sauce on top of that delicious savory meat and tortilla. I will drive from north Glendale just to come here. Now please excuse me as I food coma out.
Came for Happy Hour with a friend before they left for the airport. Had a great selection of local brews which he got and I got a hand pressed margarita which was phenomenal! On the happy hour menu we got the waffle fries to share and I got the pork belly sliders which were very tasty. The service started strong and tapered off towards the end of the meal but I did speak with the owner who was very nice and personable. I look forward to coming back for dinner soon!
Food cocktails service and decor were all fantastic. As others have mentioned the duck fat fries are a highlight and the scalloped potatoes were delicious as well. The truffle mac and cheese is a must have. I personally think the appetizers were better than the steak although that was very good as well. The service was very friendly and attentive and the server was very knowledgeable about the food and made some great suggestions for what we should try. Great dining experience!
I ve eaten here SOOO much and it never gets old. Their sashimi is so fresh I ve never had it like that before only at Little Buddha do you really get quality. And their scallop nigiri is yummy in my tummy the texture is just right. Their rolls are good just limited I can do without their California roll though.. it s very bland but everything else is delicious. My family and I are huge fans of their Jalapeno Yellowtail in ponzu sauce is to die for. I ve been to other places who make something similar to this but it just does not compare. Always imitated never duplicated! The ambiance is really relax and they re quick to bring out your order. Staff is great if you get seated by the sushi bar the chefs are always happy greeting you. I always leave happy and stuffed! So it s worth my money down to every penny!
Quick overnighter here before heading to Red Rock like all the Staybridge suites I ve been to this one does not disappoint...only negative is the world s largest sh hole aka the future home of the Raiders is right across the street
Awesome pizza!! So glad we finally got a great local pizza restaurant nearby. The service is great fresh ingredients and any pizza place that cooks their onions peppers and mushrooms before putting them on the pizza an extra touch I SO appreciate for flavor and no soggy pizza is a great pizza place!!
Absolutely one of my favorite places for lunch ... love love the jalapeno hummus ... and the chicken breast pita ... try the Greek fries they r to die for
Ahhh animal style fries. How I ve missed you so. This was not the best In N Out Burger I ve been to mainly because of the lack of cleaniness of the seating and flooring but it was still pretty damn good. Keep in mind the secret menu to make your order unique and the envy of the person behind you. I arrived at 11 PM which was perfect since there was not a line in site. The next day I arrived at lunch and was overwhelmed with mobs of hormone induced teenagers waiting to devour every cow and potato in sight. So make sure you arrive a little early or a little later for meal times. Regardless it is well worth the wait.
Had a lot of fun laughing at the comics tonight they were great! Staff was friendly and helpful definitely will go again!
I ve been working out here regularly for 6 or 7 months now and although they do keep it VERY warm inside you break a sweat before you even begin your workout I do enjoy the place. Plenty of machines so you do not have to wait on anyone else though they could use more hand weights. It s a no frills gym. You go there to workout and that is basically it. Not very strong in classes either. The kids area says through age 12 but age wise I think any child over 6 would be bored. The staff has always been nice and will say hello and from what I ve seen their personal trainers are excellent. I ve even found myself taking mental notes on new exercises to try. All in all it s a good place to go in the Gilbert area if you re not interested in the whole club atmosphere.
A fantastic car buying experience from beginning to end thanks to the helpful knowledgeable friendly sales professionals at Downsview Chrysler. From the first phone call to the dealership to driving out of the parking lot in a new ride it was first rate service all the way. I dealt with Derek Morris whom was patient a wealth of knowledge and really helped me secure what I feel was an unbeatable deal on my new ride a fully loaded Fiat 500 Abarth Cabrio . Leslie Canada Dagatan in the finance department was a pleasure to deal with as well. Lots of FIATs and lots of Jeeps on the sales lot in the showroom which helps with figuring out what options you need want on your new vehicle. I feel like I was valued as a customer feel like I was not just treated as another number walking through the door and feel like the staff at Downsview Chrysler went out of their way to ensure I got the best deal possible leaving me here now fully satisfied with the overall experience and singing their praises! I will be recommending this dealership to my friends and colleagues. It was definitely worth the drive from out of town to come visit this beauty of a dealership... I hope this helps! Trevor M
A wonderful place for an anniversary dinner. While we made reservations it surprisingly did not appear needed on a Friday night around 8pm. I would ve preferred a table further in the back where the setting is a little more intimate and not as cramped near the door but still not a terrible table considering. The bar service was fabulous. If you re a whiskey fan do not hesitate to try one of their bourbon cocktails. The food in presentation quantity and quality was incredible. I ordered the Bruschetta appetizer and an on special creamy pesto pork dinner apologies the name escapes me . It could not have been done better. Dessert was a raspberry drizzled chocolate slice of ohmygod. The menu can be a little intimidating as some of the items are likely less familiar but do not be afraid to ask or google . The only downfall was the no substitutions in any manner to add in or take off. I found that a bit off putting but nonetheless ordered a dish much to my liking without needing any special instruction. While the seat option for a reservation table was not the best the partially intimate setting was still beautiful. I would ve personally preferred a server with a little more salesmanship but she did a fine job. Most definitely looking forward to a return visit. Check out their page to see their specials both dining and cocktails as they rotate frequently.
Really great hall to hear the Symphony. The balcony has great acoustics as does the front of the downstairs. I do not recommend sitting underneath the balcony. I also enjoy attending the Speakers Series in the hall. Beautiful architecture great acoustics. One idea to consider is to eat at the Mozart Room a restaurant connected to Heinz Hall. It s a way to park early eat a leisurely dinner and then pop right into your seats.
Hands down the best fish tacos I ve ever eaten! That is the fresh ahi tuna ones and not the deep fried. I do not see it on their website today. Please do not tell me they took it off the menu! I know it is not your usual Irish fare but who cares if it tastes that good! Also try the curry chips. These are not chips fries with a little flavorless curry powder sprinkled on top. It has the curry sauce on the side for your dowsing pleasure. I could eat it by the spoonful. I took away one star cause I have to drive so far to get my fix. Really worth the drive out there though.
The salon is very lively and bustling even on a weekday afternoon. I booked an appointment ahead of time and received a wash and trim for 35. The price was reasonable and even though it was a bit hard to communicate with the stylists I still felt taken care of and my hair looked really great afterwards! Would definitely come back next time I need my hair cut.
Five months ago I purchased an RV from CAMPING WORLD. I have never had such a bad experience in my LIFE from sales to finance YES finance then to service. So I gave up. I wanted to go camping this year the one thing I love doing in life so I wanted to leave all the bad behind and move forward. On to the good review LaMesa RV. Mesa location I called LaMesa RV in Mesa and I talked to Karl Gwinn sales I told him the RV I was looking at. He said it was there and he would hold it till I could come in the following day. So I went there the following day. Karl greeted me at the door showed me the RV with NO pressure. I told him I wanted to think about it. He said I would have to leave a 500.00 deposit so I did 100 refundable . I came back today 9 1 18 and I asked him if I could view it alone. Karl said sure so I did. It was the best experience EVER! I have never felt so relaxed in a purchase. I walked back in to the showroom Karl was busy. So Ian the store manager took over. I never had to wait! Ian answered all my questions and gave me assurance that my experience would not be like my last one at Camping world. Then they sent me to the finance office and I met Lori. She also was not pushy nor tried to sell me anything I did not want. With in moments she shook my hand and said I was an owner of a new RV. If I would not have asked questions and viewed the RV I bet I could have walked in and walked out with an RV in thirty minutes. Unlike Camping World and the BS they put you through with all there gimmicks. Five hours at Camping world. I will be picking up my RV next week or the following. I hope the experience keeps going like this. I will update this review after I receive the RV. Thank you Karl Ian and Lori. Seriously this purchase was the most amazing experience I ever had.
Have alread posted a review but had to add that a friend at work ordered vegan chocolate cupcakes for my birthday and they were sooooooo delicious!! All my nonvegan coworkers LOVED them.
This is my kind of place! First off I thought the decor was cool. It was clean and new like new? No weird smells. No creeps. The staff wore mechanics uniforms. Awesome! Our mechanic for the night was GABRIEL. Nice coincedence. He was super friendly and attentive. Secondly the drinks were surprisingly cheap. Six bucks for two beers. Amazing! Lastly the crowd was super chill and cool. Really fun crowd that was dancing in some parts and enjoying their time. I loved that I put money in the jukebox and my songs actually played. I did not have to wait all night for my music choices to play. YAY. My partner won 160 dollars on one of the machines at the bar so that was an added bonus. I wish this place was in my hometown because I would totally become a regular without a doubt!
Sadly from a consumers standpoint I feel like this is the last place that offers true customer service. Every time I m in here I feel like they actually care. If there is a line the employees thank you for coming in and assure you someone will be with you soon. When it s your turn they Introduce themselves to you and even make small talk. The last 4 times I was here I did not even buy anything I just had air put in my tires and a nail taken out and repaired for that they did not even charge me . This past time I did need a new tire but there was no up selling or anything. Super nice employees. This place is ran right which is why I drive past at least 10 tire shops to come here. Thank you guys!! My only complaint is I wish they would do more then tires!
My husband and I are very happy with our experience at Bloom. Dr. Behera the nurses and the staff helped to make our experience less difficult and kept our spirits up. Also thanks to Bloom we are about to welcome our little boy to the world! I would certainly recommend Bloom to anyone struggling to have a baby. It s a challenging experience and having a great team on your side really makes a huge difference! I really ca not say enough about the whole team and how great they were to work with!
FOOD We go for the Happy Hour and every time we go it is delicious. Oysters are always fresh the meat in the sliders is divine and the wings always have the best buffalo sauce on them!!!!! My man and I always say we need to actually get meals there but we love the Happy Hour so much we have not yet. THE ONLY COMPLAINT I HAVE ABOUT HAPPY HOUR IS THIS OVER THE PAST YEAR THEY HAVE CHANGED PRICES TO BE MORE EXPENSIVE AND ALSO CHANGED TYPE OF WINGS ON HAPPY HOUR TO A SMALLER STYLE. DRINKS They are known for their beers and they have a great selection. Every time we go we try something different. They also have drinks on Happy Hour. The best drink special they have going all the time is the 7 second challenge. Finish your beer in seven seconds and it s free!!!!! SERVICE We always sit at the bar and the service has been good every time. They do get very busy so the wait is a little longer at times but that is expected at any great restaurant. Bartenders are knowledgeable about beers so if you have questions do not be afraid to ask. PARKING It s at the casino parking is still free here so take advantage of it before they starts charging too!!!! ATMOSPHERE This place is always clean and very bright. Nice big open space with large bar. Outside seating is available. DEALS Happy Hours and 7 second beer challenge!!
A little pricey but everything was delish! Loved the Udon noodles! Waitress needs customer service training. At least fake a smile!
Had my wife s iPad mini screen fixed here. The service was fantastic. The estimated time to replace took longer but everything came out great. They also gave me a great price on the replacement of screen and a tempered glass protector as well. Overall very happy with the service and work they do here.
Its always a good place to watch sports because they have so mant tvs everywhere. On thursday nights they have 60 cent boneless wing night which is a huge steal. Personally id come here over wingstop just because the experience is better for an avid sports fan
Love this place!! Any time i go in they are quick professional thoughtful and sweet. I always leave feeling like a million bucks
An amazing venue for an art show! The owner of the venue Julie is great super helpful and gave us an awesome experience. The venue has a lot of resources and its very spacious. We cannot wait to hold our next event here! Chocolate And Art Show Phoenix Edition will be back next year at Unexpected.
The best poutine in Toronto. Mr tasty fries is great if you dont mind eating from a food truck. The poutine is the best 5.50 for a medium. Real cheese curds thick gravy large portions. They also serve hotdogs and burgers as well. If you like sitting outdoors or are in the area check out mr tasty fries
I just received a call from Rachel K who had great customer service at Nation Home Warranty. I had a terrible time with the pool company that is contracted with National but Rachel and her team went above and beyond to make up for it. I m a realtor here in town and I always recommend this company. They ve always been on top of getting back to me and keeping me in the loop.
Great service Fast and oh so good. Right when we walked in we were immediately greeted by the employees with Welcome back to Popeyes. There were a few people ahead of us ordering but it took only a few minutes for our turn. We ordered the three and five piece chicken strip meals mild spice with mashed potatoes. I also ordered a side of coleslaw. My husband tried their original chicken but hot. We were given our drink cups and a number for our table. Literally before we sat down our food was ready and brought to us. It was hot fresh and the coleslaw was amazing. Most places water it down so much but it was perfect. The chicken was juicy and had an awesome flavor. Every table was full and all the employees were smiling and welcoming. We literally got one of the very last open tables. They also gave my son a balloon which made his day. The parking lot is a little difficult to manage since it is so new and not only have a ton of cars in the drive thru..there are also still work trucks everywhere. We will definitely be back.
For a date night or special occasion restaurant in Madison this is at the top of the list. Definitely make reservations for a weekend night. They have a bar area where you get a cocktail before your tables ready but the space is limited. The menu includes many options for seasonal cooked and raw sushi at least a dozen vegetarian vegan choices too as well as non sushi entrees to please most palates. The chef s were rather quick with the 4 orders of sushi and one order of sashimi we shared. Everything tasted fresh and flavorful and was beautifully presented. Our server was friendly and helpful and put a birthday candle on my fianc s plate for a sweet touch. Prices range from 6 for vegetarian tempura rolls to up to 22 for the most expensive rolls. I know some may worry about leaving a sushi restaurant still hungry but we did not have room for dessert!
Wowza! Hot spot hot food and hot waiter Nathan!!! Hahah. All jokes aside this new place has a lot of issue with parking if you arrive before 6pm when valet services begin so DRIVER BEWARE. The downstairs area is very open and modern and full of people drinking after a long day of city life. When we arrived we were taken upstairs for dining. I will say it feels a little like eating in dark loft. I would have probably chosen a lighter color to paint the tons of pipes and wires snaking overhead. Oh and there is an odd flushing sound in the pipes about every 15 minutes or so.... not sure what that s about. Here is why 5 Stars the menu was phenomenal. We both had vegetarian option and it was full of flavor and creative in presentation. The cocktails and bubbly we enjoyed were also very delicious and my bestie got a free glass because it was his birthday. How sweet right?! Nathan was our waiter... he was super attentive very knowlgade about the menu and smoking hot. We could not have had a more pleasant staff experience. The guy who carries around the water to refill glasses does not let your water glass get any where near empty before he promptly refreshes the glass. Oh we had the beets as a small plate... it was AMAZING! I feel like beets can go terribly wrong but these were fresh gold and red beets to die for. The desserts were artistic takes on popular options and they were worthy of repeating for sure!! The views out of the tall windows from the bottom floor are amazing but when the sun is going down and they raise the shades it almost blinds the diners on the second floor for a few minutes until the sun hides behind the neighboring building. Small price to pay for an amazing view. I will most certainly be back and ca not wait to try more cocktails!!
Found my perfect hideaway where I can concentrate and work in peace. Friendly owner was quick to provide a recommendation based on my tastes. I ll be back to try the meat pies and sit on the back patio. Nice big screen tv with just the right level of volume. Unassuming clientele. Free wifi and plenty to look at and read. Highly recommended!
I ve wanted to try this place since it opened. My wife had eaten here and said it was really good. So I gambled and had them cater breakfast for a meeting. HOLY MOLY was I glad I gambled!! The food is fantastic. They were extremely flexible in the menu. The sausage gravy and home fries are phenomenal!! The food was delicious and they were super communicative through out the process. The food was delivered and set up in perfect timing by too early and not late. The ingredients were super high quality. The sliced cheese was actually cheddar cheese and not cheap sliced American cheese...I know it seems silly but if they are that concerned about the kid of cheese they send imagine how high quality the rest of the ingredients must have been. I was very very happy and so were the 40 people who attended the meeting. The value was incredible a few people said they were too full for lunch. Hats off to Craig and John you guys run a very efficient operation with a fantastic menu! I will definitely use you again. Now I just need to get my butt in there and really get adventurous on the menu.
I ve been eating here for 15 years or more. Through the changes they have always been very consistent. Fresh salads I love the Tuna Terragone. Their soups are fantastic Chili tomato Bisque and chicken noodle are my favorite s. Warm breads and muffins are also yummy. Soft serve ice cream! There prices keep going up basically 15 with drink and tip but if you like fresh its worth it.
I was pretty impressed with Autoburger after trying this truck at Food Truck Friday. I ordered the Granny which comes with American cheese jalapeos sweet potato fries pickles and thousand island all on top of the burger. I also got a side of regular fries despite ordering sweet potato fries . The good the beef in this burger was top notch. Absolutely could have eaten this beef with just about any toppings and it would be awesome. The pickled Jalapeos sweet potato fries and thousand island seemed like a fairly odd combo but they all went together extremely well and I really liked it. The bad the bun was really high quality bread but it was simply too large. For a 1 4 1 3 pound patty the huge bun was too much bread and overpowered the meat and toppings a bit. At almost 10 for a burger plus 3.50 for fries which they incorrectly gave me regular instead of sweet potato it is a bit pricey for a food truck. They also took 10 12 minutes to make the burger which seemed extra lengthy to me. The fries were just okay as well definitely nothing special. Overall I loved the beef and the flavors of the burger so I have to give them a solid rating despite a few other let downs.
MidiCi Pizza is a fast casual authentic style pizza concept. They specialize in light Neapolitan Style Pizzas using only 4 ingredients for the crust that include non gmo Neapolitan double zero flour water sea salt and yeast. They offer a menu of suggested pizzas about 38 optional pizza add ons that mostly run 1 appetizers and burrata salads desserts coffee teas beer and wine. The atmosphere is inviting. It s very light and airy and interesting with a circular design. They have a small living tree in the middle of the dining area. Seating is very close together.... You start off the way you do at any fast casual place and order at the counter pick up a table number pay and then get your beverage plates and stuff maybe hit the pizza condiment bar that includes fresh basil and hot chili oil and then seat yourself. Someone runs your food to you. They were giving everyone free Margherita pizzas opening weekend but we wanted to purchase something so my husband added on meat toppings to his pizza and we purchased a Walnut and Gorgonzola Salad. I have to say the Walnut and Gorgonzola Salad was REALLY DELICIOUS! It was big and made with fresh peppery arugula lots of tasty cheeses sweet grape tomatoes a drizzle of reduced balsamic and some wood fired bread. 8.50 I really enjoyed the salad and have not had many others at this price point that were this tasty. Now to the pizza. Soon my Margherita pizza arrives with a good amount of fresh basil. The crust is light and thin as promised. You can eat it knife and fork style or you can pick it up. The crust is mild tasting. Maybe a tad bit more development salt and a tad of more char would do.....The tomatoes are good but not the sweetest the cheese is good but not the milkiest. Do not take this wrong....The pizza really IS GOOD but for the reasons I mentioned I would not put it up there with the top pizzas of metro Phoenix. HOWEVER if I put this pizza against the other fast casual pizza places I ve been to I do have to say THIS MidiCi does have a BIG EDGE on them. It s a much better pizza than from other fast casual pizzas I ve tried. I also need to add that this is only a 7.50 pizza. At it s price range this pizza really rocks. I also REALLY ENJOYED the salad and wanted to try the gelato they offer but I was full and the line was long so we did not feel like going back in line. My husband liked the house made sausage but he was CRAZY about the spicy salami they offer....he loved it! MidiCi pizza is a very nice unique addition to the eateries of Dessert Ridge Marketplace! Great value Neapolitan Style Pizzas Really GOOD Salad and More!
Hands down best tacos in town. The salsa bar is the bomb!
Gotta love weekend happy hour... The quinoa bites were delish was the lemon lavender fizz. Service was great and on a Sunday night we had pretty much had the inside to ourselves. I would definitely return.
This is my favorite local Korean restaurant and go to area for dinner or lunch near me. I enjoy the soups and the entrees here. It s is good Korean food you can enjoy and rely on.
We eat here a lot mainly due to the fact that this is the best Vietnamese in the deep SE in my opinion . The food is delicious the portions are big and the prices are good. As far as the service... well yeah it s not very good. I will say first that in several years of eating here both take out and dine in once a week they have never forgot our order or brought the wrong thing and 99 of the time we order within 2 minutes of sitting down are brought our appetizers almost instantly salad rolls or spring rolls and our meals 5 minutes after that. They usually tell us to pick a table or sometimes just point to a table are not overly friendly and never ask how your food is or if you need anything else with your meal. At times this place can get very busy and there is quite a lot of seating in there. It does seem hard to get a drink from them some of the time because they do not ask if you want a drink. We make a point to order a drink at the same time they take our food order even though they do not ask. They ve been known to bring our bill right after our food arrives even though we did not ask for it and at other times not bringing it at all. Like many Vietnamese restaurants or hole in wall Asian caf style restaurants which are in my opinion always the best it is expected that when you are finished you should come to the till. This is pretty normal to me and it does not bother me. Honestly I would not come to any Vietnamese restaurant to celebrate something or with a large group of people expecting engaging service just as I would not go to any upscale restaurant wearing sweatpants on a Monday night for quick take out. It is one small somewhat healthier and very delicious step up from fast food for me. I come here expecting to be in and out in 30 minutes and paying less than 30 for an appetizer two entrees and iced coffee with condensed milk and a pop our typical order . If this were a much nicer pricier restaurant such as Catch or Murrietta s neither of these have bad service at all just an example as well as 2 restaurants I really enjoy when splurging that had 5 star food but terrible service I would probably give it 2 stars. Service is very important at those restaurants I am usually there for 1 1 2 hrs and spend over 100 for a dinner for 2. Service just ai not a big thing for me at any viet restaurant and therefore it only docks one star off the rating leaving with 4 stars.
Ate dinner here because of the yelp reviews. Food is very good and authentic. They give you three types of salsa with your tortillas reg hot and green tomato. I had the grilled taco...they give you three...very fresh. Our family loved it. We will be back.
Had made reservation weeks in advance so got the table on time. Had ordered biscuits and gravy which was yummy hoped there was more fried chicken in it. Had also ordered elvis pancakes which were good and served with banana compote and bourbon maple syrup.
It s definitely fast and it s delicious. This location had a check in offer on yelp where you get a free pizza with the purchase of a pizza... Come on now FREE designer pizza. Just go there!
Love this place. I use the drive through to pick up donuts for long meetings. My favorite is the glazed old fashioned crispy and yummy. I also love the sandwiches for lunch. Big thumbs up!!
Best Apple Fritters....hate to say this because when I get there...they may be all gone! Nice owner....love this place. She cute...throws an extra treat once in awhile. .......DONUT HEAVEN.
Stephanie saved our day after a very disappointing experience with another stylist who works here. We were visiting as a bridal party for hair and makeup... three bridesmaids and one bride. We really wish that we could have booked Stephanie for everyone s hair and makeup but she is only one person! We are lucky that she was there to clean up the mess left behind on a couple of the bridesmaid s hair and makeup experiences. Thank you Stephanie!
Fast courteous service at an in expensive cost. I went with the dye material and it was the lease expensive installation in town.
Holy crap this restaurant has blessed my soul. Disclaimer I have a long review coming up so if the first sentence was not enough to convince you to try this place out here s some more reasons. Service My first impression of this place was horrible. When we got to the bar and saw that there was only countertop seating with 15 seats we asked the chef Ricardo what we could do because my dad is in a wheelchair. The bar was full and he was busy so his attitude came off a bit arrogant and careless. However he and the waitress opened up the restaurant right behind the bar for us to sit at within 5 minutes. It was honestly the sweetest thing and nice to have an empty restaurant to ourselves. Then he even came by to suggest us different items and let us sample the different soups! The service here is top notch. Oysters I love oysters. I ve had them at buffets at nice restaurants and in different states but I ve never seen such fat and fresh oysters! We ordered 3 dozen and they consistently stayed that way! Not a single bad small or old oyster. Soo worth the money so delicious and so satisfying. Soups We tried the Manhattan the New Zealand and the special mix of the 2 the dirty New Jersey lol that s what the chef named it . They were all delicious!! Everyone at the table loved each one. Also I highly highly recommend the combo pan roast. I overlooked it on the menu but after the chef brought out a sample I regretted not ordering it. I loved that all the soups were so light and not thick at all. Mussels The mussels were not as great as the oysters soups and were pretty standard but worth the price if you love mussels! Shrimp and Clam Linguine The portion is pretty big and it was a great selection. Bread The complimentary bread sucked and was hard as Legos but I did not give a rat s ass about it because all the other food was so great. This place is not located in a hotel on the strip but it s only like a 12 minute drive! Also do not expect the hotel to be modern chic or anything upscale. But again who cares when the food and service is great. The bar itself is trendy and looks super classy. This place definitely lives up to the hype.
This place is AMAZING! After my summer in Italy I looked so long for an authentic Italian restaurant and this stuffed gnocchi here was amazing! So great! Meals come with a delicious salad and garlic butter for the bread which are both awesome as well. Reasonably priced and I would highly recommend!
Stopped in here had an hour to kill before a concert near by with my daughter. Great little local pizza place not overly busy for a Sunday night football on the TV s B day party at the table next to us local drunks at the bar...... Ordered the Great White pizza with ranch and it was great. Good selection of beer on tap. I really liked this place too bad we live 45 miles away. Our waitress was outstanding!! I almost got carded!!
Oubliez le service avec un sourire. Ici ce qui compte c est la saveur des plats!
Warning this is a loud restaurant. do not come here expecting calm. Visiting toronto i wanted to take my mum to izakaya japanese food and yelp brought me here and the experience and food did not disappoint. Every little dish we ordered was amazing from the loaded oyster to the fried brie. Sake bombs were being dropped left and right with the staff and friends of participant cheering on. Great vibes great food. Definitely recommend.
Flower Fantasia. If your lawn and garden could shop for clothing and accessories Brenckle s is where they would go. The selection is amazing. Indoor plants outdoor plants shrubs trees flowers flowers flowers hanging pots in every size and color combination annuals perennials climbing trailing garden statuary pinwheels pots stakes and yes... DIRT. Parking is adequate a little tight but hey! it was the first sunny day in a while. The carts are great the rubber tire kind that can crawl over hoses without incident. The help is helpful. Prices are on the upper side of medium. Selection is A . Basically exactly what your lawn and garden hope you find!
Stopped in for dinner with a friend. Apparently this used to be an old bakery and was somewhat recently revamped into a restaurant. I ordered the soup of the day and I wish I remember what it was called. It had prosciutto and potato in it and was amazing!! And gluten free! I also ordered a pizza with arugula prosciutto cherry tomatoes and mozzarella drizzled with olive oil and balsamic. Despite having just eaten soup and having a rather large lunch only three hours earlier I ate 3 4 of the pizza. It. Was. Amazing!! Honestly the BEST gluten free pizza I ve ever had hands down! The flavors worked so perfectly together the crust was crispy and tasted like normal pizza! Biggest bonus did not get sick at all! They take gfree seriously! Prices are pretty reasonable especially the prices for the pizzas! They also have a gelato bar at the other end. All very yum and the guy working there is great! I will be returning again and again and again!!
Just moved to the neighborhood and this place already feels like home. The bartenders and patrons are friendly and local. A bit divey but reasonably priced and a good atmosphere. The cheese curds are great! Will definitely be frequenting this establishment!
They do a great Job! I ve been going there for more than a year and usually go to Anna. She is awesome. Chris the owner is super friendly and always remembers my name. I recommend making an appointment and not just doing a walk in appointment. They recently opened a second location in Lyndhurst.
I love this place. We ve been ordering from them for a couple of years now. Food is always delicious and service is always very friendly. We ve never eaten in the restaurant always takeout but the ambiance is really nice. Casual yet refined. The beef samosas are my favourite. Outstanding.
Free full size its huge steamed tofu pudding if you go to their Facebook page and like one of their dishes. One per person not per table so awesome! Came here for dinner and not for the dim sum! Unlike the English name of this restaurant the Chinese name actually say they serve Chiu Chow cuisine a type of Chinese cuisine . I ordered the Chiu Chow Style Marinated Duck a must for chiu chow food house special seafood fried rice and pork belly w preserved vegetables. I think the pork belly was most well done out of the 3 dishes it just melts in your mouth and it actually comes with some small bok choy in addition to the preserved vegetables which counterbalances the oil in this dish. The fried rice was average but the portion is quite generous for the price! Marinated duck is great and it comes with some marinated tofu but I just love this dish in general! The service was great even when I asked for the free tofu pudding with Facebook like . She even told us it s big and we can order two to share amongst the three of us and save one free one for next time. It was a great experience! I will definitely be back to try their Fish Maw w Snow Pea Leaf as I saw a lot of tables order it and will try their dim sum as well!
Local fried eggs with bacon on ciabatta was delicious. The yogurt parfait was fresh and good. Fresh squeezed orange juice and cinnamon roll were good too. Only complaint is that it took about 15 minutes and 2 reminders to get a simple bagel which turned out to be burnt and bland afterall. Well worth the prices.
Went here after going to stupid store. Boyfriend and I both got the Rare beef noodle soup. It was really good and filling. Pho is pretty hard to mess up. The reason I m not giving it 5 stars is because our waitress was pretty rude she did not even make the effort to come across the room to greet up. she just yelled at us and pointed to a table and did that with every other person that followed. We will probably be back after an Ikea trip or something.
My experience at The Keg Richmond Hill has always been a phenomenal one. It was my mother s birthday and I could not think of a better restaurant to celebrate at. I have dined in the main dining room on several occasions and have quite enjoyed the chic and very classy decor but as it was quite busy for a Wednesday evening we opted for patio seating. To start off the table received some very heavenly bread and butter gratis. For starters we got the jumbo shrimp cocktail which actually came with JUMBO shrimps fried calamari and bacon wrapped scallops. At this point in the meal no complaints. For my meal I got the N.Y. Strip with mushrooms and mixed vegetables. I also decided to try the creamy peppercorn sauce. My steak was deliciously seasoned and cooked to a perfect medium. But what elevated the steak to the next level were the beautiful grills marks perfectly placed on my steak. I was not a big fan of the creamy peppercorn sauce and the waitress was kind enough to make other suggestions and provide me with another sauce. My sister thoroughly enjoyed her pistachio crusted salmon and my mother savored her Top Sirloin. Although none of us had any space for dessert it was impossible to say no to the lovely chocolate ice cream cake layered on a base of crumbled oreos with caramel and chocolate syrup. Yes it tasted as good as it sounds and it was on the house. Overall a wonderful dining experience that most importantly is consistent.
Came here multiple times this past week as I was visiting Cleveland for a seminar across the street. Always super service and great place to hang. Thanks guys!
I always try to have breakfast here when I m in Las Vegas. The french toast is the best. I love sitting out on their patio in the summer. This past visit we had dinner. The food was cooked perfectly . The salad was wonderful. It was a great what a great meal and value. I m looking forward to trying the new Los Angles restaurant.
Sujuk was perfectly spiced. The bread was crisp warm and fresh from the wood oven. I ve tried this dish in the past elsewhere and I like that Soufi s Sujuk is not runny and that weight ratio between the spicy ground beef and the flat bread is well balanced. The tabouleh is also incredible. Will definitely be back!
Delicious Afghani kabob and other dishes! Used to frequent the Mississauga location when I worked in the area. The food is amazing with quick service and plenty of seating in a very nice modern dining area. The portions are generous and each dinner comes with a large naan and salad. Love it!
Although I did not have the outcome I had hoped for the patient I have to say the that CCF was an outstanding hospital. The staff from the cleaning folks to the doctors and administrators were as nice friendly and comforting as they could be. If I ever needed directions to some place and if you have not been to the Clinic it s HUGE I was escorted there instead of just given directions. The hospital is incredibly clean parking ample underground and above ground tunnels walkways so you never have to go outside in the cold of winter or heat of summer. This was my first experience with the Clinic and I have to say they impressed me and certainly met expectations. Unfortunately doctors are human and they cannot cure or save everyone... no matter how wonderful a hospital may be. I would definitely recommend this hospital to anyone who needs any sort of specialty care.
I have one word CHRISTINE! We are tourists and she went way and far beyond the call of duty. She gave us so much attention for eight people at one table. She did not do it for personal gain but because she genuinely cared about us and catered to our every need. My husband and I highly recommend her for promotion in your organization. I am a human resources professional of over 40 years and to me she is the epitome of customer service
These folks know what they re doing for high school dances. You re in and out quickly. Prices are reasonable and they are flexible with drop off times. I have many more school dances in my future with 2 boys in high school and this is where I will go.
Our server Kalani was more then amazing! She was friendly attentive an more. Food was delicious. I highly recommend the garlic edamame and the pineapple cheese wontons their both my favorite!
Amazing amazing mussels. Must try!
Amazing basketball camp !!! Coach Kuyper was very involved and had an amazing staff. Our boy had an amazing time. Not only were great skills learned but also great character.
This was my first time going to the Event! It was nicely organized with parking being a breeze. Gate entry was quick and once in the event I was pleasantly surprised that it was not as crowded as I anticipated. We went Saturday about 3 30. By that time the crowds were not too crazy and really we did not encounter any issues with waiting in long lines for our food choices either! Some more popular trucks did have long lines...but that s expected!! All the vendors were pleasant and helpful! Of course some of the foods are expensive we tried a Lobster Roll at 18 but most trucks did have 2 sample menu offerings but the regular price items always seemed more appealing!! Example 2 grilled cheese or regular price grilled cheese with bacon and turkey for 6...which sounds better?? The event seems to be getting some negative comments about prices crowds and the lack of festivities....I personally think an event is what You Make It!! Events are going to be crowded there will be lines some things will be expensive if you choose not to order off the sample menus and if you go with a fun group of people...you bring the Party!! All in all the event was enjoyable!! Tips for improvement...more areas for people sit and dine more offerings for 2 samples perhaps bringing in more local talent for more entertainment options! I highly recommend the event if you enjoy trying new foods!! Have Fun!
Sharp looking place modern meets old dinner good food nice and simple breakfast menu. Staff could have been more friendly but over all solid place will be back again!
Always hits the spot Marios Bbq is by far the best for Portuguese take out in Mississauga. Service is quick Staff is friendly Especially the owners younger son He is very courteuos with customers at all times Excellent customer service. The chicken is prepared to perfection full of flavour and usually never dry like other places. Ill be back soon Thanks!!
Came here for my birthday dinner last weekend and this place is amazing. The restaurant is located inside the Bellagio and once seated inside you have a great view of their fountain show which is super romantic if you re with your significant other. The decor is very upscale and modern ambience is loud though and it s best that you dress up if you plan to come here. Now let s talk about their food..my boyfriend and I ordered mainly seafood dishes and all of them tasted fresh rich and delicious. Our server was very helpful as well and he even got me a purse holder for our table which is awesome They re a bit pricey here though but I think it s worth it! Definitely coming back next Vegas trip.
Called Tree Removal Phx on Wednesday evening after the big storm. A tree fell into my house. They came out the same night and removed the tree within a couple of hours. I was surprised how quick they were considering the tree was about 45 ft tall! Thank you very much for the speedy work and the good clean up!
I have never actually eaten inside the restaurant so I ca not comment on that. We have ordered take out or delivery from here A LOT because it s one of the only places near our home that is open late. You can order online easily and we have never had to wait outrageously long for delivery. The food always holds up well and has been consistently delicious. We end up ordering the butter chicken a lot. I also like the lamb saag and samosas. We usually also have leftovers as you get a large portion. Ca not wait to try their buffet!
This Japanese restaurant while it does not represent a typical Izakaya is wonderful. Skewers were very good maybe could have had a bit more char. The seafood hotpot was delicious with flavorful broth. Great fresh sushi as well. Solid selection of sake and soju too. Great experience well worth the 10 minute wait to sit down.
I really liked this hotel. The staff for the hotel itself was super friendly. Rooms were quite comfortable too. I do agree with a few negative things previous reviewers said. David R. hit all the pros and cons right on the head. The hotel has the best location. Very nice.
After using this company again I can now give them 5 stars. The ordering process was flawless the delivery guys were actually a little early set everything up the way it was supposed to be and were overall nice guys. The furniture is stable so I can rest easy now.
David Robert is amazing. He is completely honest and he is not going to pressure you in to buying coverage you do not need. His only concern is providing the best service possible for his clients current and potential! No one will work harder for you than David Robert.
Great place for a quick quality meal. I ve had their salads pizza and subs and they re all really good. They have their own Bad Donkey Sauce that s oil with seasonings. It s delish!
If you want an honest trustworthy high quality mechanic you need to visit Fortitude Tire for servicing. The quality of service is top notch at an unbeatable price! Paul takes a look at every detail and ensures that you do not leave the shop unsatisfied. I trust this location to provide both excellent customer service and actual repairs maintenance. Fortitude Tire is most certainly a place I recommend to all my friends and family.
We had an overall great experience with just a minor set back with the communication when we arrived and only given 30 minutes prior to decorate the room. When we arrived to our designated room other people were established so by time they were gone our guests were arriving and we were still trying to decorate and arrange ourselves. Jimi was quite wonderful with communicating with us with the games and making sure our drinks were replenished at all times. She helped us throughout the party in maintaining clean and making sure all of our needs were meet. Thank you we shall be back
The food s great. The pork products are amazing. The owner has a line on the best around. My gripes the crowded conditions the wait and occasionally the service which seems to suffer because of the crowd. Two times now I ve had to pull a Shirley McClaine in Terms of Endearment think hospital scene and an ailing daughter needing pain medication to get my coffee refilled even once. If Matt s has space and that seems to occur only at opening I ll slide in and enjoy. But I m not going to get sunstroke for it as great as the food is and it is great .
Well I brought pearls during a trip overseas and decided I wanted to split the rope of pearls into 2 smaller necklaces for my two new nieces who are marrying my nephews . I knew I would need to restring and find a nice clasp for them.. So first I went to another bead shop and they were OK. .but did not have what I wanted they said they would call within a day or two but I waited a week and they never did.. So I checked yelp and found Sweet Beads. I went over there and they had exactly what I needed.. Plus they invited me to sit down and redo the pearls right there and then.. So I did.. They were the sweetest nicest ladies ever.. Shae and her mom helped me learn how to do this basic beading and showed me how to put on the clasp. I had to restring it 3 times because I kept messing up.. But they had great patience with me and kept showing me the right way to do it. They were really special and I will be going back to do some more. They have a great selection of everything and they are great teachers. If you want to learn to bead this is the place to go hands down!!!
first time here i had a groupon for 10 of stuff. i got a 5 dollar brownie that was huge and excellent tasting enought to serve 3 people. very rich and delicous i also got 2 cookies for 2.50 each. one was ginger molasses and one choc chip choc chip was excellent. ginger was average. i would go back but only if i had a groupon. its out of my budget at full price. friendly cashier and service!
Henry s has some really nice options on the menu as well as a daily special. The food and service are great but it can be a bit noisy at times. All things considered a fine place to dine.
I am a big fan of Lowe s and find the sales staff to be very friendly and helpful. They will do their best to provide advice on a wide variety of projects to help do it yourself customers. However last week I bought kitchen tile from Lowe s and the staff member told me the price would be reduced to cover the cost of the delivery fee. This was fine by me but when I looked at the bill their was only a 10 reduction in tile cost to cover a 55 fee. I ended up having the fee reimbursed and keeping the discount. Always ask if a staff member has completed a project before accepting their advice. I bought a lot of paint stripper from Lowe s but it took awhile to figure out the best method for removing paint as the staff members had never done it before. Their Minwax wood stain and Varathane floor finish are beautiful. I spend a lot of money time at Lowe s and it is my favorite home improvement store in the area. Their website is also good and you can keep a saved list of products you would like to buy in their cart. Next up will be a special ordered in 8 light fixture and valspar brushed suede paint.
Every step I take forward my daughter Shawna Brown will take with me. This was a collaborative effort and I thank all for their input no need to mention them they know who they are. This is a one of a kind tattoo and I would hope it will stay that way. A big shoutout to Bluenote Tattoo and Krystof what a great piece of artwork my friend. I will reccommend them to everyone needing ink. The atmosphere is amazing and very zen like for me. ripbabygirl
Accidentally went for happy hour and took advantage of the buy one get one free on any boba drinks at noon. We ordered taro slush and honey dew milk tea and a large pink cookie all for 7.04. Was not impressed with the honey dew milk. Not sure if he was the owner but he came and gave my son and I a free puff. Atmosphere is chill with a bunch of couches. If you re looking for a boba fix on this side of town you should check this place out.
Five Stars for Tonkotsu Ramen with the small noodles for those who knows and loves good broth. You ve tried Ramen spots all around town ? Try here at GOKU RAMEN Walk straight to the counter And order Tonkotsu Ramen And if you like more meet please make sure you order extra Chashu for a few bucks more then you ll be very happy. You will not be disappointed for this bowl of awesome Ramen Tell them Bill send you.
It is more than evident when a restaurant owner has aimed for above and beyond a great experience. Serguei has the ability to make you feel both welcome and valued. We came on a rainy Wednesday evening for an early dinner. Upon entering we were greeted warmly and shown to our table our coats were taken to be hung out back. Serguei first came to fill our waters and answered questions regarding the drinks menu he sincerely takes the time to understand your likes and dislikes and recommended spectacular choices. He also went through the menu with us nothing ever felt pushy rushed or forced rather Serguei has the great ability to make you feel as if you re immersed in a wonderful conversation regarding the food they offer and still retains the highest level of professionalism. After his suggestions we ordered four appetizers the steak tartar braised octopus tartine du jour and selection of three cheeses. The steak tartar and octopus came out first and both were delicious. The tartar was seasoned to perfection and topped with a quail egg. The octopus was tender and vibrant which went well beside the heavier steak tartar. We were given warm baguette and butter to accompany it. The tartine du jour was mozzarella and cherry tomato very good but not as great as the previous two dishes. The cheese was divine!! We were given two French cheeses Gouda and a very luscious Brie as well as a manchego from Spain. For mains we had the steak frites and the ricotta gnocchi scampi. The steak was a very generous portion and cooked a perfect medium. The fries were not forgotten crisp well seasoned and served with a house made aioli. The gnocchi was truly unforgettable. Light fluffy and starch free. Smothered in an incredible scampi sauce and topped with sous vide prawns. The flavor was incredibly rich and memorable! I would return simply for the sauce if I could. All in all Le Notre has quickly established itself as a star french restaurant in the city I would highly recommend checking this place out!
Overall I love Moe s. I d like to give 4.5 but for some reason yelp is all about integers. Moe is a smart business woman the chefs are good at what they do the evening bartenders are friendly intelligent and very good at mixing most common drinks and with some exceptions most of the wait staff are good. When they get busy they get swamped and yes service can suffer a bit but that s the result of the bar having a large and loyal group of patrons. Drink prices are a bit above normal but the the service and atmosphere warrant it so the value is still quite good. Food is not as good. Do not get me wrong I mean it when I say the chefs are good but the prices are much higher than normal so that value is just not as good on this side. Also the number of mouse traps and the slightly off smells in and around closed areas makes me wonder if mice are a problem... Service atmosphere and drinks are all 5s but the food is 3.5 or 4. Accordingly I think 4.5 or 4 stars is fair.
I got a pedicure from Kim and a fill gel on my hand by David. They were absolutely great! I have not liked the places in N.LV but I was happy w their service. I used to travel far to get my nails done. I m coming here from now on!
Considering my friends and I ordered over half of Station s menu in one night I figure I might as well write a review right? Here s how it went down 4 people 3 appetizers 4 entrees and 2 desserts. All shared family style. SERVICE Our server actually encouraged us to split dishes before we d even mentioned it and she brought us plenty of extra plates and serving utensils to do so. She gave us great recommendations was very friendly and attentive the whole night and even brought us extra toasted bread when we asked. Could not have asked for more from her. FOOD My impressions are kind of mixed on the food... there were one or two things I loved but some I was less crazy about. Appetizers the chicken wings were nothing special and the beef tongue was alright. If I had to order anything again it would be that chicken liver mousse. As creamy and flavorful as you d expect! Entrees the pork and steak were just alright a bit salty . The tagliatelle was pretty delicious especially that 1 hour egg! . However the highlight of the entire meal for me was definitely the butter poached cod. The buttery smooth texture instantly won my heart and I wish I could have ordered it all for myself! Dessert with only two dessert items we felt like we had to just try both. They re entirely different while the lavender pound cake is more refreshing especially with the pineapple the panna cotta has a strong rich sweetness. Even as a big dessert person I personally do not think they re must haves especially if you re satisfied from the previous courses. The selling point seems to be their uniqueness haha. Overall I was kind of hedging between a three and four star rating. I m not necessarily dying to come back and try anything else... I feel like I hit most of the highlights here. If the menu changes up I d consider trying Station again but I d be more choosy about what I d order.
Met some co workers here around Happy Hour.The construction on the street out front made it a bit difficult to get to.But once I was in went to the bar and ordered a Sangria. It was what I was thinking tasted good! Friends showed up we went to the patio and ordered snacks and more drinks. Great food and service.We will certainly return!!
We love this Parking Spot location. The customer service location price and the people are fantastic always willing to help and super friendly. Thanks you guys for everything. We highly recommend.
Fabulous decor beautiful bartender. This place is on and poppin after 10 pm so get there early and have a drink and or some appetizers!
Awesome service... Made an appointment online but got late and the guys there booked me for another one and i had to wait for about 10 mins. After waiting there i got an iphone replacement in about 20 mins and i left there happy...
Excellent food! The wings were tasty moist and quite large. The flavor selection was good. The only complaint the xxx hot wings were not spicy enough. Should be much hotter. But would definitely recommend if you have a craving for good wings!
I needed parts ASAP! Called Tyler and he found everything I needed instantly and had them ready to ship. I ended up canceling the order because I found them in town Tucson but he was still very friendly when doing so. Customer service was awesome. Keep up the good work you will be hearing from me again.
I absolutely love this place. Cindy took the best care of me. Made me feel welcomed and at ease. I loves the shape of my nails and they lasted a very long time. My pedicure was so nice. She offered an experience above and beyond the call of customer service. I recommend everyone to visit this place for their spa needs.
yum yum yum! Everything always tastes so fresh and good. I love going through the drive thru when I m in a hurry. Love the bacon avocado salad! The portions are great and so is the food.
Ed is highly detailed. He will go through everything. His refrain while working was to ask him questions. He was happy to look at anything explain anything and he did not leave until he was sure that he had seen all there was to see. The report was great broken down with lots of pictures and action items. It helped us a great deal in negotiating with the sellers of the home. He was also friendly and down to earth very easy to talk to. He gave us the report right on sight and was quick with his emails and to cash the check which was nice compared to a previous inspector!! .
Awesome!!! Highly recommend!!! One of the highlights of our Honeymoon!!! Went over the Hoover Damn Landed in the Grand Canyon and took a final fly over the Vegas Strip!!! Good Times!!!
Huge menu with several different food categories to choose from. Great beer selection including BJ s exclusive local favorites and common options. All the prices are surprisingly reasonable. I ve been to a BJ s in San Bruno CA a few times and this one in the South Hills certainly stacks up to one of the originals.
Desiree works miracles!! She helped with my first baby and was there to help even after our time ended with her. When I knew I was expecting my second kiddo she was my first call! She was unavailable but she helped me find another amazing night nurse! She is a wealth of information for any family that is expecting!! She knows her babies
My friend from the neighbourhood had been speaking of this place. Brand new. So we visited for afternoon drinks. Bourbon and draft beers. Very clean dive bar vibe like a safer Swan Dive. The owners are very nice and I wish them well. I would say that local competition 3 Speed has jumped the shark and Bar Neon is too political at this point so the door is wide open for The Jim. Will be back for sure. Vodka on tap haha.
Decent food! Good service considering how busy it is. Average drink selection. I like the location of this place but it can get a bit crowded and noisy depending on the night. I feel like a bigger space would allow for a better experience since it is a hot spot in NoDa and let s face it there s just not enough room for everybody! Still give this place four stars though because these are just minor setbacks. The salsa is fresh and super chunky! Probably one of the best food items.
This was my third time at Daily Dose and I have to say each time has been remarkable. The first time I went I shared the breakfast nachos with a friend and jeez are they dangerously delectable. The nachos along with the bacon Bloody Mary should be a prescription for a hangover. The next two times I got the Strawberry Mint Salad with Grilled chicken. The balance of Salad goat cheese and strawberries are perfect. Not overly dressed but each bite is flavorful and refreshing. I think I found my latest addiction. I will be back soon to get my daily dose.
Good place for an oil change. They re always able to get you in and out with little wait time. They also have online coupons for discounts that are always available. Workers are always nice and not pushy about trying to pressure you into extra services. Keep up the good work!
Very good Thai! I am a Thai food snob and it s hard to find in Charlotte. Excellent vegan Green Curry with actual flavorful produce. It s all about the fresh ingredients. Be careful with the spice level. Great staff intelligent caring and fast. Great job guys
Was just there for a wedding last week and we were pleased. Very helpful and accommodating both over the phone while planning and in person. The limo driver even went above and beyond to fit a couple extra people in and drove us to a restaurant off the strip where we had reservations. The photo packages are definitely on the pricey side and everything was moved along rather quickly because they do back to back weddings but overall it was a great experience.
Very good bar tenders! So sweet. I left my card there and they actually tracked me down and sent me a message letting me know they had it and it was safe. Excellent service and kind people all around.
First time here. Stopped in as a walk in and they were able to accommodate me easily. So happy I found this place. Great salon and even better mani pedi. Looking forward to visiting again!
Fantastic ! Skirt steak was so well done so the Wellington steak. The side was also really tasty. like an old home style mash potato. The starter I felt like it lacked some flavor had a steak carpaccio I have no doubt of the quality of the beef but maybe not my style or maybe some more of the pesto it had. Friendly staff too.
The Sicilian Butcher lived up to the five star reviews that brought us here. The service and atmosphere made it all the better. The Bruschetta boards are unique amazing and a must try. Having lived in Sicily for an extended period of time my bar is high when it comes to pasta and the meatballs and homemade pastas did not disappoint.
I ve found Victor through Instagram he was featured in top 10 photographers of the month in Las Vegas in May 14. I decided to contact him about a portrait session for me and my girlfriend since I was planning on coming to LV in July. When I came we met a Starbucks for a quick talk about what I want him to do and we talked about prices. He was very understanding and we both came up with a solution for us. Photoshoot was fantastic we executed it in a timely manner and both of us were happy with the shots that came out. I will definitely book him again for whatever needs may arise! Thanks Victor! Nikita Sevostyanov
You d be an idiot to not order the fried ice cream. It s one of the best desserts I ve ever had. It s a decent joint for good food but do not expect culinary excellence.
We were staying at Paris Las Vegas and decided to try this adorable restaurant in the hotel out front you can sit on the strip and watch people walk by and have the Bellagio fountains as your view it s pretty awesome . When I checked in around 1 00 or 1 30 I was told there was a 45 60 minute wait. No problem you get a beeper and it works anywhere in the casino vicinity so we could gamble or hang at a bar in the hotel. After 10 minutes of waiting I needed to run to the room to grab something thinking we still had at least 30 minutes. While I was gone the beeper went off and my husband went to get our table. They were really difficult wtih him saying that he could not sit down until I was there too. My husband essentially said she ll be right back I ll wait for her at our table and did not take no for an answer so they sat him. I was back in 10 minutes but my husband was going to go ahead and order a bottle of wine for us but the server never stopped at the table until I got there! Not sure if he was just that busy or if they were trying to prove a point about our entire party not being there but at any rate it kind of sucked. We had a great bottle of French chardonnay and a loaf of their hot french bread. The bread was awesome but sitting outside it was so hot that the pot of butter completely melted! Most of the tables had umbrellas and were shaded but were sitting right in the sun and we were burning up. I had a salad and my husband had the mushroom soup to start the soup was amazing. For entrees I had a cold crab and shrimp salad sandwich served with homemade chips. It was wonderful nice and cool and refreshing when sitting in the hot sun! Delicious. My husband had the croque monsieur with fries. The fries were tiny strips of potatoes fried until crispy and really good. His sandwich was good but a little boring. There is normally more bechamel sauce on a croque monsieur this was pretty dry with very little sauce but it did have nice flavors. Overall great lunch. It was hot so if you get stuck sitting in the sun you might be miserable I have no clue how people eat here in the middle of summer! the view is amazing! I really want to come back for dinner when it s cooler and the Bellagio fountains are all lit up.
We ve had Rick out to the house a couple of times. Rick and his son Ricky are professional experienced thoughtful electricians. Hey... remodeling work is challenging at times... more so because the homeowner and their pets and children actually LIVE in the home. But Rick and Ricky know how to solve an electrical challenge while taking precautions to minimize drywall destruction and the harmful dust associated with opening walls and ceilings. Anyone whose had real electrical remodeling work done to their house knows an electrician who can keep damage to the drywall etc. to a minimum is worth their weight in gold. WORK Rick has installed a number of new receptacles to existing circuits helped us to bring power to wall mounted TV and other devices replaced switches with dimmers and helped us to work through and correct preexisting electrical challenges in our home. He is very realistic about remodeling work and know he is going to be working to complete or extend work that other electricians began. It s all part of the job with Rick. BEST OF ALL Wherever possible Rick takes care to plan out the work in a way to avoid damaging interior walls and ceilings. This type of thoughtfulness has saved us hundreds of dollars in unnecessary drywall and paint repairs not to mention the dust. WORK ETHIC Rick arrived on time walked through the work explained his approach before he made any changes answered questions made thoughtful suggestions finished all the work he quoted cleaned up the job site and charged an extremely fair price. Even better he maintained an energetic and positive attitude throughout the entire time. INVOICING Is a breeze. Rick always sends an itemized bill via email the evening after his completes a job and you can pay ONLINE by credit card or directly from your account. IN SHORT Rick s Advanced Electric is an honest professional and experienced electrician that I can confidently recommend. He always returns our calls. We always call Rick whenever we need electric work. UPDATE We ve had Rick and Ricky his son out to the house for multiple projects now. Some time ago Rick convinced me to we would save money and time if we worked with him on an hourly basis so we tried it. In just under 2 hours he had added 4 new 15A receptacles on existing circuits corrected an old 20A GFI outlet and added a new 20A receptacle in our garage. What a savings over the per item charges most electrical contractors quote!!
Fresh Spring Rolls are da bomb! They are the biggest I ve ever seen Also they actually have pictures of all the food on the menu so you know exactly what ur getting. The waitress was super attentive n informative.
had the Lion King special roll seems to me it is very westernized Japanese food. The roll was flavorful with shrimp tempura avo and spicy tuna. I personally prefer more traditional Japanese food.
When I visited Toronto I went this place with my friend. As an appetizer we ordered Dukpoki Spicy Rice Cake. For the main I ordered the Stone Bowl Bibimbap with beef and my friend ordered it with mushroom extra beef . We both really enjoyed those bibimbaps and rice cake very much. We have tried many kinds of Korean foods including bibimbap and the bibimbap in this restaurant was better than other places for us. The beef and fresh vegetables in the bibimbap were really great and delicious and it was nice to try various kinds of sauces. Also the staff members were so friendly and attentive. We ll definitely be back next time!
If you re looking for a place where food is going to be the main focus of your meal give it a shot. The tasting menu is a fantastic deal for the quality of the food and an incredibly fun experience for anyone interested in this type of cuisine. 3 starters 2 mains 2 desserts. I have much more detail about individual dishes on my site but to summarize nearly everything was good and most dishes were on another level. full review and pictures on my site.
We were having a Sunday morning walk through the Strip District visiting from out of town and found this place kind of on the far side of all the bustle. Coming from the main shopping area you might not realize this place is even a restaurant. In fact I almost decided it was not but we walked around to the front and saw the door. Glad we did. It was a big plus that there was no line for a table. The place was packed at maybe 10 on Sunday morning but they got people seated. This was our second diner breakfast in two days and the best. The menu is a lot of fun and they remind you Guy Fieri was there with his show which is kind of cool. We really did not try any of the specialty items he tried as we were trying to go healthy for this meal. We shared an omelet with an assortment of veggies and feta. It was really good. The servers tag teamed the tables so we had all the attention we wanted. Prices were reasonable. I definitely recommend it for a good breakfast in this very cool neighborhood.
I felt the need to venture down the rabbit hole and explore this foreign store with the exotic name when it caught my attention one day. I asked myself Was this always here? I walked in and chatted with the lady behind the counter. She was the sous pastry chef and they ve been around since 2009. They recently made the sign bigger I guess bigger IS better!! Lol. It worked on me. The inside is decorated in French classic style with a cute chandelier and trimmings. The atmosphere already screams TAKE MY MONEY! . The display case may look small but it s full of tasty French delights. I always pick up a piece of German Chocolate Cake their signature Rollets and Tiramisu. Now I know who to blame when my skinny jeans wo not fit me anymore. The sous pastry chef informed me they use real fresh cream in all their pastries nothing processed. You can definitely taste their craftsmanship the desserts are light and fluffy with the perfect amount of sweetness. The price is 3.50 pastry but it drops to 3 pastry when you buy 6. It s not cheap but you get what you pay for outstanding quality. They also do cakes for any occasion and recently started doing wedding cakes. I wish I discovered Orchid Pastry much sooner. It s a neighborhood gem and is worth stopping by if you re in the area. They re so good they re gonna make muffin tops of us all!!! Hahahaha!!
Love Culver s! The staff is so friendly and helpful never rude and they do not rush you when they are busy. Great specials everyday! Try the cheese curds Ruben sandwich and a concrete mixer. Do not forget to try their root beer as well.
The restaurant is nice and clean staffs are friendly food is very good.... I ordered Seafood Ramen is the BOMB!!! TAKO WASABI is very yummy!!! Definitely this restaurant is my new favorite RAMEN place.
My husband and I discovered this place one day after hiking Camelback. I have to give the place credit as they did not turn us back when we arrived kind of well dusty. We always go on Sundays and eat from the buffet. They have pretty good selections...mostly the standard stuff. The reason for four stars is really the limited selection. They do have a menu but we re too cheap to order from it when the buffet is sitting in front of us. Okay it s really me...I m too cheap. We also had a great waiter the first time who recommended an Indian beer that we had not heard of Flying Horse Royal Lager beer. YUM!!! It goes with Indian food very well. I think our tab is usually about 20 or 30 depending on how much we drink. If you like Indian food and you re not fussy go! Cheers!
I was here last week they deserve the best rating. The hospitality is on point and the broth to these noodles has the best flavor. Fried rice was awesome. They also make the noodles fresh right in front of you from scratch. Nice fresh looking place inside.
First let me say that my recent trip to David s Bridal in Strongsville could not have been more positive. Here s why My bridal party in tow we were undergoing a marathon trip dress hunting this particular day. Getting married out of state presents a number of challenges one of them concerns hauling a bulky wedding dress across the country. My goal was to find the dress this day one way or the other. After thinking we had found the one for me the bride at Catan s Fashions down the road we made a beeline for David s Bridal hoping to quickly try on a few gowns. The reason for our rush was due to a time constraint at Catan s we basically had 45 min. to try on as many gowns at David s before we would have to rush back to Catan s for alterations pinning if I was going with their dress. It was crazy. Never fun to quickly make decisions on expensive things. Needless to say we did not expect to really find anything at David s...and quite honestly we were almost hoping that would be the case considering the dilemma we faced. The easiest choice was to go with the initial dress we all loved at Catan s. I had already made an appt. at David s this day following the one at Catan s. Due to the rush we were in I called ahead seeing if we could get squeezed in roughly 45min. or so early. No problem said the woman from David s over the phone. As soon as we arrived at David s huffing and puffing we were rushed over to the first fitting room. I could not believe how quickly the staff at David s moved to accommodate our situation. Our stylist Indira happily pulled up my stored list of faves in their database...and proceeded to quickly bring out the dresses I had forgotten about dresses I had picked out on their website 6 months or so ago! What a relief to have a clear starting point for our rushed shopping. Indira was calm confident and extremely friendly reassuring us that we could get through this effectively and timely. Indira stayed with us the whole time personally assisting me in dress changes. 2nd dress in I was sold! The dress is an amazing compromise of everything I was looking for. They immediately took me over for pinning for alterations. The process was seamless pun intended . No delay whatsoever. Very willing to work within the constraints of my somewhat short timeframe for no additional cost. Every person on their staff was extremely helpful and kind. I would go back to David s in Strongsville in a heartbeat!
Dr. Sam is the real deal! Smart passionate driven community and service minded. I could not say enough about this place. A Reason To Smile s name says it all!
Bruuuuuuuhhhhhhhhhhhhh it s good The owner was super helpful and really nice! It s just like the snowballs from NOLA with a little extra! I ll be back again
Yummy Yummy tacos! Great price too I personally would not recommend the shrimp cocktail because it tasted like ketchup also do not spend 4 on the guacamole it s more of a paste and not fresh. I was kinda bummed that they did not offer shrimp tacos seems like they would have them since they have the cocktail and and a shrimp burrito. Over all the food was pretty good and came out fast!
This is our favorite Chinese restaurant. The service is fantastic and the food is always delicious. The moo goo gai pan is my favorite!
I was hungry and found this place. I ordered dragon. It was like Japanese Maki sushi!! Taste very good!! Rice is perfect!!! I m from Japan. I know many sushi restaurant do not know how to make rice.But this place they know how to make it !! Thank u!!! Also sources was very good!! I think they are using own source. I should ask them can I buy source ..........
The pizza is great. The desserts are great. The wings are pretty good. The pastas are impressive portions but sometimes not as great as everything else. The owners are personable and like to talk to the customers. All in all Toci pizza is one of the better pizza places on the west side.
Oh Mama Mia. If there s a chocolate lover in you or with you then you have to put Vosges Haut Chocolat on your list of to do s in LV cuz it s all good in the chocolate bacon and toffee hood. This place totally rocks! I read the reviews and they were all spot on. You go for their Mo s Bacon Bar Truffles and you HAVE to get the Bacon Caramel Toffee for sure! In fact get two cuz you re gonna eat it all once you open it up on the way back to your hotel. Yup that s right. In my case I opened it up in the cab on the way to the airport and by the time I got home they were aaaaallll GONE! Yeah I shared never got so many orgasmic responses on a plane.....and they were not snake induced either. The skinny Asian dude here was a really cool cat. He was like a chocolate connoisseur I asked all the questions about all the offerings and he had a descriptive answer for everything. Yeah he s like Quality Control there he s tried it all. He said the hot sellers were the Bacon Caramel Toffees and the Milk Chocolate Mo s Bacon Bar. I got both. We knew their truffles were good so we bought the Curry ones hot diggity damn good if you re a curry fan. Cuz we were such fine customers he even offered us a small complimentary to go truffle assortment 4pack how coolio is that?
This place is doing nothing wrong. well maybe if you re driving and are looking for parking space then I guess you have some reason grounds to be pissed. I find this really place fascinating because this is the only place that I can think of where the kitchen is bigger than the seating area. All said and done you get good mexican food for good prices. ca not mess with that.
Visit date 9 17 17 So this was my first time there in which we have always heard great things about this place. It s a small place that have cigars EVERYWHERE WALL TO WALL LOL. The staff was friendly nice helpful and even explained thing about the cigars. I do not smoke but I went there because of my husband. They have live music with the perfect sound that s not TOO loud it s just right! I was able to have a conversation without yelling. They also have wine mixed drinks and beer. Even if you do not drink alcohol they sell soda tea and etc. This is a great social place with outdoor seating.
Situated in the Financial District Badali s was suprisingly empty Friday evening. My parents and I were worried that we had not made reservations but it was not at all a problem. The interior of the restaurant has a classical style with warm tones very welcoming. I ordered the following from the 28 summerlicious dinner menu 1 Sundried Tomato Mozzarella and Pesto Arancina V A hand rolled sundried tomato and nut free pesto mozzarella fritter lemon mint aioli 2 Pasta Di Pesce Spada Tagliatelle pasta flaked grilled swordfish preserved lemon pan fried house olives anchovy oil charred leeks 3 Chocolate Delice Coconut Bar Salted caramel The appetizer tasted spectacular. It was small in size but full of flavours. The rest of the meal however was quite heavy and I could not finish the pasta or dessert. The pasta did not look very appealing but it tasted decent. The caramel in the dessert was much too sweet but the bar was well made. Service was great here. Our waters were refilled frequently and the server was kind in offering recommendations. It was a good dinner experience overall.
This review is long over due It seems strange to describe a sales man as honest but that is what Allen is as well as a brilliant IT handy person. He is also super friendly and patient. 6 months ago I brought in my 3 year old laptop that would shut down randomly due to over heating for repair. I looked up different services using yelp and saw Allen s 5 star reviews and called him. Right away I liked him before meeting he was friendly and professional on the phone and asked me detailed questions to try to diagnose the problem prior to meeting me. When I brought it in he immediately allayed my concerns and did not judge me for the horrible condition that I kept my laptop and also was able to properly diagnose the problem by simply looking at the surface of the laptop. He was also very honest and forthcoming about the costs. He suggested that it would cost me about the same or slightly more to replace the laptop with a slightly used laptop rather than repair the one I had. So I ended up buying a used laptop that he had restored to good condition for a fair and reasonable price and he threw in a 3 month warranty which I did not need. It is 6 months later and the laptop still works well and is faster and more efficient than my old laptop obviously and I saved money as I would of eventually had to replace the old one after I paid to repair it. So this is actually cheaper. and it s not just the price the service is wroth it too. I ve been to other repair shops that do not really take the time to answer your questions or seem to care at all or there is a language barrier so they ca not explain anything to you even if they wanted to.
I stumbled on this place a few summers ago and make it a point to get here when I am near the area. I love the chicken with white sauce and all the sides I ve tried are good. Of course those warm cheese biscuits are really tasty.
Had a great meal last night. The coldest beer I have had in a long time. Enjoyed the standard Japanese Steak House menu but they offer a lot more than most. Service was good and all the employees we dealt with were freindly and happy to be there.
The buns are awesome. That s something I notice different about the burgers. The Wheat buns are amazing as well.
Love their tacos!! Really great carne asada tacos. The only downfall is that the tortillas rip pretty quickly so you gotta eat them fast. Very friendly staff!
I ve been going to this shop for years...! Binh is awesome at what he does. Everytime my family or i have need and oil change or tires we know who we have to call. The owner always is accommodating and puts you first. That is why we always come back. P and H always exceed my expectations.. Great place...!!!!!!
Be a good girl and make your boyfriend buy you lingerie from this store.
Super quick and I like how I can out whatever I want on a pizza and watch them make it right in front of me. Staff is always pleasant and I like their lemonade. Lol
I have now stayed multiple times at this hotel and have little to complain about. The prices are in line if not lower of other strip locations and offer rooms that have recently been remodeled with great matresses. The tower room set up is also a big plus to me I appreciate stacked rooms that are easy to access instead of walking miles to your room. Food variety in this hotel is great. The offerings have a steak house chinese italian express and a sports pub. Entertainment is great Zumanity is one of my personal favorite Cirque du Soleil show matching the hotel well. Times square also has a dueling piano bar which is packed at night much fun. The location of the hotel also is right near the center of the strip which is great for driving walking access.
I m not usually a fan of cheesecake or anything cheese related but man their cheese ice cream is good! It s a bit pricy but its the best cheese ice cream I ve had. I only had the original never tried the matcha.
Great quality and variety for AYCE!!! Yum! Great price as well. Food came out very timely and service was fantastic!
This is the best hibachi chain in Cleveland. Service is always amazing and the food is always right. I just went to the Beachwood location too they are all amazing.
They have good food that is well worth the wait... My wife and I get the garlic chichen D. I will say that you just have to be patient for it. They have also improved on their customer service providing better customer interaction.
My daughter loves going to the dentist.. she has been seen by both Dr Wallace and Dr Vinikoor and she feels really comfortable with both of them .. she loves playing in the jungle gym and the arcade games ..
I was SO skeptical about a concept that claimed it could target fat in specific areas but once I tried it there was no denying the results. This too good to be true sounding concept is in fact true! After just two weeks of doing the vacunaut I had lost 2 inches in my waist. I completed the full 12 sessions and continue to go for maintenance. Plus I love how the dermology tightens my skin!
Clean room and friendly front desk. They have a shuttle over to the strip which was convenient. The door lock did not work well probably the batteries. Told the front desk but nothing was done about it.
We had great time sampled half menu and had some wine based off waiters recommendations all great! Staff outstanding will be going back
We stopped there after the big art festival and had great beer great service and great food. Perfect after a day of walking around.
Our water heater broke and we called Ace Services to fix it. They were prompt courteous and did a great job. We had them replace the toilets as well. Aric was the serviceman who completed the work and he did a great job. We would use them again in the future.
This location provided the usual experience you d expect at a Wendy s. The dining area was pretty clean. The was good. The cashier was friendly. The restroom was clean. The service was somewhat fast. It met my expectations.
Homemade Italian done fabulously well! Chicken Alfredo and Chicken Masala were both absolutely delizioso! Crazy good wings! With blue cheese always with blue cheese! Ca not wait to come back for a pizza!!
Stocks loose leaf teas tea pots mugs strainers tins and sweeteners Service Helpful and knowledgeable without being pushy. Generous with samples too Decor did you know that tea is shipped is wooden boxes or jute bags? Me neither but if you want to know what those look like check out the store s decor. It s also quite big and well laid out. Inventory I love their selection. Everything was unique without necessarily having too much of a variety. Case in point I wanted a black chai and there was only one in the catalog. Take it or leave it. I hate when tea stores overwhelm you with options. Pricing surprisingly reasonable Parking This is 9th Ave in Inglewood. Chances are high that the earth will do a full rotation on its axis before you find a parking spot on the street in front of the store. Circle a block or two and walk to the store. Will I go back to the Tea Trader? Absolutely! Quick note on accessibility it s on the second floor so will need to take a long flight of stairs. Something to be aware of if you have mobility concerns
ARIA hotel and casino is beautiful modern and a fun place to stay. The room we stayed in was clean tech savvy and windows gave us a great city view. Everything lights TV curtains etc is remote controlled with its own iPad set up and upon first entering the room the window curtains automatically opens up to great view. Room upgrades to higher floors are pricey but I think is worth it. Several restaurants shows and mall shopping available at your convenience. The hotel staff seemed friendly and the casino floor itself is spacious and well ventilated! I hate breathing in cigarette smoke. Overall great weekend stay! ARIA is now on my preferred list of Vegas hotels.
This show blew me away I use to be a bboy back in the day so I was already a little bias but after watching the show with my wife who is not a break dancer it totally exceeded my expectations. My wife loved the show more than I did. There is so much more than dancing its funny creative and a lttle story telling as well. I cant say enough If I could afford it I would watch this show everytime I went ot Vegas.
If Angela s had a million dollar budget for marketing it would not matter. Fact is no dollar amount could ever purchase the raving word of mouth this place is supported by. You ca not put a dollar amount on a satisfied customer boasting about their favorite Italian restaurant in Charlotte. Based on my own experience I have run across many fans of Angela s both in and out of the restaurant. While dining I have actually had neighboring tables recommend their new favorite dish I should try. While waiting for takeout at the bar I ve run across some regulars telling me everything on the menu is great . YES I AGREE ! And there are even times when Angela s name and good reputation was a common factor to perfect strangers on the street. In fact I myself had tried out the place due to a recommendation nearly two years ago. There are some nights when I go for dinner and they are packed. Wait time is usually kept short unless I have brought a group of people. On the other hand there are times when you have your pick of a table which almost makes me sad. It is hard to believe that a place like this would ever be without a line out the door. The food is delicious the restaurant itself has personality that sparkles due to the friendly service and the devotion that shines through from the owners themselves. The portions are ample and the price is perfect in today s struggling economy. Their website coupons change up from time to time which makes for more of a deal. Pizza is one of my favorite things and it is ny style super good but they have things on the menu that will give my favorite a run for it s money. The Chicken Linda is like nothing else chalk board special and the Zuppa di pesce is memorable. If they do not prepare the sausage and meatballs in house I ve been fooled. But maybe that s because of that incredible sauce they serve it in. Talk about memorable I am of Italian heritage for what it is worth Half star deduction for the tiramisu which is not house made but still good and half star added back for their fresh cannolis. Charlotte Observer wrote that this is a restaurant that is most passionately supported . After being a customer for nearly two years I fully understand that I might have contributed to that title with pleasure.
Venezia s delivers! I mean that in every sense of the word. We were out looking around the area one day and found this location. Since we had just eaten we did not stop but I put it in my memory banks for future meals. I checked their website and found that they delivered to my area. Yay! There is nothing like good pizza delivery after a long day. I have ordered delivery many times from this location and each time they appear at my door in the alloted timeframe with my fresh hot pizza exactly the way I ordered it! I have never called them but used their online ordering system and it works like a charm. My requests have always been fulfilled. The delivery drivers deliver with a smile and are always courteous. As for the pizza.....YUM! It is a New York Style pizza with lots of cheese and great fresh toppings. They have Sicilian style but I m kinda stuck on NY. They also have a children s menu. My daughter is a picky eater and while she like plain cheese pizza her favorite is black olives. I can order the mini cheese and have black olives put on it for her and that works much better then getting a portion of a larger pizza for her. She is happy having her very own little pizza. Their salads are always fresh and crisp. I have not tried their wings yet but I m sure I will. They have some great specials too. If you are near one of their locations within their delivery area give them a try! I m sure I will go to this location at some point but their delivery is so great I m not sure when that will be. Thank you for delivering Venezia s!!!
This is a cute clean little place. The avocado toast is good and filling. The service is slow. We had to wait 20 minutes when we sat down for someone to take our order.
3 years and 37 000 miles later transmission holding strong!! .. So I had Scott s crew rebuild my transmission in Nov 2013. It s a FWD GM trans. and since the rebuild I ve moved across the country and put 37 000 miles on it. Still runs great and feels like new!!! Wish I had a shop like this one where I live now.
The hotel was great. Rooms are well appointed and up to date but the building is historic. The walls are thick making it quiet... both street noise and noise from other guests was very minimal. A great nights sleep. The onsite restaurant was nice. The best feature is the staff. They really went out of the way to be nice and helpful. The concierge at the desk and also Alex and Frank were all great. Alex was ready with water after our run and helped us with whatever we needed. They have a car that will take you where you want to go Frank drove us to a great dinner.
Saturday evening meal could not be better. This place always delivers with great food and a great feeling. So glad they are here!
Great service! Veggies and tofu is free refills. Everything was very tasty! Will be back for sure!
Over the years I have hired every cleaning company that you can think of....from Merry Maids to many many individual girls trying to make it on their own. The results were always sporadic....from one OK job to the worst experience ever. I have never come across a more professional eager to please and friendly company than AZCleanPros. A fantastic group of women cleaned my Scottsdale apartment for several years. The extent that they went to including putting clean newspapers down on the base of my African Grey s perch is far beyond any expectation that I could have had. When I moved to Phoenix I was so relieved that they also provided service in that area. AZCleanPros offers a regular cleaning and a deep cleaning service. And to be quite honest once you ve allowed them to properly deep clean your place in my opinion a bi weekly cleaning really becomes a bi weekly deep cleaning. From ceiling fans to windows to even sweeping my porch outside they stop at nothing. As I mentioned earlier having worked with many many cleaning services over the years I just ca not say enough about what a fantastic experience it has been working with AZCleanPros. I have recently told several residents in my new home about their services and would never consider switching to a different company for cleaning services...no matter what the price no one beats AZCleanPro s bi weekly fee that they work for no matter what the offer. AZCleanPros is just that good. I rarely write reviews but this one is very much warranted. Thank you AZCleanPros for really showing that you care.
One of my favorite local sandwich shops! I love going here for lunch...and i especially like the chunky chicken salad on croissant. Everyone working here has been so courteous and professional each and every time I have visited. The wait from the time you order to the time the food is ready is very minimal. When dining in staff also comes around very frequently to ensure that we are enjoying ourselves. Prices are also very reasonable.
Cool place with good food. Most of their dishes are designed as family style but can be eaten individually. We went on a Wednesday so it was pretty empty however it was still nice and lively with the music. Overall would recommend this place for the decor alone but the quality of the drinks and food are an added bonus.
The best indian food I ve had in Montreal. They deliver take out almost as far as you want and it s delicious on location or as delivery. Bring your own wine beer or buy beer from the nearby depanneur! repost from above because my other account might get deleted.
Amazing Food. Excellent Service. I look forward to returning here again soon for another date night.
Wow so glad we happened upon this place the other day. Tiny menu but it s all done right. Tiny bistro but I like it. Waitresses were wonderful so kind responsive and accommodating. Food came out fresh and fast. We each tried a different kind of eggs Benedict and WOW. Like seriously it was the best eggs benedict we ve all had. I think it was the hollandaise there was so much flavor! Potatoes were excellent. Coffee was fresh. We re coming back to this one.
This hotel is not close to the strip at all. The entire place is non smoking. Aside from that the hotel is pet friendly. The place was very clean and most importantly odor free. The beds and pillows were very comfortable. The continental breakfast was decent for free food. What was most impressive was the waffle maker which were surprisingly good.
Wonderful wonderful salon! Hip helpful staff and a fantastic cut for only 45 . I only wish they were not so far from downtown.
The archery tag game was so much fun!!! The staff was a lot of help and showed us how to make it extra fun so we could make the best use of our time. IF YOU RE AS COMPETITIVE AS I AM PREPARE TO GET VERY SWEATY!
hell yeah I would recommend this place. great service good food and fantastic desserts! the service here is pretty fast. I was half way done with my orange juice and the next thing i noticed was a new glass next to my plate. I would probably rate the food to be 3 stars. It was pretty decent food but i was expecting there to be more variety and selections due to the cost. 23 bucks for lunch! I m a huge dessert fan and I m pretty picky with the desserts I eat. I would have to say hands down this buffet s desserts are pretty dam awesome. I was told the chef is pretty well known and now I can see why. 5 stars for the desserts. If you love desserts fast service and good food this place is a must. PS. The lighting in this place is pretty nice as well the environment is fresh and comforting and there s windows everywhere if you re a windows person
I am still not sure what people expect for dim sum. I have been to several dim sum restaurants in San Francisco and the Bay Area Yank Sing is awesome even if overpriced and Yum Cha meets and in some cases exceeds those places. Flavor choices prices... All on point. Will be back and anyone in the Las Vegas area support this local gem!!
This is probably my favorite place to eat. We normally do takeout as the wait for seating is very long but it never disappoints! Love the food! It is made with quality ingredients and is always very good. Love the decor too. The exposed brick walls are great! If you go during the winter you have to try the winter pear seasonal salad. That is awesome!
The place is super small. I tried to do take outs everytime I visit. The food is ready literally less than 10 mins after you order. Try their pastor taco burrito etc it s soo good!! They also have this thing called ghost pepper which is really really spicy and you have to ask for it. My friend bet me 50 to eat it and I did! It was not spicy it was painful! Do not attempt!
First time trying Whitecastle and it was amazing! They have a veggie slider and it was less than 2.00. The menu is pretty affordable. We went in the afternoon and it was packed. The kitchen is open so you can see them make the sliders! I ordered the Veggie slider with pickles onion and cheese. It took awhile to make but it was delicious. One of the best veggie patties I ve had! Near the cashiers counter is various condiments like ranch sauce mayo Dijon mustard. I would definitely be back!
Fun space with great parking in private lot. lot s of interesting galleries and artists studios with a large space for events. I came for the Yelp Burstday party and it was perfect for that event. Will be back to see more studios.
I travel frequently stay a few weeks at a time here. I have a knack for finding good people. After about three visits on various shifts everyone knew my name. I d hit the door my drink would be waiting. Cheryl Meagan Andy Dan all became good friends over the years. 5 yrs. . Closest place to cheers I ve found in years. I would rate it 5 star but I would not want one to think I d embellish or God forbid be a bit partial.
Lush Fresh Handmade Cosmetics. Now everything is freshly made not in store but all the products have stickers with dates they were made and who they were made by. They offer many different products shampoo body wash soap fresh face masks makeup bath bombs etc. And best yet? It s ALL NATURAL and most of their products are vegan. I used to go to the south hills location and have been a loyal Lush customer since 2010 but when they closed I did not know what to do. I would make trips downtown but I m not a city girl so I do not like the location. However I was extremely excited when Lush decided to come to the Ross Park Mall it was closer convenient and bigger and I could finally use my lush products without having to worry about driving and parking downtown in order to get more. I went in today and bought the following items R and B Hair Moisturizer Tea Tree Toner Water Grease Lightening Cosmetic Warrior and Mask of Magnaminty. Now I wo not lie their products are a bit on the expensive side but it s really worth it. I have almost tried everything they have in store. The NEW! jumping juniper seanik and squeaky green shampoo bars are unlike any other shampoo I ve tried. It leaves my hair so soft. The body washes are to die for. Plus the employees know what they are talking about the woman who helped me today was able to suggest and give personal reviews on the products she suggested. I highly recommend lush products. Yeah they are a bit more expensive but think of all the chemicals you put on your skin and your body to me it is definitely worth paying more for having softer faster growing hair and less blemishes without the chemicals.
We had a great time at the restaurant listening to the music and the food was amazing! I am definitely going back. Thank you for the great food and experience. If you have not been there you have to try it!
Best burger in Montreal. And apparently no one seems to know it because once again we re the only ones here. Fine by me! You go ahead and eat those mediocre A and W or NBG burgers I m gonna be chillin here enjoying the short wait time smackin on these simple yet amazing burgers! And fries! Then go next door to Diperie for some ice cream! Nomnomnomnom
Came here with friends for dinner before heading to the Bruno Mars Concert that night. Love this spot! Great atmosphere and food was delicious! My steak was cooked medium perfectly. I ordered a CHILI RUBBED RIBEYE STEAK WITH MUSHROOMS POBLANOS ONIONS and FRIES!!! My husband and I tried to go again the next day so he can order the steak but it was closed for a private event.
Stopped by for their happy hour and was not disappointed. We split a bruschetta board and mushroom pizza. The pizza was awesome mushrooms seasoned and sauteed just right! The bill was minimal for all that we got. Highly recommend for a great happy hour in Scottsdale!
I was a bit skeptical about this place but I m so glad we gave it a try! Beautiful interior very classy. I love how they give you a choice of lemon lime or orange to flavor your water with. I got a margherita pizza and my husband got some sort of pork dish. Neither of us were blown away with what we got but we did not regret it either. What we DID regret was not getting a burger and fries we saw them at a nearby table and they both looked amazing! Good date place probably even better with a group though.
It s a bit crowded at times but what are you gonna say? It s a Filipino restaurant. Spaghetti is so good staff is very friendly. Enjoyed it
Got my first tattoo here today and loved it! The place is clean and very comfortable. Jess did my tattoo and she is awesome!! She also did my husbands and we were both very happy with her work and with the place. Would definitely recommend and go back.
The consulting firm I work for hired Holtzman in 2015 to remedy a very tough residential project that had been abandoned over an ownership dispute for several years. Holtzman had to work with tough budget constraints and a fairly quick timeline and performed as agreed. He assisted us with selecting designs and products and managed the project without the owner being onsite or even geograhically close. Before Holtzman the full remodel had failed multiple inspections so Holtzman walked into a partially completed project where many items had to be completely re done. Holtzman passed all inspections and was willing to speak to potential buyers during our marketing of the house for sale. He was instrumental is putting the final buyer at ease with his quality of work and professionalism. I would absolutely recommend Holtzman and his team to anyone!
The tacos were a lot bigger than expected which is always good. It was very good and had a cute little Hawaiian feel. I would go here again it s a quick little stop for friends
Travis On behalf of both my wife and myself I want to sincerely thank you and your skilled team for the amazing transformation you performed on our yard in such an unbelievable timeframe! We absolutely positively could not be more pleased with your work nor could we be more impressed by you and your crew s expertise professionalism and attention to detail. Dollar for dollar we simply do not know how any landscaping company in Las Vegas can compete with Ultimate Landscaping when it comes to value and quality of work. The truth is we had absolutely no idea how much TLC our yard needed until your crew first arrived for cleanup. The amount of work they completed during those first hours literally saved us 3 4 weekends of backbreaking labor. Plus we took great comfort knowing that your crew knew exactly how to trim our trees and shrubs as well as which should be removed. Beyond that we greatly appreciate the fact that you and your team truly listened to us when we described our vision for our yard. It brings us great pride every time we walk our property and see our personal selections adorning our front and backyard spaces and we are equally elated with the selections you and your team made. Without knowing the harsh desert landscape as you do we would never have been able to find such beautiful and environmentally appropriate plants nor would we have had any clue where to place them for optimal sunlight and or shade. Thank you again for a job exceptionally well done!
Customer service is not just about what you do when things go right its just as important if not more so how you are treated when things go wrong. My hot water tank was installed quickly and properly things went a bit south when my main shut off valve broke when the poor guy tried to turn it back on. This is not the fault of the installer my house is over 100 years old and as i learnt from the plumber later on that valve was installed before the 70 s so at 50 years plus I ca not say it s anyone s fault it rusted away. The point is Flash Furnace was on the phone helping me find emergency service calling in favours and really just being a person at the other end of the line as I being a first time home owner freak the F out over how to resolve a domino effect of problems I do not know who to call over. In hind sight its quite funny how everything went wrong but at the time Flash was there to help as much as they could and be over all pretty rad people. Anyways they were all awesome and I would recommend them for any furnace hot water tank needs. FYI they are cheaper than home depot quoted me for a better quality tank and better service. Aces!
Tried Bella Gusto tonight for the first time. The food was excellent as was the nifty Neapolitan brick pizza oven. We had succulent calamari as an appetizer which was done perfectly but should have come out with a small side of marinara. So we had to stop our waitress to bring us some of this zesty red sauce. There was a small amount under the calamari and it gave it a beautiful look but not enough sauce for three people to share. Our waitress was fast and efficient but there was no sweetener sugar salt or pepper on any of the tables so she was forced to keep running around for various items. My daughter had the Sicilian meaty pizza while I had the Prosciutto Arugula pizza. Both were delicious and there was no skimping on the shaved Parmesan or arugula. Hubby had pasta and meatballs and some of our pizzas. He was unimpressed with his pasta but this is a PIZZA restaurant after all. Dessert was wonderful daughter and I split the Affagoto a perfect blend of Espresso shot chocolate coffee brownie with coffee gelato. Multo Benne!!! I would like to give this great addition to the East Valley food scene a 5 5 if not for the missing condiments on the table overly loud music not even Italian and the 2 huge big screen sports TVs and the unruly loud table with the 2 boys not toddlers
I love visiting this hotel and I try to do so every time I m in Vegas. I have yet to actually stay here but maybe one day my dreams will come true. I would love a room with a view of the water. Awwww........ I love the front desk the flower exhibits hotel lobby casino and of course the water shows. I could just stand there all day and watch them.
Runyon was the repair service used under my Lowe s clothes dryer warranty. They showed up within the time window and performed the repair. They had to obtain approval and get a part but were back out within a few days. After reading all the negative reviews I was worried but experienced no problems with the company. They use a robo call type service to confirm appointment time the day before where you press 1 to accept the time etc. Also repairman called when he was a few minutes away.
This is my regular go to spot. I usually get a gel pedi by michelle who is absolutely outstanding! Shes amazing at what she does and she pays close attention to detail! Not to mention she is sweet and does her best to satisfy your needs! The staff greets you immediately and offers you a bottle of cold water they are all so friendly and kind.
I came here while getting my car detailed at Danny s and had 2 hours to kill. I ordered the gobbler sandwich with roast turkey stuffing and a cranberry relish. Oh yummy...it s even better than paradise bakery s version. The vibe is cozy and open and has great wifi. When the manager heard it was my first time she came over and gave me a delicious pumpkin muffin with glaze. I m ready to burst but really loved relaxing here. Great place!!
Absolutely stunning every time! This is the Only Place I will order from. They are super reasonable and so friendly to deal with on the phone or in the store!
Great food. Chips are excellent. Good for watching sporting events. Service is fast and friendly.
Decent pizza great value. LOTS of screaming kids running around.
Good food and portion sizes. The bear claws are yummy!
Love the variety! Love the sushi and the strawberry soup! Shishito peppers are fabulous and by far THE best guacamole I ve ever had from a restaurant!
Herbal Nails is hands down one of the best nail salons I have chosen to bring my business to. Simply because they cater to an awful allergy I have to acrylic gel nails. I am a slight nail biter so I have always had fake tips to ignore the habit about two years ago I developed an allergy to whenever wherever no matter what I tried no cuticle oil no primer no fake tips my nail beds would break out with an itchy rash that would barely let me sleep at night until I had ripped my new full sets off. I was devastated and just stopped getting my nails done therefore always being a bit self conscious about my hands! My friends mother is a regular at Herbal Nails and told me about this new product called SNS it is a natural nail gel powder alternative that gives you the same exact look as acrylics without the harsh damage to your nail! Acrylic bonds to your nail bed which is where I developed the allergy all the primer that I had been putting on through the years had taken all the natural oil out of my nails where as SNS is already pre bonded with natural ingredients! So it does not hook to your actual nail and depend on that to stick on. There is no UV lights to wait for it s a simple instant dry! I m telling you I did not think other people had this allergy but after reading up on it I found many similar cases and I m glad I have finally found the alternative with NO swelling or itching what so ever!!! It is a little more of a price for the SNS but if I feel comfortable with my nails and my hands I am willing to pay!!! Also a note this is the ONLY salon that I know of in the Phoenix Scottsdale area who uses the SNS product! GO SEE KATIE! She is so sweet and I believe she is an owner of the salon as well. She takes cares of me about every three weeks and always remembers our stories right where we left off. I hope this review is useful for anyone who possibly has an allergy go try SNS at Herbal Nails!
I recently bought carpet again from Moeen at Carpet and Flooring Liquidators in Pineville. I had a tight time frame I was working with and Moeen was able to get my carpet installed perfectly within that time. Angel and his crew arrived as scheduled and completed the job expertly in the time promised. I would definitely recommend Moeen and Carpet and Flooring liquidators for your carpet needs.
loved this vegetarian place! the portion is good and the food is very yummy! Really liked the blackbean and seitan burger and the quesadilla with avocado! Their dessert is pretty amazing too! the gluten free tiramisu one is delicious and soft! the mango and raspberry cheesecake is amazing too with very rich flavour it gets crowded during weekday lunch around 12 if you do not have a reservation make sure you call ahead to put your name down. the service gets a bit slow during lunch time just because it is completely full
Staff always greets members clean functioning machines. One of the nicest gyms I ve seen and the friendliest people staff make it worth it. Definitely worth checking out.
Lucky s is my fav place to get breakfast brunch in Cleveland. Tucked into a residential neighborhood it is cute friendly and just as tasty as you ll find. I ve been there a number of times and love the vegetarian Canoewreck is my usual go to choice it is so delish. You carnivores should give it a whirl. I always want to venture out and get something new but I love it. Now let it be know that I ve tasted lots of things my friends have ordered and everything I ve tried is awesome. Last time I tasted the Bruleed Steel Cut Oatmeal bruleed oatmeal with fruit topping and these unusual and fab spinach cheese eggs and toast. I sooo wanna get that next time...maybe we should head there for breakfast tomorrow! This place has staff that are friendly and know their menu very well. The coffee is great they have beer and other beverages. This place uses local produce some from their own garden as much as they are able plus other supporting other local and organic food products. We had a breakfast brunch celebration one visit and we called and ordered ahead a birthday fruit tart to end the meal with candles and all. It was beautiful and yummy so keep in mind they have awesome pastries and bakery items too. On a warm day we love to sit outside at their picnic tables where there is full service dining. Love this place hope you get to enjoy it soon too!
Great people AMAZING food! My wife and I were both craving a real hamburger nothing frilly. She found Fat Burger on Yelp and the photos were exactly what we were looking for. Two Double Cheese Boygers one order of skinny fries one order of steak fries a chocolate shake and a Diet Coke later we re extremely satisfied. We would have taken photos but the food did not last long enough for us to get our phones out. We ca not wait to go back and sample the rest of the Fat Boy menu! Five stars highly recommend.
Awesome food. I mean....awesome. I would totally give this place five stars but ... a. I had to wait in line outside in the freezing cold for an hour to even get a table. b. the service was pretty terrible I would normally take off two stars for that but the food was THAT good. I ordered the Huevos Rancheros and Lobster Bisque Soup. mmmm.
always a long wait so ive heard....went there once and waited 30 mins....but once seated the all you can eat sushi came super fast ..we had a group of 6 had all kinds of stuff was very very good food
We had pizza and fries delivered for lunch and really liked the food. The cheese pizza is not too greasy cheesy. There was not anything fancy about the fries but still tasted fine. The only negative was the fact that it took one hour for the food to be delivered. We ll be trying their 30 inch pizza next time!
Yes. That meatball. That giant delicious juicy meatball. I ve been here a couple times first with a big group no problem for deez guys white linen attentive without hovering well timed dramatic what you hope for when you go to an Italian steakhouse in vegas performance nice wine list huge portions...great experience overall. The second time was a date and we sat in an almost fully enclosed booth very romantic we felt like ballers and our waiter pulled out all the stops. In order to get here you must traverse the Fremont Experience and one of the shoddier casino s in town. But it would not be Vegas if you did not feel a moment of indescribable inescapable sadness en route to beautiful indulgence.
First time here and we would come back! Great sushi and great service. We had sake and the Awesome rolls. They were definitely awesome! The place is small and there seemed to be a lot of regulars there which is a good sign.
This IS the best Middle Eastern food in Cleveland and surrounding suburbs. I agree that it is better than Alladin s. Everyone in our party was there for the first time and we all agreed that the food was outstanding. We will be back.
this place if awesome.. i was just tryin to find out a quick bite to eat place and i ve searched.. yelp landed me on this place.. i thought its just a regular place for tacos and burritos but i kid you not this place is something different.. one of the best al pastor tacos i ve eaten by far the cucumber pineapple and spinach agua fresca combo is now my go to drink the girl Norma had me try it first and damn its freaking good.. she even handed me some coupons for my next visit.. and i will definitely come back and dine with my wife and kids..
I use to go here all the time when I worked nearby. Their Penne A La Vodka Penne with grilled veggies are amazing. The family owned restaurant gives you that personal welcome. The chef always going out of his way to personalize my order. You cant go wrong with anything you order. Also tried thier pizzas shrimps garlic bread soup and chicken parmesian.
Delicious gyros and kabobs! Service has gotten a lot faster since they opened. This place is great when I want a quick fresh meal.
Vegan poutine! Got it twice within a few days delicious and memorable. Will definitely be back if I m back in town. One poutine is definitely enough for a meal maybe too much .
Beautiful decor and atmosphere. The food was wonderfully flavourful and not too greasy. My boyfriend took me here for my first authentic thai experience and I was not disappointed. Thai One On did not really count The tapas style was a good approach making it easy to share and giving you enough stomach space to try a variety of dishes. They had a good selection of things that were not your typical and some things that were more familiar. Their curry and khao soi dishes were very flavourful and on point. Nothing too spicy just packed with flavour. Their squash fritters were also to die for. It came with a really yummy tamarind? sauce and it was nice and light not greasy. Because it s tapas style do not expect portions to be big. However the ingredients were super fresh tasty and service was attentive. Will definitely be back some day.
If I had the option of 10 stars I would give them to Dr. Pearce. We were referred to Dr. Pearce through our vet so we had never met him before. It was a holiday weekend and he made himself available to us on very short notice when our beautiful precious Hope s health was suddenly declining rapidly and we did not want her to suffer. From the moment he arrived his incredible kindness and compassion for Hope and for us was beyond what we expected. He treated Hope with the utmost dignity not only in her last moments but even beyond that from the time he carried her out of our home to two weeks later when he returned to personally bring her home accompanied by a beautiful hand written card two ceramic paw prints two framed paw prints and he even gave us extra copies of her paw print to use as we wished. Saying goodbye to our beloved pets is beyond excruciating no matter what age. Hope was 15 and our hearts were shattered beyond measure and we were not ready to say goodbye. Dr. Pearce was patient and kind and gave us all the time we needed to spend with Hope which was very comforting in such a time of overwhelming grief. We are truly grateful that Hope s last moments were full of nothing but the energy of love and gentleness surrounding her making her transition very peaceful for all of us. Thank you Dr. Pearce for your incredible heart for our companion animals and for those of us who love them.
Super sweet and attentive without being overly attentive service and fabulous food we had the caprese kale caesar and the kids had plain pepperoni pizza we had the sausage and onion dee lish ! And the beers were amazing! Pleasantly surprised at how wonderful this restaurant was. Outdoor seating was the perfect temperature at 6pm ish in April!
The Cashier Kunta Gave me Great service . He checked on me and my guest several times. He also informed me and my guest that all the food is cooked fresh to order so there will be a small wait when we got our food it was hot and fresh Thanks Kunta we will see you in September.
First time getting my eyes checked and I felt very comfortable at this office. Everyone from the front desk to the doctor was super friendly!! My boyfriend and I are very pleased with this office and will continue to come here for our vision needs!!! Thanks so much Dr. Hartman and staff!!
They all know me at the bar. Save today no one has ever rubbed me the wrong way. The pb and j burger is amazing. I always come back
I stopped in for a cocktail an expensive cocktail even for the strip. The view is serene with the waterfall and music. The best part is when the frog appears from behind the waterfall and starts singing classic songs. Everyone outside just shuts up and listens.
I m putting four stars because of the smell of the casino and the bed was uncomfortable. But on the bright side everything else was amazing. The view was beautiful service was good parking lot easy to find and network was easy to connect to. Also the noise in the elevator they need to fix that someday. I know that the place is really old but it does not feel really safe to me when I go into the elevator.
A five star restaurant I will never eat at again I do not plan to anyway and I am nothing if not unpredictable. This food is the kind of thing you see prepped at the Bocuse D or just unreal food that is shockingly meant to be eaten. I did not take pics because at the time I was not blogging yet but there are pics aplenty in the interwebs to intrigue you. This could and maybe should be a once in a lifetime experience due to the expense. But everyone should experience this once.
Variety of things to choose from. Cheap and reasonable price. I would call it the first mini Daiso store in Vegas!
We always go to this location for a relaxed atmosphere to get something to eat and play a few games of pool. Their food is pretty good recommend their burgers and quesadilla and the service is usually pretty on point.
I had not been here in a long time but happen to be in the area. It was a Wed night and it was extremely slow. so it was easy to get the perfect seat. Everyone was friendly. The seats were clean and comfortable. Only complaint is that the bathrooms were a little messy as if since it was slow they did not even bother to check on them.
Any place that can make something vegan on the fly is totally awesome in my book. The atmosphere is cozy with lots of booths dim lighting and many nights a quiet live acoustic act outside or near the bar. Smokey shitake mushroom tortelloni on top of roasted spinach and tomatoes. AND paired with roasted fall vegetables? So awesome. My first visit here I had some fantastic ratatouille and a vegan Boston lettuce salad. Quite beautiful and incredibly tasty. I think the price for what you get here is just a pinch pricier than what it should be but it is not going to stop me from coming back.
all together show was put in the nice way. Music stage decoration was wonderful. !!! I dont know how cant YOU LIKE that! You need to understand Circ...and enjoy. I was having a lot of FUN. all together SHOW was CREATED BEAUTIFUL. I dont care about story ...I even didnt know the story ...I JUST GOT FUN and Good time from VISUAL Perfrmence and Music
chatime
I recently had my hair cut and colored by Amie Brooke in this old town gem of a hair studio. Parking available right in front. It s charming as you walk through the all glass door into an inviting atmosphere of concrete floors beautiful chandeliers accented with modern wood and metal accents. It s nicely done. Coffee wine or water is part of the enjoyment when getting ones hair done she offers all three. Listening to music and catching up with Amie is wonderful time. I followed Amie from a prior hair studio because when you find an amazing hair dresser you stick with her.... no matter where she moves! She is gentle caring keeps up with the latest trends and reliable. She s a great hair dresser!! This was actually closer to my house!! I m a product junky so when I saw that she is carrying a different line of hair products I could not wait to smell them try them and see if the shine in my hair could be any more. Kevin Murphy Young Again wash rinse and Kevin Murphy s Young again infused oil was my first purchase. It s a little pricey however it smells amazing and it makes my hair super shiny!! The product goes a long way so it s worth the money. Amie also used a different line of color on my hair and it was absolutely perfectly matched. Ca not wait to see go back. Great time and love my shine!! Thank you Amie!
Rosanna was just amazing. She made our entire night and was just an incredible person. Thank you for such a wonderful night! You are just fantastic!!!
Beyond amazing! Visited this placed 2 days out of my 4 day vacation. Got the Ham sandwich first day. Got the chicken sandwich complete with chicken skin bits on the second day. On both days I got the Fluff and Nut and oh my goodness it was sandwich dessert heaven. The nutella fluff and little rice krispies make the perfect combination in texture and taste. Yum. My mouth is starting to water thinking about it.
I went in to buy a gift card and the young cashier was so helpful. I was in and out of there very quickly. Since it is holiday season it s nice to know they have the employees ready to get you checked out quickly and with a friendly attitude!
I enjoyed the Caprese salad and sausage mushroom flatbread last evening. Plenty of delicious food. The wine selection is also very adequate. I will return when in the area. F
I was at the Riddell football helmet plant. I saw Rubins yelped strong so I decided to pop in for breakfast. The corned beef omelette was great. The hash browns are the real deal. Crunchy on the outside. The large OJ is 12 ounces. I m stuffed and have food left over. Highly recommend.
Went here for my birthday and had a great time. Only negative was they ran out of bread and our server had obviously not been serving long. The pizza is by far the best in the state!
I would definitely come back here the next time I am in Vegas! The breakfast was great and our server Amanda was just as great! Nothing better then good food and service. I am not a big muffin person but the banana nut muffin is a must try!
You gotta sit down stairs order from the bar and enjoy! Get a Sconnie beer and some brats! Red or white both good!
Had I read the reviews on here before I went I might not have gone at all. My experience was much better than most of these reviews. Leslie S was my waitress and she did a wonderful job. Being my first time there I asked her what she would recommend. She made multiple recommendations but the one I decided on was the Sligo Burger medium rare with onion rings. The rings were crispy and hot and my burger was cooked to perfection and delicious. I loved the combination of sweet with heat. The Sligo Burger has BBQ sauce bacon and jalapenos on it. I really like that every booth has it s own LCD TV along with larger ones around the room. That way if you are interested in more than one game you can tune in to one at your table and watch another on the larger screens.
Pizza here is phenomenal great crust generous fresh toppings. I m down in Woodbine from the NW to house sit and will need to make special trips from the NW for this pizza!
Only open for breakfast to the public on Saturdays and Sunday s otherwise they are open for catering events during the week. GO here on the weekend this place is amazing! The food is fresh and not greasy which is hard to come by when going out for breakfast. A cute local spot. They also have great pastries and coffee. If I ever need to cater this is where I will go.
Great service and quality especially for the price. We got the Pad Si Ew with vegetables and Thai Cashew Nut with vegetables and tofu. Both dishes had fresh vegetables which were cooked just right and they gave good amount of tofu as well. Food had tremendous flavor and the right amount of spice. We did not even have to use our hot oil which we always do to make it spicy. We did order vegetable rolls and they were yummy as well. This may become our go to place if it s consistent...
We have used Falcone Crawlspace at least 4 or 5 times. They are very honest knowledgeable and dependable. The most recent work was for brick repair. Joseph did a WONDERFUL job! We could not be more pleased!
An absolutely beautiful and quite enormous interior space in the middle of the city Mildred s temple is more like a temple oasis. Lunch is a hot ticket so much so that you either need a reservation or you are made to wait it out. Is it worth it? Well that sounds like a question from someone who has not actually tasted the blueberry pancakes. You are either a waffle guy or a pancake guy you ca not play both sides of the fence. Personally I d go with the waffle any day of the week. But this is something else entirely. This is the kind of dish that forces you to commit culinary treason. These stacked fluffy pillow cakes are heavenly indeed. The far and away top seller and the house specialty for good reason. The best pancakes I have ever had and it s not even close. This takes first second and third prize. From what I hear from my neighboring diners this is the kind of place where everything is so good but you find yourself never wanting to not get the pancakes thus a constant dilemma ensues. These are the kind of problems I want in my life.... Note although you ll have to pay the restaurant is actually attached to a parking garage. You could always try your luck with street parking.
I love this park!! It is my favorite park to go to especially in the morning. It is very well cared for and clean. I love the abundance of peacocks cats bunnies and chickens. They have everything from picnic tables to relax at a rose garden beautiful historic buildings and even a dog park. It makes me happy I live in Glendale AZ!
I was extremely impressed with my entire experience. Jason responded immediately to my quote request and they came and did the work the same day. I would definitely use them again. My car looks great!
Quite literally grew up with this restaurant and quality has been very consistent! I believe there was a slight dip in quality way back when but it s back on top. Personal faves are the fried doughsticks rice rolls and fried noodles not a big congee fan . This place has always given fast service consistent good quality and is wallet friendly. Two people can easily stuff themselves here for 20 25 bucks and this will make you FULL . Since this is a part of my childhood I ca not imagine ever losing this restaurant! Best HK style breakfast joint in the area possibly the country . NOTE Be careful on weekends they may get kind of packed. In addition you may be asked to share a table which will shrink your wait time but with the sacrifice of privacy.
One day I found a menu for this place stuck in our front door. Ever since then we have ordered delivery a few times. Delivery is usually pretty quick. They always tell me that the wait time will be 45 minutes but it ends up being about 25 30 minutes. The one thing that annoys me about the employees who take the phone orders is that they never tell me what my total is before asking for my payment. Seriously! I give them my order. Then they ask How will you be paying? Cash or Credit Card? I ALWAYS have to ask them Uh what is my total? I mean that is common sense right? They should always tell their customers what their total is BEFORE asking for payment!! I have not tried too many items on their menu but this is what I like so far BBQ Baby Back Ribs I have definitely had better but these ribs were still pretty good. I usually get this if I am really hungry since it also comes with beans fries and cornbread. Bacon Cheeseburger Pizza full of flavor and very filling for a thin crust pizza. Deep Dish Pizza with Pepperoni Sausage and Olives Our party ordered this earlier this week and it was the first time I had actually dined in the restaurant. I rarely eat Deep Dish Pizza but this was pretty good and made me full very fast! They cut the slices so big that I was full after eating just one slice! What I did not like Homemade Fried Mozzarella not sure how to explain this one. I guess I was expecting it to taste like the Mozzarella Sticks you would normally order from other restaurants but it tasted funny. All the Pasta dishes I have tried maybe it was because I ordered it for delivery or on bad days. Their cream sauce for the Chicken Fettuccine Alfredo was too thick and lacked taste. I also felt that their marinara sauce was a bit too sweet. Prices are kind of high but overall the food is pretty good.
Air supply was the best! Our a.c went out the other night when temp was 112 with 115 expected the following day. We called at 5 pm when air went out and 1st thing next morning Ed was at the house. Once it was determined our 26 yr old a.c was dead Ed had a new one with instilation crew here within 2 hours. With outside temps at 115 those guys worked both in our yard and attic and get new unit up and going. The price was fair as we had another contractor from another company in our home at the same time and he told us the price was fair. Thanks Ed and your crew as we are now quite comfy and look forward to our power bills going down.
We originally ordered and utilized the Eliminator B100 from Boyett Family Rayne Water Conditioning. This system worked extremely well and the install was great. When we read of a newer system provided by this company we decided to try it. The Filtersorb media reduces the hard water scale but does not provide a true soft water experience. It also removes the chlorine odor from our water. We are pleased with this product. Another great benefit of this system is that it does not use salt or electricity. This system runs with water pressure only. So now we have the ideal system for us! Yay!
A group of us went on Saturday around 5pm. As non native Pittsburghers it was a little hard to find at first but thankfully there is a huge parking lot. My husband and I each ordered one of the cocktails but there was a mistake and the server brought him a cider instead. It was very loud inside and she offered to get him another but he just kept the cider. We had other issues with servers getting confused with drinks which may have been the noise level or because it did not seem like tables were assigned to specific servers. Otherwise everything was really wonderful! We had the pickle plate and the cheese plate and enjoyed both. We also tried a few of the ciders and cocktails all of which were really great! I would definitely like to go back and try some of their pizzas.
Excellent service! Food is on the smaller portions the uni quite disappointing. But the rest of rolls and nigiri sushi were good. We were party of 4 adult and 3 kids the wait was quite long for our food Well it was happy hours so understandable . The server and the manager were attentive and very nice. I love the ambiance of the place too. Overall we ll come back again! Definitely recommend to friends and family! Yumm!!
Il Chianti is so delicious! It is one of my favorite local restaurants and my daughters and I love to go have a meal here about once per month. The owner chef is so friendly and amazing! He comes out from the kitchen and greets his guests throughout the evening asking with genuine care how you like your dish. Everything we ve had has been simply divine so our answer is always DELICIOUS ! I am certain though that if something were not to our satisfaction or liking her would personally see to it that we had something more suited to our tastes without hesitation. The ambiance is also lovely. The restaurant is small and quaint and feels so warm and welcoming. Some nights there is even live music piano and or acoustic guitar . We love Il Chianti and will continue to frequent and support our local business owner. If you have not yet tried this place do your taste buds a favor and go! You wo not regret it!
If you are looking for quality service go no further. This planet beach is AMAZING!!!!! Me and my mom had gone to the planet beach in litchfield park by brass armidillo and were absolutly disrespected as first time customers. Nothing was right and we left furious after being very stressed and needing this relaxation. So we decided to call this planet beach. They had no issue booking a walk in appointment for us and accepting our free spa day coupon for both of us. We got lost and were so stressed out we said we werent going to come and were gonna go home and the girl on the phone went all out and helped direct us from the area we were to their location and when we got there they apologized for the OTHER store treating is poorly. I fell in love with every single service i was given. I REALLY want to do the membership and go back sometime. I just live far away but believe me when i day the 30 min drive to this location would be much more satisfactory than the 10 min drive to a location that treated me like trash bc i dont look like a tan barbie. Thank you to shelby and the other girl with the black hair working on April 7th at 4pm. We couldnt be any more grateful for your kindness and willingness to work with us! I will definitly try to make it back out there sometime
Saw this foot massage place on groupon and decided to give it try. Very peaceful atmosphere and the foot massage was perfect. Not too hard not too soft. They have this ion cleanse treatment too that s pretty cool. You ca not best this place prices. Take a lunch break and come over here.
Very good food!! My fianc and I love their chronic tacos and burrito. Chipotle and fillibertos have nothing on this place! We will continue to come back here. They have amazing taste a fair price and good portion size. If you are in the mood for a little Mexican check this place out!
An upscale relaxing and cozy place. I ordered the Red Velvet Chicken and Waffles drizzled with cream cheese with a side bowl of fruit and it was excellent. Chicken was cooked just right and the waffles were so fluffy. It was all very filling. I would definitely recommend this.
I am not a big fan of Thai food but I always come back here when I m in town. They have a low priced weekday lunch special menu that has plenty of selections. Their duck curry is fantastic as most reviewers on here have already stated. The waiters waitresses are very friendly and helpful and the food here has an excellent value.
A hidden Gem We Olive and Wine has an excellent choices of wines. The atmosphere is welcoming and friendly. In addition to the amazing wine selection We Olive and Wine offers a light fare cheese and meat panini s small salads. So nice to have a place with a great atmosphere service great wine and light fare. You can also shop for fine olive oils that have been correctly pressed and not overly processed. A hidden gem in the shopping mall close to Kohls and Sprouts once you find We Olive and Wine it will become your hidden gem.
One of my lunch spots I go to on break from work during the week. This place has a nice quiet atmosphere during the day and it is relaxing to get away. The food is delicious to me as well. I ve had the Reuben Burger French Onion Soup Caesar Salad and the Turkey Sandwich. So I ve had a fair share of different items on the menu and every time it is solid and delicious. Definitely worth it to check out if you work downtown. It s hidden away in the Marriott downtown next to the Key Building. It s a nice spot to unwind and get away from work for a bit and have a good meal.
We are outside Olya s normal cleaning area but my Wife kept pestering her and she agreed to make a special trip. Noone was home when she and her team arrived and when I did come home everyone was working hard. The place looked great and my Wife who came home 3 days later said it still smelled good and looked good then. Great attention to detail like who thinks to clean the transom cabinets in the kitchen?! Olya does! Highly recommend and so glad Olya made an exception for us. We are now having her out on a regular basis.
Great beer selection food to die for. Never disappoints. It s a Pittsburgh classic. Must try if your in south side. Beware of the menu size! So many good things and not enough time to try!
This place is full with good looking girls serving great service and delicious food ! Come watch the game with them and me of course I ll be here for s while I have free micheladas
I went back here tonight this place is still AMAZING!! The salami shrimp and octopus appetizers were amazing. I had lobster risotto for my main course omg so good. Seriously this place is fantastic. Everyone should come here.
We were in the area sight seeing and needed a place to grab a quick bite. This meal was delicious!!
YUM! I like this place alot! I went with my son. I had a special green chile tamale with two eggs potatoes and black beans he had their signature french toast. Mine was excellent but after a bite of his french toast I wish I had his!! There is alot of love for food here. It is a busy place so plan for a wait. The place lost one star just due to its business and pricing was slightly higher than some of the other breakfast places in the area. I am coming back however!! OFTEN!!
Of course I m gonna love this place. A specialty store for hip hop records that serves great coffee and has performances by artists like Onra? I could not have dreamt up such a place! I mean where else in the world let alone Pittsburgh are you going to find a store with old Brand Nubian records next to Africa Bambaataa next to Black Sheep I m getting chills writing this sentence! . My only grudge is that their food though very ambitious in its eclectic menu leaves much to be desired. But who cares? I could probably spend all day here going through their records alone. This place is a gem.
This was our first visit to Cleveland and came here on a Sunday just before noon to have lunch. We had a guacamole flight salsa verde and a flight of margaritas. The drinks were fantastic with the blood orange being my favorite. My wife picked the guacamole with goat cheese which ended up being our favorite. We finished up with the Machaca beef brisket taquitos not because we were necessarily hungry but just could not resist trying another dish. We could not finish it all and I regretted not being able to take leftovers but we were travelling and that just was not an option. The dcor of the restaurant is really cool with all of the lucha libre items hanging on the walls. If we lived in the area I m sure we d be regulars. Next time in the Cleveland area this will definitely be on the list of stops.
Always a great time to be had here. The place is always super clean. The owner is super nice and great to work with. I am sadly thinking my daughter who is almost 5 is almost done with visiting this place but it was fun while it lasted!
Star Bar has a great atmosphere and the space is really well designed. The owners and bartenders are all friendly and laid back. They do not have a great food selection during the week but the tap list is one of the best I ve seen. This is definitely an awesome spot to grab a drink if you re on the near east side.
Excellent and no hassle service. I was in the car within 10 minutes and on my way. I would recommemd National.
Been coming here for 4 years. Go to spot for Yaki and other unique treats. Always bring out of town friends here and I will always come back. Late night Asahi and skewers will always have my heart!
My favorite store to buy books. I like the coffee shop inside as well. Very pleasant to read with a cup of joe. Been coming back for more than 7 years!
We ve been Dilworth Pediatrics patients since they opened their doors. I highly recommend the sweet patient and knowledgeable Dr. Jon Kocmond pron. Coke mund but we have had wonderful care from the other doctors and all of the caring nurses and even from the cheerful ladies in the front office waiting room. To provide another counterpoint to Erin A For over 8 years we have NEVER experienced a long wait or felt that a visit was taking an absurdly long time. As a matter of fact when we ve visited with a sick child we ve been seen very quickly including on Saturdays and Sundays.
Inexpensive casual place for a great burrito. I have been going here for over 10 years and I ve always had a great meal. It is a little bit of a hike for me to get there but well worth it! The chicken and beef burritos are very tasty and the salsa is awesome they have many to choose from . I recently tried the fish tacos for the first time and they were also very good. I highly recommend this place the food is great!
I will give it 5 starts because the owner is very friendly and welcoming. They have arcades ping pong pools and have karaoke nights. Go before 1am and get some cheap drinks w your friends!
Pretty impeccable service. Consistent too. Have eaten 5 various meals here breakfast lunch late night over the past year and have always been happy with the food. With the exception of the stock Hash Brown patties which are shaped like small hockey pucks and are a bit mushy inside. Apparently you can specify that they be flattened smashed on the grill and fried up well done which I will try next time. Love the Huevos Rancheros with a side of Turkey Bacon. The Huevos comes with a grilled whole Jalapeno a delicious touch. And an entire table Thermos of coffee shows up when you order coffee. Yes it s never a cheap meal but the idea is that you have some sort of resort credit or players comps that you want to use here. Great people watching too it s a wide open multi level seating area that reminds me of a modern college cafeteria a good thing .
I ve never loved going to the gym until I came to TruHit. The new owners have created a community. They are like a second family to me. I love coming here and I have made lifelong friends because of it. The workouts are tough but I always feel amazing afterwards. Come to TruHit! It s the best!!!
when we used to live in north york we came here quite a lot. services are ok i am really expecting super great services as long as they are not rude i am fine with it. food came out fast rolls are good. selection are fine. i like all their rolls. if u paid cash you get 15 off. if i was still living close there that will be my spot. only i wish them have a lit more special rolls.
Three gluten free options! Lunch sandwiches are large generous portions. Great place to grab a quick bite. Everyone working was accommodating and so very nice!
I was there the other day with a small group. I was impressed with their blackboard specials but did not order from there because most were whole fish servings. What I ordered were sea urchin and salmon carpaccio black cod miso and pickled vegetables. The first two were very tasty and creatively made. The three pickled vegetables were a mix of sour sweet and bitter and the waiter could not identify them when asked. I look for creative cuisine when I eat out and these Japanese tapas did not disappoint. I will definitely be back for the blackboard specials to share with a friend.
My wife and I are regulars... GREAT food and great service. Oscar the bartender is consistently friendly and attentive and Ozzie the owner is there to open the door shake your hand and great you EVERYTIME!! There are other great Italian restaurants in Vegas but for the locals this is a hell of a Gem!!! Side note.. Mike at Bogeys the bar next door is also the best!!!
This charming dinner whisks you away to simpler times! It has a very authentic 1950 s American dinner vibe. And just so happens to have the greatest chili dogs north of Coney Island! The food is typical diner food along with some Greek plates and all very reasonably priced. The service has always been excellent and I love drinking a cold coca cola from a tall glass bottle! Definitely go!
She is fantastic! I came her to because my boss recomended her...it s always scary taking your wedding dress to someone...especially when you are on a very tight budget. For our wedding there were two brides so we had two dresses double scary. She had great customer service. She was also fast...one week we did the initial fitting the next week final touches and later that week done eventhough my dress had a lot of beadwork. She was also honest if something did not look like it fit she would let us know and if something was not needed she did not suggest things to get more money out of us.
After a little trouble finding parking for the RV me and the fam pulled into Brownstone national park mid afternoon on a Saturday and were immediately impressed by the ultra modern looking registration area. A camp counselor greeted us right away and told us to set up shop wherever we liked! Comfy seating and basic roofing meant we could leave the tent in the RV for another time which was a huge bonus because honestly as much as I love the wife she s like a soggy taco shell when it comes to holding stuff. Earlier in the week we were razzin the kids about making them sleep outside the tent with the bears! Haha. Hell it got them to do their homework brush their teeth groom one another etc. Unfortunately the camp employee we spoke to said they only had beef chicken and fish up there most of the time. Shame. As our first night at Brownstone wore on I decided to leave the roofed area and take in some of those pearly white southern Ontario stars! While outside I met a LOVELY fellow camper by the name of Big Dwayne. Big Dwayne if you re reading this.....I want you to know that you made me feel something I ve never felt before. Also TOOT TOOT TOOT TOOT WIGGLE WOGGLE ZAM! Hahahahaha! Overall me and the fam had a great weekend at Brownstone park. After that first night we were not allowed back in the roofed area which was f i n e by us since fresh air is the elixir of the Gods! I m not sure what that Amanda H is on about. Sounds like she thought she was at a restaurant or something and her and her friend s steaks got switched. Then they sat there like a coupla dum dums and ate each other s steaks and complained. ROTFL. P.S. Try the special camp drink Delirium . The kids were out like lights by 6pm and still have not woken up! Cheers! We ll be back!
We thoroughly enjoyed our meal here with another couple it was all our first time eating here and the experience was amazing! We were at a table right in front of the kitchen most people may not like that idea but it was awesome to see everything going on. The atmosphere was sexy and intimate. The signature cocktails were delicious specifically The Drifter and Mr. Jitters plus they offered a wide selection of fine whiskey bourbon. We all shared a bit of our dishes with the table best way to taste everything. I preferred the 28 day aged filet compared to the American Japanese Wagyu. Definitely recommend getting your steak Oscar style with the crab asparagus and bearnaise sauce also the Beef Wellington and Foie Gras felt like butter. The sticky toffee pudding and sorbet trio were to die for! It s pricey but worth it!
Looking for good and cheap dim sum places? this is the spot to go! 1.98 dish during weekdays and 2.38 on weekends Unlike every other 2 dim sum spots Vince restaurant offers both value AND quality. Menu is extensive they have 7 different kinds of fillings in their rice rolls and 6 different buns. Everything came out relatively warm made fresh. I would give it 3.5 stars for food but because of the value and comparison to other Chinese 2 Dim sum places this is where you will get the most bang for your buck.
Some friends and I had driven past this brewery several times wondering when it would finally open. On a whim last night we called and found out they had been open for just over a week so we decided to stop in. We stayed for about 2 hours and had such a great time talking to the owner and brewmaster Rob. Just to set it straight this is a brewery first and foremost. There is ample seating throughout the open design including some luxurious and not yet beer stained couches and enough room for about a dozen beer lovers to belly up. Since they have only been open for 10 days at this point it was disappointingly not packed out at all. I realize that Four Peaks is just down the road but that place is usually over crowded to the point one might think some patrons would wander this way to check out Sleepy Dog. Each of us started off with a flight of their 5 currents beers. The samples were a nice size and it only cost 3 per flight. That s amazing to me! These were the beer types Pilsner Hefe Pale Irish Ale and a Scottish Ale. They were all very good for their respective beer types. As my buddies both agreed on the Hefe for their ensuing pints I favored the Scottish Ale. While we sipped on our brews the bartender Jen prepared our nachos and hotdogs and made sure we did not run out of our beverages. Rob graciously unfolded the story behind the Sleepy Dog name sorry you ll have to go to find out for yourself and how he started brewing in his home until he became serious about it and went to school as well as travelled abroad and throughout the states picking up experience and touring breweries. From the bar it is wide open into the brewery itself so you can see where your beer came from. Rob mentioned that on Sundays they are giving tours of the facility will have beer specials and throughout football season he will have many of the games on. He saved no expense on the flat screens...they re very nice. And because they are a microbrewery and not a brewpub he encourages people to bring their own food if they like. Their short menu is just enough for someone who is really hungry or just wants nachos and or a hotdog. Very soon we should also begin to see other brewerys beers on tap as well as a cold box with bottles or cans of other varieties. The beer was delicious bottom line. I believe they re cooking up an IPA as well as another type that should be ready in a couple weeks. Sleepy Dog Brewing provides their beer to many restaurants and other brewpubs around the Phoenix area. Although it is not your typical growler they do provide a unique receptacle for taking beer to go and they sell kegs with a very modestly priced deposit. I hope to see twice as many people in here next time I go which will be soon. And I hope that people really get behind this local microbrewery. I know we are. Cheers.
Once again Ruby Watchco has wowed us with another delicious dinner. Every dish had depth full of flavors wonderful textures and balanced. Ruby s Corn Cobb Salad was divine! The best cobb salad I have ever had. The smokiness of the bacon and sweetness from the corn so good! Sleger s Living Greens Romaine Hearts Bacon Hen Egg Tomato Aged Cheddar Green Goddess Brown Derby Vinaigrette The most yummy part about the Pan Seared Steelhead Trout was the skin. It was palatable savory and oh yes crispy. We loved the Ratatouille trimmings. Brown butter roasted cauliflower was aromatic smoky and sweet. I also loved the fingerling potatoes with olive relish and carrot slaw with creamy tartar dressing and how they complimented the trout. When I first saw the dessert Chocolate Berry Fool Dark Chocolate Summer Berries Candied Hazelnuts. I did not know what to think. But let me tell you it was out of this world! It reminded me a little bit of black forrest cake but a thousand time better. Rich without being too chocolaty. Staff were friendly and attentive as always.
I absolutely LOVED this place and the food. The restaurant is small and cozy the waitress is very friendly and attentive and the attached European grocery has some delicious items that you ca not resist. I had the Sampler plate that had 6 pierogis your choice from a large selection a wonderful salad of cabbage and fresh dill a huge DELICIOUS cabbage roll with a delicious tomato sauce or mushroom gravy if you prefer a large serving of kielbasa and several small servings of condiments. It s was the best cabbage roll I ve had in many years and made just right. I will go back again and again to this authentic Eastern European restaurant.
Being second generation Italian people ask me where my favorite Italian place in Vegas is and Nora s is it. But not the whole menu. For me Nora s is about one thing and that thing is the eggplant parmigiana and the cannolli . I ll get to the parm in a sec but definitely start your meal out with one of Nora s family style salads. We get the house salad and even the generous portion is polished off easily by a group of four. The garlic bread is a take it or leave it thing. I ve taken people here who thought it was great and others thought it was okay. The garlic ensures that you definitely need a breath mint after just one slice and if you plan on locking lips with someone later on you may want to pass on it. I ve eaten in Italian restaurants all over the country and they serve the best eggplant parm I ve ever had. Thickly cut with a meaty texture fried to perfection and topped with a generous portion of mozzarella cheese then popped in the oven or salamander it s to die for. Maybe they put a little too much cheese on top but I m the type of guy that says you really ca not put too much cheese on anything. Also I d get a side order of meatballs they re top notch. If you do not like eggplant I d go with the baked ziti. It s served a little different with balls of ricotta covering the top of the ziti. The pizza is solid but not NYC style so if that s what you re used to just order the eggplant. They do make a white pizza which is kinda hard to find in Vegas. I would not order the chicken parm or the chicken Marsala it s not made the way people are accustomed to and besides I told you to order the eggplant so why are you looking at other menu items? At the end of your meal I deplore you not to leave this joint without ordering cannoli. They re just like momma made em crisp shells filled with a sweet but not too sweet creamily delicious ricotta topped on one side with pistachios and the other chocolate chips. I ve also tried the tiramisu which is very good but takes up precious cannoli space in my stomach so I usually do not order it. For me going to Nora s and not getting the eggplant is like going to a steakhouse and ordering a side of veggies. This is my go to place for some just how momma made it eggplant meatballs and cannoli.
A great little place for lunch. Very authentic Northern Chinese cooking. Did not order their signature soup dumpling. But the three dishes that we order for lunch was delicious. My favorite was the sauted string beans. Shredded pork and veggie and Ma Poa Tofu was equally good. Food is good enough to overlook the place not being tidy and service not being the best. Will definitely want to come back to try other dishes.
Came here for dinner tonight with friends. One of my friends was a smart cookie and called ahead to make a reservation for 10PM but as it turns out we showed up earlier and got in at around half past eight! We skipped the long line and were seated quickly. I can say that we would have not gotten in without that reservation..kudos to my friend. The place is expensive but we were all ready to splurge. Myself and a friend had the sea snails in garlic as an appetizer. They were scrumptious as I always find snails to be. I never have French food without them! As my entree I had the buttered steak with frites fries . It was tender and juicy and I could have eaten more of it! The fries were crispy and tasty as well. Service was very attentive and pleasant even though our French was not good! Dessert was a peach sorbet for me and it tasted a little bit like peach tea ice cream..not what I was expecting but still good I suppose. The place is pricey but I would recommend it and come back! Sitting outside in the summer is also very nice!
I ve never once been disappointed with the food here. Yo Rita is a place you do not expect to find in Pittsburgh it seems like more of a Chicago type of joint. Reading some old reviews it seems people were upset with portion size and pricing if you have not been here in a while you need to give it another try. I ve never left without being uncomfortably full of delicious food at a fair price. And I also saw people complaining about parking...this is not Manhattan it s not that hard to find parking. You just might have to gasp! walk a block or two. I guarantee you ll survive. Now for the FOOD you start off with free chips and salsa. One is a milder salsa and the other is just a touch spicy. The chips are warm and delicious beware that you could easily ruin your appetite as you get free refills on the chips. DRINKS I ve had a margarita here a few times and they were good if you re into that. I m more of a beer drinker and they have some beers on tap as well as Modelo Tecate Corona etc. TACOS I ve never had a taco I did not like here. They change up their menu now and again but always have a few that stay. The Santa Cruz is great and so is the BBQ Chicken for people not willing to venture out to their more exotic choices. I ve always found that two tacos is more than enough for me and usually females are completely full after one taco. The prices run from 6 9 usually but as I mentioned two is more than enough. The space is a bit small so blast of cold air from the door can be a bit uncomfortable depending on which table you sit at but they usually keep the heat up pretty high to combat that so it s not such a big deal.
My first experience of B Spot was over a year ago. At the time I was not yelping so I never wrote a review! I do remember my first time being just mediocre. I ordered the Lola burger I believe and remember thinking okay as I ate it. If anything I loved the fries. BUT I just recently returned to B Spot for dinner. I had to pick between this or Paladar so I thought why the heck not let s give it a second chance! My second experience was much tastier than the first granted I am not a huge burger person . I ordered a BLT this time around with an egg. Oh my god. So much bacon! Such a big sandwich! Yummy runny yolk! Oh and I really love bacon! So I am an advocate for all non burger loving people to go to B Spot and try the alternative items on the menu that do not involve ground beef. Furthermore the individual I went there with loved their burger that had a turkey patty. More reason for me to go back!
Every city needs someone at the edge of things to keep that city moving forward culturally socially and even financially. Stray Cat pushes the edge in Phoenix. They put on professional work and continually challenge audiences over 10 seasons. Hooray for the edge.
Nice place with lots of room and very attentive. We came on Thanksgiving mid afternoon hoping for breakfast brunch but because of the holiday they were not serving it understandable. Ordered a simple steak sandwich with fries and a chicken brie sandwich. Both were very good but the complimentary bread is straight up addictive! We also saw some of the other dishes that came out of the kitchen like the french onion soup that looked tasty. Had a very good server who checked in often even on such a busy day. It s decently price would recommend to anyone visiting here but please stay away from the hotel in general. I would say that s the only negative of the restaurant and only positive of the hotel.
I ve wanted to try this place for a long time and glad I finally made it! If you have not been here yet and wanted to try some good Persian food this is a place for you BUT come hungry the plates are huge one dish for one is meant to share for two. This place has really high end interior with a fancy stair to the 2nd floor. You can call it classy or I do not know they are trying... Food was delicious! Eggplant hummus started very well for us we could taste only a hint of eggplant but good enough! Two of us also shared a plate of lamb and chicken with rice both meat were nicely marinated yet flavorful and so tender! And the rice was very fluffy. Maybe we had too much hummus and pita even with just one order of entree we still had leftover. Again portion here is big!!! Will definitely come back for me but will always come with friends!
I love HT but I can only give them 4 stars. The staff is always helpful and friendly the store clean aisles stocked. I have to downgrade them for their lunch and dinner buffet which should be convenient. I do not understand how a store like this with access to everything cannot COOK BEEF PROPERLY unless it is hamburger. We had their Smokey Bones package and the ribs were always dried out. The beef brisket was fine for a couple of times then tough as nails again and again. I had to braise the beef for over 50 minutes to tenderize it. Again their prime rib was excellent then it went downhill tough and gristly. Get any kind of sliced beef on the lunch line and you can tear your teeth out trying to chew it. Does not their chef check these things before they go out to the line? Do they not know a tough cut of beef has to be cooked for more than an hour to tenderize it? This stuff should melt in your mouth. I learned if you ca not cut it with the serving spoon then do not buy it. They also always serve chicken 7 different ways that gets tiresome. 4 5 kinds of wings fried and baked They rarely have anything but salmon but they cook fish beautifully. Their catfish is excellent when you can get it. And ham wow I do not mean their deli ham chopped up but a real ham that has been baked with a glaze. Of course we love it so it is never served anymore. We started going to the John J. Delaney store as their buffets are huge and wonderful except the same problem! The beef is always tough! Last time it was their stroganoff and the servings spoon would not cut a single chunk of beef. What as SHAME! I have also requested they post their daily menu online which they just wo not do. It is hit or miss.
Stopped by DiAnoia s a few nights ago to celebrate our anniversary. We were seated near the window and were greeted by a friendly waitress. We immediately ordered drinks the house red blend for me and the amaro new fashioned for him. Both were great choices! Next up was the appetizers we decided on the heirloom tomato tart fresh bread and a side of olives. Try the heirloom tart it is outstanding!! For our main course I got the cacio e pepe and he went for the gnocchi. Both were quite tasty but the cacio e pepe was a little too watery for my liking. We were so full from dinner but just HAD to get a piece of tiramisu to go. I have pretty high expectations for tiramisu and unfortunately this one fell flat. It had an odd lemony taste to it which completely threw off the flavor profile. All in all I will absolutely be back!
Chelsey and Laura are fantastic! I m always asking them to push hair boundaries....extensions black to blonde and back again bangs...I m obsessive with my hair...and these two are talented and understand your needs. I would highly recommend them!
Wow great place!! Went here for brunch. We did not have reservations but they seated us on the patio which was perfect. It was hot but patio was covered so it worked out. Everything we ordered was yummy. Service was wonderful. Located in a cute area neighborhood.
Dave and the rest of his staff are great. My wife felt therapy is useless until she went to A . We would use them again no questions asked. They are very professional and personable. We told her ankle doctor about them and the doctor is going to send his referrals there. great results!!!
So Good! I love the atmosphere and the food. It s always a great place to go with a groupo of friends! Recommended!
I have not had an issue with this location. Pizza is always fresh and ready when I arrive for pickup. App ordering has made the process so much easier. There is a taller young guy that works there who is always very nice I do not recall his name.
Really Enjoyed our brunch here a few days ago. Food was delicious and service was great. I only wish my lemon was not so tiny could not taste it in my water. But overall great experience.
This place is amazing. The chef and staff were so friendly and made the environment so comfortable. The food was delicious. If I could give this place 6 stars I would. I ca not wait to come back to Vegas. This will definitely be a place I recommend to anyone visiting. I had the breakfast stack sandwich with cheesy hash browns fried egg and turkey sausage. So delicious!! The picture does not do it justice.
Prior to training with Ron I became frusterated with the extra weight I couldnt seem to strip off after developing Chronic back pain and a grade 3 hamstring strain. I was referred to Ron through a friend who also had a positive experience. My goal was to lose 15 lbs of body fat and just overall feel better. In less than 3 months I saw my body fat drop from 19 to 10 while adding lean muscle mass. Better yet Ron s program also helped my back and hamstring pain feel 100 times better which I was not expecting. Ron is attentive creative fun to be around and he loves his job!! I would recommend Ron to anyone looking for a results driven trainer!!
This little gem is situated in Liberty Village. Since Winterlicious is now on i decided to take advantage of Mildreds Amazing Winterlicious Menu. Upon arriving we were escorted to our table extremely promptly. Our server Welcomed us to the restaurant and asked us would be like a beverage. The server s knowledge of all the beers wines and drinks MTK had to offer was in my opinion amazing. We were recommended a pale ale beer which i have to admit was quite tastey. My guest was given a glass of champagne which she also enjoyed. We were given buscuits for the table.. which were nice. i wanted more When it comes to a winterlicious menu... some restaurants do not give you a lot of selections. MTK gives you a lot of choice. For my appetizer i decided to go for the Shrimp and Crab Cakes these came in portions of 3 with s side of garden salad. I was highly impressed. My guest went for the Warm Beet Salad and while she did enjoy the salad itself... the portion was a little too big. For our Entree we both decided to go for the MTK Burger. This was amazing. The burger is cooked to how you would like it. Our server recommend Medium .. so we agreed. The burger is presented on freshly baked bun with carmelized onions relish and upon recommendation lots of handmade aoili sauce. The fries comes in a little pot beside the burger and was just enough to seal the deal. Id recommend this to anyone. One of the best burgers i have ever eaten. My Compliments to the chef. Upon waiting for dessert i asked our server for a Latte.... This was one of the best lattes i have ever drank. I made sure to tell her that too. For Dessert i decided to go for the profiteroles.... These were also extremly tastey. Amazing Service Great food and the friendly atmosphere makes Mildred s the place to be in Liberty Village.
I have been living in this town for 17 years. The owners and employees at HOS are all PHENOMENAL. No marrer waht your question is they will get you the answer quickly. As for the owners they are so knowledgeable about every item they sell and they go out of their way to educate you not just make a sale. I would recommend House Of Smokes to anyone.
Amazing food from an amazing family owned restaurant. Always fresh and delicious. I do not eat much meat and there are always plenty of vegetarian options. We re always welcomed with a warm greeting and treated as friends. Very thankful for this incredible place!
So my Roomate and I have gone several times now to Le Thai. We take everyone when they come to town. It s all the way on Fremont 30 mins from my house so unless I m gonna be on Fremont I do not go. But we got some waterfall steak thing last time and it was the best!!!!!!!! They usually have a 30 min wait but that s bc it s the best Thai in Vegas. So it s worth the wait and if your down on Fremont it s a great choice Garlic rice beef is the best thing on the menu. I ve tried like everything and I ca not find a more flavorful dish
I went to Urban Taco awhile back. I was immediately blown away by the interior and the decor. I was comfortable before I even say down. Then I got the food and will forever be a fan of Urban Taco. Great spot for dates too.
Love this place!! Came here earlier in the week and last night. Sat at the sushi bar. Ordered salmon carpaccio salmon sashimi and a salmon seeker. All were excellent. Shared a couple bottles of sake with my buddy Steve. This sake is smooth as ice. Atmosphere is warm and welcoming. Will definitely be returning more and more.
Nice casual atmosphere pleasant ambiance. The staff is very friendly and helpful with the menu but stuck to the strict no substitutions rule. I ordered a reasonably priced lunch special Chicken Chow Mein. It came with a really tasty soup rice and veggies in broth. The lunch portion was more than enough for me but I did make one mistake. I ordered my dish at a level 7 spicy. Apparently I have a weaker tongue than I thought. It was so spicy I could not finish more than a few bites and I m STILL sniffling 20 minutes later. But the saving grace was the tiny egg roll that came on the plate. It was amazing. I d go back with friends to give it a second try but I ve learned my lesson with the spice!
With the exception of a brunch buffet this was hands down the best meal my husband and I had in Las Vegas. Easy to find in n out and inexpensive most places on the Strip are overpriced and not worth it. We should have found this our first day.... My husband has never had Thai food and our waiter was very patient as to getting his likes and dislikes and choosing a dish that would EASE him into Thai BBQ Short Ribs. Perfect choice! They were delish and left him wondering why he never tried Thai before. We will definitely return on our next trip.
Love this hotel.. We stayed here in October for 4 nights.. we stayed in one of the suites in the newer tower. Our room was amazing!! We ordered room service atleast once a day and we ended up figuring out the room service was better then the some of the restaurants in Vegas. The pool was OK.. if your looking for a fun pool with music and young people.. this isnt the pool to go to.. but overall the hotel is awesome!
super long line buy worth the wait i love the oepn face sandwich if u are in old port area this is a must try
This pepperoni pizza is my I m at home looking disgusting sidekick. Due to it being relatively close we choose to pick up and wait times are standard 20 minutes. But I do not know if it s the type of pepperoni or sauce but this thing is fantastic! Out of all the pizza delivery places this might be my fav. Pizza Nova used to have my heart but the one in my area s service and quality is horrendous so I m an FBI convert and there s no looking back!
Ok so i been on a KETO diet for 4 months now and its really hard to find good food that i can have with this diet and not fan of salad... i know!!! But these salads are the best!!! This place is awesome and you can order with app and your order is complete in minutes!!! CAVA people are awesome. Definitely great place for lunch dinner and snack time. Come try them out if your into Mediterranean food.
Great little cafe and restaurant to grab a bite to eat! Relaxed atmosphere and the owner and staff are very sweet! Good food coffee and pastries! Will definitely be returning soon.
Casual Korean place in the lower level of the ParkTowne Village shopping complex. They have the usual Korean fare on the menu but are best known for their KFC Korean Fried Chicken. I got a small combo for 11.95 which consisted of 5 wing pieces 3 drumsticks and a side. I got 4 spicy pieces and 5 regular pieces. For both flavors the skin were super crispy. The garlic flavor was pretty good while the spicy pieces definitely had some heat to them. Also got a side of coleslaw which was okay. Food was served reasonably quick. Was definitely some good fried chicken. Could not finish the combo and took home two drumsticks.
Excellent service! Just had to wait cause they were busy it was a Saturday. Ramen and special French fries was really Good!
I just ate here for the first time. I had the Lebanon and sauerkraut sandwich. I think it was the best sandwich I have had in years! WOW! Thank you Duck and Decanter. I ca not wait to eat here again.
Came to Yard House for dinner before going to the airport to leave Las Vegas. It s in a mall made to look like a quaint downtown shopping center. Pretty nicely done actually but would be nicer if they closed it off to care traffic. We likely would not have found the place though were it not for our GPS leading us straight there on city streets. Was busy for early evening but we got a table right away. The staff was extra attentive and got us everything we needed. My boyfriend and I were meeting friends and since we had a plane to catch ordered before they got there. Getting meals at different times and two different bills was no problem for our waitress. What a relief! Perusing the menu I was surprised at the selection. Though the Yard House is a brew pub they have a pretty interesting and appetizing menu that include gluten free and vegetarian options. My boyfriend got a grilled ahi salad and I got the mac and cheese which is nothing like the usual mac and cheese. It had chicken bacon and wild mushrooms in it with a small pasta I d never seen before. The sauce was made of several exotic cheeses and it was delicious! My friend s four year daughter shared it with me so though I thought it gourmet and exotic it was easy enough for her to enjoy as well. I tried the ahi and it was really tasty too. Our friends got burgers with cones of crispy french fries and everything looked delicious. Overall the restaurant is a loud and happening place but seems to be a good place to bring kids while still feeling like you re having a night out on the town. Prices were very reasonable and the service was fantastic. I would definitely come back.
If you want to eat yourself into a food coma and you want to achieve said coma while eating dim sum there s no better place than Sam Woo. Well I m sure there are... But I ve been here twice and I really like it. The staff is very attentive and the service is pretty quick. My only real gripe about these kinds of restaurants is that the staff believes that if you re not Chinese looking that you ca not possibly use chopsticks the girl from a few days ago was shocked when I shooed her away . Beyond that you ll find all the greats here including the BBQ pork buns and fried taro my favorites . Lots of beef pork shrimp and veggie well not all veggie options on the menu. And the tea is loose leaf jasmine so good . Enjoy it!
First off the Tempe location is closed. The only other location is now North Phoenix on Cave Creek road. I have not been to the Phoenix location and dont know if its the same people. I have brought my honda to the Tempe location 3 times. Twice for timing belt water pump and once for CV boots. I like them cause they specialize in honda acura use OEM parts and their prices are always between dealer and cheap ma n pop shops. They never up sold me on anything the car did not truly need. I never had to bring car back because it was wrong or i was unsatisfied. 4 stars cause they are not open on weekends. Please change to Tu Sat schedule and because i cant comment on the other location in North Phoenix.
Wow! I never knew this gem existed in my neighborhood! I decided to try it based on the raving reviews and the hype is real! I luckily came on a wednesday night following a AZ Cardinals victory. this means that it s happy hour pricing all day. The sushi was quality and reasonably priced! Better root for the AZ Cardinals or come at regular happy hour times!
I have always wanted to get a Brazilian wax but heard too many horror stories. I was afraid of the excruciating pain that so many people complained about. But after having a baby I figured now is the best time to try it. After reading the reviews I decided I would give Taz try. I was not disappointed! She was absolutely amazing. Even though this was my first wax the pain was not that bad and Taz talk to me the entire time so I did not really focus on the pain. I highly recommend her. She is friendly and wonderful and makes you feel at home. Her place is clean bright and inviting. I will definitely be back for my next wax and will probably do a facial as well. I felt very little discomfort after the wax and the hair is just starting to grow back even though I got the wax two weeks ago. I like the privacy of a home spa.
I came in looking for a bow and walked away with a great experience. He took the time to help me select one and give me lots of pointers in using it. While he was helping me it got really busy but he did not get flustered or rush me while helping me out. I appreciate all the help he gave. Would definitely recommend this place and will be going back when I get a chance. Thought I was a right handed shooter but come to find out i m a lefty. Go figure.
The biggest donuts in town friendly service music coffee drinks easy parking did I say donuts? Offering custom French Toast on Sundays. I recommend you treat yourself here often
Seriously impressed. Superior quality ingenuity and service. I will go there again and again and take anyone who comes into town.
Awesome! All locally grown food with local brews. Fantastic burger! Our family of 6 loved it though a little pricey definitely worth it!
Absolutely the best experience I ve ever had at any shop!! These guys are top notch outstanding customer service friendly helpful. Even had freeze pops for my kids and coloring books! They truly care! Thanks Ken and Robert.
Prime is really awesome!! He s the only person I ve went to and really amazing work! Check him out.
Kristen is an expert at customizing a massage therapy. I need a deep muscle massage in my back. Kristen was able to loosen the tightness and relieve my pain. Highly recommended.
My date and I were looking for someplace to eat on a Wednesday night that was not packed because this place is probably the longest running restaurant on Ossington besides the original vietnamese places there was actually a table amazing! The menu is a single page listing about 30 small plates ranging from 9 25. It s one of the first places that was doing asian fusion before it become a trend and hte chef expertly mixes up flavours for some seriously tasty dishes. The server recommended 4 5 between the 2 of us and we ended up ordering 4 Scallop Ceviche wowowowow.....so good we got about 6 decent sized scallops that were amazingly fresh. Spicy Crispy Shrimps with Jalapenos and Garlic again perfectly crispy not too greasy delicious sauce and the shrimps were big and fresh Beef cheeks in a red curry sauce the beef was fork tender almost like pulled pork in a rich curry....coma inducing heavy...but worth the calories Slow Braised Pork Belly with Muscatel Reduction so good...but if you re not familiar with pork belly be prepared for the 1 layer of fat and the 1 4 layer of meat pure indulgence. If you want to splurge i would recommend the steamed black cod you get a whole fish wrapped in aluminum that takes a while to prepare... but it is heaven still remember it from 2 years ago There were a handful of wines by the glass and we were actually too full to have dessert. Always loved this place it s never disappointed me a foodie favourite!
My fave Ohio city hangout for catching up or getting some work done. Hip vibe and friendly staff make it a great choice! Oh and the best part...great coffee and CLE Bagel Co. bagels!!
Yum yum yuuuuuuum! This place was recommended to me by a friend and it was love at first bite. Do not be put off that they do not have a huge selections for breakfast. Their breakfast sandwiches are just perfect! Simple egg muffin sandwich with cheese meat and avocado. But this sandwich is huge it s like an egg mcmuffin on steroids. Their lattes are also really good! Cute spot with some artwork next door and everyone is always friendly.
So I m in Phoenix for work and I m looking for somewhere to eat and I stumble across this God sent restaurant! This is some of the best Caribbean food I ve had in years. Big up to the owners of this restaurant they really are amazing! Oh and you must try the curry goat!
Great massage. Great location. Lovely decor. Very professional. No contracts!!! I ll be back!!
I m a Trader Joe s addict and make a weekly trip to this store to stock up their store brand foods and delicious seasonal items. There are the staples I buy on the regular but I absolutely love how there are new items weekly and the seasonal items too. The prices are competitive but the flavor and tastes of their pantry items are delicious. Their fresh cheese case is amazing to try different cheeses and not break the bank. Their meats are on the expensive side but their produce and fresh items are very competitive. And I feel like the quality of their fresh produce is often times far superior to other grocery stores. Their staff is always so helpful and friendly and you can literally ask to sample any of their items minus alcohol and anything needing to be cooked.
We always call in for take out and the order is always ready with in 10 minutes. Great fresh and hot is the best way to describe this place. Over 4 years of coming here we have only been disappointed once. Not a bad record.
I stumbled in here in search of a place to get some writing done. In doing so I found one of my favorite coffee shops in Arizona. I started off with Turkish coffee always a favorite of mine. They gave me not just the cup but the pot and a little piece of chocolate. Truly a great companion to research. As far as atmosphere it was the perfect balance of music and talking without either being too loud. They had a bookshelf full of books plenty of seating plus outlets that also had USB connections. Everyone working was very friendly and helpful as well. You cannot find a better place to spend time or even get a cup of coffee and run.
I ve been here several times. Went again last night. It s good food for the price. Never had to wait in line too long. Very good service. Love the turkey and roast beef.
Best indian food in Toronto. Fresh ingredients table side greetings from the chef and a beautiful setting. The chef s passion and dedication to his craft is evident by the taste and presentation of amazing plates. A must visit!
Fantastic! Delicious food. Beautiful display. They catered an event of ours on October 21 at Rio Vista Community Center in Peoria and we could not have been more pleased. The only thing that could have been better was if they had put little labels in front of the coffeepots for regular and decaf because one of the workers gave the incorrect information. But overall was an excellent caterer caterer. Showed up on time reliable highly recommended.
This is my absolute favorite place for Thai food in the valley. The staff is courteous and prompt with orders drink refills and have a witty sense of humor! My favorite entrees to order are yellow curry and Pra Ram! The peanut sauce is to die for. Lastly the sticky rice with mango dessert is a must try! Definitely recommend this place!
Absolutely amazing service and food. I have eaten here on numerous occasions for lunch and have never been disappointed. The portions are huge so you never leave feeling hungry. I usually spend between 10 11 and it s worth it! Everyone there is helpful and if it is your first time let them know and they will help you out.
Everyone needs to check this Crossfit gym out. They recently opened and went in to see what was going on. I met Royce and had a workout with him today. He was awesome! Very professional and knew what he was doing. It is a brand new facility and very clean. I cant wait to go back and get another workout in. I would give them 6 stars if I could.
It was my first time eating sushi it was pretty good. The service was great the ladies were friendly and explained everything well since it was our first time being there. Waitress was really nice towards my kids. The food was good. It was kinda pricey but we had 2 kids and 2 adults. The only thing I did not like was that they charge you 1 to use your debit card and they did not tell you. I think since my bill was over 100 they could have waived the 1 fee but what can you do. But the sushi was good. I would probably check it out again.
Very good burger. The fries were awesome. The place had a good vibe....maybe a little loud. Price is right.
Service is usually pretty quick! Kassadi is super nice every time I see her!
We are really enjoying our stay here! My family and I love staying at embassy suites and have been for the past 6 years or so we are treated like family here!!! The staff goes above and beyond to make sure that our stay is enjoyable. Mike at the front desk is very professional and courteous not to mention that gorgeous smile!!! lol There are so many great employees here Sandra at front desk she s a gem and always a pleasure to talk to !!!Zuly is one of the nicest staff members and the housekeeping staff are reliable and very professional. Eric is a great addition to the management staff!!! Not to mention the great happy hour and complimentary breakfast everyday of your stay. All in all our family enjoys staying at the embassy suites and we always recommend to family and friends! In addition my husband wanted me to add that Eric always handles any concerns or issues that we may have and he is very patient when my husband asks a million questions! Thanks Eric we appreciate you and the staff !!! Also Adela who is part of housekeeping staff did an excellent job !!!
I saw Tom Waits perform here. I love that sentence. THE UP SIDE I saw Tom Waits perform here in a rare concert appearance. He came on around 1 AM. It was magic. THE DOWN SIDE How can there ever be a down side if Tom Waits performed here. THE SUM IT UP I saw Tom Waits perform here and it was good.
Definitely enjoyable and located close to Fremont St. Cheap compared to a lot of things in Vegas.
We got our wedding bands here! Jan was wonderful to work with my now husband changed his mind 3 times about his band and one of them was a custom order and they did not even blink an eye. I was worried about my ring size since the temperatures can of course be extreme here in Phoenix and they said they could resize my ring anytime I needed free of charge which is awesome. It was so great to find a local family operated jewelry shop with such great and friendly service. I highly recommend Burland! P.S. Nothing to do with them but they re next to a great little mom and pop Italian deli. Beautiful jewelry and delicious subs? Score!!
Sarah is very talented and knows hair and makeup! In my opinion one does not get trained for it one has to have it in them to know and understand hair and all that comes with it and Sarah is just that person. Sarah can take one look at you and tell you what is going to look good on you and what not. She s an expert in cutting hair coloring hair and styling hair! You come out looking like the girls in the fashion magazines and most importantly Sarah cares about the health of your hair as well. Sarah is very friendly and a genuinely nice and caring person. I ve been going to Sarah for a few years now. I would recommend her to anyone in a heartbeat! Thank you Sarah!
As a super foodie I was impressed by the food and even more impressed by the quality of service... They exceeded every expectation! Churros waffles Cheddar Biscuits and gravy were beyond mouth watering... Coffee was amazing! I felt like I was in the best cafe in San Francisco.... Only one improvement needed. Craft just needs heaters outside for that amazing patio they created!!! Thank you for the best breakfast for my family!!!!!!!!
Rick cleaned my house when my lease was up in September and he was absolutely outstanding! Offered a reduced rate and provided service that was exceptional. He showed up on time worked hard and produced a great product. Our Carpets were clean and even a month later when we went back to verify everything was good to go before vacating the property it still looked and smelled great! In Las Vegas we have seen more than our share of businesses that are incompetent without integrity and provide poor quality. It was an awesome surprise to find a company that did what it said it would and did it exceptionally well. I ll definitely be using Carpet Monkeys next time!
Super delicious food that does not leave you feeling heavy or greasy. I m never disappointed and end up here at least once a week for lunch. Everyone I ve brought here always leaves happy. Only reason I do not give it a 5 is because it can be pricey for lunch. 10 bucks for a plate. But again I love it too much to say no.
This place is amazing the oysters were the best thing we had and this ravioli soup was super good
My wife and I ate here for breakfast two days in a row November 2016 . I had the fillet and eggs both times. My wife got a omelet one day and the French toast the second day. My fillet was pretty good. Not the best I ever had but still pretty good. My wife s French toast and bowl of berries were excellent. The staff was friendly.
The place is nice a little un organized but they were busy for a Sunday morning. As should be expected. Arrived at 11 10 seated at 11 15 ordered food and got our drinks by 11 20. So far so good. Place has music mostly oldies! It can be a little noisy when it s busy. The staff is very friendly and accommodating. I Always see everyone cleaning. Of course my wife had to point at the cob webs in the corners haha. The wife ordered the colonel I ordered the copper queen skillet. Got our food at 11 42... 22 minute wait until we ordered. Not bad. We finished our food at 12 00. Got our check at 12 04. Cashed out and left at 12 06. I will be coming back! I like this place.
Komeya has become one of my favourite to go eat in and takeout places around my hood! I am a frequent at this place when I am feeling lazy and need a quick yummy meal. The salmon avocado poke bowl or the BBQ pork with running egg rice bowl are my usual. I find the portion of the food is pretty huge to me so for the poke bowl I always ask for less rice. For the BBQ pork with running egg rice bowl I often only am able to finish half and save the rest for my lunch the next day! Service is always prompt and friendly at Komeya. So glad to have this little cafe in the neighbour and will definitely continue to show my support
I have been going to Dr. Coffey for over a year and think he is the best! I was having lots of pain in my toe and he performed toe fusion surgery. I am now pain free and so happy with the results. He is very compassionate and has a very friendly staff. I highly recommend Dr. Coffey!!
Loved the Pain au Chocolat and the Croissant. It was crispy and flaky. Just like in Paris. I tried a piece of the Banana Nut Muffin and the Pecan Sticky Bun and they were not as good. A little too dense for my taste. Their coffee was expensive 3 for a small but it helped with the hangover.
Great service and fast delivery!!! Better than Pizza Hut near here! Pizza hut takes hour to do carry out and 2 3 hours to delivery! Check my other comments on their stuff with screen shots! This papa johns is great! Driver guy was very friendly and we ordered 3 minutes before time cut off and he was not rushing me with the conversation.
So honestly I come to Brewster s every so often. I love the atmosphere. Every time I come in usually get pretty good service but as of recently i ve had new servers named Maddy and Denin as servers. I have had the best service from these two and would recommend Brewster s to anyone.
Great place ca not wait to go back and try some other items. Very reasonably priced food. Portion are a not too big so you do not feel too stuffed when you leave. Get the talie dinner. My new favorite indian restaurant near me.
We love this place. It s good for lunch dinner. Their menu is simple but has many choices. You can see how they prepare your dish behind the counter. The service is rather good. If there s a bit wait time they will apologize and inform you. We always order the salt pepper chicken wings as appetizer which comes in 8 good size pieces for 8. I ordered wonton soup this time. It comes with large size shrimp wanton broccoli water chestnuts straw hat mushrooms and big shrimps. The taste is so good and surely to fill you up. My husband had the fried spicy shrimp with noodles. Huge portion and the spice is just right. I wo not say this is a cheap place but the food is good quality. It has become one of our regular stops.
Great service told the guy it was our first time here and he gave us some good suggestions. The line was long but moved pretty fast. Will come back before we leave AZ and recommend to anyone who has one close to them.
Las Lupitas has a great reputation for a reason. Everything is prepared so well and it is so cheap. It s a market with take out prepared food options. I get carnitas warm fresh corn tortillas 1 lb queso fresco salsa verde SO GOOD and an avocado.
I ve had croissants pain au chocolat creme brulee and sandwiches all excellent quality and priced nice. Staff are friendly and welcoming too.
Ordered Cake Here From San Antonio Since I Would Be Vacationing In Las Vegas For Best Friends Birthday. Transaction Was Very Smooth And Easy! Had To Change Delivery Time Towards Last Minute Graciously Made Change! Cakes Were Delicious! I Ordered Two Flavors Strawberry Champagne One Of My Favorites Ever. And Pineapple Cream Cheese Was Great As Well. Will Definitely Do Business With Again When In Area!
This is an update to my earlier less than complementary review of Snooze. I was contacted by them and agreed to give them another try. I met up today with a pal for coffee and catchup The place was quite busy at 10 am on a Tuesday. I mentioned that to the hostess and asked to be seated in a quiet spot so was taken to the back of the restaurant. She found a tiny table for 2 which was quite close to a big table of diners. I asked if we could sit at the table for 4 right next to it and then noticed seating outside so decided to move out there. Our hostess was visibly annoyed by that. Once we settled in the service and food were fantastic. My friend had a yummy looking pancake and I had Rye toast with a side of Salmon. Our server was very nice about letting us hang out for a good long while. So the long and short of Snooze? GOOD food wait staff pricing ala carte options location parking super cute decor and menus. Could be better noise levels and the hostess ...both of these are easy fixes with some Emotional Intelligence training. and some serious sound dampening efforts. Our server DID mention that you were working on the wait times. Still a deal breaker for me but I wish you the very best as you get it figured out. Again summer is almost upon us and your business is bound to suffer if you ca not vastly reduce those times.. Thank you again for the opportunity to re review Snooze. Keep working those kinks out!
I had to print 600 pages of power points for my class and the manager owner was so patient and kind! She even gave me a discount because I had so much to print! When you need to print in bulk this location is the place to go!
Years of searching in Vegas and a coupon in Val Pak introduced me to the best pizza in town! This Verrazano at Rainbow and Westcliff is excellent! I m a serious foodie and the pizza is delicious and priced very well. Go and enjoy!
I enjoyed this place. The ramen was good and the server was knowledgeable about the beers on tap. We came around 930pm and the service was timely and the food was good Definitely will return! Thanks Not the greatest food picture in the world but it s what I got...
Where to start went out with Jen last night had an awesome time. Staff kept the party going through the night into the early day. The first club was not that great because it was still early but the last two were insane. If I could give Jen and her staff more stars I would.
The Phoenix Phresh bowl was yummy if you re looking for something light to have at a local cute shop you should come here. Looking forward to trying more things off the lunch menu since I work right around the way. Ca not wait to tell all my coworkers!
By far the best hangout place in Pittsburgh! Ordered a few of their apps and entrees to share with friends and everything was delicious! Possibly the best Indian food I have tasted! The staff was friendly and helpful. And the drink specials were defintely a bonus! All around a great environment friendly staff and amazing food and drinks! Defintely a must try if you are in the area!
We ve been to a few new places lately some were even pretty good but none inspired me to write. Until today. We had lunch at a brand new place in Old Town Scottsdale called Big Earl s. It s a BBQ joint run by the people responsible for La Petite Maison. Nice to be so multi faceted! While you can get the usual BBQ suspects ribs brisket pulled pork etc. the big treat for us was Tasty Parts . This section of the menu included fried sweetbreads 8.99 oven roasted beef bone marrow with pickled okra 7.99 and pickled pig s feet 5.99 . I know a lot of you are cringing at the thought but believe me this is great stuff. We had crispy pig tails with ranch dressing 5.99 two big deep fried items that were the shape of hot dog buns. I was thankful that they were not curled. The meat which you strip from the bone was succulent especially when eaten with the fried batter dressing and a little BBQ sauce. I ll admit the remains did look kind of gross. Roasted pork belly with caramelized onions 6.99 was our second dish. It was not quite as good as the tails since it did not crunch but I was licking my fingers anyway. We had started with an appetizer of Barbacoa nachos of Texas beef brisket Memphis Pork Butt and Velveeta Love 8.99 . The chips had been more than generously layered with the tender smokey meats so much in fact that I ended up taking home a large cupful of meat which will make a great sandwich tomorrow. We also shared a blue cheese wedge 3.99 . The lettuce was nice and fresh and the dressing actually tasted like blue cheese. The bacon bits raised the salad to a higher level so tasty and crunchy. Both of us were stuffed but there was one dessert that we had to try Pecan and Date pie 3.99 . OMG this was to die for. Somehow the chef managed to control the sweetness and the creamy tangy topping was a brilliant touch. The restaurant is cute not overly kitchy. There s a great soundtrack of old fashioned cowboy songs playing quietly in the background. The servers are very attentive but unobtrusive.I LOVE THIS PLACE. There s a lot more on the menu we want to sample. I think Big Earl s will become one of our go to restaurants.
Scooter s is a cool bar especially if you re a Seahawks fan. I recall a few year ago before the Seahawks were even good this bar would get PACKED on Sundays. I can only imagine how busy it will get now that they are the defending champs!! I used to go and watch the UFC fights here all the time. Standing room only and you get to get there early. The bar as well as dining room get jam packed. There are several old school video games here most notably a Street Fighter II Champion Edition game!!! This machine alone is enough for my friends and I to drop by. They also have dart boards a pool table and a shuffle board table. As far as the bar goes its your typical setup. Not much different from a PTs or Putters. Where I feel Scooter s excels at is their food. I can recall the first time I went in. My friend and I were in the neighborhood looking for a quick bite. At that time Scooter s was new. I do not recall what we ordered but I remember the both of us thinking WOW this food is good!! And I have never been disappointed since. The appetizer sampler platter is HUGE and only 16. You get wings fingers potato skins and mozzarella sticks. The nacho s are also enormous best part is at the end you re not left with a pile of chips. They put a ton of toppings on these bad boys. If you get their wings I HIGHLY recommend the spicy garlic. Another favorite of mine is the pastrami burger fried egg. I believe it is a 1 2lb patty with a heaping helping of pastrami lettuce tomato onion and mozzarella cheese. This burger was so big I could not even bite it. I had to take out the veggies and eat it as a side salad!! If you re looking for a chill bar to grab a cold one crazy fun atmosphere for the UFC or feeling nostalgic for some Street Fighter II this is a great alternative to the big boy chain. Who knows you may even be lucky enough to have Heather as your bartender. She is fantastic!!
Best fish and chips I ve had in Phoenix! AMAZING!!! Their drinks are good too! I had their No 30 and graveyard mash the Halloween special were really good. The grilled chicken sandwich was very good too. Will definitely be back here for fish and chips and happy hour drinks! The best thing is their happy hour is everyday even weekends until 5pm.
Many years ago I stayed at Circus Circus.... back when it was new built in 1968 . That ll give you an idea of how old I was... or am. Even in 1995 when I first brought my children to Las Vegas to see the circus acts at this hotel not to mention the arcades at all the hotels I was thrilled to show my girls this place. But now you could not pay me enough to stay here..... or even set foot in this smoky dungeon of a building. However upon traveling to Vegas with my daughter and her wonderful boyfriend and I wanted to show them a good time and he wanted to go to Circus Circus for the cheap gambling I acquiesced took a deep breath and walked into the casino portion anyway. Well guess what..... I won a fair amount of money playing the slots and I would have won even more if I had just known what the heck I was doing !!! I ended up winning 250.25 and it was as high as 380 !!! but for the fact that I kept thinking I was only playing with 25 or 38....... NOT 380..... and yes I do know how to add. The others all played poker blackjack and craps for extremely reasonable prices 5.00 and while they were doing a good job of winning at those games I sat down on Ellen DeGeneres slot machine. It kept ringing sounding off ringing some more and I knew I was winning but it said these were penny bets so as I d watch the numbers I thought I was playing with 25 38 worth of pennies...... but guess what when I decided to call it quits and cashed out for a voucher I pretty much fell off the chair when I saw a voucher for 250.25. I have NEVER won that much. I m still excited thinking about it !! So while I will still never stay here again I will now make it a point to show up in their casino with their dirt cheap tables and apparently possibly lucky slots.
Awesome food! I m partial to New Mexico s style of southwestern mexican cuisine and Carlsbad does it right. Just had the enchantment platter chicken blue corn enchilada with green chile carne adovada burrito and a chile relleno with a side of rice and beans and sopapilla. They ll top it off with the requisite fried egg if you ask too. Everything was fantastic service was great and the atmosphere is fun. Highly recommended!
This is some delicious and authentic Mexican food! The machaca beef is yummy and the green and red enchilada sauces are so good! I always get Christmas one enchilada with green sauce and one with red sauce!
This place is great if you want something nice but cheaper than other 4 star hotels. Use priceline or hotwire and you ll be happy with the hotel. If you pay full price you may wish you opted for a different hotel. It is definitely NOT ON THE STRIP. It is a short walk to the strip but a walk nonetheless. Parking is sometimes a pain so we chose to park in the mall parking directly across the street. No need to tip or wait for the valet. If you can request a view of the Strip otherwise you may be facing I 15 and a bunch of sex shops.
The food here is delicious! Big huge stuffed potatoes pasta hearty salads unbelievably tasty sandwiches. The service is always very good as well. The place is always clean and the atmosphere is fantastic. The only problem is that some of the food mainly the pasta s are a bit overpriced. Also the BIGGEST problem is that they close at 8 30pm! I know this might not seem like a big deal but being right behind the Padres Mariners spring training field and right off the 101 in the heart of the arrowhead entertainment district you d think they d be open till at least 10 or so at least on Weekdays and maybe Saturday? Catch them at lunch or for an early dinner and if you do not mind spending a few extra bucks for the pasta you should be just fine. I ve never regretted a single visit here and I m sure neither will you!
This place is awesome! I love the space it s open and very outdoorsy feeling. My service was excellent and they offered far more beer options than I was expecting. I walked from Elizabeth and was greeted by the unpleasant odor of the garbage trucks that park on Louise but it was worth it to get to Catawba. They have a nice outdoor seating area outdoor bar and garage doors that make the inside feel open and airy. I will definitely be back!
Never been b4 but I m going back for sure. Great prices even in Lost Wages I mean Las Vegas. 4 ate dinner with desert and one cocktail and it was 80 bucks and change. The menu selection is outta control. Too much to choose from IMO. Service was very good and the cob I had was one of the better I ve experienced. The fresh lemonade was excellent with a sugar rim and the lemon drop good sized and very tasty too.
Exceptional Customer Service! This was my first experience planning a funeral. Sean and his staff were awesome. We had my father s service and everything was perfect. The food provided was delicious. Thank you Thompson Funeral Chapel for making this experience painless. We will definitely continue using Thompson Funeral services in the future.
Delicious! Went to Momofuku Noodle Bar and I have to say that it s absolutely delicious! Many of the the classics from the east village original are there but chef Hans Vogel of Momofuku Noodle Bar Toronto has also put some extra dishes that are very of the moment in Toronto dining but still have the new york flare which Chang is famous for. Great Inari yields fluffy rice filling seaweed mayo and melted swiss cheese an unusual combo but absolutely amazing. Pork buns feature supple bun meaty pork belly with a nice sweet hum of hoison. Ginger scallion noodles are one of the best noodles on their short menu though the Momofuku ramen does not live up to the hype but it s tasty nonetheless. Lucky enough to eat once again during summerlicious lunch and found their famous fried chicken on the menu. The Fried Chicken is two southern fried drumsticks ssm style served with bibb lettuce and garnished with red eye mayo and kimchi. Not a bad idea to skip dessert and head upstairs to milk bar for Crack Pie or maybe a Compost Cookie.
An iconic steakhouse worthy of its reputation. The waiters are in jackets the lights are dim but not dark and the place has all the charm of Sinatra himself. The table side caesar was great. They mix up the dressing to order and then toss in shredded romaine and parmesan. The portions are very generous enough for a meal. This was definitely one of the best caesars I ve ever had. We also tried the petite filet and the new york steak. They switched the doneness on the steaks but they were still very good. I did not mind at all. The new york was definitely more flavorful. The filet was honestly a bit bland as far as steak goes but it was very tender. Everything is a la carte so you have to order sides separately. I tried the double baked potato and it was alright. It reminded me of potato skins. Oh the bar is fantastic. I tried their signature golden steer and manhattan and both were on point. My only regret was not saving room for dessert. They have a table side bananas foster and cherries jubilee that looked amazing table next to us ordered the bananas foster . Also the table behind us was celebrating a birthday and they were raving about the cheesecake. Definitely going to try next time.
Great little lunch place found to mix up the regularity of all of the places from which my coworkers and I regularly order dine. Might be a little hard to find if you re not familiar with the Promenade area but it s in the same building parking area as The Habit Burger. First thing I noticed was how cute and adorable the interior is reminiscent of a bright southern house and kitchen. Great variety of chicken scoop flavors! I made sure to check the menu out beforehand so I knew what to expect. Being a little hungry I decided to go with the 2 scoop combo and my coworker went with a 1 scoop and salad. If you re unsure which flavor to order they ll give you a sample. I went with the pesto mayo free and original scoops. Both a little plain but fairly flavorful lots of chicken more than I expected . The side option I selected was black eyed pea quinoa salad which was better than I expected! Has a bit of a spicy kick at the end of each bite but not much. Wish I had more room for more of that salad! Each meal comes with a shooter of pudding both us of selected the pumpkin seasonal and wanted more! TL DR SO. MUCH. PROTEIN. SO. FILLING. Next time my coworker and I are going to share a 3 scoop meal.
Food is delicious and fresh and the customer service is great! Our favorites are the chicken pesto sandwich BBQ pork sandwich and onion rings a must try! .
Decided it was burger day and I wanted to research the best burgers in CLE. This place comes in the top 15 so I was on my way. Surprisingly I had never been here in all my dining experiences so it was all new to me. Its a cool place and very unique. The older section is cooler than the addition but I get they needed the space so it is what it is. I came for the burger. Good beer selection and when I asked for a light lager the server brought a couple of samples which is always a welcomed strategy. Also ordered some Apps as we were starved and they are worth filling up on as they are as good as they sound on the menu. Plus we were able to order 3 and share as they are big enough for the group especially when you read whats next. The burgers are great plain and simple. A large patty greasy in a good way thick bacon and plenty of it it just all worked. I had the Rocky River and next time would skip the sour cream but I will order that again. The fries are also excellent and worth again filling up on.
I had din din here with a friend and it was absolutely delicious. It was our first time and it did not disappoint us. The price is totally worth it for the amount of food you get. We got the chicken skewers with falafel and grape leaves as a side. It was a good Mediterranean food .
Finally found a salon that I can see myself going to for as long as I m getting my nails done. I recently started getting acrylics again as I ve winged myself out of biting them off a week into them. I was going to this other salon in town in which I d lose up to 3 nails in between fills waited the typical 2 weeks max . My roommates come to this salon and always have nice nails so I figured I d give it a shot. I m not sure the nail techs name she sits directly next to Ivy but she was a sweetheart. She informed that it would be in my best interest to remove the set I had from the previous salon and start fresh. I told her my concern with how quickly my nails fall off and asked if she could double prime them. She listened to me took her time and gave me a great set her shape was the nicest coffin style I ve ever gotten . I went in for a fill 2 weeks later without any missing nails and again got exactly what I wanted. Though 2 days later I broke a nail in which they had me in right away and fixed at no charge Really thankful that I found this place and would recommend.
Heard about this place from wife so we popped in since we were in the area. Loved the industrial atmosphere of the place and how you can see everything that s going on in the kitchen. The staff was very friendly and the food was superb. They have a good selection on the menu with add ons so you can customize your order. If you are ever near downtown you should definitely check this place out.
Another hidden Toronto gem. Why do not more people know about this place! Well the main reason is that it s just about in the middle of nowhere. I never would have found it if my parents did not live a few minutes away. I m no Sushi expert but this is the best I ve had so far. After around 5 meals here I have not been disappointed with on piece of sushi. Everything is fresh tender and perfectly prepared. Ask for a table in the back where you take off your shoes and eat in traditional Japanese style.
This place was one of those once in a lifetime got to spend and eat your heart out on a buffet type experiences. No line or reservation needed on a Saturday night which was awesome and totally not expected but this was not a busy time of year price of entry steep but that comes with the territory. Started off with the seafood section tons of clams raw shrimp and oysters. Oysters were a bit tired looking but they soon refilled with some winners. The crab legs were abundant and some serious meat on them not your generic buffet legs very happy so far. The lull occurred while checking out the meats section the whole pig was a bit dry and the prime rib a little over done but thats OK. The asian section was full of some interesting dishes some dim sum congee and fried rice all good stuff. Next highlight was the staff our server was like a ninja the second a plate was done it disappeared within seconds truly high end something other places should learn from. Last course of dessert although not my fav but that my preference if you have a sweet tooth the dessert section was massive and beautifully presented. The table next to us kept getting more of the small bites taking pictures and devouring plate after plate. I enjoyed the egg custard and some flan but there are easily over 100 options on the dessert bar including a crepe station. Parents watch your kids here they will go into a sugar coma instantly. All in all a world class buffet only wish is that there was lobster available it was in the case upon arrival but nowhere to be found inside.
Fantastic breakfast. There was a wait on Sunday morning. Stopped in after the early service at church and grabbed a coffee while I was waiting to be seated about 20 minutes . They had complimentary lemon mini poppy seed muffins available for those waiting nice touch. I had an egg white veggie omelet and stone ground grits. Both were super tasty. I will go back. I did not like paying 1 more for egg whites and then another 1 to add one extra veggie the menu only allows for three I wanted four. It seems like I am being penalized for making a healthier choice. Either way I give this establishment top billing. Friendly staff clean facility great food and comfortable spaces.
What does Tups mean? Is it a nickname inside joke or the secret ingredient in their Giardiniera recipe? Tups is located in a funky shopping center which by the way Google maps will point you in the wrong direction if you re heading east on Windmill just a heads up. This small family owned deli only has only a few seats inside to sit and enjoy your lunch so if you plan on dining in watch out for those busy feasting hours. They offer the basic deli menu items soups salads sandwiches coffee and espresso. I ordered the half roast beef sandwich and The Greek Village salad. When I ordered my sandwich I was asked if I want everything on it I said yes to this just no onions and mayo. When posed with a question like that you assume your meal will be stacked with plenty of veggies cheese and maybe an in house tapenade nope. I basically got two slices of roast beef a tomato and some wilted lettuce it s like my 6 year old niece made lunch for me. Believe it or not the Greek salad saved the day. The Greek Village salad was about 10 but this thing could easily feed a small of Mediterranean food lovers. It comes filled to the brim with romaine tomato cucumber red onion green pepper feta cheese and kalamata olives dressed with olive oil oregano and parsley vinaigrette and served with three pieces of soft Pita bread. This alone was enough to feed me for lunch and as a side salad during dinner. Totally worth the price tag. The customer service here is well above most snacking spots from beginning to end which is more than I can say for most of the 5 star dining spots in the Valley. I m not fully sold on this place as a solid go to sandwich location but that could change with my next visit.
This is a GO TO place to eat!! I ve eaten BBQ all over the US and this ranks near if not at the top. Everything is great with HUGE portions!!! Here is how I rank the proteins. Brisket Wings Ribs Pork Chicken But it is all good with incredible service. Be prepared to wait as it s always crowded!!! The word is out on this place!!!
Wow! I loved this place. Thanks to Yelp I discovered this place and I was supper exited to go. The Magic Noodle did not disappoint a single bit. I love the open kitchen and the view of the making on noodles by hand. I had the Beef Brisket Soup and cannot wait to try the Szechuan one next time. This is the kind of place that is worth the 45min drive and it caters to true foodies. Awesome!
One of my favorite places to get some Vietnamese Cuisine. Service is very fast and the food is absolutely delicious! I love the Pho and noodle dishes. The Sandwiches are great too. I always come here since it is close to my home. Prices are reasonable too.
This review is only based on one visit but I think its safe to say i m a fan. Finally visited the red sandwich house after driving by it a couple of times always wondering why all those people were outside! With very limited hours it took me a while to get down here as I do not work in the area but thankfully a day off during the week enabled me to grab a bite! Very small little 1 room house . No frills what you see is what you get. They have a flat top deep fryer toaster oven to warm buns a few heat lamps to keep fries hot and that s about it. Walk in if there is room place your order wait a few mins pay and leave happy. Very basic food burgers dogs sandwiches and some good breakfast stuff from the looks of it as well. I had a bacon cheeseburger and it was great. Perfectly juicy with that little bit of flat top crustiness. And to top it off its all super cheap. Ca not wait to get back for another burger!
I have a love hate relationship with Title Boxing Highland Heights ! The work out is always challenging the trainers are awesome and encouraging. It s a great place! I tell myself I am not coming back but I ca not seem to stay away !
Amazing experience. My wife and I scheduled a couples massage with Stacey and Jennifer on our anniversary trip to Vegas. BEST massage I have ever had in my life. Thank you thank you thank you for exceeding our expectations. My only regret would be you guys are not in Dallas preventing us from visiting on a regular basis. Keep up the AWESOME work looking forward to our next visit.
My husband and I are always on the look out for new asian restaurant specially Thai. We ve been going around trying thai restaurant that our friends recommend.The only problem is that they almost have the same dish and you tend to get bored eating it. Although we tried a thai fusion restaurant in Las Vegas it was a disaster. So when we heard about this place we were curious since the owner is thai but name represent Vietnamese food. Since this is a soft opening not expecting a full list menu they got 7 dish so far 5 of it we tried. The coconut ice cream AMAZING! Home made and the owner makes a fresh batch everyday. Tonkatsu slider bread is soft and the tonkatsu is soft not like most tonkatsu we tried its either too dry or to hard. It has apple slice and tonkatsu sauce dressing. The combination is perfect the sweet taste of the apple compliment the saltiness of the dressing. The spicy tokyo ramen hold true to its name its really GOOD. Trying their thai burrito and pork belly next time! Definitely going back for more.
Amazing amazing amazing. If you are in Pittsburgh you have to visit. I had the kale salad which was the perfect amount of crunch. They dressed it in a soy dressing that was perfect was a little spicy though so if you are not into spice may want to hold the peppers. Followed by the kale salad was the street corn of which I could have honestly ate 3 orders to myself. Probably my favourite thing I had all night. Then I had the Korean tacos which were good but a little dry still very tasty but could use more sauce.
This is the healthy one i am looking for. Many choices of protein tuna salmon chicken etc and also fresh vegetables avocado mango tomatoes etc . I really love the way this place moves on the reasonable price and nice service. I ll be back
UPDATE!! Second visit and my God what a turnaround. First time here I got the krapow basil beef and it was bland bland bland even though I requested extra spicy and the veg portion was coarsely chopped green pepper and there was just zero love there. I posted a review here at Yelp and the owner messaged me saying that he d hired a cook from another excellent Thai place... I relented and tried the same dish today and wow NIGHT AND DAY improvement! Crazy hot with nice long beans instead of those crappy bell peppers and the taste profile was just perfect for krapow salty and spicy and MM MM good! 10 gets you this bit of perfection with an ample serving of jasmine rice in a very cute paper container. So so so happy I gave them another chance this was possibly the best basil dish I ve had since my fave quick service Thai place went out of business in Toronto 15 years ago. Try it and ask for extra hot you ll thank me.
What a place. Posh and expensive. However if you like to be pampered with good service and excellent food then you dont mind paying a bit extra to be here in an upscale environment. It was birthday time again in our family and the lucky lady decided she wanted to try the Old Mill. Good choice. It was above excellent. I would suppose its not for everyone because they cater to a more refined pallet and we appreciate that more than i can express in a simple review. We arrived shortly after 6 and the only complaint i had was the parking is in a public lot across the street but other than that its all good. We entered through the hotel and walked along the hallway to the restaurant on this chilly evening but enjoying the classic charm of this old place. Congrats on the Old Mill on the 100th anniversary by the way. Upon arrival we were greeted by the Maitr d and seated by the window overlooking the courtyard. The wait staff attending to our table were very pleasant and at first we thought a bit straight forward but when they realized we were having fun as a group they seemed to adapt to the mood of our table and that was a bonus in our eyes. We ordered some beverages to get started then took a look at the menu followed by the chef s specials. After some discussion 4 out of 5 decided on the Beef Tenderloin and one for the duck with a soup of the day starter. Now i must say i managed to sneak a taste of the soup and the amount of seafood in there made this one very tasty and hearty soup and it was served in a bread bowl but hey i was already snacking on the bread at the table and as i said it wasnt my soup to begin with so a taste was all i could manage. Somewhere as we chatted they repleneshed the bread because i looked over and the basket was full again. They dont have to be told and you dont have to ask they just take care of you and thats what we like. The water glasses were always being filled the coffee cup seemed to replenish itself also. They were on top of their game on Saturday night. Finally after a bit of a leisurely wait our meals arrived. At this point I noticed the place really seems to be filling up so its quite a popular spot. Now to say the tenderloin was good would be an injustice the reduction that the the beef was cooked in was unique and flavorful and the beef itself was tender and cooked to a perfect medium the side dish which is extra was your choice of many different options so a few of us chose the fingerling potatoes and a few chose the carrots and parsnips and for my son he had the mac n cheese. Now this Mac n cheese was something elevated above anything i have ever had. I was impressed and the fingerling poatoes were a bit of heaven even good reviews from across the table about the veggies so all was spot on so far. As the main course came to an end my son asked for the unfinished mac and cheese to be packed to take home and just a cool foot note they did a neat foil take home container with a handle which we found quite amusing and unique. Now comes the desert it was somebodys birthday and they brough this wonderful sampler of desert delights with a candle and the presentation was beyond our expectations. A quick round of happy birthday fromt he serving staff and our fellow diners applause made this another cool moment for us with the attention from our serving staff. i cant even pronounce this but i had Valrhona Chocolate and Dulce De Leche Tart and this may be the best desert i have ever had and as a chocolate lover that is a huge complement to the desert chef. As for the others who enjoyed the Tiramisu and other treats provided by this fine restaurant i can only say that its possible we shall return for the next special occaision. It may not be for everyone but if you want to treat yourself and are ready for something special then its a great place to visit. I can see some people are not prepared for the price or are used to something a bit more bland so its not for everyone but for those of us who appreciate food as an art and fine service as a profession then this is an experience worth the price. It was a delight and a pleasure to visit the old mill and i wish i could give you more than 5 stars for making this occaision such a memorable one.
This is my second time eating lunch at a Black Bear Diner the first one was in Fernley Nevada. The in Tempe met my expectations. I had the bacon cheeseburger cooked medium well fries and iced tea. I also tried their homemade bacon dip for the fries which was pretty good. They have an assortment of sauces so I tried the chipotle sauce on my burger which was flavorful and fairly spicy. I d say the food at the Black Bear Diner is traditional American food with some good variations. The iced tea is just iced tea but is not bad. The atmosphere is like an alpine lodge with 50s diner music piped in. The AC works well so bring a sweater. The only thing I did not care for was being seated right by the kitchen doors when the restaurant was half empty but since it was not super busy it was not that much of a nuisance.
This was my first time at Sorso Wine Room and quickly became my favorite wine bar! Our server Joey was absolutely wonderful. He was not only knowledgeable about the restaurant wines and industry but also the perfect balance of being accommodating and friendly! Would definitely recommend coming here and be sure to ask for Joey as your server!
Very good burger. Fresh and juicy meat. Service a little slow but not that bad. Love the appetizer the bun with pork is so good. Lot of choices to select Love it. My friend had the ramen noodles and he love it too. Will come back to try something more.
I have almost been at Villa Toscana for a year I plan to renew my lease. I have had no major problems with my apartment anything that has needed to be fixed they have came within a day but usually that same day. The office staff is very nice and helpful they ve always been honest and friendly. The grounds stay clean. I ve only had issues with neighbors making false calls and not super friendly but for the most part other neighbors are very friendly. it s very safe and the pool area is very nice. I would recommend this to place to anyone with kids that want a spacious apartment for a good price. personally i enjoy living here.
Went to Montreal for the weekend and this bar crawl was the highlight of the trip. Lots of fun great deals and I definitely recommend it to anyone visiting Montreal who likes to drink and have a good time!
Great ice cream. Family friendly. Quick service and pride in what they do. Best place in Huntersville Cornelius to grab some ice cream with the kiddos.
This place has the best chocolate chip cookie in the city along with Le Gourmand . I ve only been here for pastries and coffee but it s not too crowded and the service at the counter has always been friendly. Lots of seating and great location.
Shrimp and grits were absolutely delectable!! Kale salad was fresh and delish! Great location great service and the owner is an angel! Very sweet and customer focused.
Just went to Jack Frost after moving back to Cleveland after 17 years away. Went there in the 70s as a little girl and I was so happy that the shop is still there and the donuts are amazing! How nice to come back to a small business that does not disappoint after so many years. The donuts have just the right texture and flavor. Very fresh. And they have specialty ones like a cassatta donut with vanilla creme and fresh strawberries. I could have sworn they once had some stools years ago which they do not now. Not much space for that which is too bad. But never mind. Go to Jack Frost!
Good local dive bar. Good prices nice bartender nice memories of Tower Plaza and the occasional puck hitting the glass behind the bar. It is what it is and that is exactly what I want. I love places like this it is an institution.
Stopped by before starting on my usual pilgrimage up I94. Place is pretty hard to find because it is hidden behind a McDonald but I was happy I put in the effort. I had 3 tacos pastor barbaco and carnitas. All were good and came with perfect sauces but what I liked most where the tortillas. They were the more rustic kind and looked like they might have been homemade with stone ground flour. It is a small thing but I thing it is this sort of things that makes a taco joint stand out. I also liked the vibe of the place. Laid back mostly South American patrons and a prompt no frill kind of service. Oh And the World Cup on TV. Will probably stop by again for a quick bite on my way from or to I94 and maybe get something more portable to eat while on the road.
holy mother of god. yum. best.cleveland.pizza.ever. hands down. and really nice people. fast forward three months from now when i ca not fit in any of my clothes.... EDIT I am sooooo gonna be fat. cuz last night i had the meatball sub. holy goodness in my mouth. i m in troooouble with this place being so close to me!!! go here! eat their food now!!!
My favorite place for gelato in vegas!! Great quality and real ingredients. Flavors like carrot cake pistachio and even ube and rosemary. They change everyday so my advice is to check their Instagram page if you come here often. My favorite is sticky toffee pudding its amazing. The owner is incredibly sweet and friendly! Prices are justifiable for the amount you get. They also have plenty of gluten free and vegan flavors.
A . Collin did a great job at a great price. Recommended to my family for further pest elimination. I rarely write reviews so the service and price was worth it.
I suggest calling and making reservations if you plan on eating here because there is usually a long wait if otherwise. The ambiance at this place is very romantic and great for dates! We came to this place because we heard they have really good ramen so we had to come give it a try. They only have the pork ramen 17 and vegetarian ramen that is not on the menu. The pork broth was light in flavor not too heavy. The pork was so juicy and tender that it almost melts in your mouth! It also comes with an egg bean sprouts green onions and dried seaweed. If you want to add spicy they charge 1 for a small thing of chili oil which is not worth it in my opinion. Most places give it for free and the chili oil was not even spicy! OH and we also tried their pork buns also delicious! It comes with their homemade ssam sauce which is almost a twist between Korean red pepper paste and hoisin sauce kind of tangy sweet and spicy spicier than the chili oil for sure . Ramen is only a small part of this restaurant and it was good but the price was just not worth it for me.
Yo first let me say that it s pretty damn easy to get to the stadium via the subway. I m from NYC Brooklyn to be exact and I ve been taking the subway for years. I found the Toronto subway relatively easy to use efficient and clean. You take the train depending on what part of town you re in either southbound or northbound to Union Station. Everything is the area. I think the blue jays play nearby. The aquarium is a short distance and the CN Tower is close by as well. Now I must say that it best to take the subway because parking can be pretty expensive during game night. You can sit anywhere in the air canada centre and have a great view. We sat up pretty high to watch an excellent OT game last night against the Boston Celtics and I must say that the view was great the crowd was HYPE! That s all you ask for. I m a die hard Brooklyn Nets Fan and was rooting for the raptors to beat the celtics because it would help us Brooklyn with getting into the playoffs. Unfortunately Boston won but I think Brooklyn will still make it.
I love this sandwich shop and will continue being a return customer! If you are looking for a great sandwich shop this is the place to check out!!
Freed s makes the best cakes and deserts in town hands down. We love the cupcakes and any pick of cookies and my daughter loves that they usually have samples for you to enjoy while picking up your order! Freed s is definitely my top pick for a Las Vegas bakery!
Great service!Master fixed my car door lock within 20 minutes and did not over charge! The friendly smiles and attitudes really also helped.
Elizabeth was the best staff member by far! She was so kind and she deserves a promotion. 10 10 would go back.
Delicous meal. Group of 10 Saturday morning fast service hot food big portions and tasty. Yes we ll be back.
I simply love this place!!!! They carry the freshest and most sustainable fish! The Chefs are all so friendly and knowledgeable! SABLE FISH IS A MUST TRY!
This has got to be one of the best escape rooms in town. The puzzles are challenging but the hosts are very good at giving subtle tips without totally giving up the answer if you get stuck. Great atmosphere in each of the themed rooms I ve done 4 and creative and fun challenges. The staff is always super friendly too!
The broth was tasty and the noodles were cooked very well! The meat that was included with the dish was also well seasoned and was a good portion size!
The gyro is outstanding the sauce is fresh and always has a generous amount of meat onions and tomatoes in fluffy pita bread. The house salad on the side is my favorite part TONS of veggies and the dressing is consistently fabulous! We ve tried a lot of gyro places and have decided to not waste our time anywhere else. Calling an order in for pick up is also easy and they get your order perfect every time!
I have not been to a spot this cool in a minute. The decor customer service and attentiveness of the staff the very delicious food and theeee perfect cup of coffee makes this place the perfect neighborhood hot spot for good food and conversation. I d love to see this in North Mesa. I will definitely be back and highly recommend.
The food and people are so great here! Many people come by for take out in this neighborhood restaurant. The staff members seem to know and remember their customers well. I see this as a very family and community oriented restaurant that I would go back for if not for the food! I ordered Coco Tropical which was rotisserie chicken over a coconut rice with spicy pineapple chunks. I also used their house sauce over the bed of rice and chicken. I do not know what s in their house sauce but it is AMAZING! I ve never had anything like it. It has a good blend of tropical flavors along with acidity to balance out the savory food to complement the entire dish. Delicious! My friend got the Cuban I m not all that into mustard and ham but I just ended up finishing half his sandwich! The bread was perfectly crispy and soft with silky pork. They have delicious sounding specials that I have yet to try but that will be for my next trip! This place makes me feel so excited and warm!
Korean shaved ice bingsu is different from the Taiwanese oe other ones as it is rich in texture and flavors. Layers of shaved ice that is very fluffy and light like snowflakes with layers of flavour depending what you order in between each layer. Delicious treat to share. Comes in 3 sizes cup small or large. Quite pricy for the size but too good to say no to. The sesame one is my favourite. The cheese one is very weird with parmesan cream cheese and other kinds of cheese. The coffee one is more like a breakfast all in one with cheerios cornflakes etc. The mango one is nothing special in my opinion. The matcha red bean one is too common as well. If you go in a large group expect to wait for a while as there are limited seats. It is a self serve place. You get your own water and go order and pick up at the counter so I m not sure what s with the tipping...and...their menu items are already expensive enough...
Put this place first on your list of new restaurants in Scottsdale that you have not yet tried. The food is as fresh and delicately prepared as one could possibly find anywhere. The space is gorgeous and elegant yet comfortable and inviting. The hosts Valentina and Gian Franco make you feel as though you ve all been great friends for years. Nonna is Scottsdale s newest little known gem. You wo not be disappointed.
I ve been going to Paradise Nails for almost 4 years. This is a very clean salon which is really important to me. I m very pleased with the manicures and pedicures I have gotten over the years and all of the staff is very friendly. Even at times when I ve shown up near closing time they always welcome me in and never try to rush me out. Paradise nails is always my first choice!
I stopped by this new location today for my fat burner shot and was delighted by the friendly and personable staff. The medical assistant that gave me my shot was very upbeat and full of smiles. I do not feel judged and the environment is very welcoming. I originally started at the Awahtukee location and the service is top notch across the board. I ve been on RM3 for a little over a week and I ve already lost 11lbs. For someone who has always struggled with their weight their entire life seeing these fast and positive results give you the motivation to continue. I would definitely recommend my friends and family to Red Mountain.
Let me start by saying I love Taco Bell so that shows my taste for Americanized mex food. Never been to a del taco but it was very good. Prices cheap outdoor seating and tacos what more could you want
My wife and I stopped in and I am glad we did! Nassar and his wife were extremely knowledgeable and friendly. They spent a lot of time showing my wife a number of different handmade pieces. They did not pressure us to buy anything and in fact disouraged us from purchasing a bracelet with the ring because it was just too much. Anytime we are in Scottsdale we will surely be back!
Came for breakfast. The breakfast tacos with hollandaise are awesome!
So I m not a big pastry guy nor do I often seek out such places. But heard a lot about this Cronut thing and thought would be nice to treat my visiting in laws. Place was far less busy on a Sunday morning than I expected so it was nice to have plenty of space for us especially since I m toting my baby boy. Pleasant ambiance assigned my focus is the food and is it worth the hype? Ordered Strawberry Pancakes for the ladies a Chocolate Cronut to share and had to get the Bacon Waffle Breakfast Sandwhich for myself. Dive right into the Cronut and gotta tell ya although I m a family man I had a hard time sharing this thing. The chocolate filling matched up perfectly with the subtle donut croissant flavor. I was afraid it would all be too sweet but totally wrong. What an invention! I may have lost a year off my life with this breakfast but no doubt with it. Then to follow with great coffee and an excellent bacon sandwich this is now our official go to morning joint for visitors. Bread and Butter is worth the hype. Just wish I could ve tried their old sister store Meat and Three. If this is what they can do with dough and sugar ca not imagine how good the meat was!
BG Wild went above and beyond what was expected during our trip to Havasui Falls. We had a group of 27 women which would probably seem daunting for any guide. But Josh was incredible at working with all of us to make sure our trip was one to remember. He eased any of our fears and literally helped us put one foot in front of the next down the cliff to Mooney Falls. He helped prepare all the meals and helped cleanup. He answered all our incessant questions he helped our trip out of the canyon be seamless and helped make this trip one we will never forget. I would recommend Josh and BG Wild for anyone looking to make their trip the best they can!
I only tried a couple rolls here but they both were really good. The server recommend the pink lady to me so that s what I tried and she was right. I definitely want to check it out again and explore other rolls that they have.
Whether you are staying at the luxurious Fairmont Princess or just visiting Phoenix Scottsdale you wo not find a better restaurant than Bourbon Steak. My wife and I shared an 8 oz rare Filet Mignon baked potato delicious Brussels sprouts and a Farmer s salad. Bourbon Steak gladly split the entire order and threw in French Fries to boot! It was more than enough food for two. Bourbon Steak has now displaced Maestros Ruth s Chris and LG as our 1 restaurant for steak! There really is a difference in their Mesquite Grilled steak. Equally important the friendly personalized service from Stephanie made this a very special night. The key to success for Bourbon Steak the entire staff was equally attentive to back up Stephanie and make sure our dinner was an experience to remember. 5 stars for Stephanie the chef and the other staff members at Bourbon Steak! Don and Fay Hermosa Beach CA
This place serves great wings I d recommend the terriyaki sauce ones.
This was our first visit so we tried a little of everything garlic knots spinach and pepperoni rolls and cheese and met pizza. Every thing was fantastic! The sauce was amazing as well!!!!! Prices were reasonable. I ll be back!!!!!
Were seated with in few minutes of our 7pm Sunday ressies. Very busy but settled down by time we left. Two of us had large fideo soup 11 with tortillas 2.25 and create your fav pork carnitas w Rajas Y Crema 14. Comp chips salsa refried beans were more than enough and tasty. We were very happy with all of the food. The Rajas was just right for a mild sauce. Both large soup and 8oz pork was enough to take home leftovers. One thing I love about this place is option to sub fresh veggies for rice beans. Is a great mixture of green yellow squash carrots shrooms and onions. Service was top notch for the level of restaurant this is. All of the 4 staff we encountered was pleasant and efficient.
Professional and experienced stylist Stacy Holloway has a few tricks up her sleeve! She listens to my wants needs and concerns and never ever disappoints! My hair turns out stunningly beautiful every time!
First time we stayed in Vdara Hotel and we all love it. This hotel is so clean absolutely beautiful and very spacious. We had a stunning view of the Bellagio. This hotel has a bar downstairs and I had the best strawberry mojito. We ran out of time so never had the chance to dip in the pool. Two things negative about this hotel parking is valet only which is very inconvenient and toilet paper holder is broken. The best thing to do is park in Bellagio if you do not mind walking which we did almost every day. If it was not for the parking I would give this hotel five stars.
Really like Dr Tsai. He s very caring and easy to talk to. Best part is it s very easy to make an appointment and be seen. Rarely have to wait much past an appointment time and often they have same day appointments. Unfortunately he no longer takes my husband s insurance so we are back on the hunt for another PCP.
The freshest fish in town with the best sushi specials. I highly recommend this place!
Wow! The service here was very good. Our waitress took the time to answer any questions that we had on our first visit and the food was ready quite quickly. Definitely the best scrambled eggs with cheese I have had in awhile and their breakfast potatoes were delicious too. I will definitely have to come back to try the bacon jam as well as their Mac and cheese!
First time at this location still best shop in Las Vegas. I usually go to Henderson but they are both convenient staff is super knowledgeable and nice. Was fast Leah was great budtender great suggestions she knows the strains and the concentrate wax prices for everyone wish they had BOGOS tho cause it is expensive if you re from LA or CO but they have a huge menu theres something for everyone edibles topicals . Love Essence best shop in town. Must try
I ordered my son s birthday cake from here and could not have been happier! I love that it you can tell that the 1 priority of the Drago sisters is to make their customer happy. The passion for their job is real. It never feels like one of those bakeries that mass produce their product scribble Happy Birthday on the cake and overcharge you because they can. I emailed them a photograph of what I wanted the cake to look like and I think it came out way better than the picture I had emailed. For Easter I ordered a Tres Leches cake and that came out wonderfully as well. A few guests had never had Tres Leches before and they all came out big fans. This is the only bakery I m going to if I m in need of cake. I come here maybe once every two weeks when I m feeling like a chocolate chip cookie or another sweet treat and I always leave really happy.
By far the best nail salon I have ever been to. NUMBER 1! THEY ALL SPEAK ENGLISH!!! Personalized service with every color imaginable. A must if your looking for a LAVISH experience
No reviews? Oh my. Well it is a chain but it s a good chain. It has saved our taste buds more than once from the likes of Chili s and Applebee s. We love to eat here for a late lunch when there is not the hundreds of people waiting in line. I could eat most any of the appetizers except the fried macaroni too weird but love the corn cakes. I m a Chicken Romano kind of girl and my husband varies from the Steak Diane to the Shepard s Pie to lots of other things. I am so glad that they now have lunch portions. They are still too big for me to finish but at least I m not leaving an entire cow on my plate. We always wonder why they can have such a huge menu and still make most dishes taste terrific when other restaurants can barely make one thing well. The only thing we avoid is the cheesecake. I ve never liked cheesecake and my husband can take it or leave it. And after their huge portions he generally leaves it. Oh and did I mention the bar? Great drinks. I LOVE the smoothies. The decor is interesting in a Vegas kind of way. We come here a lot!
Great Ambiance and pretty people. The Dorsey is a hidden gem. It is located in the Venetian hotel so unless you are staying there or gambling in their casino you d miss it. The set up is very posh and well put together. A great place to have drinks and not feel like a disaster as can happen in LV. Seating was intimate. Couch style and we were easily accommodated to move to a larger area as our group expanded. We were moved to a cage like semi private area. Music fluctuated between 90s baby making music to Current Hip Hop hits. Cocktails were withing good moderation of alcohol. I would highly recommend Vodka Lime punch bowl. Not only is the presentation unique it was full of flavor and very refreshing. Not too overwhelmingly sweet. Serves from 4 6. Prices are on the higher side but you should expect that in LV ALWAYS. I will make my way back to The Dorsey on my next visit to Venetian LV. XOXO B
Great BBQ spot food is excellent. Portions were smaller then expected but very good.
Celebrated a birthday at Lola s and our party was a group of 5. The food was delicious and the service was great. The waiting time between apertizer and main course was perfect. The price of food and drinks was just right. The only suggestion for improvement is that the restaurant needs to replace the chairs. Main chairs had rips in them.
I love this store. I usually go to the Cardenas which is amazing too but this is much closer to my house. The various of fruits and veggies super excites me. I get tired of the same old same old at smiths. This place has everything. I also ordered some dinner to go. Large portions and great food for a great price!
Elite Bakery is greek run bakery just at corner of progress and kennedy and it been standing there for the last 20 years Its a small shop but you can get from greek grocery like olive oil to feta as well other things like dessert to cakes and it all good. The baklava is a must but there chocolates that wrapped in colour foiled is my favourite and the cakes are good 20 dollars for a cake is fair. Just about what you get at other places like Metro
Best Indian buffet in the area! The food options they have out are always good. They even have meat chicken ! Best saag paneer I have ever had! Do not forget to ask them to warm up the gulab jamun for you. Best served warm! Best part Indian music and videos blasting in the dining room. Gotta love it!
My husband and I booked the Atrium for our son s and daughter in law s rehearsal dinner. As some of us know when there s a special occasion there are no do overs. It s make it or break it and after meeting with Denise I felt as if she genuinely understood and embraced this concept. It was her goal from beginning to end to make our evening as special as the event should be. Whatever I requested from the chilled salad forks to ordering an off menu dessert Denise s answer was always the same. She d jot it down in her notebook and say Not a problem. We can do that. She suggested that we pre order and took it upon herself to email our guests the personalized menu and a follow up phone call if necessary which thankfully left me without that extra chore. But no matter how accommodating Denise was if the food was substandard the event would be deemed a disaster. I am please to say that the appetizers entrees and dessert were as excellent as her attitude. My Strip Steak that was paired with Crab Mashers rivaled Morton s in their heyday and my husband s Cedar Planked Salmon was moist and perfectly prepared. From the edible art that was presented on 3 tables on one side of the fountain that graces this elegantly rustic room to the center pieces on our tables the staff that anticipating our every need Chef Tom s flexibility and execution of his menu from beginning to end there was no need for a do over at Matchworks Tavern.
They say what happens in Vegas stays in Vegas but this experience will be with me forever. This was one of the most amazing experiences of my life. The staff is amazing and the experience is exhilarating. If I lived there I would definitely have a new hobby! If you are in the area whether you live there or visit I 10 10 recommend you go! You will NOT regret it!
After so many let downs from other ramen shops in the city I must say I ve really enjoyed both of my experiences here. It was super spacious no wait times clean washrooms and the service was great. Raijin has chosen a prime location for both students and hungry shoppers from the Eaton Centre. What we ordered Tonkotsu Karamiso Ramen spicy miso flavoured egg 10.50 1.50 Tonkotsu Miso Ramen egg 10 1.50 Unlike other places their portions are large and the regular size bowl of noodles were very filling. Your options are small or regular and you can add extra noodles for 1.50. Considering the number of ramen options that Toronto has amassed within the past few years I would not put them at the top of my recommendation list but tied with Ryoji Ramen and Izakaya for the number 3 spot. Their noodles were nice and chewy which I liked and veggies were plentiful but I still favour Sansotei s egg and their creamy and rich broth is unbeatable. On the plus side if you ca not stand waiting in line in some cases out in the cold for a bowl of noodles then I m sure Raijin will be able to seat you faster than any other ramen shop nearby. This place is underrated. I ll be back. My ramen soul searching continues ... Parking street Hours 11 30 am 11 00 pm Vegetarian options available
Amazing food and intimate atmosphere...not a picky person when it comes to food but could not help but not rate this restaurant with all 5 stars. Boyfriend and I will be coming back and recommending this place to many of our friends and coworkers physicians nurses therapists etc.
My grandson loved the time he spend at CodaKid. He would love to return and asks about doing so all the time. While I think their prices align with their market I cannot afford it.
A tiny luncheonette with an eye catchingly blue exterior and a few tricks up its sleeve. Inside it s little more than a counter with a few other seats around it room maybe 20 in total. I came here for the poutine but noticed they also serve borscht so I got that as an appetizer. The borscht was more a creamy soup than the hearty vegetable soup you might be expecting and it was beautifully beety. The poutine was... poutine. The fries were fresh I saw them fried in front of me on the opposite side of the counter and were offered with an optional salad on the side which I got and which made me feel better about eating this for dinner. It was good but I think on the topic of poutine no matter how fresh and well received by others I have a heretical opinion I prefer New Jersey disco fries. Other details A fellow down the counter from me got an amazing looking burger platter it seemed like four burgers not exactly small on a plate with some salad. This was eaten by one man. I liked him immediately. I wished I d ordered this platter instead of my poutine. It s a teeny place again not fine dining and maybe not a place to take a first date but it s got charm and the folks working behind the counter are young and exude happiness. Anyway it was nice to sit here a while.
I got the chicken pho with broccoli and spring rolls to go on a hungover Sunday night. I was a bit scared as the ratings for pho did not seem that great and pho to go is always a let down. But it was one of the desperation things. I was extremely pleasantly surprised. It was large enough for me to eat two meals from so that was nice. The flavor was delicious. The only complaint would be no jalapeos but I had a fresh one at home so it worked out. The receptionist Paloma was very nice and helpful while I waited. She deserves a raise for her hard work!
Hate to write a great review for this restaurant it will be even harder to get in. Having said that it is fabulous! Never had a bad meal they make everything from scratch even the prosciutto. It is like being back in Tuscany. Even the coffee is terrific. Ca not wait to go back. Thank you Diners Drive ins and Dives for showing us this gem.
The best butcher shop we have ever gotten our meat from. Always fresh and the best cuts. Totally worth the 1 hour drive.
Hakka Advice as stated by Tanya G. Advice No. 1 If someone claims that Hakka food is just Indian Chinese fusion ignore everything they have to say thereafter because they are either uninformed stupid or lacking taste buds. Authentic Hakka food is made by Hakka Han people Chinese people who migrated to other places including India . Advice No. 2 If the owners proprietors of a Hakka restaurant are Chinese and they happen to have a slight strong Indian accent this is a good sign that the food will be delicious. Refer to Advice No. 1 to understand the relevance. Advice No. 3 If the owners proprietors of a Hakka restaurant are Indian this means that they re most likely trying to get in on the Hakka food scene and what you re actually eating is Indian Chinese fusion or their attempt at Hakka food. More than likely it ll be crap. Refer to Advice No. 1 to understand the relevance. Advice No. 4 Have cash on hand. Many places will take debit cards but most Asians prefer to deal with cash so simplify your life and theirs. Chilli Chicken House CCH is so legit that my mouth is watering right now thinking about the meals that I ve had. It s been 24 hours since my last CCH experience and already it seems too long. The fact that this place is now 1200 miles 1900 km for you Canucks away is only adding to my depressed state of mind. Their lunch special is 5.75 and includes an entre rice or fried rice noodles for a little extra and a spring roll. The spring roll is nothing special but it goes well enough with everything else. I have now tried the Manchurian Chicken Chili Chicken Manchurian Fish Szechuan Fish Shrimp Pakora and Fish Pakora. Everything. Is. Delicious. Obviously it s not the healthiest fare and I suppose if you want it to be slightly healthier you could ask that the entre be made dry instead of with sauce but sauce is the magic yo. If there is one thing that you must absolutely have though it s the Shrimp Pakora. They are amazeballs. No seriously they re actually balls filled with amaze. Top it off with a little bit of that garlicky gingery hot sauce they have on the table and it s just... pantomimes head exploding Service is amazing. Frequent checks by all staff smiles all around and even after the meal was paid for the water glasses kept getting filled. Well done sir s . Well done. I m going to say that if you do not like this place you re probably a terrible person.
These guys and gals are absolutely great!! Had somebody back into a vehicle of mine and pushed the fender in. Luckily the damage was minor however when I called and spoke to Dan he was kind enough to repair the damages FREE OF CHARGE did not have to wait either as he got one of his guys on it PRONTO!!! Aside from a tiny scratch you d never know the gender had been damaged! Hope you all enjoyed the 12 pack after hours!! Places and people like this is what builds a community again a MILLION thanks!! If and when you some Automotive Finishes repaired give these guys your business they actually earn it with GREAT Customer Service and Friendly Attitudes to boot!!
I m a huge fan of Fox Restaurant Concepts and The Henry was in line with my other favorite restaurants in this family. We went early before a concert and it was busy at 5 30pm in summer . It appears that they attract a big happy hour crowd. The set up is a little confusing if you ve never been here but the staff was friendly and welcoming. I loved the atmosphere and the food was yummy! I started with the strawberry rhubarb collins which was tasty and refreshing. The popovers were good but a little bland. I had the quinoa tacos and they were amazing. The tacos are small but full of flavor and surprisingly filing. I also tried my sister s chicken with creamed corn. Love the creamed corn! It s just like the corn at The Greene House. It sounds weird to be so excited about corn but it s really that good! I frequent other Fox restaurants that are closer to me but I would certainly return to this one if I m in the area!
Dina is a wonderful counselor and has helped me through a difficult time in my life. She is very accommodating and is always there when you need her.
Service was ON POINT. Loved the portions and the flavors were amazing. This particular location was once a Sizzler. The decor was nostalgic. Very relaxing breakfast.
I eat here once a week or so and am always happy with my delicious meal! The gentleman that owns the business almost always the one who makes my food and he s incrediby friendly kind and polite. The food is very tasty and reasonably priced plus you get free baklava! The entire place is always immaculately clean. I recommend all my friends go here if they re hungry and in the neighbourhood.
I should probably mention I ve only been here ONCE and very briefly. I d just finished my training session at my nearby gym and forgot to bring my own protein shake. I headed down to my favourite nearby juicery Fresh Juice which was closed surprisingly . Anyways I backtracked to Fuel which I only went to because it was conveniently a minute s walk away. And can I just say wow! The staff were so friendly I felt like I was actually conversing with friends. They make you feel welcome and as if helping you was the best part of their day very patient and informative when I was indecisive and curious about which protein shake would be best to get. Honest took me a good five minutes to decide but they were really helpful. I probably dread the protein shake part more than the workout part but theirs tasted nothing like whey. Thanks for the hospitality guys!
Came to have dinner with my daughter here. The place is nice but a bit too warm for my taste. The service is great and the food is pretty good. Their menu has quite a variety. You can chose from Japanese American or Thai I m sure this satisfies People in a large group . Either I m old do not get out enough or this is an Arizona thing because I have not noticed this back home. They have happy hour from 5 7 and then again from 9 11. I tried the chicken pad Thai. Everything was good just a bit too soupy actually way too soupy. My daughter had the sushi she loved the Las Vegas roll. She s a student at ASU and said she would frequent this place.
We definitely like the food. I mean like like. Very full of flavor and excited to taste every bite. However it was cold by the time we got to enjoy it. Word of warning the register is a nightmare. Very confused staff charged other people food to our bill. Then proceeded to help people behind us while waiting for the situation to be corrected. At one point the lead cashier or manager told my wife that we will get to you when we get to you . Even cold it was good but I really wanted it warm. If they can get their stuff together they would be 5 5. Update It looks like the cashiering and checkout problems are a thing of the past. Been twice since and the service was great.
WOW! Super service and reasonable rates. This review is a week late I m sorry! Moving into a new home can be stressful and we wanted fresh locks. I had called another highly recommended locksmith found on Yelp but got no response. Levi answered the phone immediately and offered to work on a Saturday afternoon! Talk about over the top customer service. I scheduled service for Monday and he was prompt. He explained options for traditional locks as well as key less entry systems. I m old fashioned and Levi provided new locks keys and a much needed sense of security after a difficult transition into our new home. Super nice guy! I would highly recommend him and DEFINITELY use his services again if necessary. Stop reading reviews on other locksmiths and call Levi.
So amazing! The chicken is amazing the milkshakes are amazing and the service is even better! Ashley and Erin are definitely the dynamic duo! Love this place! .... and the cherry on top is that my hubs and I both hit six spots playing keno!
My favorite sub place next to my work office
I ve ate at both locations now the downtown and downtown summerlin location.. Food is great.. a little overpriced for the portions but so yummy.. I tried the fat elvis and also the bacon pancake dippers.. soo good.. P
Much better then last time I was here! They have a new owner and the sushi is better. Its fun if you do not expect top quality sashimi. Just good cheap rolls and friendly service.
I have purchased food from lifestyle healthy foods and nutrition on and off for several months. Jayson has been evolving the menu and it has some really great choices. He offers different proportions. The food has great flavors and is always cooked perfectly. I swear the chicken and fish are always very moist. His snacks is a perfect alternative to the garbage i used to eat. You just cant beat the prices. So whether you dint have time to shop and cook or your trying to eat healthy this place can be a great goto for ready to eat healthy food. Btw the chocolate delight is one if my favorite snacks!
Do you like subway? Do you like chipotle? Do you like seafood? Then this is the place for you Kind of ! The ordering experience is reminiscent of creating your own subway sandwich or chipotle burrito except now you re creating a poke burrito or a poke bowl BOWL not BALL for all you Pokemon fans . I personally recommend creating your own bowl but I have yet to try the burrito. I do plan to come back and try the sushi burrito soon and if it s anything like the bowl it will not disappoint.
This restaurant does not look like much on the outside but inside it s lavish. They even showcase their cold wine room in glass. The food based on northern Thai was superb! We had the pad woon sen and their original dish kang ka noon made with Jack fruit 10.95 each. Both were delectable and a good size. Total price was 23.68 but worth it since it s fresh. The service was extremely friendly and patient with our order since they have a large menu! As Thai connoisseurs from LA since we frequent Thai Town often we recommend!
It s so obvious that the people who write lousy reviews for this place have never been here and are just jumping on the bandwagon. My wife and I and some friends went tonight expecting to see craziness and chaos and ended up eating some incredible food. They have a white pizza that was no joke the best pizza I ve ever had. I m a fatty... do not take that compliment lightly. I love pizza. This had this savory almost custard like sauce that blew my mind. The desserts are so amazing and rich they re obviously made with love. And lastly the owners were very gracious and so sweet. We visited with them at length. Leave these poor people alone already and actually try the food. You wo not be let down.
I MEAN WHERE DO I BEGIN?! DELICIOUS ALL AROUND! First off just get over the cost you come here cause you know who gordan ramsey is so just enjoy your time. That is exactly how we approached this dinner. We are by no where close to being sophisticated rich folk but we enjoyed every minute of this meal. It was fun and cool to be pampered all night by their amazing service. We got everything we wanted not looking at the costs at all and I recommend everyone do the same. For us it was our once in a lifetime meal. We will never spend that much on a meal again but damn it was worth it for the once. Service was the best I ve ever had. The server was knowledgeable I mean he rolled a cart of all the different cuts of meat to our table to show us what was what and which to get and not to get for which types of flavors we were looking for. It was a great experience. The helpers also kept folding our table napkins if we ever got up to go to the bathroom constantly coming over to make sure water was filled and that the table was clean. Ca not ding anything on the service that s for sure. To the food! We got the kobe beef which was 35 oz minimum 3 oz........ WORTH EVERY PENNY! It melted in our mouths the flavor was so good. I wish I could eat like that all the time but hey it was so nice to finally be able to say I tried it and I know how good meat should taste. I got the lobster wellington it had plenty of lobster and everything was cooked to perfection. The table also got several scallops sides which was tender and cooked well. Finally the dessert it was soooo good apparently some award winning one but all I know is that it melted in my mouth and it came out warm but not overly hot. Again we enjoyed every part of our meal. We each spent approximately 150 200 per person but we were full to the brim and every dish was worth it. Definitely wish I could be back but only if I win the lottery. Happy eating!
I have been to Compliments a few times over the years mostly because anytime I would come into town to visit my mother would take me to get pampered with massages and manicures but also to see Janna the hair guru of the year. I come from a family full of women who are very particular about their hair myself included so when the hair queen of the Fosters my mom recommended her I had to go in to fix the mess that was created previously by the hair artist in Houston. Janna is wonderful she knows what she is doing and can certainly work a pair of shears. I would highly recommend her if you are looking for someone young and refreshing with good ideas. Their salon is more upscale and they use Bumble and bumble and Epicuren products which are always great. The salon is super clean and everyone that works there is extremely friendly and helpful. They all have beverage service which is always a plus. I ve also had a massage by Beth who is AWESOME! Extremely profession and just a very good masseur. For nails Debbie is great and definitely see Robyn for a facial. Their prices are typical for spa services you can get a full listing of services an products on their website www.complimentssalonandspa.com.
Jameh is the newest Korean drinking spot in North York. It is basically a sojubang pork belly restaurant. If you are looking for a party atmosphere with nice lighting and lots of noise this is the place. Eating here made me feel as though I was transported to Sinsa dong.
A better version of The Great Dane in pretty much every aspect. Great beer selection with a rotating crowd pleasing food menu. Now if only they d open up locations downtown in Fitchburg the east side and Wausau...
Being a vegetarian every time I came to Smith s just next door I could not help but become overwhelmed by the awesome smell that came from this place. So I had to bring mom to taste it and give me a full review. She said the wings were awesome and would love to come back but they were not as good as hers. I also learned they have chicken tenders and will have to come and try those for myself considering I have jumped off the veggie train after ten years and dying to see if the taste matches the aroma. Come and check this hidden gem out if you are a fan of good chicken. My nostrils and Mom s taste buds are saying you probably will not be disappointed.
This was a find. The service was really good and they just brought us a ton of tasty dishes. quite frankly I m not sure what we had but it was all great. Lots of unique dishes at this place. Some of the items can be really really saucy but otherwise it was great. I will definitely be back and maybe with a review with more details. They have really cool japanese soda. It was a little sweet but fairly tasty.
Came here to get my eyebrows waxed! Shatara is amazing she takes her time and is thorough has a great conversation with you to help make you feel comfortable.
Great bang for your buck. I have the monthly spray tan package and after 2 spray tans a month it pays for itself . Great way to look tan without damaging sun rays They always have great deals on the Lotions too
Great experience! The front office staff was very friendly...I typically hate going to the dentist due to having so many fillings in the past from having such a sweet tooth but this time around I came to have a tooth pulled. Dr. Huang made the process as smooth as possible. The actual procedure was quick and painless and no pain whatsoever during recovery. Definitely would recommend this dental office to anyone!
This place was pricey. By pricey I mean I spent around 7 on 2 donuts. That s a little outrageous to me but when you take into consideration the fact that 1. You re in Vegas 2. You re presumably on vacation 3. THE DONUTS ARE ALSO OUTRAGEOUS then it makes sense. I had the strawberry shortcake and it contained enough sugar and melty goodness to hold me over for a couple of weeks. Seriously. So sweet but so indulgent and delicious. No regrets.
Okay its a bit ridiculous when people come and mark down a store because its not what they wanted it to be. Do I give an Italian restaurant a bad review because they do not serve great Thai food? That s ludicrous! Empire Games is a store for Miniature war gaming sure they have some other stuff but the focus is on miniature war gaming. They are awesome at it and know their stuff very well. I live in Phoenix but I will drive all the way out just for advice on painting ridiculously small figurines. Glenn and Bri D s review of this store that is not to their liking has some good info but is grossly unfair to the store. If you need sporting goods you go to Sports Authority or something like it. If you need someone who REALLY knows running shoes go to runners den. This is the Runner s Den of Miniature Warfare games I believe the name even refers to Warhammer 40K but I could be wrong . Runner s Den does not have baseball bats... why should Empire Games have a full stock of Euro games?
Oh man! The food was great!! I got the French toast eggs ham and hash browns!! Everything was PHENOMENAL! My boyfriend got the Mr. Mamas burger and holy moly! It is the size of the water cup! He loved it and everything was made quick! Very impressed. When we come back to Vegas we will DEFINITELY be stopping here again! Our waitress was very friendly and quick! Loved it here!
Do not be fooled by the name they have great burritos and the space is a bit more upscale than a shack. This place sits a notch above your local bertos think of it as a local genuine option to chain fast casual places. I appreciate the fact there are several veg burrito options including one with soy sausage. The in house red and green sauce is standard and good they also do offer a selection of unique bottled hot sauces to add some more spice.
Snoh has been around for a few years and they were the originators of shaved ice in the valley. I used to be lukewarm on it but it s grown on me a little bit each successive time that I ve come. This location in particular is bigger and a bit more convenient than the original location. The shaved ice itself is pretty flavorful and I always get either the condensed milk glaze or the black sesame glaze for a little extra flavor. Service is quick and they have board games and big tables around so that you can hang out. Definitely lighter than ice cream and I think it tastes better than most ice cream places anyway!
Can I review a place based on one drink alone? Sure! Why the heck not?! This location is quite new. There are several throughout the city. The patio is quite large. There are a mix of high tables low tables and outdoor sofas. We were there just to enjoy the nice weather and to have a drink. Service was very friendly attentive and efficient. I would definitely go back to enjoy the outdoor space and to try some of the food as well.
Just got sushi from here it s by far the nicest sushi I have had since arriving in Toronto. The tuna avocado roll was delicious.
My favorite sushi place ever! This is a super great privately owned restaurant that the owners chefs take great pride in. One of the owners Moe is incredible. I love sitting at the bar and chatting with them while they make the dishes. I love asking Moe for some of his recommendations and to to surprised me because there always the most unique rolls I ve had. Definitely ask for the hand roll!
My boyfriend and I needed a dress and tux for a black tie event. They took us without an appointment and helped me find a dress that was beautiful. Betsy did the alterations and my dress fit like a glove. I have never received so many complements on a dress and my boyfriend looked like James Bond! Thank you so much!
Honestly I hope people try this place. I realize there are a million and one nail salons in the area but this place was so amazing. We walked in with no appointment for two pedicures and two manicures. They welcomed us in. The owner and her son took such good care of us and made sure everything was perfect. I highly recommend the VIP spa pedicure. The parrafin wax and hot stone massage are amazing. The salon is extremely clean. Try this one out!
Let me start by saying we have been here many times on account of it being very close to home as well as the awesome collection of liquor as well as hard to find beers. Jamison is the best bartender employee ever! He always takes care of us with a smile! One time I bought a case of Ninkasi and since he knew it was my favorite he gave me a glass just because. Well today I came in for a beer tasting and after a couple went to the bathroom. After a few minutes Jamison came over to our table with my PURSE which I had accidentally left in the stall! Needless to say he saved my entire life by returning my purse which I d accidentally dunkenly left behind in the bathroom! I tried to thank him profusely by giving him money which he tried to refuse but he still smiled and said it was just the right thing to do! Whoever might be reading this Jamison is a real asset to your establishment! I ca not thank him enough! We will continue to patronize your awesome establishment not simply because of your selection of beer liquor but because of Jamison and the other employees like him! Thanks again Jamison!...for saving my life!
I spontaneously decided to get my hair colored on my day off and and remembered a coworker of mine telling me about this place and how she loves her hair dresser Scarlett and so I decided to see if by chance she could squeeze me in sometime that day and thankfully she had a spot open! The staff was beyond nice. I walked in the door and Scarlett s assistant jessica I believe was her name came and brought me over to her chair and asked me questions and offered a drink. Then I was introduced to Scarlett who really listened to what i wanted and also gave me her opinions and what i really loved is that she took the time to look at my facial features and told me what she thought would be the best haircut for my face. Throughout the whole process Scarlett and her assistant were very nice and professional. I ve already recommended her to friends and co workers! I absolutely LOVE the color and cut Of my hair! I keep getting compliments!! I will keep going to her forever!!
The food is excellent at Seafood Connection! Im from Maryland and now seafood and crabs. I love the addition of sides and grilled items too.
My friend suggested Blaze Pizza before our movie at Yonge Dundas and the moment he said you can add as many toppings as you want for free I was hooked. When I walked up to the counter I was greeted by a friendly staff member who asked me if I had ever been here before. When I said no she proceeded to explain how I order my options etc. For the indecisive they have signature pizzas you can choose from like the Meat Eater Veg Out BBQ Chicken or you can go completely rogue and build your own pizza using their selection of meats cheeses veggies and sauces. I opted to start out with one of their signature pizzas the Veg with half half sauce then I added a slew of other toppings to create my delicious masterpiece. All the build your own pizzas cost 10.45 regardless of how many toppings you add. I waited about 10 minutes after I ordered and paid and the pizza was ready! The pizza was quite good with a thin crust which I really enjoy and they also have a wall of hot sauces on the side so customers can help themselves. I have to say the staff are also very attentive and make a good effort to clean up tables as soon as possible. Blaze is a great concept and I can see why it s so popular. I would definitely return with friends and see where my pizza creating abilities take me.
I really enjoy Swiss chalet so yummy the chicken is the best when you are wanting comfort food I do not really order anything else cause the other food is not that great but when you can dine for 2 and get a deal that s normally when I come ! So yummy
our room had a great view of the mountains. The staff was polite and helpful with anything we needed. The layout is pretty similar to the other station casinos. The amenities are the standard but defiantly worth the resort fee. Our room was very clean and it was a pleasant visit.
While it s not a traditional park per se no jungle gyms few resting areas and walking trails Symphony Park is a pretty greenspace and great event space. You ll drop by here for a variety of local events including Summer Pops In the Park Beer Bourbon and BBQ Walk for Lupus Great Grapes etc. Because the space is so close to SouthPark mall you reap the convenience of fairly easy parking and exit. Additionally it s quite expansive and hosts an amphitheater so music can be played to the masses! While I have not actually walked around this park at a time other than a festival I imagine it would be quite lovely. Next time you read about an upcoming concert or festival in Symphony Park I d definitely check it out the venue supports loads of people and has maintained its beauty.
Superb pizza place in the heart of Squirrel Hill. There s a few pizza shops on this strip and while some are Pittsburgh staples and others are not this one is a true gem. Not many shops like this one in the city. Their gluten free menu is EXTENSIVE to say the least and the gluten free pizza is actually pretty good. However their regular pizza is a true contender to the pizza shops in the city. It s the right amount of salt flavory cheese gushy gobbely goop on a pizza. The dough is crispy yet hearty and the sauce is lite yet potent. It is also a bottle shop so grabbing a sixer on your way out the door is an option. Highly recommend.
The pizza here is so good!!! Especially after drinking... I ate 3 slices very quickly without chewing. I tried the meat pizza sausage peperoni etc and the veggie pizza which had a ton of veggies and garlic on it. Minutes later after I finished eating I went to lay down on the bed at the hotel. I started to develop a massive headache and felt really sick. Next thing you know my body could not hold the food down. I did not have food poisoning or anything but just found out I cannot eat garlic ever again after being hungover. The ride home to Cali from Vegas was so bad I felt bad for my friends in the same car as me. That s another story for the books...
The best bubble tea I had. Popping bubble was literally popping and the tea also tasted great! Yogurt Lychee was refreshing and sweet as well
really nice facilities relaxing atmosphere awesome mentholated steam room and hot sauna helpful staff. i had a brighten up facial with dianna and it was really really nice. the spa is extremely clean and relaxing. my only complaint is that my target massage with miranda was pretty terrible she was brusque and her technique was not worth the 85 for 25 minutes. my advice is that if you do not like the massage after 5 minutes or if you were shuddering from the masseuse poking her fingers in your back like i was ask for someone else surely an establishment as classy as the mirage spa will accommodate your request. my cousin really enjoyed her massage with a male whose name i ca not remember. just call and ask for someone good. also sample as much of the products in the bathroom as possible they re really expensive.
Dr Arnold is a no nonsense professional. His staff are always friendly and courteous. I would highly recommend him.
Everyone we come here it is such an enjoyable experience especially since we have gotten to know the staff. Michelle the manager always takes extra care of me and the girls to show us a good time and make sure we are comfortable. Cheers to good service and management! We will keep coming back for sure!
This is the best barber I ve ever been to not just in Arizona anywhere! Edgar is professional thorough and he takes pride in his work. I ve already recommended him to several of my friends and will continue to do so with confidence.
Great Nutella French toast and Nutella mini Crepe Anything with Nutella would be great to try and good service too Thanks
Just had my daughter discharged today and I have to say the staff is amazing. Dr. McGreevy and staff were thorough professional and personable. The hospital is spotless and they kept us informed of every step. So thankful to them for providing exceptional care. I highly recommend this hospital.
I FREAKIN LOVE THEIR BANH MI!!! GRILLED PORK IS AN ORGASMIC FLAVOR I HAVE TO TYPE IN ALL CAPS. I do not really get anything else besides the banh mi. I really do not want to rate the pho or bun bo hue because I am a really hard critic for those types of soups. I highly recommend their pork spring rolls they are better than any spring roll I have tasted from OC down to LA the Las Vegas spring roll from Pho Bosa WINS. Again do not forget to try that BANH MI!!!!!
Wow! What a great pizza. Pizza was absolutely fantastic. Service was friendly on the phone delivery was on time and courteous and the price was very reasonable. I ll want to try the restaurant now absolutely one of the best pizzas I ve had here and definitely beat any other delivery. Home run!
We used to order take out from here years ago. I finally had the chance to dine in and check out the restaurant. The menu is endless so you are guaranteed to find something for everyone. I enjoyed their hot n sour seafood soup and pork fried rice are my favs. They have really good chow Mein as well. Food is good quality. Service is always super friendly.
Definitely a must try if you are visiting Montreal. Extremely welcoming and friendly staff who make you feel right at home. Delicious poutine generous portions and fantastic prices. You can customize your poutine in any way you want which is such a beautiful thing.
When looking at this page on my web browser on my phone it said Yelpers report this location is closed which is so wrong ... It most certainly is not. We stopped by the Unibroue brewery around the corner because my husband thought they had a hospitality center and tours. Not so much. Hopping on the phone we found the Fourquet Fourchette was less than a half mile away so we hopped back in the car. Found it open. Not closed. Whew! The restaurant was completely empty it being 2pm but the back patio had a couple families and friends a nearby bike path trail seemed to lead straight here for a wonderful water side rest. We also noted that a wedding was going to be taking place so that was kind of cool. We got to clap and cheer for the bride and groom on their special day. We had the beset grilled cheese sandwiches ever followed by a monstrous charcuterie platter. Our waitress did not know the english words for some of the things on the tray but we did not care. We were gonna eat it anyway. So good. Could have used a couple more slices of toasted bread but overall... amazing. More than perfect for two of us. We enjoyed Maudite Ephemere Blonde de Chambly Raftman in bottle because it wa not available on tap and la fin du monde. We watched the wedding party enjoy Blonde de Orange which is kind of a mimosa with beer. I took a picture of one that was returned to the bar and wished that the bartender had given it to me instead of pouring it away... ah me. Heartbreaking. Gift store was a little expensive but we were there and bought some beer to take home and 2 beautiful glasses. Overall absolutely no complaints. Hearts and bellies full... the manager then asked if we liked beer history and recommended we swing by Bedondaine and Bedons Ronds. Which we greatly enjoyed. Beautiful setting beautiful day beautiful everything.
I recently shit my pants while having a picnic with my girlfriend. I waddled to the bathroom to relieve and clean myself up and noticed there were no stall doors. Anybody could of walked in and saw a grown man with shit all over himself. After i cleaned up i went to wash my hands and there was no soap!! Nice park though I caught many trout from that pond.
I love coming for date night here! The service is good and also the food is well priced. We ordered the chimichuri steak salad and I was floored at how amazing it was! The tickets are VERY adorable I am very happy we live so close to a great restaurant entrainment venue. Will always be a repetitive clients to this establishment.
I ve had this place a couple of times since have being introduced to it and today I decided to try the Shrimp Bowl with rice and beans topped off with cabbage or lettuce to your liking cottage cheese Chipotle sauce and a salsa of your liking red green. It was delicious and I seriously recommend having that bowl!
A giant pile of tasty Nachos downed with Modelo on the tap?? Love it! Great spot to hang out with friends and watch the game and eat some good Mexican american food. The fully loaded quesadilla is highly recommended as well.
This place never disappoints. I have been going here nonstop since 1986. The food and the people are both authentic. One of my favorites is the Nana s special for breakfast. I really enjoy the green pork chili. The tortillas are fresh and tasty. I ca not say enough good things about this restaurant. Be sure to ask for the hot sauce in addition to the regular salsa that they bring at the beginning of the meal with the very tasty chips. You will not be disappointed
Adam and the service team plus Chris are amazing!! Completely different from la location I go to. They are honest have a great sense of humor and really stride to make the customer feel special!! Amazing boys
Great food choices healthy options. Friendly service whimsical atmosphere. Try the fresh mint iced coffee. The avacado toast was decadent and the traditional brekkie satisfying. I do wish they would serve everyones dish at the same time. Good experience overall.
Great place to go for drinks! All their drinks are made with fresh squeezed juices and they are all delicious! This is not a fine dining restaurant so do not expect it to be. The food is good but I go here more for the cocktails and bar scene. If you are looking for a good drink and a snack then this place is for you!
What a gem in the southwest. Pastries are light and not too sweet or too heavy. The animal themed cream puff is adorable and they make crepes too
Thank you Dr. King for your response and I do understand what you are talking about although I am not an owner I am a manger at a small business. I have updated my rating to 5 stars because I feel that is accurate. I am feel grateful that you found a way to keep your business going. It is really a great place. I love the mix classes and all the instructors. Also I was not complaining about having to tip I just did not understand. I am glad that got cleared up and it is totally worth it!
I left my baby Duncan there for the weekend and boy did he have a great time! I loved watching their Facebook page for photos and videos. They were very attentive with his behavior and needs he s a bit of a shy guy sometimes and definitely has some confidence issues... Mirna made check in incredibly easy. Same with checkout The gal that helped me had a very specific report for me since she had a chance to spend a lot of time with him. And he did not come home smelling like a dirty dog park like he has coming home from other boarding places. They do not have a bunch of hidden fees and extras that they try to tack on. I actually found them through Groupon and honored the Groupon special without me having to purchase it Groupon takes a huge chunk fee out of what you pay for it I cannot wait to keep bringing him back for day care play dates. I actually think he is disappointed to be home with humans instead of surrounded by dogs! So worth the price even without any specialty coupons.
Looking to stray from the beaten path ie the strip when you re in Vegas? We were... and we did thanks to finding Happy Feet Spa on Yelp! Jared and I were with the YelpLADoesVegas crew and having a blast... and despite having incredible accommodations and not needing to leave the Aria property for anything at all we decided to go check this place out. Warning this place is in a shady looking strip mall and can be hard to miss from the street. Our taxi driver had a challenging time finding the address. But as the saying goes do not judge a book by it s cover. We walked in were shown to our massage chair beds and started relaxing immediately as our feet started soaking into the hot water buckets that our therapists brought out. I had Byron and Jared had Charlie both were awesome... As mentioned in the other reviews it s 20 for a full body massage tip ... and more than worth every penny. They even went above and beyond with using hot stones when they did our backs. This is not going to compare to a full spa experience at a fancy hotel on the strip but it is a damn good massage and only a small portion of the price!
Food was great a bit smaller menu selection than one would expect. The service was good. We were seated quickly 4th time here and have never had to wait . If you are looking for a good burger and fun atmosphere this is the place!
This place is amazing! One of the best foot spa in Las Vegas. It s very clean and they have friendly staff. Upon entering the spa their staff greeted us with warmth welcome. I told one of the staff that I have groupon and the I have two different kinds of groupon for me my boyfriend and his mom. They checked our groupon and told us to sit on the chair. My groupon is for shampoo and scalp massage and detox ion and the other two is for hot stone massage and detox ion. One of the staff told me follower him to the other room where they do the shampoo and scalp massage. Man I love the scalp massage and it was so relaxing. It was worth it he did it for about 30 mins and when it was done he blow dry my hair. He then told me to go back to the other room to do my detox ion. My boyfriend and his mom also enjoyed their hot stone and detox ion they said it was really good and relaxing. It was worth the money. I will definitely come back next time for different massage.
While on a girls vegas trip we ventured in for dinner. We ordered several different plates for everyone to share. The food was great the decor is amazing and the service was good. After dinner we ventured upstairs to the club they had great music but like most everything in vegas it caters to men. Half naked women in roman attire were hired as eye candy for the men I think they forgot that we need some eye candy as well.
I have been working with Melinda for about 10 years. Great cuts color and great conversations. In addition the shop has the best jewelry deal in town and darling clothes for the 15 to 40 crowd.
Mike and Kenny are great! They re super responsive and seem to be on top of everything. Found these guys from my friend who uses them for their Las Vegas properties. I ve also recommended them to family friends and friends who have property out there. They seem to be the only ones that know what they re doing in the desert and living standard conditions of Vegas area. You can see them in action with monthly bi monthly services. As for prices competitive and cheaper than other locations in the area. They re simple very responsive and seem to really be on top of it. Residential 25 per month 40 bi monthly or 65 one time. And of course it all varies depending on the size of you property. They re very knowledgeable. I was able to dig their brains on help for issues we are having on our property in California Los Angeles Los Feliz Area . Different from the desert conditions but same pests!!! As for the roach issue Mike was able to give me options and solutions....basically these pest situations need to be attacked asap before they re out of control and yes other units can affect it. Our HOA is useless and a hopeless cause. We may need to talk to the pest control in LA and have them implement Newmans Pest Control s strategy plan. As for the Las Vegas properties I believe Newman s Pest Control can handle all of them. Beware German roaches are the worse. They spread really quick and hatch over 100 eggs a day!!!!
Fat Tuesday is a great place to get strong drinks at good prices. This one is located in Mandalay Place which is just up the escalator from the Luxor casino floor. This is the only Fat Tuesday location at which I was carded thanks I guess? Drinks were strong and there was no line. No place to sit at this location but you re in Vegas so keep moving! One thing I loved about the plastic tumblers we got for cheaper refills was it has all the locations listed on the cup. We were never too far from our next drink!
Great work and super affordable. Will be going back for any other adjustments I may need she was also incredibly nice and professional! Habla espaol!